<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24630 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "cr00000005594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H2>   February Reports </H2>
<DATE1>  3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-014--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIAN PRESS BRIEFS - No 1 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
I.     EDUCATION 

   Training in Turkey--Under the aegis of the Mongolian Moslem 
Association more than 100 youths from Ulaanbaatar were sent to study 
at Turkish institutes and at secondary and religious schools in 
three- to five-year programs to qualify as doctors, engineers and 
managers, and foreign language specialists.  (ARDYN ERH 26 Aug 92 p 
1) 

   Transportation School Established--The Transportation School was 
established subordinate to the Technical University with N. Osorhuu, 
candidate of technical sciences and a department head at the 
Technical University, as its director.  (ARDYN ERH 29 Aug 92 p 1) 

   1992-1993 School year--For the 1992-1993 school year, 97,200 
children were enrolled in 909 kindergartens, 440,900 children 634 
general education schools and 45,900 students specialized education 
schools of all levels.  More than 32,000 teachers and educators 
worked in the kindergartens, schools and specialized education 
schools.  (ARDYN ERH 29 Aug 92 p 1) 

   II.  SOCIAL ISSUES 

   Mongolian Women's Committee Central Council--On 19 August 1992, 
the fourth extraordinary meeting of the Central Council of the 
Mongolian Women's Committee was held in Ulaanbaatar and focussed on 
organizational issues. 

   D. Monhoo was released from her duties as chairman of the central 
council because of her election to the Mongolian State Great Hural. 
Gonchigiyn Dashaa was elected chairman of the central council by 
majority vote and M. Monhbuyan deputy chairman unanimously.  (ARDYN 
ERH 22 Aug 92 p 
1) 

   Federation of Mongolian Trade Unions Membership--As of the 
Fifteenth Congress of Mongolian Trade Unions (no specific date 
given) the following trade union associations, identified with their 
leaders, were included in the Federation of Mongolian Trade Unions 
membership rolls: 

bot 
           Trade Union Association             Association Leader 

    1.  Association of Mongolian Trade 
        Unions for Industrial Workers            C. Baljinnyamn 

    2.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Motor Vehicle Workers                    S. Shuumarjab 

    3.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Construction Workers                     G. Bayart 

    4.  Free Association of Trade Unions 
        for Educational and Scientific 
        Workers                                  S. Ganbat 

    5.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        State, Public, Cultural and Artistic 
        Workers                                  D. Erdenebat 

    6.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Railroad Workers                         D. Damdin 

    7.  Association of Independent Trade 
        Unions for Transport, Communication 
        and Petroleum Workers                    P. Tseen 

    8.  Association of Independent Commerce 
        and Services Trade Unions                D. Tsiyen-Oydob 

    9.  Trade Union Association for Those 
        Employed in Agriculturally Related 
        Work                                     H. Ahmaan 

   10.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Health Workers                           P. Gantomor 

   11.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Agricultural and Food Industry 
        Workers                                  I. Dagbadorj 

   12.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Traditionally Individual Workers         J. Regdzen 

   13.  Association of Trade Unions for 
        Publishing and Information 
        Organization Workers and 
        Employees                                T. Baasansuren 
eot 

   The headquarters for the Association of Mongolian Trade Unions is 
located in Ulaanbaatar - 11, Sukhe Bator Square - 3.  (ARDYN ERH 28 
Aug 92 p 
4) 

   III.  BIOGRAPHIC 

   ADILBISH, DASHIYN--Ambassador extraordinary and plenipotentiary 
and veteran worker in state, administrative and mass organizations; 
died following an illness; born in 1917 in the territory of Taragt 
Somon, Oborhangay Aymag; since 1931 procurer for a consumer 
cooperative, driver for Mongoltrans and the State Small Hural, 
instructor and department head at the MPRP Central Committee, 
chairman of the Central Council of the Mongolian Trade Unions, 
ambassador extraordinary and plenipotentiary, minster of foreign 
affairs, chairman of the Executive Committee of the Association of 
Mongolian Peace and Friendship Organizations; elected candidate 
member and member of the Central Committee of the MPRP and several 
times deputy to the People's Great Hural; one of the veteran 
Mongolian diplomats involved in developing Mongolian friendship and 
cultural relations with other countries; awarded the title of 
Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary, Order of Suhke Bator, 
Distinguished Labor Red Banner, the Order to the North State two 
times, other medals and orders, medals by Hungary, Germany, 
Czechoslovakia, and medals by the World Peace Council; obituary 
concluded with the listing of the following:  Mongolian Ministry of 
Foreign Relations, the Central Council of the Federation of 
Mongolian Trade Unions, the Association of Peace and Friendship 
Organizations, and the Executive Committee of the Mongolian Veterans 
Association  (ARDYN ERH 26 Aug 92 p 4) 

   BYAMBAJAB, E.--Mongolian ambassador extraordinary and 
plenipotentiary to Kazakhstan  (ARDYN ERH 22 Aug 92 p 2) 

   CHOGJMOO, T.--Chairman of the Telephone and Radio Utilization 
Committee (ARDYN ERH 25 Aug 92 p 2) 

   CHADRAA, B.--Vice-president of the Mongolian Academy of Sciences, 
deputy chairman of the Nuclear Energy Commission subordinate to the 
Government, and academician (ARDYN ERH 29 Aug 92 p 1) 

   CHULUUNBAT, D.--Director of the ''Huryn shim'' Center subordinate 
to the Ministry of Nature and Environment  (ARDYN ERH 22 Aug 92 p 1) 

   DAMDINSUREN, B.--Deputy minister of science and education  (ARDYN 
ERH 25 Aug 92 p 1) 

   GANBAATAR, S.--Deputy director of the Main Communications Office 
(ARDYN ERH 28 Aug 92 p 3) 

   GANIBAL, J.--Mongolian ambassador extraordinary and 
plenipotentiary to the European Economic Community; born in 1947 in 
Ulaanbaatar; completed training at the Moscow City International 
Relations Institute in 1972; qualified as an international relations 
specialist; department director at the Ministry of Foreign Relations 
(ARDYN ERH 25 Aug 92 p 2) 

   LIGDEN, B.--chief editor of the newspaper ARDYN ERH  (26 Aug 92 p 
1) 

   NAMHAYJANTS, B.--Deputy minister of science and education  (ARDYN 
ERH 25 Aug 92 p 1) 

   NYAMBUU, H.--Head of the ethnography department of the Mongolian 
State University; candidate  (ARDYN ERH 29 Aug 92 P 4) 

   PUREBDAGBA, N.--Director of the Mongolian UNESCO section  (ARDYN 
ERH 25 Aug 92 p 1) 

   PUREBDORJ, L.--First deputy minister of finance  (ARDYN ERH 26 
Aug 92 p 2) 

   SHURA, N.--Chairman of the Executive Committee of the Mongolian 
Red Cross Society  (ARDYN ERH 25 Aug 92 p 2) 

   SANDALHAN, R.--Minister of roads and transportation and deputy 
chairman of the State Harvest Commission  (ARDYN ERH 22 Aug 92 p 2) 

   SUHBAATAR, T.--Deputy director of the State Social Welfare Office 
(ARDYN ERH 21 Aug 92 p 3) 

   TSEND, T.-- General director of the Mongolian Insurance Company 
(ARDYN ERH 28 Aug 92 p 3) 

   TSENDBAYAR, S.--Head of the Mongolian Association To Protect the 
Rights of Consumers  (ARDYN ERH 21 Aug 92 p 2) 

   TSOGTBAAR, DORJIYN--Minister of geology and mineral resources; 
born in Ulaanbaatar in 1954; graduated from the Mongolian State 
University in 1977; qualified as mining engineer; candidate of 
technical sciences; married; has children; since 1977 worked as 
engineer at the Erdenet General Administration, senior dispatcher at 
the open-pit mine and deputy department director; since 1980 senior 
engineer at the same industry administration, since 1986 specialist 
and senior specialist at the ministry of geology; since 1989 chief 
miner at the "Mongolchehoslobakmetall" Industry Main Administration, 
and since 1990 deputy director of the State Control Office 
subordinate to the Government  (ARDYN ERH 25 Aug 92 p 1) 

   TSOLMON, B.--Director of the License Bureau of the Foreign Policy 
Office of the Ministry of Trade and Industry  (ARDYN ERH 22 Aug 92 p 
2) 

   TSOODOL, S.--Candidate of medical sciences; chief infectious 
diseases specialist at the Ministry of Health  (ARDYN ERH 29 Aug 92 
p 3) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  ()UESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION, (703) 733- 
6375.) 
ENEAG/O1 FEB/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/PF 1/1949z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24631 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-01FEB94-DPRK-U. S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      DPRK Accuses U.S. of Bad Faith, Threatens NPT Withdrawal </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                         Protesting a series of recent developments concerning the Korean 
nuclear issue, Pyongyang has used unusually harsh language to 
accuse Washington of reneging on its "promises" and has 
threatened to reactivate the process of withdrawal from the 
Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT).  To add weight to this 
threat, Pyongyang is even hinting at a readiness to resume 
nuclear fuel reprocessing.  Nonetheless, Pyongyang's rhetoric has 
stopped short of ruling out a negotiated settlement of the 
nuclear issue. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

   Pyongyang's most recent pronouncement uses some of the harshest 
language employed in an authoritative statement since high-level 
U.S.-DPRK nuclear talks started last year.  The pronouncement, a 
31 January North Korean Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement, 
accused the United States of "a brazen-faced betrayal" and of 
having "completely reneged on promises" made to the DPRK by 
supporting the IAEA demands for "full-scope inspections" of North 
Korean nuclear facilities (Pyongyang radio, 31 January).  The 
statement warned that if Washington "persists in reneging on its 
promises to the end," Pyongyang will be "no longer bound by 
promises made to the United States."  The statement in effect 
indicated that North Korea would: 

   + Once again declare its intention to withdraw from the NPT. 

   + Lift its current "freeze" on "all nuclear activities "--a 
formulation that up to now has kept Pyongyang from refueling 
reactors or extracting plutonium from spent fuel. 

   + Reconsider its decision to eventually shut down its existing 
and prospective graphite-moderated reactors, which produce 
readily extractable plutonium. 

   Pyongyang is apparently trying to foster the impression that, if 
necessary, it is willing to risk aggravating its current 
international isolation.  Apparently to this end, the 31 January 
statement warned Washington against overvaluing the importance of 
bilateral talks to Pyongyang or miscalculating Pyongyang's 
eagerness for diplomatic recognition.  "We have lived up to now 
without relations with the United States," the statement 
declared, and "we can and will live that way forever." 
Intimating a willingness to face the consequences of a breakoff 
of contacts, the statement went on to declare that should the the 
United States adopt any other measures than dialogue, the DPRK 
will take "commensurate countermeasures." 

   Pyongyang's Stance     The 31 January statement mapped out what 
looks like a tough North Korean negotiating position on the 
inspection issue. 

   + It reiterated Pyongyang's earlier contention that just because 
Pyongyang has "temporarily suspended" the effectuation of its 
withdrawal from the NPT, this does not mean that North Korea 
regards itself as currently bound by the treaty's provisions.  In 
line with this contention, the statement maintained that North 
Korea's return to the NPT, along with the attendant requirements 
for full-scope IAEA inspections, can only be settled through 
future DPRK-U.S. negotiations. 

   + The statement also claimed that Washington had agreed "toward 
the end of last year" that Pyongyang would accept only limited 
nuclear inspections necessary to ensure the continuity of IAEA 
safeguards, pending further DPRK-U.S. talks.  The IAEA, the 
statement said, is now demanding full-scope inspections and 
Washington, "instead of making efforts to straighten out" the 
IAEA, is supporting its demands.  This, the statement said, 
constitutes a violation of the "spirit" of the "DPRK-U.S. 
agreement."  Moreover, the statement went on, the United States, 
in "a brazen-faced betrayal," is once again bringing up the issue 
of special inspections of "two military sites "--sites that the 
IAEA suspects to be nuclear waste storage facilities. 

   + In addition, the statement claimed, Washington had agreed to 
hold a third round of bilateral talks and call off Team Spirit 
military exercises.  In violation of this alleged agreement, the 
statement said, Washington is now claiming that unless Pyongyang 
accepts the IAEA's inspection demands, the third round of the 
DPRK-U.S. talks cannot be held and sanctions against North Korea 
will have to be entertained.  Moreover, according to the 
statement, the United States is "bent on" conducting "large-scale 
military exercises, including Team Spirit,"  and "U.S. official 
circles" are saying that if Team Spirit cannot be conducted, 
Washington plans to continue "other military exercises" in the 
South or "even in Hawaii." 

   The statement also complained about a recently reported visit to 
South Korea by CIA Director Woolsey.  It accused him of 
"plotting" to strengthen intelligence gathering against the 
North, which, the statement contended, "strongly suggests" full- 
fledged war preparations.  Nevertheless, the statement, 
continuing the effort to preserve dialogue with the Clinton 
Administration, asserted that it would be "U.S. hardline 
conservative forces" that would be held responsible should a 
"catastrophic situation" result. 

   Signs of Flexibility     In a move presumably designed to allow 
for negotiating room, the 31 January statement devoted relatively 
little attention to the issue of the potential deployment of 
Patriot missiles in South Korea.  The statement noted that 
Pyongyang "cannot overlook" any deployment of the Patriots, but 
stopped short of issuing an ultimatum on this issue.  Instead, it 
claimed that "hard-line conservative forces" in the United States 
are  hurrying" to deploy the missiles as part of an effort to 
gain "military supremacy" over the North.  It ridiculed as 
"sophistry" a statement attributed to a U.S. State Department 
spokesman that the missile deployment cannot be regarded as 
provocative, calling the potential deployment a "reckless, new 
war provocation." 

   Before the 31 January statement, the Patriot issue had generated 
- a number of pronouncements in the North Korean media, including 
comments by Pyongyang radio and KCNA (28 January), and a 
statement by a spokesman for the Committee for the quasi-official 
Committee for the Peaceful Reunification of the Fatherland (CPRF) 
(Pyongyang radio, 31 January).  While Pyongyang radio attacked 
U.S. "conservative forces and bellicose elements" for allegedly 
backing a Patriot deployment and warned of its consequences (28 
January), the CPRF statement mainly targeted South Koreans, 
appealing to them to "stage antiwar, antinuclear peace" 
activities and "more bravely fight the present rulers" of the 
South. 

   Implications     The harsh language of the authoritative Foreign 
Ministry spokesman's statement seems designed to project an image 
of North Korea's determination not to cave in to outside 
"pressure" on the nuclear issue and a willingness to face all the 
consequences.  At the same time, its failure to spell out 
specific demands, coupled with its effort to blame 
"conservatives" for complicating the issue, suggest that the 
North Korean leadership still hopes for a negotiated settlement. 

(AUTHOR: YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA 
DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 

EAG/BIETZ/DEW 03/0052Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24632 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-O2FEB94-CHINA-UK-HONG KONG 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Renews Threats of Economic Reprisals </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Intensifying     its ongoing effort to force the British Government 
to change its stance on Hong Kong, Beijing returned to 
specifically threatening economic reprisals against British 
companies unless London withdraws its support for Hong Kong 
Governor Christopher Patten's political reform program which was 
submitted to the Hong Kong legislature (Legco) in December 1993. 
This hard-line stance was most authoritatively expressed by Wu 
Yi, minister of foreign trade and economic cooperation (MOFTEC), 
who warned at a press conference on 28 January that the British 
Government's "uncooperative attitude" on Hong Kong "is likely to 
affect (yingxiang) Sino-British trade ties?? (Xinhua, 28 January). 
In addition to Wu, other Chinese officials have also recently 
gone on record as warning London of the negative economic 
consequences of supporting Patten.  According to Beijing's 
English-language paper China Daily, Tong Jiemin, deputy director 
general of MOFTEC's European affairs department, said that 
"bilateral economic and trade relations can hardly escape damage 
from an uncooperative and unfriendly Britain" (16-22 January). 
Similarly, Lu Ping--the State Council's director-general of the 
Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office--was reported by the PRC-owned 
Hong Kong daily Ta Kung Pao of 18 January as telling a group of 
Hong Kong businessmen that Britain, because of its stance on Hong 
Kong, "is now falling far behind" France and Germany in gaining 
access to China's "huge potential market." 
   Beijing's most recent explicit warnings to London on economic 
reprisals contrast with the previous circumspect ion evident in 
Premier Li Peng's remarks in mid-December just prior to the 
submission of Patten's partial reform bill to Legco.  At that 
time, Li had implied that Beijing was contemplating retaliatory 
measures--possibly including economic reprisals--if Patten 
submitted his reform bill, stating that "frankly speaking, it is 
hard to say that the unfriendly, uncooperative attitude of the 
British" will not "affect" bilateral relations in "other fields" 
(Beijing radio, 11 December 1993).  Chinese leaders were last 
observed to specifically threaten British firms with economic 
reprisals in late March 1993 when Li warned that Beijing planned 
to retaliate against British firms unless London withdrew its 
support for Patten's proposals.  PRC media subsequently portrayed 
Chinese officials as backing away from such hard-line threats of 
punitive economic measures against British investors. 
(AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ  cka 02/2115z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24633 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-02FEB94-CROATIA 
<H3> <TI>      Opposing Views of Pact Undermine Prospects for Detente </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Conflicting     interpretations between Zagreb and Belgrade of their 
recent agreement to begin normalizing relations suggests that the 
pact will do little to ease tensions between them.  Serb leaders 
continue to call for the creation of a Greater Serbia 
incorporating the so-called Republic of Serbian Krajina (RSK) in 
Croatia and Serb-held areas of Bosnia-Herzegovina into the FRY, 
while the Croats insist that the pact implies Belgrade's 
acceptance of Croatia's existing borders.  However, the agreement 
may also have been intended to serve as a signal to the Bosnian 
government of President Alija Izetbegovic that the Croats and 
Serbs are willing to cooperate in the Bosnian conflict despite 
their unresolved dispute. 

   Meeting on the periphery of the international peace talks on the 
Balkan crisis, Croatian President Franjo Tudjman and Slobodan 
Milosevic, president of the Republic of Serbia in the Federal 
Republic of Yugoslavia (FRY, including Montenegro), reached an 
agreement on 19 January to take steps toward normalizing 
relations between Croatia and the FRY.  Although Tudjman and 
Milosevic were the central figures involved in the talks, the 
brief "joint declaration" was signed by the two sides' foreign 
ministers since, as a republic president, Milosevic does not have 
the authority to sign agreements for the FRY.  The declaration 
stated that, "guided by the provisions of the UN Charter and the 
basic documents of the CSCE," Croatia and the FRY have agreed to 
"embark upon the process of normalization" of their relations. 
As a "first step in this direction," the two sides would open 
"official representative offices" in each other's capitals to 
"ease interstate relations and contacts" and "contribute to the 
development of mutual trust" (Tanjug, 19 January).  Both Zagreb 
and Belgrade have reported that one of the main purposes of the 
Geneva talks was to facilitate the reopening of communications 
and economic links both between Croatia and Serbia and within 
Croatia that were disrupted by the war between the Croats and the 
Krajina Serb separatists (Zagreb TV, 22 January; Borba, 1 
February). 

   A subsequent meeting between Croatian Foreign Minister Mate 
Granic and FRY Vice Premier Zeljko Simic established a framework 
for further talks.  Granic and Simic, in addition to discussing 
issues related to the reopening of communications links and the 
creation of a commission on displaced and missing persons, agreed 
that the two sides would meet monthly "at a high political level" 
to examine "all other issues of importance" for normalizing 
relations.  Meetings will take place on an alternating basis in 
Zagreb and Belgrade (Zagreb radio, 27 January).  Suggesting that, 
for their part, the Serbs want to continue the  negotiating 
process, Tanjug reported favorably that the 27 January session 
had taken place "in a highly tolerant atmosphere" (Tanjug, 27 
January). 

   At the same time, obstacles have already been put in the path of 
achieving detente.  RSK "Foreign Minister" Slobodan Jarcevic has 
announced that the Krajina Serbs will allow the opening of the 
Belgrade-Zagreb highway only in return for "certain concessions." 
The Serbs would set up "border crossings" and all those 
travelling through the RSK would be subject to Krajina laws. 
"Similar" concessions would be demanded for opening rail and 
telecommunications links (Borba, 1 February).  The Croats have 
adamantly refused to consider such demands in previous talks 
aimed at opening communications links through Krajina Serb 
territory (Vjesnik, 28 October 1993). 

   Expansive Croatian Interpretation 

   Tudjman immediately claimed that the agreement was tantamount to 
Belgrade's recognition of Croatia's existing borders and a 
retreat from its desire to incorporate Krajina into an expanded 
FRY (more commonly referred to as "Greater Serbia").  Although he 
acknowledged that the agreement did not "clearly" state that the 
FRY recognized Croatia's borders, he insisted that implicit in 
the declaration's references to the UN Charter and CSCE 
principles is "precisely" such recognition (See box).  Moreover, 
he insisted that the agreement meant Belgrade has "given up" the 
Krajina Serbs and acknowledged that the Serbs in Croatia must 
submit to the authority of the Croatian government (Zagreb TV, 19 
January).  Even after denials by the Belgrade leadership that the 
agreement signified the FRY's acceptance of Croatian sovereignty 
over Krajina, Tudjman insisted that his government is "on the 
right track" and that it had "found a way" to "liberate every 
square inch of Croatian soil" by peaceful means (Zagreb TV, 22 
January). 

   Other leaders echoed Tudjman's views.  Tudjman's chief of staff 
and general secretary of the ruling party, the Croatian 
Democratic Community, acknowledged that the document did not 
specifically refer to Belgrade's recognition of Croatia's borders 
but insisted that its reference to the "Republic of Croatia" 
implied such recognition because "it is completely clear to 
anyone" that the Republic of Croatia is that state and its 
borders that have been recognized by "over 100 countries."  He 
also insisted that references to the UN Charter and CSCE 
documents in the joint declaration imply Serb acceptance of 
Croatia's borders as "recognized internationally" (Danas, 25 
January). 

   Croatian Foreign Minister Granic hinted that Belgrade's adherence 
to Zagreb's interpretation of the joint declaration might help 
win an easing of the UN sanctions against the FRY.  In a speech 
to the Croatian parliament, he suggested that "several elements" 
of the agreement "could be relevant" to UN Security Resolution 
871 that links lifting of the sanctions to a resolution of the 
Krajina Serb issue as well as establishment of peace in Bosnia- 
Herzegovina.  He predicted that the agreement would lead to 
normalization of relations between Zagreb and Belgrade and would 
"have an impact on the position of minorities" in Croatia and the 
FRY "if the Serb side displays goodwill" (Zagreb radio, 26 
January). 

   Granic has also acknowledged that the Croat-Yugoslav agreement 
could be viewed as an attempt to isolate the Bosnian Muslims but 
has denied that this was the purpose of the joint declaration. 
Although he described all of the talks taking place about the 
crisis in the Balkans as "mutually interdependent," he dismissed 
the idea that the Croat-Yugoslav pact was intended to put 
pressure on the Bosnian Muslims, insisting that Croatia is "not 
conducting talks with anybody to the detriment of a third, absent 
party."  Granic maintained that Tudjman had recently offered 
"much more" to Izetbegovic during their meeting in Bonn in 
January than he had to Milosevic in Geneva (Zagreb radio, 26 
January). 

   Bosnian Connection 

   In contrast to the Croats' interpretation,  Belgrade has put more 
emphasis on the impact of the joint declaration on the peace 
process for Bosnia-Herzegovina and has narrowly interpreted the 
bilateral impact of the agreement.  In his statements to Belgrade 
television immediately after the joint declaration was signed, 
Milosevic emphasized the international negotiations in Geneva 
aimed at achieving a Bosnian peace and barely mentioned the 
Croat-Yugoslav bilateral agreement (Belgrade TV, 19 January).  On 
the previous day, he emphasized the "high degree of 
understanding" between the Serbs and Croats at the Geneva peace 
talks because the two sides arrived an "identical approach to 
solving" the Bosnian crisis without mentioning the negotiations 
about normalizing relations between Zagreb and Belgrade (Tanjug, 
18 January).  FRY Foreign Minister Vladislav Jovanovic 
specifically linked the Croat-Yugoslav agreement to the Bosnian 
war, asserting that, by signing the joint declaration and 
displaying a willingness to make peace, the Serbs and Croats had 
"unmasked the Muslim side, which proved itself [at the talks in 
Geneva] not to be interested in peace but in war" (Vecernje 
Novosti, 21 January). 

   Narrow Serbian Interpretation 

   Taking a much different view than the Croats of the meaning of 
the joint declaration as it relates to bilateral relations 
between Belgrade and Zagreb, Serb leaders have made it clear that 
they intend to press ahead with their plans to create a Greater 
Serbia.  While they profess support for the idea of normalizing 
relations with Croatia, Serb leaders and the Belgrade media have 
taken a much narrower view of the agreement: 

   Milosevic.  Typically, Milosevic was circumspect in his response 
to a question about whether the 19 January agreement implied 
Yugoslavia's recognition of Croatia's borders.  Without directly 
answering the question about recognition of Croatia's borders, he 
insisted, as he has in the past, that the question of the status 
of the RSK "can be settled only" by negotiations between the 
Croatian government and the Krajina Serbs.  By denying any role 
in helping to resolve the status of the Krajina Serbs, he 
appeared implicitly to indicate that he would not intercede to 
persuade the Serbs to compromise with the Tudjman government.  At 
the same time, he stressed that "all responsible Serb and Croat 
politicians must work on normalizing" relations (Tanjug, 19 
January). 

   Jovanovic.  Foreign Minister Jovanovic has emphatically and 
specifically denied that the joint declaration implied any 
diplomatic recognition of Croatia or of Croatian sovereignty over 
the RSK (See box).  Immediately after the 19 January announcement 
of the joint declaration in Geneva, he told a Belgrade TV 
interviewer that the agreement "means neither recognition nor the 
establishment of diplomatic relations."  He stressed that, 
despite the agreement, there were no grounds for "prejudging" the 
issue of the RSK, which would be decided by "direct negotiations" 
between the Krajina Serbs and the Croatian government (Belgrade 
TV, 19 January). Subsequently, in a letter to the UN Security 
Council, Jovanovic indicated that the Serbs viewed the reference 
to CSCE principles in the 19 January agreement quite differently 
than the Croats.  He reiterated the FRY's stand that the Krajina 
Serbs should be allowed to exercise the "right of self- 
determination" guaranteed by the "Helsinki final act of 1975" 
(Tanjug, 1 February). 

   RSK President Martic.  In the wake of the joint declaration, 
Milan Martic, who won the runoff election for "president" of the 
RSK on 23 January with strong backing by Milosevic-controlled 
Belgrade media, has emphatically refused to compromise on the 
Krajina Serbs' claim to independence from Croatia.  He told a 
Belgrade television interviewer that the Krajina Serbs will 
"negotiate peace" with the Croats on "how to live together as two 
neighboring countries" but that "under no circumstances" would 
the RSK revert to Croatian sovereignty (Belgrade TV, 28 January). 
Martic based his campaign for election on a platform that 
promised uncompromising support for the RSK's independence and 
unification with the FRY in a Greater Serbia.  In one statement 
he claimed that he received "some promises" that "unification 
could take place" by the end of 1994 (Vecernje Novosti, 18 
January).  Commenting on Martic's victory, a Belgrade television 
correspondent stressed that it should be "understood as a message 
to the world" that "not a single inch of this most western 
Serbian land will ever, under any circumstances, be part of 
Croatia" (Belgrade TV, 25 January). 

   Steps Toward Greater Serbia 

   Demonstrating the Serbs' resolve to create a unified Serbian 
state, the RSK and the Republic of Srpska (RS) in Bosnia- 
Herzegovina announced that they will adopt the newly introduced 
Yugoslav "super dinar" to facilitate economic integration.  Three 
days after the Belgrade-Zagreb joint declaration on normalizing 
ties, officials of the FRY, RSK, and RS announced a joint 
"economic recovery" program that would include recognizing the 
Yugoslav convertible dinar as a common currency.  Belgrade's 
National Bank of Yugoslavia will serve as the Serbian lands' 
central bank and the RSK and RS announced they would adopt 
economic programs that would dovetail with Belgrade's economic 
reforms that went into effect on 24 January (Tanjug, 22 January). 
Commenting on the economic program RS "Premier" Vladimir Lukic 
expressed the hope that all the Serbian republics would "soon be 
one political territory" (Belgrade TV, 22 January). 

   Prospects 

   Although Milosevic probably hopes that the agreement will help 
persuade the UN Security Council that the FRY is trying to 
fulfill the terms of Resolution 871 and Tudjman, under pressure 
from domestic political opponents, would like to show he is 
making progress toward reincorporating the Krajina Serbs, neither 
is likely to gain much from the 19 January joint declaration. 
Both the Croats and Serbs are likely to use the agreement as 
leverage to try to advance their goals at the expense of the 
other, suggesting that they will make little progress at actually 
normalizing relations.  While the liaison offices in Belgrade and 
Zagreb will serve to facilitate bilateral communication between 
the two governments, it is unlikely that the two sides will make 
much progress in opening communications in the near term. 
Opening of communications links will depend on agreements between 
the Tudjman government and the Krajina Serbs, and neither side 
has displayed much willingness to cooperate with each other over 
the past 3 years.  Even the most basic step toward normalization, 
a general ceasefire, remains tenuous at best with frequent 
violations on both sides.  Given this lack of cooperation, the 
joint declaration is unlikely to persuade the Muslims that they 
need fear a Belgrade-Zagreb condominium in Bosnia-Herzegovina. 

   BOX 

   The Two Opposing Views of the Agreement 

   Tudjman on the 19 January Agreement 

   We agreed in this declaration on the opening of offices--an 
office of the Republic of Croatia in Belgrade and an official 
office ... of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia in Zagreb.  This 
is a way to establish normal diplomatic relations, to achieve 
diplomatic recognition.  I remembered in this context that 
such offices were opened after [former U.S. Secretary of State] 
Kissinger's trip to China.  Therefore, this is an extremely 
important development. ... 

   I want to make this clear to everyone:  This is recognition of 
sovereign Croatia.  This is a possibility to incorporate 
peacefully, without casualties and new destruction, all those 
Croatian areas that are currently occupied or under UN protection 
into the constitutional and legal system of the Republic of 
Croatia (Zagreb TV, 22 January). 

   Jovanovic on the 19 January Agreement 

   This Yugoslav-Croatian agreement stresses the position of peace, 
which will strengthen the Serbian and Croatian positions in the 
peace process for Bosnia-Herzegovina....  By signing this 
agreement, our two sides have unmasked the Muslim side, which 
proved itself [at the talks in Geneva] not to be interested in 
peace but in war.... 

   The joint statement is very clear and there are no ambiguities in 
it.  The only thing that is stated in it is that two offices will 
be opened.  The statement does not mean either mutual recognition 
or the establishment of diplomatic relations.  It does not offer 
solutions to any political problems.  If this were the case, it 
would have been mentioned in the text (Vecernje Novosti, 21 
January). 

   END BOX 

(AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, ELAG, (703) 733-6120) 
ELAG/GILISON/ta 03/0035z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24634 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-O2FEB94-CHINA-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Sees Continued Obstacles to Better Relations </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                        Although clearly welcoming the recent spate of high-level Sino- 
U.S. exchanges, Beijing has remained cautious about the prospect 
for improving bilateral relations, identifying the U.S. position 
on human rights, the question of most-favored-nation (MFN) 
trading status for China, and the Sino-U.S. trade deficit as 
obstacles that continue to hinder stronger ties to Washington. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Reflecting its happiness with the continued expansion of high- 
level contacts, Beijing was upbeat in assessing the significance 
of U.S. Treasury Secretary Lloyd Bentsen's 19-22 January visit to 
China and the 24 January meeting between Secretary of State 
Warren Christopher and PRC Foreign Minster Qian Qichen in Paris. 
Meeting with Secretary Bentsen on 19 January, PRC Premier Li Peng 
took a positive view of the visit, claiming that it would 
"strongly promote" the development of bilateral ties (Xinhua, 19 
January).  Qian also praised his meeting with Secretary of State 
Christopher, describing it as "positive and constructive" in 
remarks to reporters after the meeting on the 24th (Xinhua, 24 
January). 
   Commentary on Secretary Bentsen's visit in PRC media and in the 
PRC-owned Hong Kong press was even more upbeat in assessing the 
results.  A 22 January Xinhua commentary, for example, said that 
the resurrection of the Sino-U.S. Joint Economic Commission, 
which met for the first time in six years during the Treasury 
secretary's visit, and the conclusion of a new Sino-U.S. textile 
accord marked a "major step toward a new stage" in trade and 
economic cooperation.  A 22 January editorial in the PRC-owned 
Hong Kong Daily Wen Wei Po effusively claimed that the visit had 
made "inspiring achievements and had vigorously promoted" 
bilateral trade and economic relations.  The editorial went on to 
praise the statement issued by the Joint Economic Commission as a 
"successful attempt" to handle bilateral economic ties, saying 
that it had set up a "new framework for close economic and trade 
relations." 
   Continued Obstacles 
   Despite its obvious pleasure at the increasing number of high- 
level Sino-U.S. contacts, Beijing has indicated that the U.S. 
position on human rights, the question of MFN trading status for 
China, and differences over the Sino-U.S. trade deficit continue 
to hamper the development of a "normal" relationship.  At his 
meeting with Secretary Bentsen on 19 January, for example, Li 
reiterated China's longstanding position on U.S. human rights 
demands, saying that the two sides, in handling "differences in 
ideological concepts and values," should "seek common ground 
while reserving differences."  In apparent reference to the MFN 
question, Li called on the United States to "seize the 
opportunity" created by the November summit meeting between 
Presidents Bill Clinton and Jiang Zemin and "do something 
practical and down-to-earth" in order to push Sino-U.S. relations 
back onto a "normal track" of development. 
   Media commentary on Secretary Bentsen's visit went even further 
in decrying the obstacles to better relations.  The 22 January 
Xinhua commentary, for example, complained that the trade deficit 
continues to "affect" bilateral ties.  It noted that, although 
there are now "sound grounds" for developing bilateral economic 
and trade ties, the "annual discussion" of MFN status for China 
continues to "cast a shadow" over the relationship.  Placing the 
burden for removing these obstacles on Washington, the article 
predicted that there would be "smooth development" of bilateral 
economic and trade ties if the MFN question was "permanently" 
resolved and that there would "surely" be a "remarkable increase" 
in Chinese imports from the United States if U.S. restrictions on 
exports to China were rescinded.  The 22 January Wen Wei Po 
editorial also portrayed the annual debate over China's MFN 
status and U.S. restrictions on exports as "obstructions" to 
Sino-U.S. trade.  Like the Xinhua commentary, the editorial 
called on Washington to take steps to resolve these issues, 
expressing the "hope" that the United Sates will do "more solid 
work and break away from quibbling over certain issues to 
vigorously make a new step forward." 
   Prospects 
   While Chinese leaders are clearly buoyed by the increasing number 
of high-level contacts with the United States, there is no media 
evidence at this time to suggest that Beijing is prepared to make 
significant changes in its position on human rights and the Sino- 
U.S. trade deficit in order to improve bilateral ties.  Routine 
media commentary continues to suggest that Beijing believes it 
can rely on the lure of the Chinese market and pressure from U.S. 
business interests to limit Washington's options on MFN, human 
rights, and trade deficit questions. 
(AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ  cka 02/2124z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24635 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000005994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-02FEB94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Signals Modest Concessions on Framework Issues </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                 Japanese media reporting suggests that the Japanese Government is 
prepared to make some modest concessions on selected U.S.-Japan 
trade framework issues, most notably those involving the 
automobile and auto parts sector and government procurement.  The 
pressure to make such concessions appears to be coming from parts 
of the government, mainly within the Ministry of Foreign Affairs 
(MOFA), that are reportedly increasingly concerned about the 
consequences of the hard line Tokyo has been taking in the 
framework talks.  At the same time, however, Tokyo appears to 
remain united in its opposition to any concessions on the issue 
of setting objective criteria to measure Japan's trade 
performance, suggesting concessions are unlikely in this area. 

                              END SUMMARY 

   The Japanese Government appears to be searching for ways to 
resolve the impasse in the Japan-U.S. framework negotiations and 
avert the failure of the 11 February summit between President 
Clinton and Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa by making some 
modest concessions in key areas, judging from Japanese press 
reporting.  In the automobile and auto parts sectors, for 
example, the government has begun to signal that it is prepared 
to work with the Japanese auto industry to devise a plan to 
increase Japanese purchases of U.S.-made autos and auto parts. 

   -- According to a 28 January Kyodo report, Sozaburo Okamatsu, 
Vice Minister of International Trade and Industry for 
International Affairs, told a press conference on 28 January that 
his ministry was urging the Japanese auto industry to take a 
"cooperative approach" to increasing imports of U.S.-made cars 
and auto parts.  Okamatsu reportedly stated that this approach, 
designed to dispel "mutual distrust" between Tokyo and 
Washington, would involve each automaker setting criteria, such 
as specifying the number of Japanese dealerships selling U.S.- 
made cars and the number of firms cooperating with U.S. auto 
parts makers to design parts for use in Japanese-made cars. 
Okamatsu reportedly added that these criteria would then be used 
to evaluate Japanese firms' import performance twice a year and 
to decide whether additional steps to increase imports were 
necessary. 

   -- In addition, the 24 January Mainichi Shimbun reported that the 
Japanese Government was broaching such a voluntary import plan 
with the Japanese auto industry, focusing particularly on the 
development of joint U.S.-Japan ventures to help U.S. firms 
design auto parts for use in Japanese-made cars. 

   The details of the Japanese Government's plans appear to still be 
under consideration.  While Okamatsu reportedly stated that the 
criteria he mentioned might be used to evaluate the performance 
of Japanese companies twice a year, the 2 February Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun reported the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) is broaching with Japanese automakers a plan under which 
each automaker would issue a yearly projection of the volume of 
specific U.S.-made items it would purchase.  This plan also 
reportedly involves reciprocal actions on the part of U.S. auto 
makers, including the submission of yearly projections of exports 
to Japan. 

   Another proposal under consideration appears to be the 
establishment of a third-party organ to assess the degree of 
foreign participation in the Japanese auto market.  According to 
the 2 February Nihon Keizai Shimbun, this proposal will be 
presented to U.S. Trade Representative Mickey Kantor during his 
current visit to Tokyo.  The paper stated that MITI envisions 
that the panel will be composed of scholars and the 
representatives of private companies and will assess both 
Japanese import performance and U.S. export efforts based on such 
criteria as the volume of Japanese automobile and auto parts 
imports and the number of sales outlets selling imported cars. 
According to Nihon Keizai Shimbun, MITI wants the criteria used 
by the panel to include the number of cars made by U.S. 
automakers--such as right-hand drive vehicles--tailored to the 
demands of the Japanese market. 

   Government Procurement 

   A second area where the government appears to be prepared to make 
concessions is government procurement.  According to the 28 
January Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Tokyo is drafting a new action 
program designed to make government procurement more open not 
only for public works projects but also for such areas as 
communications and medical equipment.  The paper reported that 
the draft program will expand the principle of open competitive 
bidding to all projects of more that 500,000 Special Drawing 
Rights (SDR) (down from the current 1 million SDRs).  The program 
will also introduce a comprehensive evaluation system that will 
take into consideration not only the price of items to be 
procured, but also such factors as performance, particularly for 
supercomputers; and will establish a neutral review board to 
arbitrate complaints related to government procurement.  Nihon 
Keizai Shimbun reported, however, that the review board will not 
have jurisdiction over some areas, most notably supercomputers. 

   In a further effort to signal its readiness to make government 
procurement more open, Tokyo reportedly plans to inaugurate a new 
government publication to announce upcoming projects.  According 
to the 1 February Nihon Keizai Shimbun, this publication has been 
tentatively named the Government Procurement Gazette and will be 
included in the action program for opening the government 
procurement market.  The gazette will reportedly consolidate 
information currently published in a number of different 
government publications and will be issued in both Japanese and 
English editions. 

   Pressure from MOFA 

   Some of these concessions may be the result of pressure from 
elements within the Foreign Ministry.  Japanese press reporting 
has suggested that key officials in MOFA are increasingly 
concerned about the impact that the impasse in the talks may have 
on the upcoming summit between President Clinton and Prime 
Minister Hosokawa, and more broadly, on relations between Japan 
and the United States in general.  According to the 26 January 
Sankei Shimbun, some MOFA officials increasingly believe that 
Japanese negotiators have become so involved in rebutting 
specific U.S. arguments that they have lost sight of the broad 
issues involved in the talks.  Sankei Shimbun reported that these 
officials believe that the broad U.S. argument--that the Japanese 
government procurement, automobile, auto parts and insurance 
markets are less open than U.S. and European markets and that 
intra-industry trade in underdeveloped--is "essentially correct." 
They reportedly are arguing that it is counterproductive for 
Japanese negotiators to keep insisting that the United States 
take steps to increase U.S. exports to Japan because this stance 
runs the risk of making Washington think that "Japan is trying to 
avoid the real issues."  According to Sankei Shimbun, some of the 
MOFA officials who support this line of argument have been 
pushing for Japan to make concessions in the automobile and auto 
parts sectors, suggesting that the Japanese auto industry could 
take steps to increase imports. 

   Recent statements by, or attributed to, MOFA officials tend to 
support the conclusion that some MOFA officials are pushing for a 
more flexible Japanese approach to the framework talks.  The 26 
January Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted Japanese Ambassador to the 
United States Takakazu Kuriyama as stating during a 25 January 
news conference in Washington that "Tokyo and Washington earlier 
agreed during construction talks to set criteria to assess the 
openness of the Japanese construction market.  This will serve as 
a precedent and will be good for reference."  The 2 February 
edition of the same paper reported that Kuriyama told Prime 
Minister Hosokawa on 1 February that the United States was taking 
"a tough approach to the framework talks" and that he hoped that 
Hosokawa would "exercise leadership to conclude the talks."  The 
1 February Asahi Shimbun cited an unnamed senior MOFA official as 
expressing concern that the framework negotiations might fail if 
the impasse is not resolved. 

   United Front Against Objective Criteria 

   Despite the signs of modest concessions and the divisions within 
the government over Tokyo's hardline stance in the framework 
talks, Tokyo appears to remain united in its opposition to 
setting objective criteria to measure Japan's trade performance. 

   -- During his news conference after the passage of the political 
reform bills on 29 January, Prime Minister Hosokawa said that 
although he had instructed Japanese officials to search for 
compromises in the framework talks, he believed that Japan should 
"clearly insist on our stance" (NHK Television, 29 January). 

   -- According to the 1 February Asahi Shimbun, Hosokawa and MITI 
head Hiroshi Kumagai during a 29 January meeting reconfirmed 
Japan's stance on the issue of objective criteria, stating that 
"matters to be discussed at the Japan-U.S. economic framework 
talks should be confined to what the government can do using its 
authority, and Japan will not set any numerical targets." 

   -- During a 1 February news conference, Foreign Minister Tsutomu 
Hata reportedly stated that Japan would never accept the setting 
of numerical targets, asserting that "such criteria run counter 
to Japanese Government efforts to promote deregulation" (Kyodo, 1 
February). 

   -- During a 27 January news conference, MITI Administrative Vice 
Minister Hideaki Kumano reportedly rejected a U.S. call for 
setting targets for the import of U.S. cars into Japan, calling 
it "out of the question" and "inconceivable" and arguing that 
"the Japanese Government cannot commit itself to goods that 
Japanese consumers buy" (Mainichi Shimbun, 28 January). 

   -- According to the 26 January Yomiuri Shimbun, Ambassador 
Kuriyama stated during a 25 January news conference that the 
United States "has been overly hasty in seeking trade results 
from the [framework] talks." 

   The Japanese Government appears to remain under considerable 
political pressure to maintain this stance.  Business leaders, 
who will provide critical financial support in future elections 
even under the new political reform legislation, have continued 
to press the government to oppose objective criteria.  According 
to the 31 January Mainichi Shimbun, a group of Japanese business 
leaders, including Takeshi Nagano, the President of the Japan 
Federation of Employers Associations and Shoichiro Toyoda, the 
Chairman of Toyota Motor Corporation, met with Prime Minister 
Hosokawa on 30 January to urge him to continue to oppose the 
setting of objective criteria to measure Japan's import 
performance. 

   The Japanese media, possibly with the encouragement of the 
Japanese Government, also appears to have fostered a climate of 
public opinion highly critical of the concept of objective 
criteria.  In addition to reporting the numerous statements of 
Japanese officials arguing against the concept of targets, the 
media has featured a variety of reports discrediting that 
concept.  For example, on 28 January, Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 
Japan's leading economic newspaper, reported that a group called 
the "Scholars Against Managed Trade," consisting of 154 Japanese 
and foreign economists and political scientists and headed by 
Kazuo Ueda, an economics professor at Tokyo University--which has 
close ties with the government--issued a "policy proposal" 
criticizing objective criteria as "something that promotes 
government-led managed trade."  According to Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun, the policy paper argued that if the Japanese Government 
accepted objective criteria, Japan would "face unreasonable trade 
demands from the United States" and be hit with U.S. sanctions if 
it failed to meet the criteria.  In addition, Japanese editorial 
opinion has continued to oppose numerical targets.  An editorial 
in the 31 January Asahi Shimbun, for example, described Japan's 
rejection of objective criteria as "reasonable" and warned that 
"setting target figures in individual trade fields is undesirable 
since it is what we call managed trade." 

   Outlook 

   As the 11 February summit approaches, Tokyo will probably make 
further modest, selected concessions on framework issues to avert 
failure of the summit and to avoid increased friction with the 
United States.  In order to maintain its argument that the 
Japanese Government cannot interfere with the private sector, 
Tokyo is likely to attempt to cloak these concessions as 
agreements between the private sectors in the United States and 
Japan.  However, the unanimity of opposition to the setting of 
objective criteria to measure Japan's trade performance--cutting 
across all the main political forces in Japan, including leading 
politicians, the bureaucracy, the business sector, and the media- 
-suggests that the Japanese Government will be reluctant, if not 
unable, to make any concessions in this area. 

   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/ta 03/0008z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24636 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-02FEB94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      Democrats Seek Unity for Election, With Limited Success </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              Ukrainian democrats have been making great efforts in recent 
months to unite for the 27 March legislative elections, trying to 
avoid the fate suffered by disorganized and mutually antagonistic 
Russian reformers in December.  As the nomination of candidates 
ends, however, they remain divided by personal rivalries and 
policy differences and have succeeded in uniting behind common 
candidates in only a limited number of districts.  Despite all 
the publicity for the parties, nonparty candidates nominated by 
the official establishment and industrial and agricultural 
organizations may win the most seats, aided by the winner-take- 
all election system mandated by the Ukraine's election law 

                         END SUMMARY 

   Ukrainian political parties have had ample time to organize and 
form alliances for the elections compared to their Russian 
counterparts, who had only two and a half months.  On 24 
September 1993 President Leonid Kravchuk signed a law passed by 
the Supreme Soviet setting parliamentary elections for 27 March 
1994 (Holos Ukrainy, 28 September 1993) and giving candidates 
until late January to collect the 300 signatures necessary to 
register (Vidomosti Verkhovnoi Rady Ukrainy, 30 November 1993). 
Russian parties were required to collect and submit 100,000 
signatures for registration within a little over a month after 
the announcement that the election would be held, and many failed 
to meet the 6 November deadline and were kept off the ballot. 

   In another significant divergence, the Russian election law was 
designed to strengthen parties by allocating one half of the 
State Duma's seats on the basis of party lists, while Ukraine 
adopted a pure majority system and other measures apparently 
intended to weaken parties.  The Ukrainian Supreme Soviet (in its 
"first reading" of the bill) on 10 November rejected proportional 
representation and retained the traditional system of district 
elections where candidates compete in a winner-take-all contest 
(Uryadovyy Kuryer, 13 November 1993).  Moreover, the Supreme 
Soviet compounded the blow against parties by adding, on the 
second and final reading of the bill on 18 November, a provision 
allowing labor collectives and trade unions, as well as parties, 
to nominate candidates (Kyivska Pravda, 19 November 1993; Ukraina 
Moloda, 28 December 1993).  Some trade unions decided to nominate 
their own candidates instead of cooperating with parties.  This 
hurt Rukh, for example, which had counted on an alliance with 
some trade unions to help it win seats in Donetsk (Ukraina 
Moloda, 28 December 1993).  Reflecting the law's devaluation of 
parties, when registration ended in late January, 1,768 
candidates had been nominated by labor collectives versus only 
707 by parties (UNIAN, 2 February).  (Apparently some party 
affiliated candidates have been nominated by "labor collectives" 
or "groups of electors," meaning that there really are more than 
707 party candidates.  A 28 January Kyivska Pravda article on 
candidate registration in Kiev Oblast said that parties nominated 
12 of their members locally but that in all, 46 party-affiliated 
candidates were running.) 

   In another contrast to the Russian election law, the Ukrainian 
law requires candidates to win a majority of votes cast 
(Vidomosti Verkhovnoi Rady Ukrainy, 30 November 1993).  Russian 
law requires only a plurality.  With 6,565 candidates running for 
450 seats (UNIAN, 2 February), many races will require runoffs, 
as in the 1990 parliamentary election.  The Ukrainian law orders 
runoffs held within two weeks after the first round, giving 
parties a short time to work out alliances for the runoff round. 

   Democrats Sign an Agreement 

   To avoid fragmenting their vote and thus risking elimination of 
their candidates on the first round, democratic parties have been 
striving to form blocs and set up structures to facilitate 
cooperation.  The Supreme Soviet's rejection of proportional 
representation spurred this movement further, since small parties 
have little chance of winning any seats under the majority, 
winner-take-all system.  Democratic parties took an important 
step toward unity in mid-October when 18 parties and 
organizations issued a declaration calling for cooperation in the 
election.  Although recognizing that "creation of a single 
electoral bloc of democratic parties and organizations to 
nominate a single bloc candidate in each electoral district is in 
practice impossible today," the parties agreed to "coordinate 
actions" by seeking to adopt a new election law providing for 
proportional representation or a mixed proportional 
representation-majority system, to agree on single candidates 
whenever possible, to attack only communists and not other 
democratic candidates, and to unite behind one democratic 
candidate if there are runoffs (Vecherniy Kiev, 20 October 1993). 

   A surprisingly wide array of democratic parties, including some 
that are usually mutually hostile, signed the declaration. 
Signers included Vyacheslav Chornovil's anti-Kravchuk Rukh; the 
pro-Kravchuk, anti-Chornovil Democratic Party of Ukraine (DemPU) 
and Ukrainian Republican Party (URP); and the less nationalistic, 
pro-reform, anti-Kravchuk New Ukraine and Party of Democratic 
Revival of Ukraine (PDVU); and even one of the rightwing parties 
on the fringe of the democratic classification--the Congress of 
Ukrainian Nationalists (KUN).  Of the democratic parties, only 
the anti-Chornovil National Rukh of Ukraine (VNRU), whose leader, 
Larysa Skoryk, opposed coordination and insisted that there be a 
choice of democratic candidates (Post-Postup, 30 December-5 
January), Anatoliy Matviyenko's centrist Labor Congress of 
Ukraine (TKU), Ihor Markulov's Donetsk-based pro-business Liberal 
Party of Ukraine, and Vladimir Zolotarev's pro-economic reform 
Constitutional Democrats did not sign.  Not surprisingly, most 
ultranationalists (the Ukrainian National Assembly, National 
Conservative Party, and Stepan Khmara's Ukrainian Conservative 
Republican Party), and, of course, the Communist Party of Ukraine 
(KPU) and parties close to it--the Socialist Party of Ukraine 
(SPU), Party of Labor, United Social Democratic Party, Peasant 
Party of Ukraine (SelPU), Peasant Union of Ukraine, and the Civil 
Congress--did not join. 
   Weak Coordinating Structures 

   The agreement's signers set up a coordinating structure but the 
structures were too weak to prevent parties from going their own 
ways.  The signatories--joined by the centrist Labor Congress 
(TKU)--on 11 November met to discuss creating a coordinating 
committee for the election but all they could agree on was to 
establish a procedure for party leaders to consult with each 
other on a weekly basis--a "Permanent Conference of Democratic 
Parties and Organizations of Ukraine" (UNIAN, 12 November 1993; 
Kievskiye Vedomosti, 16 November 1993).  Later they agreed to 
create a "Center for Promoting Ukraine's Democracy and 
Statehood," with former Rukh Chairman Ivan Drach, former URP 
Chairman Levko Lukyanenko, and Chornovil supporter Serhiy Odarych 
as co-chairmen (Holos Ukrainy, 11 December 1993).  Eventually 40 
organizations joined, including various groups of businessmen and 
entrepreneurs such as economic reformer Volodymyr Lanvoyy and the 
All-Ukrainian Association of Private Owners, which he recently 
founded, according to Lukyanenko (Molod Ukrainy, 11 January).  In 
the meantime, the PDVU and Party of Greens reportedly backed out, 
apparently feeling that the URP was using the center for its own 
benefit (UNIAN weekly "Views, Commentaries, Forecasts," 30 
December 1993).  The organization, by then referred to as the 
All-Ukrainian Electoral Committee of the Democratic Association 
bloc, met in early January to coordinate lists of candidates from 
member-parties (UNIAR, 4 January). 

   Democratic Blocs 

   The parties that signed the mid-October declaration were unable 
to form a single, unified democratic bloc.  Instead, three main 
election blocs emerged, based on existing movements--Rukh, the 
Congress of National Democratic Forces (KNDS), and New Ukraine. 
Weakness and divisions within New Ukraine prompted its leaders to 
form additional blocs, some with overlapping membership, to 
replace or supplement New Ukraine. 

   --Election 94     On 24 October Rukh passed a resolution calling 
for "centrist democratic" parties to unite against the 
communists, the "party of power" (i.e., Kravchuk and other 
government officials), and "right radicals" by creating an 
election bloc called the "Association of Democratic Forces 
'Election 94'" with oblast and election district branches 
(Vecherniy Kiev, 27 October 1993).  Rukh, led by Chornovil, is 
largely based in the west Ukraine.  It is nationalistic but 
stresses political and economic reform more than many other 
nationalist organizations, and it opposes Kravchuk. 

   --Congress of National Democratic Forces (KNDS)     Formed as a 
coalition in August 1992 by the anti-Chornovil national democrats 
(mainly the URP and DemPU), KNDS backs Kravchuk and puts 
protection of Ukrainian independence above political and economic 
reform. KNDS parties met on 3 November and scheduled a 19 
December congress, which converted the coalition into an election 
bloc and adopted an election platform (UNIAN, 4 November 1993; 
UNIAR, 19 December 1993). 

   --New Ukraine     The parties belonging to New Ukraine--an 
alliance of economic reformers based mostly in the russified east 
Ukraine and cool both to Ukrainian nationalism and Kravchuk--also 
set out to form an election bloc, but New Ukraine has been badly 
divided and weakened.  The Social Democratic Party of Ukraine 
quit New Ukraine in September (Holos Ukrainy, 21 September 1993), 
and the Party of Democratic Revival of Ukraine (PDVU), one of the 
biggest parties in New Ukraine and, according to PDVU leader 
Taras Stetskiv, "the glue that keeps New Ukraine together" (Post- 
Postup, 16-22 December 1993), began debating whether to remain in 
the bloc (Ukraina Moloda, 22 October 1993; Post-Postup, 16-22 
December 1993).  At New Ukraine's December congress, bloc leader 
Volodymyr Hrynyov pointed to the defeat of Arkadiy Volskiy's 
Civic Union in the Russian parliamentary election and warned that 
New Ukraine could realistically expect to win only 20 seats in 
new parliament (Demokratychna Ukraina, 25 December 1993).  As a 
result, New Ukraine leaders began forming new blocs to use in the 
election instead of or in addition to New Ukraine. 

   New Ukraine's Affiliates 

   In an attempt to broaden and strengthen New Ukraine's base, 
Hrynyov, PDVU Chairman Volodymyr Filenko, and others decided to 
set up a new bloc for the election, the "Democratic Center" 
(Post-Postup, 16-22 December 1993).  Filenko explained that "when 
it became obvious that New Ukraine was unprepared for the 
elections, we decided to establish the Democratic Center, which 
should become a new bloc of New Ukraine and PDVU" (Post-Postup, 
16-22 December 1993).  The announcement of the creation of the 
Democratic Center on 9 November was signed by 60 people from 
various parties, including Filenko, Supreme Soviet member Taras 
Stetskiv, Minister for Nationalities and Migration 0leksandr 
Yemets, and sociologist Volodymyr Khmelko from the PDVU, DemPU 
Chairman Volodymyr Yavorivskyy, and Labor Congress of Ukraine 
head Anatoliy Matviyenko.  Reflecting the eastern and New Ukraine 
origins of the Democratic Center, the signers included several 
non-nationalistic Kharkivites (Hrynyov, Filenko, and Kharkiv 
Mayor Yevhen Kushnaryov).  But the new organization also brought 
in Lviv activists such as former Deputy Premier and Economy 
Minister Viktor Pynzenyk, PDVU leader Stetskiv, and Supreme 
Soviet member Ihor Hryniv (Holos Ukrainy, 29 December 1993). 

   Proclaiming a "centrist position," the Democratic Center platform 
stressed economic reform and largely ignored nationalist themes. 
Diverging from national democrats' stress on Ukrainian statehood 
and independence, the platform, while condemning any "renewal of 
the USSR," declared that "calls for immediate withdrawal from the 
CIS do not consider harsh economic realities" (Holos Ukrainy, 29 
December 1993).  The organizers did not invite Chornovil to join 
(Khreshchatyk, 3 December 1993), and neither Rukh or URP joined 
(Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 20 November 1993).  Chornovil for his part 
said the new conference of democratic parties created in November 
had no intention of merging with the Democratic Center (UNIAN, 12 
November 1993). 

   Members of the Democratic Center group from Lviv--Stetskiv, 
Pynzenyk, and Hryniv--joined with other Lviv politicians such as 
former First Deputy Premier Ihor Yukhnovskyy, Supreme Soviet 
member Mykhaylo Kosiv, and some other members of Rukh and the URP 
to form a similar election coalition in their locality called 
"New Wave" (Nova Khvylya) (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 20 November 1993; 
UNIAN, 30 November 1993; Ukraina Moloda, 30 November 1993; Kiev 
Radio, 23 December 1993).  New Wave became a major factor in 
Lviv, nominating some of the most prominent Lviv figures on its 
ticket--Yukhnovskyy, Pynzenyk, and Hryniv (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 12 
January).  Rukh in effect also supported these three by not 
running candidates against them (Vysokyy Zamok, 4 January). 

   In addition to creating the Democratic Center, in early December 
New Ukraine Chairman Hrynyov joined with former Premier Leonid 
Kuchma to form an "Interregional Bloc for Reforms" (MBR). 
(Hrynyov's forming of a bloc with Kuchma brought criticism from 
Filenko and Stetskiv (Khreshchatyk, 18 January) and questions 
about how he can simultaneously lead three blocs, but Hrynyov 
pledged to press ahead with all three (Post-Postup, 16-22 
December 1993).)  Presenting themselves as an alternative to 
Kravchuk and the nationalists, Hrynyov and Kuchma declared that 
they had quit their posts of Supreme Soviet deputy chairman and 
premier because the government and Supreme Soviet were blocking 
reasonable economic policies (Nezavisimost, 10 December 1993). 
They proclaimed support for reform, regional rights, and closer 
partnership between Russia and Ukraine (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 8 
December 1993; Izvestiya, 17 December 1993). 

   This alliance of two of Ukraine's most prominent politicians, 
both popular in the heavily populated east Ukraine, raised a 
potentially powerful new force in the parliamentary elections and 
a significant threat to Kravchuk in the coming presidential 
elections, where either Hrynyov or Kuchma may run.  Hrynyov and 
Kuchma predicted their bloc could win 30-35 percent of the votes 
(Izvestiya, 17 December 1993).  Kuchma has strong support among 
industrialists and was elected president of the Ukrainian Union 
of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs (Ukrainskyy Soyuz 
Promyslovtsiv i Pidpryyemtsiv--USPP) at its December congress 
(Demokratychna Ukraina, 11 December 1993).  Hrynyov was already 
choosing candidates for the Supreme Soviet in his native Kharkiv 
and neighboring Dnipropetrovsk and has strong support in business 
and industry in the south as well as the east, according to a 16- 
22 December Post-Postup article. 

   The Labor Congress of Ukraine (TKU) in December set up another 
bloc, "Solidarity for Wellbeing and Progress," which is 
apparently favorable to Kuchma, as is the TKU itself, whose 
Dnipropetrovsk branch has nominated Kuchma for parliament (Kiev 
radio, 14 January).  This bloc is also aimed at business and non- 
nationalistic centrists with the objective of proposing "new 
approaches to social policy" and their own approach to market 
reform (Ukraina Moloda, 1 January).  The organizations joining 
the Solidarity bloc--the Union of Leasers and Small Enterprises, 
All-Ukrainian Association of Entrepreneurs, trade unions for air 
line workers and geologists, and several other small 
organizations--appeared similar to the ones that formed the TKU 
itself in April 1993, suggesting that the bloc is simply a new 
form of the TKU.  Like the TKU, the new bloc is centrist and 
stresses private ownership and cooperation with Russia (Kiev 
radio, 14 January). 

   Competition for Hrynyov and Kuchma 

   A group of businessmen and managers, the same constituency looked 
to by Kuchma and Hrynyov, spurred the creation of a potential 
rival bloc, "Hromada," at about the same time as Kuchma and 
Hrynyov formed their bloc.  In contrast to the Kuchma-Hrynyov 
bloc, Hromada appears more favorable to Kravchuk.  A founding 
congress of the "All-Ukrainian Association 'Society'" (Hromada or 
VOH) was held on 8 December, attended by a number of bankers and 
entrepreneurs (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 8 December; Segodnya, 15 
December 1993) and uniting, in the words of delegates, "former 
middle level Soviet economic nomenklatura" who have invested 
their capital in industry, "have something to lose," and want a 
party to represent their interests (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 11 
December 1993).  According to the 11 December Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta, the bloc was organized by Oleksandr Turchynov and Serhiy 
Lylyk, former Kuchma advisers.  They were named councillors to 
Premier Kuchma in June (Uryadovyy Kuryer, 8 June, 24 June 1993) 
but left the government in December (Uryadovyy Kuryer, 23 
December 1993), following Kuchma's September resignation.  Lylyk 
also was vice president of the Confederation of Enterprise 
Organizations "Ukraine-West" and one of New Ukraine's leaders 
(Holos Ukrainy, 30 June 1992).  According to Turchynov, however, 
Hromada has "nothing in common" with the Kuchma-Hrynyov bloc 
(Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 11 December 1993).  Although Turchynov, 
according to the 11 December Nezavisimaya Gazeta, stressed that 
Hromada is in opposition to the government, the 8 December 
Demokratychna Ukraina reported that he said the bloc would 
support Kravchuk.  Further suggesting ties between Hromada and 
the government, the 15 December Segodnya reported that the 
government had paid the rent for the hall where the bloc met. 

   Leftists Attempt to Unite 

   Communist and socialist oriented parties have attempted to form a 
united bloc for the elections but have succeeded in coordinating 
their activities only in some regions.  Communist Party (KPU) 
First Secretary Petro Symonenko at a 12 October press conference 
said his party may establish an election bloc with the Socialists 
(SPU), Peasant Party of Ukraine (SelPU), and Party of Social 
Justice and perhaps in the future with the Party of Labor (Post- 
Postup, 13 October 1993).  At the December SPU congress, the SPU, 
KPU, and SelPU signed a statement of intent to cooperate 
(Khreshchatyk, 28 December 1993), but the SPU and KPU clashed 
over nominations and the SPU decided to avoid any national 
coalition (Khreshchatyk, 11 January 1994).  The two parties have 
been able to unite only in some regions (Segodnya, 15 December 
1993).  In Odessa, 14 communist and allied leftist organizations 
formed a coordinating council, but the council split over some 
candidates (UNIAN, 10 January).  KPU Deputy Chairman Yevhen 
Marmazov declared that his party will not form a bloc with 
anyone, "but all of us--the Socialist, Communist, and Peasant 
Parties--will assist each other" (Post-Postup, 30 December-5 
January). 

   Little Cooperation Among Ultranationalists 

   Ultranationalists have not appeared to make great attempts to 
form blocs with like-minded extremists, even in the nationalist 
center of Lviv.  Stepan Khmara's Ukrainian Conservative 
Republican Party (UKRP) nominated 9 candidates in Lviv's 23 
districts.  UKRP backed some candidates of the ultranationalist 
Ukrainian National Assembly (including UNA Chairman Yuriy 
Shukhevych), one Congress of Ukrainian Nationalists (KUN) 
candidate, Irina Kalinets, and one Rukh candidate, Dmitriy 
Chobit, for other Lviv seats (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 5 January; 
Vysokyy Zamok, 6 January).  Pravda Ukrainy on 6 January reported 
that KUN had declared its intention of running candidates for all 
seats, backing away from forming joint lists with Rukh and other 
democratic parties.  (KUN, unlike other ultranationalist parties, 
had signed the October agreement to coordinate with democratic 
parties.)  KUN announced candidates for 15 of Lviv's 23 
districts, although it did back 3 candidates of other parties, 
including Rukh (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 4 January). 

   Efforts to Coordinate Nominations 

   As nominations of candidates began in early January, (According 
to the election law, nominations begin 90 days before the 
election (i.e., in late December) and end 60 days before the 
election (26 January) and candidates need to gather 300 
signatures (Vidomosti, 30 November 1993).) democratic parties' 
efforts to coordinate, beset by much friction, appeared to 
succeed in at least some cases, even though parties announced 
their slates of candidates for most seats.  No national alliances 
have been formed and various parties and blocs have united behind 
some candidates in various districts, producing a variety of 
combinations and suggesting that the result will be a 
kaleidoscope of multiple party labels. 

   Rukh, as the largest democratic party, appears torn between 
trying to field its own candidates in all districts and trying to 
cooperate with its rivals in the URP and DemPU.  At an early 
January session of the democratic parties' committee to 
coordinate lists of candidates, chaired by Chornovil rival 
Lukyanenko, Rukh was accused of violating agreements to 
coordinate by running its own slates in some areas, especially 
Kharkiv.  Rukh's Ivan Zayets justified Rukh's actions on grounds 
that other parties were too slow in deciding where to nominate 
candidates (UNIAR, 4 January).  According to another account, 
Lukyanenko complained that in Kherson 23 democratic organizations 
had united in a bloc but Rukh stayed out and he accused Rukh of 
intending to nominate candidates in all 450 Ukrainian districts. 
Rukh representatives responded that in Kherson the democratic 
organizations had united in support of Kravchuk and the local 
state administration--a position Rukh could not accept (Molod 
Ukrainy, 11 January). 

   Nevertheless, Rukh has apparently taken a number of steps to 
coordinate, agreeing to support a candidate from another party in 
some districts.  Rukh leader Les Tanyuk dropped out of a race in 
a Kiev district to give a clear field to a URP candidate and was 
nominated by Rukh for a Lviv seat, even though he is from Kiev 
(Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 4 January).  Lviv Rukh Chairman Yuriy 
Klyuchkovskiy said at the Lviv Rukh conference that Rukh had made 
concessions to other parties, especially the URP, by not running 
candidates in 5 districts, citing as an example Rukh's not 
fielding a candidate against Lviv URP Chairman Oleh Pavlyshyn. 
But, he complained, URP had not responded in kind and had gone 
ahead and run a candidate against Lviv Rukh Chairman 
Klyuchkovskyy in his district (Vysokyy Zamok, 4 January).  The 
Rukh conference had had to fight to block one of its members, a 
member of the present Supreme Soviet, from running againt 
Pavlyshyn (Vysokyy Zamok, Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 4 January).  Rukh 
also ran no candidates against New Wave's Pynzenyk and Ihor 
Hryniv, nominated New Wave's Yukhnovskyy on the Rukh ticket 
(Vysokyy Zamok, 11 January), and ran no one against URP Chairman 
Mykhaylo Horyn (Vysokyy Zamok, 4, 13 January).  At the same time, 
however, Rukh ran candidates for Lviv's other 18 districts 
(Vysokyy Zamok, 4 January). 

   Regional Variances 

   The success of coordination varies widely across Ukraine. 
Democrats are having some success in uniting in Lviv, but their 
foes seem more successful in forming blocs in Kharkiv, while 
Donetsk appears to be a general free-for-all. 

   --Lviv     The national democratic parties are having some 
success in coordinating in Lviv, although they are likely to win 
all seats in this nationalistic center anyway, as they did in the 
1990 parliamentary election.  Rukh, URP, New Wave, and possibly 
some ultranationalist candidates appear likely to split up the 
Lviv seats, in part by cooperating and in part by open 
competition.  After "tough negotiations" among democratic parties 
in Lviv's "political consultative council," according to the 28 
December Vysokyy Zamok, agreement was reached on common 
candidates in several districts, mainly between Rukh and URP--for 
example, for wellknown candidates Yukhnovskyy, Pynzenyk, URP 
Chairman Mykhaylo Horyn, and Lviv Oblast Soviet Chairman Mykola 
Horyn.  New Wave's Yukhnovskyy has the backing of Rukh and the 
Ukrainian Peasant Democratic Party, as well as his own party, and 
URP Chairman Horyn has the backing of the Ukrainian Peasant 
Democratic Party and no opposition from Rukh.  Serhiy Plachynda's 
Ukrainian Peasant Democratic Party announced 6 candidates in Lviv 
but also announced it would back New Wave's Yukhnovskyy, URP's 
Horyn, Rukh's Yaroslav Kendzior and Mykhaylo Kosiv, and UKRP's 
Stepan Khmara (Vysokyy Zamok, 18 January).  Although the Lviv 
Rukh and URP conferences chose slates of candidates covering most 
districts, their leaders indicated that the two parties may later 
alter these slates to further reduce mutual competition (Za Vilnu 
Ukrainu, 4 January). 

   --Kharkiv     Parties have formed several blocs in Kharkiv, 
according to a 2-8 December 1993 Post-Postup analysis.  The 
Communists (KPU) and Socialists (SPU) have formed an election 
bloc.  The Civil Congress and Party of Labor have formed a rival 
bloc, which professes to be anti-communist and pro-market, but 
all four parties have roughly similar views on other issues, are 
financed by the official trade unions and Kharkiv Scientific- 
Industrial Union, and occasionally cooperate.  Thus, the SPU, 
KPU, and Party of Labor combined to back at least one candidate, 
Viktor Chub, socialist head of the Kharkiv Union of Trade Unions. 
The Social Democratic Party (SDPU), Liberal Democratic Party, 
Christian Democrats, DemPU, and URP have formed a "Justice" bloc, 
but this is quite weak, according to Post-Postup.  (Later, the 
Liberal Democratic Party withdrew from the Justice bloc because a 
plank on federalism was dropped from the bloc's platform, 
according to UNIAR on 14 January).  New Ukraine should be an 
important bloc in Kharkiv but has been weakened since the Social 
Democratic Party and most of the Liberal Democratic Party quit, 
leaving only the PDVU and part of the LDP in New Ukraine. 

   Rukh has not joined any bloc in Kharkiv and has been debating 
whether to join with New Ukraine or with the URP and DemPU. 
Rukh's opportunities to form a bloc have been hurt by personal 
antagonism between the local URP-DemPU leaders and Rukh and by 
the local New Ukraine's coolness toward joining with Rukh. 
Another important party in Kharkiv, the Liberal Party, apparently 
is going it alone. 

   --Donetsk     In Donetsk, where non-nationalistic, eastern 
parties like the Liberal Party, KPU, and SPU are strong, there is 
apparently little cooperation among parties.  The Party of Labor 
and Party of Justice were organizing a joint election bloc, as 
were the Civil Congress and Party of Slavic Unity, but the 
Liberal Party intended to run candidates in all 47 districts and 
the KPU also was aiming to do so (Pravda Ukrainy, 18 January). 
Rukh had hoped to ally with labor unions in Donetsk to help it 
win in local districts, but the democratic trade unions created 
their own bloc--the Free Trade Unions of Ukraine--to run 
candidates, leaving Rukh out in the cold (Ukraina Moloda, 28 
December 1993). 


                     Registered Ukrainian Parties* 

Title                              Chairman           Members 

Christian-Democratic Party of 
Ukraine                          V. Zhuravskyy        12,000 
Civic Congress Ukraine           O. Bazilyuk,         1,500 
 (Donetsk)                       V. Meshcheryakov, 
                                 V. Terekhov 
Communist Party of Ukraine       P. Symonenko     120,000 
Congress of Ukrainian Nationalists  S. Stetsko    not given 
Constitutional-Democratic 
  Party                            V. Zolotarev       2,000 
Democratic Party of Ukraine        V. Yavorivskyy     3,000 
Labor Congress of Ukraine          A. Matviyenko      2,000 
Liberal-Democratic Party of 
  Ukraine                          V. Klimchuk        1,000 
Liberal Party of Ukraine           I. Markulov       10,000 
  (Donetsk) 
Organization of Ukrainian 
 Nationalists**                    Mykola Slyvka  not given 
Party of Democratic Revival 
  of Ukraine                       V. Filenko         2,500 
Party of Economic Revival of 
  Krym (Simferopol)                V. Shevyev     not given 
Party of Free Peasants of Ukraine  V. Hordiyenko      4,500 
Party of Greens of Ukraine         V. Kononov         1,500 
Party of Labor (Donetsk)           N. Azarov         10,000 
Party of National Salvation of 
  Ukraine (Dnipropetrovsk)         L. Yershov     not given 
Party of Slavic Unity              I. Karpenko        1,449 
Peasant Party of Ukraine           S. Dovhan          7,000 
  (Kherson) 
People's Party of Ukraine          L. Taburyanskyy    3,671 
  (Dnipropetrovsk) 
Rukh (People's Movement of 
  Ukraine                          V. Chornovil      62,000 

Social-Democratic Party of 
  Ukraine                         Yu. Sbitnev         2,000 
Socialist Party of Ukraine        O.  Moroz          90,000 
State Independence of Ukraine     V.  Shlemko***  not given 
Ukrainian Beer Lovers' Party      V.  Yermakov,       2,500 
                                  V.  Serhiyenko, 
                                  P.  Tarnovskyy 
Ukrainian Christian Democratic 
  Party (Lviv)                    V.  Sichko            350 
Ukrainian Conservative 
 Republican Party                 S.  Khmara          3,000 
Ukrainian National Conservative 
  Party                           V.  Radionov          500 
Ukrainian Party of Justice        M.  Hrechka        20,000 
Ukrainian Party of Solidarity 
  and Social Justice              E.  Lashutin        1,134 
Ukrainian Peasant Democratic 
  Party                           S.  Plachynda       5,000 
Ukrainian Republican Party        M.  Horyn          12,000 



   *Kievskiye Novosti on 19 November 1993 listed the 30 parties 
registered at that time, along with the number of members claimed 
and other data.  Parties are based in Kiev unless otherwise 
indicated. 

   **OUN was registered after the November list, as the 31st party, 
on 17 November (Kiev radio, 17 November; Demokratychna Ukraina, 
24 November; Post-Postup, 27 December 1993). 

   ***Shlemko was replaced by R. Koval at a December congress (Holos 
Ukrainy, 10 December 1993). 

   Implications 

   By preserving key features of the pre-reform electoral system- 
-majority voting and nominations from unions, farms, and 
factories--Kravchuk and other non-party-affiliated officials, 
including most members of the Supreme Soviet, have significantly 
raised the election odds in favor of the establishment, the 
amorphous "party of power" that still runs most areas of Ukraine. 
Locally well-known, but non-party, candidates backed by the 
government, industrial and agricultural establishments and 
President Kravchuk, Supreme Soviet Chairman Ivan Plyushch, and 
acting Premier Yukhym Zvyahilskyy, having arranged nominations 
from farms or factories, will probably win more seats than party 
candidates, especially in rural areas where parties are little 
developed. 

   The majoritarian system will-also favor large parties in areas 
where they are most dominant, but it will likely significantly 
penalize the democrats, who are more divided than the leftists. 
Rukh and the KNDS should run well in the west and Kiev city, and 
the Communists, Socialists, and the Party of Labor in the east, 
south, and rural areas.  Competing for the same moderately pro- 
reform constituency in the east, the Labor Congress of Ukraine, 
Liberal Party, New Ukraine, the Kuchma-Hrynyov bloc, and the 
Democratic Center could knock each other out in the first round 
if they are not able to increase their cooperation.  If they fail 
to achieve greater cooperation before the first round, democratic 
groups may get a second chance to cooperate between the first 
round and the runoffs, which will probably be necessary in many 
districts, but the democratic vote could be so fractionalized in 
some districts that no democrat survives for the runoff. 

   (AUTHOR: HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 03/0027z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24637 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-016--Mongolia 
<H3> <TI>      MONGOLIA:  KEY APPOINTMENTS, No 1, 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     FMN reports key appointments to the recently restructured 
State Security Administration and the Border Guard Administration. 

   Following the government's removal of the border army from the 
structure of the State Security Administration in compliance with 
the Law on the Defense of Mongolia and the State Border Law and 
subsequent structural and organizational changes made in the Border 
Guards Administration, the following appointments were announced: 

   D. Sandag director of the State Security Administration; 
   L. Gendenbaatar deputy director of the same; 
   Colonel P. Sundeb director of the Border Guards Administration; 
and 
   Lieutenant Colonel P. Dash chief of staff of the Border Guards. 

   Prior to their appointments, D. Sandag served at the Political 
Policy and Social Issues Research Center, P. Sundeb as chief of 
staff of the Border Guards, and P. Dash as director of the Border 
Department of the Border Guards Administration.  (ARDYN ERH 23 Dec 
93 p 1) 

(AUTHOR:  MIAB/CISD.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION, (703) 733- 
6375.) 
ENEAG/02 FEB/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/ta 03/0046z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24638 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   4 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING ITEM 
IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT 
IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS, 
ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT 
COMPONENTS) 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-03FEB94-CHINA-FRANCE-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Hints of Aircraft Purchases from Airbus </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
In     a move that could have serious implications for the U.S. 
aviation industry, Beijing has signaled that it is considering 
using aircraft purchases to further reward France for its recent 
pledge not to authorize arms sales to Taiwan.  In discussing 
China's tentative plans to buy "more than 40 planes" from the 
United States and Europe this year in a recent interview with 
China Daily, Ye Yigan, president of the China Aviation Supplies 
Corporation, seemed to make a special effort to imply that the 
French-based European consortium Airbus Industrie may have an 
edge in competing for those sales when he stated that 
"normalization" of Sino-French ties will "help" China's business 
with Airbus (3O January-5 February).  Pointing out that 
competition among "foreign companies" for a share of China's 
aviation market is "tough," Ye went on to suggest that China may 
shift more business to the French-based firm, noting that "in the 
future" Beijing will "further develop and improve" its relations 
with Airbus. 

Although it has been less than a month since China and France 
announced the restoration of bilateral ties, Beijing has already 
awarded a French firm a lucrative Guangzhou subway contract.  The 
Chinese government had previously diverted business contracts 
away from French firms to register its displeasure over the 
French decision of November 1992 to sell Mirage jet fighters to 
Taiwan. 

(AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (7O3) 733-6O97.) 

EAG/BIETZ/SDJ 03/20200z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24639 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   4 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-017--Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      UKRAINE:  PROGRESS, PROBLEMS IN ESTABLISHING A NAVY </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     Foreign Media Note reports on progress and problems 
encountered in establishing Ukraine's Navy and Naval Air Force. 

   Presentation of New Navy Commander 

   On 13 October Minister of Defense Colonel General Vitaliy 
Radetskyy presented the new Commander of the Navy, Vice Admiral V. 
Bezkorovaynyy, to the Navy command component in Sevastopol. 
Radetskyy expressed gratitude to outgoing Navy Commander B. Kozhyn 
for his significant contribution to the establishment of Ukraine's 
Navy and stressed that Ukraine, as a maritime state, must have its 
own navy.  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 14 Oct 93 p 1) 

   New Navy Commander Chairs Council Meeting 

   The newly appointed Commander of the Navy Vice Admiral Volodymyr 
Bezkorovaynyy chaired a meeting of the Military Council in 
Sevastopol.  Head of the Directorate for Cadres Captain 1st Rank V. 
Polevoy delivered a report to the Council on progress in bringing 
the officer corps up to strength and eliminating the shortfall 
between navy requirements and the projected number of graduates out 
to the year 2000.  He noted in particular that staffing for the 
Navy, Rear Services, and the Naval Aviation Directorate was at 60 
percent.  In his address to the Council Commander of Naval Aviation 
and Deputy Naval Forces Commander for Aviation Major General Mykola 
Volovin discussed the role of reconfiguring the Sevastopol Naval 
Institute in bringing naval aviation up to strength and training 
aviation specialists.  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 20 Nov 93 
p1) 

   Navy Commander Assesses Progress, Prospects 

   In an interview prepared on Ukrainian Armed Forces Day, Navy 
Commander Bezkorovaynyy pointed out that starting from almost 
nothing in April 1992 the Navy today has surface ship formations, 
marine sub-units, and almost 20 units of various types and staffing 
for the Navy Rear Services and the Naval Aviation Directorate is at 
6O percent.  He assessed the situation as follows: 

   "During the 1993 training year Naval Forces continued their work 
in forming and establishing control organs, guaranteeing the timely 
conducting of plant and state tests of ships under construction and 
their introduction to the body of forces on constant readiness, and 
also in guaranteeing control over navigation in the Black Sea Basin. 
Plans for combat, operational and mobilization training have been 
almost completely carried out.  Analysis of measures showed that the 
level of training of staff and command organs in the Navy has risen 
markedly in comparison with past years. 

   "An important result of this was the Navy's attainment of 
international recognition; foreign political and military leaders 
relate to us as to a state structure and an armed service branch of 
a maritime power.  Participation of Navy representatives in 
international symposia on military policy questions, speeches, 
exhibits of naval equipment and armaments, visits to Ukraine by 
warships of other countries, visits to our ships by highly placed 
personnel from several states, and meetings at Ukraine's naval 
headquarers with military and naval attaches bear witness to this. 

   "The concept of establishment of Naval Forces was made more 
precise in Ukraine's Basic Military Doctrine.  We have a clear view 
of this problem.  The basic principle in establishment and 
development of Ukraine's Navy is the optimum composition of a combat 
nucleus, sufficient to defend the State's interests against any 
possible agressor by sea.  Therefore, well-planned work must proceed 
for establishment of naval force sub-branches, especially surface 
and submarine forces, naval aviation, costal defense forces, 
formations and units of combat, special and rear services, and a 
scientific program."  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 6 Dec 93 P 
3) 

   Funding Problems 

   In an article commenting on difficulties in establishing the 
Navy, Captain 2nd Rank Myroslav Mamchak noted that the construction 
and repair of many ships has been frozen due to a lack of funds in 
the Ministry of Defense.  One "flagrant" example cited by Mamchak is 
the as yet unfinished aircraft carrier "Varyah," whose sale would 
generate substantial hard currency for the State, he noted.  The 
author further stated that the absence of a State program for 
establishing a Navy has precluded concentration of national security 
efforts against a threat from the-sea.  He discussed local 
contributions from the public to build and outfit warships bearing 
the regional name an alternate source of funds.  (Kiev NARODNA 
ARMIYA in Ukrainian 23 Dec 93 p2) 

   NARODNA ARMIYA cited such an example of moves to solicit funds 
from the populace to equip warships.  By agreement between rayon 
leaders and the naval command a campaign was begun in Syanynskyy 
Rayon, Ivano-Frankivsk Oblast, to collect funds to equip a newly 
built warship to bear the name Pokuttya.  A special bank account was 
established and 3.8 million karboantsy collected, of which 3.7 
million have been allotted to equip the ship.  According to the 
report, the remainder is in an account in the Ukraina Agrarian Bank 
for additional contributions at a later date.  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA 
in Ukrainian 14 Nov 93 p 1) 

   Naval Air Arm 

   The Ukrainian Naval Aviation Directorate was established in 
accordance with a Ministry of Defense decision and a Headquarters 
directive.  Major General Mykola Volovin was named Naval Aviation 
Commander, and experienced aviators were appointed to 60 percent of 
the positions.  The directorate is based at an air garrison near the 
city of Skay (Crimea).  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 6 Oct 93 p 
1) 

   Battalion Established in Sevastopol 

   A new battalion was established under the Sevastopol garrison 
commandant Vladimir Zverev to guard military installations, conduct 
patrols, and accompany freight trains. It was scheduled to begin 
service in mid-September.  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Russian 10 Sep 93 
p 1) 

   New ASW Ship Added to Fleet 
   Commander of Ukraine's Naval Forces Vice Admiral Vladimir 
Bezkorovaynyy, Ukraine's presidental representative in Sevastopol 
Ivan Yermakov, and Hero of the Soviet Union Vice Admiral (ret.) 
Vladimir Pilipenko greeted the arrival in Sevastopol of the new ASW 
(anti-submarine warfare) ship "Lutsk" on 21 November.  The "Lutsk" 
had just successfully completed sea trials in the Black Sea and was 
reported to be the fifth ship to fly the Navy flag.  Ship commander 
Captain 3rd Rank Viktor Zaremba praised the performance of his 
youthful crew, only 20 percent of whom had previously been to sea. 
(Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Russian 23 Nov 93 p 1) 

   The "Lutsk" was referred to as the fourth, rather than fifth such 
ship to fly the Ukrainian flag in an article published two weeks 
later.  Elaborating on the impact of economic difficulties on the 
ship's building, the article reported that for a time the fate of 
the "Lutsk" was in doubt:  construction was brought to a halt 
immediately after independence due to funding problems.  The fine 
points of funding--problems which were formerly resolved in Moscow- 
-were "not well understood in our newly established Ministry of 
Defense," and as a result the ship stood idle at the Kiev Ship 
Building plant.  The problems were subsequently resolved through the 
efforts of the Kiev shipbuilders and Military Acceptance Commission 
representatives Captain 1st Rank Petro Polyakov and Captain 3rd Rank 
Ihor Tyshchenko.  (Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 6 Dec 93 p 3) 

(AUTHOR:  STANLEY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733- 
6375.) 

ENEAG/03 FEB/MILFI/CIS DIVISION/SDJ 03/2106Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24640 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   4 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-O3FEB94-CHINA-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      China Warns Washington on Intellectual Property Rights </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Acknowledging  problems in implementing the January 1992 Sino-U.S. 
memorandum of understanding (MOU) on protecting intellectual 
property rights (IPR) in China, Beijing has announced new steps 
to enhance its protection of IPR, while also warning Washington 
not to make the issue an obstacle to better trade relations. 
Reflecting this dual approach, Minister of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation Wu Yi, in remarks to a press conference on 
28 January, took Washington to task for its alleged criticism of 
China's IPR protection efforts.  Complaining that the United 
States "does not understand" China's "positive measures" on IPR 
protection, she pointedly noted that the "level of IPR 
protection" in China has "surpassed the average world level" 
(Beijing TV, 28 January).  Wu went on to warn Washington not to 
make compliance with the MOU the focus of a "trade dispute" with 
China, saying that would be "extremely unwise for the U.S. 
Government to apply pressure" on China. 

At the same time, Wu indicated that Beijing recognizes the need 
to  continue to respond to the "demands" of foreign countries as 
well as to the growing internal pressures from its own market 
reforms for better IPR protection.  Announcing new steps to 
enhance Chinese protection efforts, she said that Beijing will 
begin a "universal" education campaign to enable "people across 
the country at different levels" to understand the "importance" 
of IPR protection.  In addition, Wu indicated that Beijing will 
"actively suggest" that IPR courts be established in "some key 
cities."  A 31 January report on Wu's press conference in 
Beijing's English-language paper China Daily indicated that the 
drive to establish special IPR courts has already begun, noting 
that "last week" a "patent court" had been set up in Haikou in 
Haninan Province.  Last August, Beijing's official press agency 
Xinhua had reported on initial efforts to set up a legal 
structure to handle IPR violations, announcing the establishment 
of a new court in Beijing to deal with IPR disputes. 

(AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 

EAG/BIETZ/SDJ 03/2129Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24641 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-04FEB94-VIETNAM-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Hanoi Welcomes Embargo End, Reaffirms MIA Cooperation </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
While     predictably welcoming President Bill Clinton's 3 February 
decision to lift the U.S. trade embargo against Vietnam, Hanoi 
has also sought to reassure U.S. critics of the decision by 
issuing a highly authoritative Foreign Ministry statement 
reaffirming Vietnam's continued willingness to cooperate in 
resolving the question of Americans missing in action (MIA) from 
the Indochina war.  The 4 February statement, while claiming that 
the decision had "opened a new page" in U.S.-Vietnamese 
relations, made it clear that Hanoi will continue to "cooperate 
fully" with Washington in resolving "pending" bilateral issues 
(Hanoi radio, 4 February).  The authoritative statement then went 
on to underscore Hanoi's longstanding position that the MIA issue 
is a "humanitarian concern not linked with political issues" and 
reaffirmed the willingness of the "Vietnamese Government and 
people" to continue to "cooperate in a constructive spirit" with 
the U.S. Government and American people in resolving the MIA 
question to the "fullest extent possible." 
   Hanoi's decision to use a highly authoritative Foreign Ministry 
statement to deliver its message on the MIA question is 
particularly notable, since such authoritative statements are 
rare.  For example, last year Hanoi issued only two such 
statements--one in March to protest the killing of Vietnamese 
residing in Cambodia (Hanoi radio, 12 March 1993) and the other 
in June to comment on the Cambodian elections (Hanoi radio, 3 
June 1993).  Hanoi last employed a Foreign Ministry statement to 
comment on the United States in May 1992 when it issued one to 
protest an agreement between Chinese and American oil companies 
to exploit oil and gas resources on Vietnam's continental shelf 
(Hanoi radio, 17 May 1992). 
(AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS ANDOR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL, ASIA 
DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/PF 4/2009z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24642 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   6 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-4FEB94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Seeks To Cool Economy, Control Inflation </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                             Reflecting increasing Chinese leadership concern over mounting 
inflation, Politburo standing committee member and central bank 
governor Zhu Rongji recently introduced a potentially 
controversial package of tough anti-inflation measures, which 
includes a plan for tight new controls over credit. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Zhu announced the new measures at the closing session of a 
national conference on financial work held from 12 to 15 January. 
While calling for continued implementation of key policies from 
the austerity program instituted last July to address the chaotic 
behavior in the financial sector, Zhu also unveiled a new 
hardline policy on credit expansion (Xinhua, 19 January). 
Ordering financial authorities to "strictly control" the "total 
credit supply," Zhu said that the "planned total credit line" 
must not be exceeded "even by one yuan" and that "investigation" 
will be carried out to ensure compliance.  He went on to back up 
his statement in warning against unauthorized bank lending. 

   Underscoring the importance the leadership appears to attach to 
the new program, the State Council immediately reinforced Zhu's 
demands, releasing a circular on 29 January calling for tight 
central control over investment (Xinhua, 29 January).  Echoing 
Zhu's speech, the circular stated that "in principle, no more new 
projects will be approved this year" in an effort to prevent 
"reckless and redundant" construction.  The circular also ordered 
tighter controls over the "sources of capital," urging further 
action against illicit fund-raising schemes employed at local 
levels.  Seeking to reassert strong central control over new 
investment projects, the circular went on to establish 
restrictive requirements for authorization and demanded strict 
screening and tight management of the approval process. 
Investments in real estate development and construction, in 
particular, it said must be "incorporated" into the state 
investment plan or they will lose their eligibility for loans. 

   Guarantees for Priority Projects 

   Perhaps still sensitive to criticism that his anti-inflationary 
economic policies last year shut off funding to important 
enterprises and projects, Zhu sought to reassure potential 
critics of the stringent credit controls of the leadership's 
standing commitment to a "soft landing" for the economy.  For 
example, he implied that loans for projects in "infrastructure 
and basic industry" would not be cut off, stating that they would 
be managed by a new "state development bank" in charge of policy- 
related lending.  Seeking to give added authority to his 
instructions, Zhu urged financial cadres to follow paramount 
leader Deng Xiaoping's instruction to avoid making the bank a 
"locked safe," just as it also should not be run "like a currency 
issuance company." 

   The 29 January State Council circular further reinforced Zhu's 
message, stipulating that the "needs of priority projects" should 
be "ensured" by "pooling together" financial resources.  It 
called on all regions and departments to "give priority" to 
completing major projects approved last year, including, for 
example, improvements in China's housing stock.  Similarly, a 24 
January article in the PRC weekly journal Liaowang by commentator 
"Bao Xin"--a forum frequently used by the leadership to 
illuminate its pronouncements--stated that the new restriction on 
the overall scale of investment "does not mean" that "no new 
investment" will be made in capital construction.  "Necessary" 
capital construction, according to the commentator, is a "major 
means" of sustaining the "lasting momentum" of economic 
development.  The commentator went on to reaffirm that "priority" 
should be given to basic industries and infrastructure projects, 
while the scale of other projects, including real estate, office 
buildings, and hotels, must be "resolutely cut down." 

   Motives 

   The need to check rising inflation appears to have made it 
politically possible for Beijing to call for the potentially 
painful economic measures.  In his speech, Zhu attributed the 
introduction of the new policies to the danger that "inflationary 
pressure could build up at any time."  PRC media had already 
served notice that inflation had begun to rise late last year. 
Judging from media reports citing State Statistical Bureau 
figures on cost of living increases in 35 Chinese cities, the 
urban inflation rate in December jumped 3.9 percent over the 
previous month's rate (Xinhua, 17 December; Zhongguo Xinwen She, 
20 January).  Adding to the leadership's worries were dramatic 
increases in the prices of grain, cooking oil, and other 
essential commodities beginning in November, which prompted an 
important State Council meeting on 25 December and calls for 
price controls on these products (Xinhua, 27 December 1993). 

   Implications 

   Beijing's introduction of tough new economic measures serves to 
underscore the party leadership's concern over inflation. 
However, the campaign faces a rough road ahead as it is likely to 
run up against stiff opposition, ranging from state enterprise 
advocates and provincial and local officials with a vested 
interest in investment-led growth to radical reformers promoting 
rapid growth.  Beijing's apparent inability to strictly enforce 
earlier central directives to cool investment also threatens to 
be a liability.  The political tug-of-war over inflation and 
investment is unlikely to end until Beijing makes good on its 
promise to establish a more independent banking system able to 
exercise sound economic judgment in allocating capital. 

(AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ/jf 05/0012Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24643 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   8 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-017--IRAN 
<H3> <TI>      IRAN: COMPLAINTS TO NEWSPAPER REFLECT ECONOMIC, </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SOCIAL           PROBLEMS, NO. 3 

   This is the third in a series of media notes based on the SALAM 
newspaper column "Hello, SALAM," which explores further the social 
problems perceived to be facing the Iranian public.  Some of the 
issues and complaints discussed, purportedly called in by individual 
Iranian citizens and often drawing comments by the paper, are: 
unemployment, differences between the Majles and the Voice and 
Vision, the disparity between social classes, the rising dollar, 
late payment of salaries, the high cost of living, medications 
shortages, high taxes and lawyers' fees.  The samples of the column 
published below are translated in full. 

   On Unemployment 

   Caller:  I am a veteran who spent 15 months at the front.  I have 
been unemployed since 1988.  Wherever I go, the answer is negative. 
I even referred to the President's office.  They told me:  "If there 
is work and a job is not given to you, we will investigate, but if 
there is no work, it is the problem of society."  Who is supposed to 
solve this problem?  What are we supposed to do if unemployed youths 
find themselves dragged into illicit activities.? 
   SALAM:   This is the second time we have published this message. 
This caller should send his resume in to us because a benefactor 
plans to assist him.  (SALAM, 23 Nov) 

   On Poverty 

   Caller:  A few days ago, at a traffic light on a crowded Tehran 
street, two grown girls along with their mother were asking with 
great insistance for money from passing drivers.  I spoke with one 
of the girls.  She said she was twelve and that one hour earlier a 
passenger in a car had called her an obscene name.  When she 
protested, the driver got out of his  car, grabbed her hand and 
tried to force her into his car to take her to the police station. 
Finally, with a great deal of difficulty, the mother, the girl, and 
other people succeeded in freeing her.  When I spoke to the mother, 
she told me that her husband had been bedridden for the last two 
years.  First, herself, and later, one by one, her daughters have 
been forced into begging to fight the ever increasing cost of 
living.  (SALAM, 23 Nov) 

   On Prisoners' Access to Press 

   Caller:  Now that Mr. 'Abdi's (SALAM's arrested editor-in chief) 
trial is to convene, after his being in detention for 90 days, has 
he been kept informed of news?  For example, does he receive SALAM 
and is he aware of everyday happenings? 
   SALAM:   It is highly unlikely that he has had access to radio or 
press, but it appears that he has access to books.  (SALAM, 24 Nov) 

   On Differences Between Majles and Voice and Vision 
   Caller:  I am very sorry about the differences that have come 
about between the Majles and the Voice and Vision because this will 
strike a blow to Islam and the well-being of the system.  This will 
cause the enemies of Islam to take advantage of this situation and 
create division. 
   SALAM:   Not all disagreements are bad.  Inquiries and 
investigations are among the rights of the Majles.  If we were to 
adopt the logic of this caller, then we would have to say that the 
Majles should not perform inquiries and investigations because of 
the potential for causing divisions.  Answering inquiries and doing 
investigations are also within the rights of the Voice and Vision, 
but not the way it proceeded.  The platform it assumed was improper. 
Voice and Vision had to answer queries either to the Majles or the 
judiciary.  (SALAM, 25 Nov) 

   On Restraining Anti-American Demonstrations 

   Caller:  Interior Minister Besharati promised to list the reasons 
for preventing anti American demonstrations by students.  He seems 
to have forgotten his promise; and you don't pursue it anymore 
either. 
   SALAM:   The Rasht deputy questioned him regarding this matter, 
which will be discussed and addressed soon in the Majles.  Will it 
be answered satisfactorily?  We'll have to wait and see.  (SALAM, 27 
Nov) 

   On Disparity Between Social Classes 

   Caller:  I am a student in the north of the city.  Our house is 
in the city's south.  When I return from the university, see the 
poverty of the people and compare it to the wealth in the north 
where people travel in cars, millions of them, I lose heart.  When I 
hear my classmate say that his uncle owns several factories, that he 
earns several million tomans a month and that he has capital 
amounting to several billion tomans, my heart bleeds.  And, now even 
the dollar is worth 200 tomans.  Isn't there anyone who can get to 
the root of this inflation and fix it.  (SALAM, 27 Nov) 

   On the Rising Dollar 

   Caller:  Regarding the rise of the dollar and the falling rial, I 
want to know what the banks are doing about fixed investments, which 
lose their rial value every day.  Do the banks guarantee the value 
of these deposits or not?  With the steady increase in the value of 
the dollar and the sharp fall of the rial, will depositors be given 
worthless paper at maturity or some money?  (SALAM, 27 Nov) 

   On Late Salaries 

   Caller:  I work for the metro system.  Every month our salaries 
are late by 10-15 days.  Please have the (authorities) look into 
this.  We are renters and have children in school.  They should at 
least let us know that they will be paying us every two months, so 
we can plan.  (SALAM, 30 Nov.) 

   On the High Cost of Living 

   Caller:  I  recently bought two packages of meat from the Molla 
Sadra (Meatpackers) Organization.  They weighed about 2.800 grams. 
Each package had about 700-800 grams of pure fat and the meat was 
not good quality either.  I figured that this meat, which should 
have sold for 440 tomans, in reality cost 600 tomans.  Are the 
officials in charge of the Neat Organization aware of the situation? 
I'm curious if this is the result of actions by the employees or of 
the government's policy. 

   SALAM:   This type of thing is not related to government policy. 
However, it might be that the Meat Organization will have to 
supervise the packaging process.  (SALAM 27 Nov) 

   Caller:  I am calling from Khorramabad and work in the office of 
communication.  On Wednesday one of our customers came to complain 
about his bill.  We verified it and told him that the bill was 
correct and he should pay it.  When he was leaving, he asked:  "What 
am I supposed to do, now?"  We told him to pay it.  "He said that my 
problem is something else.  I am a civil servant and earn 15,000 
tomans.  The telephone bill is 4,800,  the water bill is 6,000 and 
the electric bill is 2,800 for a total of 13,600.  Only 1,400 tomans 
are left.  I have three children and rent to pay.  Why don't you 
budget your charges so that I can know how to continue my life." 
would like you to publish this so that the public will become more 
sensitive to our problems.  (SALAM, 2 Dec.) 

   On Shortage of Medications 

   Caller:  One cannot find any aspirin in this country.  How does 
the Health Minister justify this? 
   SALAM:   The aspirin shortage is real.  Officials admit to its 
shortage and that of many other medications.  These shortages are 
simply the effect.  The real cause is the financial difficulties 
that have prevented pharmaceutical companies from producing 
medicines.  The president declared in recent weeks that these 
companies will receive financial assistance.  We have no information 
about how this promise will be kept, but many commonly needed 
medications are available.  (SALAM, 28 Nov) 

   On Taxes 

   Caller:  Aren't taxes collected by the government to provide 
comfort and service to the public?  What is the reason for the 
excessive increase in taxes, such as the ones on water and 
electricity.  The taxes are far greater than what we can pay.  And, 
has the government provided any services in exchange for collecting 
these huge taxes to satisfy the nation?  Furthermore, are these 
taxes collected only to solve the government's problems or should 
they also solve the nation's?  (SALAM, 5 Dec.) 

   On Exorbitant Lawyers' Fees 

   Caller:  I have a question from the Judicial Branch.  Hasn't the 
Judicial Branch set the fees that lawyers charge their clients?  If 
the Judicial Branch has set these fees, why are they so high?  And, 
if it has not, why don't they control them.  They are exorbitant. 
Lawyers should be fair.  I hope that the Judicial Branch will set 
its own equitable rate so that everyone who needs a lawyer can hire 
one.  (There were two complaints  of this type.)  (SALAM, 5 Dec.) 

   (QUESTION AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, PERSIAN GULF/ 
SOUTH ASIA BRANCH AT (703) 733-6518) 

ENEAG/07 Feb/POLCHF/ECONF/NEASA Division/SDJ 07/1933Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24644 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000006994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-015--MAGHREB 
<H3> <TI>      MAGHREB PRESS REVIEW No. 2 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     press review series focuses on economic, social, and 
demographic issues in the Maghreb countries of Algeria, Libya, 
Morocco, and Tunisia. 
   MOROCCO 
   France Freezes Financial Aid to Morocco 
   London Arabic expatriate dailyAL-HAYAH has reported that France 
will freeze nearly FFI billion in financial aid promised to Morocco 
by the Beregovoy government and will limit other financial aid for 
that country to short-term loans for Moroccan-French joint ventures 
working on local projects.  French officials reportedly argued that 
with the continuing economic downturn in France, reduced aid to 
Morocco is justified in view of that country's foreign currency 
reserves in excess of $3.5 billion and the stronger showing of the 
Moroccan dirham vis-a-vis European currencies, especially the French 
franc.  Furthermore, French officials were said to now give priority 
to aid requests from Africa and other French territories. 
   The direct French financial aid packages for Morocco affected by 
this decision were: 
   FF35O to 500 million in grants and financing for the Moroccan 
budget deficit. 
   Nearly FF500 million in long-term loans with interest not 
exceeding 2.5 percent. 
   Among the important French loans still programmed for Morocco in 
1994 are: 
   FF300 million to expand the activities of ALCATEL in 
telecommunications. 
   FF200 million to purchase two freighters. 
   FF160 million to continue nuclear energy research for peaceful 
purposes and electricity production. 
   FF70 million for the Office of Communications. 
   FF81 million for the Office of Phosphates. 
   FF15 million for the Office of Electricity. 
   According to AL-HAYAH, French aid to Morocco has declined since 
1990, because of the French policy that approves aid only to joint 
ventures or for projects that provide for the purchase of French 
goods and products.  This decline reportedly reflects France's 
concern that its share of the Moroccan market has dwindled to 22 
percent.  Sources cited by AL-HAYAH reported that the purpose of the 
French aid freeze is to pressure Moroccan officials-to give 
preference to French firms in local development projects.  (London 
AL-HAYAH 11 Jan 94) 
   Ministerial Visit Nets Loan Agreement 
   Moroccan Prime Minister Mohamed Karim Lamrani led a delegation of 
government ministers and other officials to Madrid in December, 
where they reached agreement on a series of loans to Morocco 
totaling 150 billion Spanish pesetas to purchase Spanish goods and 
maintain the preferential fishing arrangement for 650 Spanish boats 
operating in Moroccan waters.  A joint communique issued after the 
visit affirmed Spanish willingness to offer financial support for 
development programs in Morocco's northern provinces, as well as to 
complete studies on plans for a Maghreb-Europe gas pipeline, 
telecommunications networks via undersea cable, and a fiber-optic 
communications line. 
   According to Rabat daily AL-ANBA', 1992 Spanish investment in 
Morocco constituted 19 percent of all foreign investment in the 
country.  The paper reported that Prime Minister Lamrani has stated 
that more work is necessary "to encourage letting Spanish contracts 
in Morocco, similar to French and EU contracts, in order to realize 
a comprehensive and gradual development of the economy of the two 
countries."  Lamrani also noted that several cooperative 
educational, cultural and environmental projects were planned. 
   Lamrani acknowledged the need to solve the problem of 
transporting people and goods over the Straits of Gibraltar, 
especially when workers cross into Spain during the summer.  He also 
acknowledged that the two countries were investigating ways of 
stemming the tide of illegal Noroccan emigrants and illicit drugs 
into Spain.  (London AL-SHARQ AL-AWSAT Il Jan 94; Rabat AL-ANBA' 5-6 
Dec 1993; Rabat AL-ANBA' Weekly Supplement 12-13 Dec 93) 
   Conflict Between Spanish and Moroccan Fishermen 
   According to the Moroccan press, a dozen Spanish boats surrounded 
two Moroccan trawlers off the Tangiers coast and threatened to wreck 
them if they continued to operate in the area.  Moroccan authorities 
asked EU representatives in Morocco to intervene "to end these acts 
which harm not only Moroccan-Spanish relations, but Moroccan-EU 
relations as well."  The incident took place the day after the 
Moroccan-EU commission meeting on fisheries and one month after the 
EU announced a grant of 155 billion Spanish pesetas to the Spanish 
fishing industry to renovate its fleet and repair ports.  Disputes 
continue between Morocco and Spain over the use of fishing beds that 
have been declared off-limits during a "biological pause" to enable 
stocks to replenish themselves.  According to a front-page article 
in Rabat daily AL-'ALAM, the Spanish fishing lobby is putting 
pressure on Morocco and the EU to reduce the duration of biological 
pauses, and has objected to Moroccan boats fishing in areas that are 
off-limits to Spain.  (Rabat L'OPINION 18 Jan 94; Rabat AL-'ALAM 6 
Jan 94; Rabat AL-MITHAQ AL-WATANI 25 Dec 93) 
   Foreign Minister Addresses Ceuta, Melilla Question 
   Foreign Minister Abdellatif Filali reportedly told the Moroccan 
Council of Deputies that Morocco still seeks to establish a joint 
Spanish-Moroccan commission to study the future of Ceuta and 
Melilla, even though he said King Hassan's 1987 letter to King Juan 
Carlos requesting this has yet to be answered.  Regarding recent 
discussions among Spanish parliamentarians concerning the 
possibility of granting self-rule to the two cities, Filali opined 
that the discussions would not lead to self-rule, but rather to 
further development of the existing city government system.  (London 
AL-SHARQ AL-AWSAT 21 Jan 94) 
   Spanish Investment in Melilla Being Studied 
   The Spanish Economics Ministry is reportedly studying a proposal 
to fund development in Melilla.  The proposal would involve EU 
cooperation and would provide up to 35 billion Spanish pesetas to 
the city from 1994 to 1999.  The proposal would raise Melilla's 
development budget to 53 billion Spanish pesetas over the next six 
years.  (Rabat AL-MITHAQ AL-WATANI 24 Dec 93) 
   (QUESTION AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/08 Feb/POLCHF/ECONF/NEASA Division  cka 08/1853z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24645 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-08FEB94-DPRK-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Mixes Harsh Rhetoric With Signs of Moderation </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                 With the specter of economic sanctions over the nuclear issue 
looming larger, Pyongyang media have sharpened their rhetoric 
against Washington.  At the same time, Pyongyang radio aired a 
leadership view that indicated a strong preference for a 
negotiated settlement, a possible sign that pragmatists within 
the North Korean leadership may be counseling a less 
confrontational approach to the nuclear issue. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

   Following last week's harshly worded Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement that accused Washington of bad faith, Pyongyang raised 
its confrontational rhetoric another notch.  A 3 February 
followup commentary in the party paper Nodong Sinmun seemed to go 
beyond the Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement by hinting at 
possible military confrontation and by warning that North Korean 
verbal threats should be taken seriously (Pyongyang radio, 3 
February).  Sounding a belligerent note, the commentary declared 
that continued U.S. "pressure" on the DPRK will result ultimately 
in North Korea taking "concrete action."  The commentary went on 
to declare that North Koreans are "completely prepared 
politically, ideologically, militarily, and materially to cope 
with any unexpected situation," and warned that "those who act 
rashly and and recklessly will face only shameful defeat."  It 
cautioned, "What we say is not empty words.  We do not like to 
issue idle talk." 
   Assessment of Talks     In sharp contrast to the belligerence 
apparent in both the 31 January Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement and the 3 February commentary, Pyongyang radio on 4 
February reported remarks by a high North Korean official that 
accentuated the positive aspect of bilateral talks with 
Washington on the nuclear issue.  At a 1 February Moscow press 
conference held in support of the Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement, according to the radio, DPRK Ambassador to Russia Son 
Song-pil reiterated the now standard accusation that Washington 
is not interested in a negotiated settlement, but stopped short 
of following the line set in the earlier spokesman's statement 
and depicted bilateral negotiations as a "delaying tactic" on the 
part of the United States.  On the contrary, he cited the DPRK- 
U.S. joint statement, issued at the first round of high-level 
bilateral talks last June, and unspecified "certain progress" he 
claimed was achieved at the second round in July, as positive 
accomplishments.  The tenor of Son's assessment was in sharp 
contrast to the 31 January spokesman's statement, which dismissed 
the DPRK-U.S. talks as having been used by Washington merely to 
"buy time" to prepare for "crushing" North Korea.  Moreover, the 
comments by Son, who in the 1980's headed the North Korean Red 
Cross and was instrumental in bringing about inter-Korean 
exchanges of family visits and art troupes, suggested that a 
peaceful resolution of the nuclear issue is still within reach. 
While chiding Washington for allegedly leading the talks to a 
potential "rupture," he stated that this had happened at a 
"decisive moment when a bright vista for a complete resolution of 
the nuclear issue . . . is being opened up," an upbeat assessment 
of the talks Pyongyang had not used in recent weeks. 
   Implications     Pyongyang's publicity for Ambassador Son's press 
conference appears part of its carefully calibrated media 
campaign to signal its preference for a peaceful settlement of 
the nuclear issue, its heightened rhetoric notwithstanding. 
Son's upbeat portrayal of DPRK-U.S. nuclear negotiations seems 
likely to represent views of pragmatists within the North Korean 
leadership who are pressing for amelioration of Pyongyang's 
current international isolation as a means to preserve the 
regime. 
(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ  cka 08/2017z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24646 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDSEE-08FEB94-YUGOSLAVIA 
<H3> <TI>       Yugoslavia:  Belgrade TV Shuns Zhirinovskiy During Stay </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Although     Western media reported that Russian Liberal Democratic 
Party leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy was warmly received by large 
numbers of Serbs at gatherings in eastern Bosnia and Montenegro, the 
Belgrade media gave short shrift to his 27 January-4 February visit 
to former Yugoslavia.  Tanjug and Belgrade radio devoted a moderate 
amount of coverage to the visit, but Belgrade television, which 
appears to be strictly controlled by Serbian President Slobodan 
Milosevic, broadcast only scant reports of Zhirinovskiy's 
activities.  After showing only brief glimpses of the Russian during 
the first days of his visit, when he visited Serbian Orthodox 
Patriarch Pavle for a closed-door meeting on the last day, Belgrade 
television news merely mentioned the fact of the meeting over a 
still photograph of the Belgrade cathedral (Belgrade TV, 2 
February).  On the eve of Zhirinovskiy's visit to Belgrade, the 
independent Belgrade daily Vecernje Novosti, which strongly supports 
Serbian nationalism and Milosevic, published an interview that 
appeared to be intended to poke fun at the Russian even if his 
statements were quoted accurately.  In the interview, Zhirinovskiy 
rambled and made statements that made him appear ignorant about 
Yugoslav politics.  For example, he professed not to know that 
Yugoslavia had a Federal president, Zoran Lilic, who is, in strictly 
constitutional terms, superior in the political hierarchy to 
Milosevic (Vecernje Novosti, 28 January). 
   Milosevic had reason to be wary of Zhirinovskiy's visit.  The 
Serbian president most probably did not want to antagonize Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin or Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev, who are 
both actively engaged in seeking a solution to the crisis in former 
Yugoslavia.  Moreover, Serbian Radical Party leader Vojislav Seselj, 
now a bitter opponent of Milosevic, served as Zhirinovskiy's host 
while in Belgrade (Tanjug, 2 February).  Belgrade television rarely 
reports on Seselj's activities and was unlikely to give much 
coverage to any foreign visitor who embraced him, especially since 
he is now causing Milosevic considerable difficulty in the Serbian 
parliament. At the same time, in an apparent attempt to hold on to 
the support of the radical Serbian nationalists without stirring 
international ire, Milosevic ally Zeljko Raznjatovic-Arkan announced 
at a 4 February press conference reported on by Belgrade radio, but 
not Belgrade television, that his Party of Serbian Unity and 
Zhirinovskiy's party had signed an agreement on "cooperation" 
(Belgrade radio, 4 February). 
(AUTHOR:  NASH.QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF ANALYST/ 
ELAG, (703) 733-6120) 
ELAG/GILISON  cka 08/2032z  frb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24647 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-019--SO. KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      SOUTH KOREA:  Press Reports on New Members of Kim Yong-sam's </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Cabinet 

    SUMMARY:  President Kim Yong-sam started 1994 with a virtually 
new cabinet, dubbed the "Phase-Two Cabinet" by South Korean media. 
Press reporting to date on the cabinet has focused on the 
credentials of the new appointees and on the working dynamics 
between cabinet members and the president.  Also, since this is a 
non-election year, the press expects that President Kim will seize 
this opportunity to strengthen his political stance. 

   The 29 December CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports that, of the 26 cabinet 
members, 15 are new, including the prime minister who was appointed 
on 16 December 1993.  CHUGAN notes that while President Kim was 
working on changing his cabinet, the press was kept in the dark, 
which is in line with the president's usually "secretive" way of 
handling personnel matters.  And even though there had been 
speculations about upcoming changes, the press was nevertheless 
"surprised" by the extent of the reshuffle and by several of Kim's 
nominations.  According to the 22 December CHOSON ILBO, the 
president personally contacted the new ministers on the eve of their 
appointments, while most of the former ministers learned of their 
dismissal from television reports. 

   Changes in the Blue House staff, the DLP (Democratic Liberal 
Party) leadership, and within the vice-ministers' rank subsequently 
took place, and President Kim's new team was nearly complete by the 
end of last year.  The 27 December TONGA ILBO opines that, although 
the revamped cabinet reflects Kim's determination to take a "new 
direction," it is also essentially a group of "Kim Yong-sam men with 
few technocrats," a view that is shared by other Seoul press 
sources.  TONGA notes that Kim had "hardly any insiders" in his 
"Phase-One Cabinet," but that in "phase two," he has surrounded 
himself with "insiders."  Kim has been viewed as a "one-man team" 
and the new cabinet could help change that perception, TONGA says. 
In addition, the paper foresees no major changes in political or 
economic policies this year. 

   Following the reshuffle, Seoul press sources examined the 
relationship between Kim and the new members of his cabinet and the 
reasons behind the president's selections. 

   Prime Minister Yi Hui-chang is described as a "man of 
conviction," who is  "very respected," and "popular with the 
public."  However, his appointment on 16 December came as a 
"surprise," because even though Yi could be considered a "symbol of 
reform," he did not seem to fit in the role of leader of Kim's 
"globalization and liberalization era" team.  There were two 
supposed reasons why Kim chose Yi, according to the press.  One 
reason might be that Kim wants to use Yi's "clean image and 
popularity" to pursue his own reforms.  The other reason might be 
that Kim and Yi have worked well together over the past 1O months. 
In addition, Kim reportedly respects Yi for his "honesty, judgement, 
courage," and "convictions." 

   Given Yi's recognized abilities as a judicial official, the press 
has given him "high marks" and predicts that he will be an 
"effective" prime minister, "not a yes-man," unlike his predecessors 
who acted primarily as  "f igureheads."  Yi will be expected to 
demonstrate his ability to run the government, handle political 
issues, control and work with the cabinet and bureaucrats, and help 
revive the national economy.  (Seoul CHUGAN CHOSON 3O Dec 93) 

   Deputy Prime Minister/Economic Planning Board (EPB) Minister 
Chong Chae-sok is described as a "strong-minded, scholarly 
workaholic" and is considered a welcomed addition to the EPB. (Seoul 
TONGA ILBO 22 Dec 93) 

   Chong is a "technocrat" who held ministerial posts in the Park 
Chung Hee government and was "purged" by the Chon Tu-hwan government 
in 198O.  He was a university professor when President Kim called 
upon him to be minister of transportation.  He favors less 
government control and more autonomy for the private business sector 
and has vowed to promote technological development to boost 
industrial competitiveness, train technicians, and expand social 
infrastructures. (Seoul KYONGHYANG SINMUN 23 Dec 93) 

   Chong is expected to be able to work well with the other 
ministers who handle economic issues, such as Hong Che-hyong and Kim 
Chol-su, two holdovers from the previous cabinet.  Chong has no 
personal ties with President Kim, but since he is from North Cholla 
Province, he provides "regional balance" to the cabinet. (Seoul 
CHOSON ILBO 22 Dec 93) 

   Chong's appointment to the new cabinet was a "big surprise." 
Having been away from politics for a long time, Chong seemed an 
unlikely choice to lead the national economic team. (Seoul CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG 29 Dec 93)  Furthermore, Chong had reportedly made 
"critical" comments about President Kim's new economic policies 
before he became transportation minister. (Seoul CHUNGANG ILBO 28 
Dec 93) 

   Deputy Prime Minister/National Unification Board Minister (NUB) 
Yi Yong-tok's appointment came as a "real surprise" since Han Wan- 
sang, Yi's predecessor, was not expected to be replaced, given his 
personal ties with the president.  However, because of his 
government's evolving policy toward the North, Kim needed a new 
person to lead the NUB, someone with "more realistic views" of the 
North-South relationship.  Yi is said to hold "conservative and 
hard-line views" regarding the North and seems capable of "working 
smoothly" with both the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the National 
Security Planning Board (NSP).  Yi's "realistic" outlook was 
reportedly acquired through his tenure in various administrative 
positions, including that of chief delegate to the North-South Red 
Cross Conference.  Moreover, Yi comes from the North and still has 
family members there.  Yi's appointment was generally viewed as a 
"well-made" choice.  (Seoul TONGA ILBO 22 Dec 93) 

   Minister of Home Affairs Choe Hyong-u is a five-term National 
Assembly member and a "Sangdo-tong man" (the president's private 
home is in Sangdo-tong).  He is also recognized as having a "strong 
mind" and an "exceptional" ability to get things done.  In order to 
promote "globalization and liberalization," Kim was looking for a 
"strong and efficient domestic affairs manager" and he picked Choe 
who is also a long-standing advocate of bureaucratic reform.  Choe 
is expected to carry out the government's reform policies using the 
"carrot-and-stick" method. (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 23 Dec 93) 

   Minister of National Defense Yi Pyong-tae was appointed by 
President Kim, contrary to earlier speculations that Kwon Yong-hae 
would be retained.  Because Yi is a retired Hanahoe (an elite 
private fraternal organization in the Army) general and a member of 
KMA (Korean Military Academy) Class 17,  his nomination came as a 
"surprise."  Yi hails from Kim's home province, where he and the 
president attended the same high school.  Defense Ministry personnel 
and many military observers believe that the reform-based national 
defense policy will not change under Yi's leadership.  However, Yi's 
Hanahoe membership brought up the question of whether Yi's 
appointment signals an end to the "Hanahoe purge" or whether Yi is a 
"Hanahoe executioner." (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 22 Dec 93)  Yi assumed his 
new job with "confidence," and under his direction, the Army, Navy, 
and Air Force each formed special task forces, which met separately 
for brainstorming sessions over seven days during the new year's 
holiday.  Over 1OO issues were discussed and each service has 
reported back to Yi with suggestions for further reforms. (Seoul 
HANGUK ILBO 5 Jan 94) 

   Minister of Education Kim Suk-hui was formerly the dean of the 
College of Home Economics at Ewha Women's University.  The media is 
puzzled by Kim's appointment of this nutritional scientist from a 
"well-respected," "intellectual family," who has no administrative 
background or political connections.  She got to know President Kim 
at several official functions that she attended in her capacity of 
director of the Korean YWCA. (Seoul TONGA ILBO 22 December 93) 

   Minister of Agriculture, Fisheries, and Forestry Kim Yang-pae was 
the mayor of Kwangju City and has held various posts in his home 
province of South Cholla.  Because of his experience and proven 
abilities as an administrator, his appointment did not raise any 
questions. (Seoul TONGA ILBO 22 Dec 93) 

   Minister of National Construction Kim U-sok is from President 
Kim's home province and has been a close associate of and an aide to 
Kim.  He was elected to the 13th National Assembly. (Seoul CHOSON 
ILBO 22 Dec 93) 

   Minister of Health and Social Affairs So Sang-mok has "excellent 
academic and political credentials."  His experience in government 
and proven abilities as a politician--he was elected to the 13th and 
14th National Assemblies--made him a "good choice."  Although he is 
an economist, So has shown a keen interest in social issues, and his 
appointment was welcomed by the ministry staff. (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 
22 Dec 93) 

   Minister of Labor Nam Chae-hui is a journalist-turned-politician; 
he was a four-term National Assembly member who served on the 
Special Committee for Labor Affairs.  He is a member of the 
Democratic Justice faction of President Kim's DLP, and his 
nomination is viewed as a gesture for DLP unity.  Nam's ability was 
not in question, but the ministry staff appeared to have "mixed 
feelings" about his appointment because they did not anticipate that 
former Minister Yi In-che would be replaced. (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 22 
Dec 93) 

   Nam is expected to be able to work well with other ministers who 
handle economic affairs, and President Kim hopes that he will settle 
some labor and wage issues, and head off labor-management disputes. 
(Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG 29 Dec 93) 

   Minister of Transportation O Myong served both Presidents Chon 
Tu-hwan and No Tae-u, as a ministerial ranking official.  He is 
known as an "outstanding organizer" and a "hard worker" who helped 
modernize the national telecommunications industry.  The 
organizational skills and professionalism he showed hosting the 
Taejon Expo 93 reportedly impressed the president. (Seoul HANGYORE 
SINMUN 22 Dec 93) 

   Minister of Government Administration Hwang Yong-ha spent the 
last 24 years on the Board of Audit and Inspection (BAI) and was 
Prime Minister Yi's right-hand man when Yi was the BAI director. 
Hwang is described as "independent-minded." (Seoul HANGYORE SINMUN 
22 Dec 93) 

   Minister of Environment Pak Yun-hun worked at the Office of 
Legislation for 26 years before he became a university professor. 
In 1981, he was involved in drafting environmental laws, and 
subsequently, has been active in promoting environmental interests. 
He is a close associate of Prime Minister Yi, which led the press to 
speculate that it was at Yi's recommendation that he was appointed. 
The ministry staff was "surprised" by Pak's nomination, but Pak's 
knowledge of and interest in environmental issues made him a 
welcomed addition to the cabinet. (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 22 Dec 93) 

   First State Minister for Political Affairs So Chong-won is a 
journalist-turned-politician, a three-term National Assembly member, 
and a "Kim yong-sam man."  He is known as a "rational and caring" 
person, who always stands up for his own convictions.  Given his 
past "dedication" to the president, he is expected to be there to 
"protect" Kim when needed. (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 22 Dec 93; CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG 29 Dec 93) 

   Patriots and Veterans Affairs Agency Minister Yi Chung-kil is 
recognized for his "professionalism" and "efficiency."  Yi has no 
personal ties with President Kim and is a well-connected former BAI 
member. (Seoul HANGYORE SINMUN 22 Dec 93) 

                  President Kim's Cabinet List 
                         (Effective 21 December 1993) 
                              (* New appointees) 




   Prime Minister                 *Yi Hoe-chang 
   Deputy Prime Minister          *Chong Chae-sok 
   Deputy Prime Minister          *Yi Yong-tok 


Ministry                    Minister               Vice Minister 

Agriculture, Forestry       *Kim Yang-pae          Kim Tae-su 
&amp; Fisheries 

Communications              Yun Tong-yun           Kyong Sang-hyon 

Culture &amp; Sports            Yi Min-sop             *Kim To-hyon 

Economic Planning 
Board                       *Chong Chae-sok        *Han I-hon 

Education                   *Kim Suk-hui           Yi Chon-su 

Environment                 *Pak Yun-hun           Kim Hyong-chol 

Finance                     Hong Chae-hyong        Paek Won-ku 

Foreign Affairs             Han Sung-chu           Hong Sun-yong 

Govt. Administration        *Hwang Yong-ha         Sim U-yong 

Health, Social Affairs      *So Sang-mok           Chu Kyong-sik 
Home Affairs                *Choe Hyong-u          *Yi Hyo-kae 

Information                 O In-hwan              *Yi Kyong-chae 

Justice                     Kim Tu-hui             Kim Ki-sok 

Labor                       *Nam Chae-hui          *Kang Pon-kyun 

National Construction       *Kim U-sok             Yu Sang-yol 

National Defense            *Yi Pyong-tae          *Chong Chun-ho 

National Unification        *Yi Yong-tok           Song Yong-tae 
Board 

Science &amp; Technology        Kim Si-chung           Han Yong-song 

1st State Min. for          *So Chong-won          Chong Song-chol 
Pol. Affairs 

2d State Min. for           Kwon Yong-cha          Kim Chong-suk 
Pol. Affairs 

Trade, Industry             Kim Chol-su            Yi Tong-hun 
&amp; Energy 

Transportation              *O Myong               Ku Pon-yong 

Govt. Legislative           Hwang Kil-su           Pak Song-kyu 
Admin. Agency 

Patriots, Veterans          *Yi Chung-kil          Kim Si-pok 
Affairs Agency 

(AUTHOR:  TOMPKINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
SOUTHEAST ASIA/KOREA BRANCH AT (7O3) 733-6522). 
EAG/09FEB94/POLCHF/ASIA DIVISION/SM 09/1557Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24648 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING ITEM 
IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. 
Document Type:S&amp;T PERSPECTIVES--VOL 9 NO 1, 31 JAN 94 
<H3> <TI>      PERSPECTIVES SELECTIONS ARE BASED SOLELY ON FOREIGN NEWSPAPERS, </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
BOOKS,  JOURNALS, COMMERCIAL DATA BASES, AND OTHER OPEN-SOURCE 
PUBLICATIONS, OR ON RADIO AND TELEVISION BROADCASTS.  SOME OF THE 
MATERIALS USED IN THIS PUBLICATION WILL APPEAR AS ABSTRACTS OR FULL 
TRANSLATIONS IN FBIS SERIAL REPORTS.  COMMENTS AND QUERIES REGARDING 
THIS PUBLICATION MAY BE DIRECTED TO THE MANAGING EDITOR (SHARON W. 
AT (703) 733-6395), THE EDITORIAL ASSISTANT (CHRIS R. AT (703) 733- 
6622), OR INDIVIDUALS AT THE NUMBERS LISTED WITH ITEMS. 
   DEVELOPMENTS 
   DEVELOPMENTS highlights worldwide S&amp;T events reported in the 
foreign media. Items followed by an asterisk will be published in 
full by FBIS. The contributor's name and telephone number are 
provided. 
   Automotive Industry 
   (Italy) A hydrogen-fueled engine developed by the Agency for New 
Technologies, Energy, and the Environment (ENEA) and VM Motori, in 
collaboration with Magneti MareIIi and the University of Pisa, is 
currently being tested on a Fiat van. The engine gives the van a 
range of about 200 kilometers and is far less polluting than 
gasoline engines. The hydrogen used to power it is contained in 
eight pressurized tanks. (Rome AMBIENTE Nov 93) Brussels 
Bureau/Sharon W. 733-6395 
   (Italy) The Porter Elettrico, an electric vehicle developed by 
Piaggio in collaboration with the Micro-Vett company of Imola, was 
exhibited at the Bologna Motor Show in December. The 4- or 6-seat 
minibus is a van with a 500-kilogram payload capacity. Another 
version is a garbage truck with a 400-kilogram payload capacity. All 
versions are powered by the 10-kilowatt M1O0 electric motor 
developed by Micro-Vett. Part of the kinetic energy generated in 
braking is converted to electricity for battery recharge. The 
vehicle's top speed has been held to 55 kilometers per hour to 
maximize acceleration and range. The new vehicle is exempt from 
certain taxes, and its insurance rate has been reduced by 50 
percent. Sales were slated to begin in January through Piaggio's 
sales network, with the price of the minibus expected to be 
35,280,000 lire ($20,700). (Rome ANSA 7 Dec 93)* Sharon W. 733-6395 
   (Germany) Volkswagen is preparing to market the Golf Ecomatic, 
the first production-model automobile that conserves fuel and 
reduces emissions by turning off its engine when the gas pedal is 
released and restarting it when the pedal is again depressed. An 
electronics package controls the engine and maintains safety 
functions such as power steering, lights, and power brakes. When the 
gas pedal is released, the engine stops and a servomotor engages the 
clutch, disconnecting the wheels from the transmission and allowing 
the car to continue forward by momentum alone. When the engine 
restarts, the car's electrical system switches to an auxiliary 
battery so that it is not subject to the voltage drop associated 
with the starter's high electrical consumption. In large urban 
areas, where a car's engine might be off up to 60 percent of the 
time, the system could reduce carbon monoxide emissions by 36 
percent, hydrocarbon and nitrogen oxide emissions by 25 percent, and 
carbon dioxide emissions by 21 percent. Fuel consumption could be 
reduced by at least 1 liter per 100 kilometers. (Paris L'USINE 
NOUVELLE 2 Dec 93)* Alexis M. 733-6345 
   (France) Working with French automakers, the French Petroleum 
Institute (IFP) has developed two experimental fuel-injection 
techniques aimed at making the two-stroke automobile engine a viable 
alternative to the conventional four-stroke engine by eliminating 
its chief disadvantage: emissions of unburned hydrocarbons that are 
10 to 20 percent higher than those of a conventional engine. One 
technique, a direct liquid injection procedure, allows fuel to be 
fully atomized just before ignition. Another, an air injection 
procedure developed with Peugeot, can, according to initial 
research, reduce hydrocarbon emissions by over 97 percent and carbon 
monoxide emissions by over 99 percent--enough to meet emissions 
standards for the year 2000. Although both procedures (which rely on 
pressurization) are currently expensive, the IFP hopes that the two- 
stroke engine's advantages--lighter weight, simpler architecture, 
lower cost, and greater power--will persuade auto makers to invest 
in further research. (Paris AFP SCIENCES 2 Dec 93) Alexis M. 733- 
6345 
   (Mexico/Italy) The Italian firm Faam-batterie Sp.A. will develop 
electric vehicles for sale in Mexico as the result of a late 
November agreement with the Mexican Government. Mexico has already 
agreed to purchase a prototype vehicle and the Italian company plans 
to set up a vehicle production plant in Mexico. Faam-batterie has 
asked the European Community for 250,000 ECU ($278,000) for market 
research. The recently enacted North American Free Trade Agreement 
will allow Mexico to export the electric vehicles to Canada or the 
United States without paying export duties. (Milan IL SOLE-24 ORE 23 
Nov 93)* Renee McG. 733-6339 
   Clean Energy 
   (China) China's largest photovoltaic power facility has 
officially joined the power grid. Located in the Ngari District of 
western Xizang, the Gerze solar power station, for which 
construction costs totaled some 2.5 million yuan ($287,000), is a 
joint investment project involving the Ministry of Electric Power, 
the Xizang Planning Commission and Gerze County. Ground was broken 
on the project in 1991 and the facility was officially inaugurated 
in November 1993. (Beijing RENMIN RIBAO (OVERSEAS EDITION) 3 Dec 93) 
Parker H. 733-6336. 
   (United Kingdom) A 30-megawatt electric power plant that produces 
energy by burning discarded tires has been opened in Wolverhampton. 
The $85 million plant will burn 8 to 10 million automobile and truck 
tires a year to produce electricity for 25,000 households. It 
produces no harmful emissions, and the residue from the combustion 
process will be recycled for other industrial uses. (Rome ANSA 12 
Nov 93) Brussels Bureau/Sharon W. 733-6395 
   (Japan) Working with Tokyo Gas, Osaka Gas, and Toho Gas, Mitsui 
Engineering &amp; Shipbuilding Company, Ltd. has developed a gas turbine 

combustor with low nitrogen oxide (NOx) emissions (25 ppm NOx) with 
16 percent O2 when installed in Mitsui's 1,000-kilowatt gas 
turbine). The Mitsui Super Premix employs a dry method called "lean 
diffuse/premix two-stage combustion," which reduces NOx emissions by 
diffuse-combusting some of the fuel to stabilize the flame, then 
premixing most of the remaining fuel with combustion gases and 
eventually reducing the flame temperature for improved gross thermal 
and overall efficiency. The dry design eliminates maintenance and 
water purification problems associated with the water or steam spray 
method. The new combustor, which meets Tokyo's and Osaka's strict 
NOx regulations, is expected to encourage the use of cogeneration. 
Two of the combustors are operating in cogeneration systems in 
Sapporo City. (Tokyo KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 15 Dec 93)* Junko A. 733- 
6346 
   Clean Manufacturing 
   (Germany) An environmentally friendly water treatment system at 
the Siemens Matsushita aluminum capacitor plant in Heidenheim uses a 
dialysis system that makes it possible to recover and reuse 
materials used in the manufacturing process, reducing overall 
production costs by nearly 75 percent. The treatment system cost 1.2 
million marks ($687,000); the cost for a conventional system is 1.7 
million marks ($974,000). Waste water recovered after aluminum 
etching has high concentrations of hydrochloric and sulfuric acids. 
Conventional water treatment systems include a neutralization phase 
followed by separation of liquids and solids. The liquids are 
released into the sewer system, while the solids are dumped. In the 
Heidenheim system, a membrane separates the waste water directly 
into two parts: one rich in hydrochloric and sulfuric acids (up to 
80 percent of which can be recovered and reused) and the other rich 
in metals. The metal-bearing part, composed mainly of alumina salt, 
can be used in organic filtering to precipitate bacteria. (Paris 
ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO 16 Dec 93)* Sharon W. 733-6395 
   (EC) The European Community is sponsoring a new project to 
develop artificial intelligence applications in the paper industry 
in order to minimize environmental damage and costs incurred in the 
manufacturing process. The EC's CLEAN project will implement 
computer-aided software engineering (CASE)-based learning methods to 
optimize performance in production processes. Project participants 
are Siemens, British Maritime Technology, and the Belgian University 
of Leuven, as well as the initial customers for the technology, 
Portuguese cellulose manufacturer Cellulose do Caima and Dutch paper 
maker Roermond Papier. (Zellik TECHNIVISIE Nov 93)* Brussels 
Bureau/Renee McG. 733-6339 
   (China) China's first "green" electronics plant with an air 
conditioning and purification system cooled by a freon substitute is 
to be built in 1994 in Dongwan City, Guangdong Province. The joint 
venture is called Dongwan-DuPont Electronic Materials Ltd. Dongwan 
Southern Electronics Ltd. and DuPont China Group Ltd. will jointly 
invest $13 million. The facility will include new microcircuit 
materials fabrication equipment like that used in DuPont's British, 
Japanese, and US plants. By 1995, the joint venture will begin 
manufacturing thick-film circuits and circuit materials and other 
electronic devices for automotive applications, computers, and 
similar high-tech products for both the domestic and international 
markets. (Beijing RENMIN RIBAO OVERSEAS EDITION 20 Dec 93)* Thomas 
T. 733-6342 
   Solar Cells 
   (Japan) Sharp Corporation has developed a 1 x 1-centimeter solar 
cell whose deterioration in efficiency is one-third that of 
conventional solar cells. The efficiency, initially 11.4 percent, 
dropped to a low of 10.2 percent after 300 hours of exposure to 
light but improved to a final 10.4 percent after another 50 hours. 
The 450-nanometer-thick cell consists of a layer of amorphous 
silicon/carbon sandwiched between two layers of amorphous 
silicon/germanium on a glass substrate. Researchers maintained high 
conversion efficiency with these thin films by changing the 
wavelength of incoming light. Sharp is developing a 10 x 10- 
centimeter prototype cell and hopes to produce 30 x 40-centimeter 
cells for practical application by the year 2000. (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 22 Dec 93) Junko A. 733-6346 
   FEATURE ARTICLES 
   ISRAEL/GERMANY/ITALY: POSSIBLE BREAKTHROUGH IN BATTERY TECHNOLOGY 
   European tests of an Israeli-developed zinc-air battery show it 
gives an electric vehicle the performance and range capabilities of 
one powered by an internal combustion engine. 
   Recent German and Italian press reports suggest that an Israeli- 
developed zinc-air battery may represent a breakthrough for electric 
vehicles. Tests by the German federal postal authority (the 
Bundespost), as well as by Italy's National Electricity Board and 
the Montedison company, showed that the new battery is lighter than 
other systems and has a long life. It is also the first battery 
capable of giving electric vehicles performance and range 
characteristics comparable to those of vehicles powered by internal 
combustion engines. The Bundespost is so impressed that it plans to 
replace part of its diesel fleet with electric vehicles powered by 
zinc-air batteries. 
   About five years ago, an Israeli researcher achieved a 
breakthrough in zinc electrode processing that led to development of 
the new zinc-air battery. According to a report in DIE WELT (17 Jun 
93), it has long been known that zinc can be used to make high- 
energy-density batteries. Many small standard 1.5-volt batteries 
already have zinc electrodes that produce electrical energy through 
an oxidation process. But increasing the energy density enough to 
power a vehicle requires creating a much larger electrode surface 
area, and the very fine zinc powder needed to achieve this surface 
area was extremely flammable and virtually impossible to process. 
The Israeli researcher discovered a simple way to make nonflammable 
zinc powder that could be processed into porous electrodes with 
extremely large surface areas. When immersed in a weak alkaline 
solution and supplied with oxygen, these sponge-like zinc electrodes 
become powerful generators of electric current, achieving an energy 
density of 300 watt-hours per kilogram, about 10 times that of a 
lead battery. The Jerusalem company Electric Fuel Limited (EFL) 
holds the patent on the zinc powder and is licensing the process. 
   Germany's Bundespost recently sponsored a series of tests of the 
EFL battery performed by the German Technical Control Board in 
Munich. The tests, which used a 3.5-ton electric Mercedes fitted 
with a 650-kilogram EFL zinc-air battery system, were described in 
DIE WELT (17 Jun 93) and WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE (2 Jul 93). In traffic, 
the test vehicle exhibited performance comparable to that of a 
diesel vehicle, accelerating to 50 kilometers per hour in 10 seconds 
and reaching speeds of up to 110 kilometers per hour. Whereas a 900- 
kilogram lead-gel system gave a Bundespost electric van a range of 
only 54 kilometers, the zinc-air batteries had sufficient charge to 
enable a light truck to complete a 320-kilometer mail delivery route 
with many stops or to allow 400-kilometer long trips in a passenger 
car. The oxidized zinc electrodes were then removed from the modular 
batteries and replaced with fresh ones. This "refueling" takes only 
three minutes with a special tool. In another test designed to 
assess cold-weather durability the entire test vehicle was left in a 
cold chamber for three days at -20 degrees Celsius. Whereas 
conventional batteries tend to break down when exposed to extreme 
cold, the EFL battery immediately supplied enough power to start and 
operate the vehicle. 
   After they are removed from the battery, used electrodes can be 
regenerated easily in a special process. The metal is purged of 
oxygen and shaped into new electrodes using electrical power either 
from a grid or from solar cells, whichever is less expensive. The 
zinc batteries in the Munich test vehicle were "refueled" using 
solar power from the desert outside Jerusalem and were then flown 
back to Bavaria "charged" (DIE WELT). 
   The Bundespost officially announced the successful Munich battery 
trials at the end of August 1993 (WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE). Christian Bader 
of Mercedes-Benz's Utility Vehicle Development department called the 
EFL battery "quite outstanding." Gabor Benczur-Urmossy, battery 
specialist at the German Automotive Society, said the EFL design 
provides a battery whose performance "approaches that of an internal 
combustion engine" in terms of range and acceleration. A Technical 
Control Board study also confirmed that the EFL technology meets 
ecological and safety requirements "without any restrictions," 
according to WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE. According to Bundespost calculations, 
the EFL battery has an efficiency of about 26 percent: higher than 
that of any other battery system and higher than that of a diesel 
engine. 
   DIE WELT comments that the new battery is best suited for use in 
fleets in which all the vehicles return to a common depot where the 
electrodes can be replaced. Though the need for an infrastructure of 
electrode reprocessing facilities is cited as a possible drawback, 
other fleet operators such as Bundespost Telekom and various 
municipal works are reported to be very interested--to the extent 
that they will probably help finance the infrastructure 
(WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE). In the coming months the Lurgi Plant 
Construction firm in Frankfurt plans to participate in development 
of a reprocessing facility for zinc electrodes. 
   Test results have been so promising that the Bundespost wants to 
replace part of its diesel fleet with electric vehicles powered by 
EFL batteries. At a press conference in late December (DIE WELT 23 
Dec 93) Bundespost officials announced that starting in 1995, about 
70 vehicles owned by the Bundespost and various firms and 
municipalities will be fitted with the new battery for field trials 
designed to answer some operational questions. For example, 
Bundespost board member Guenter Tumm said the operating costs of an 
EFL battery-powered vehicle should initially be about 1.40 marks (80 
cents) per kilometer, but Bundespost experts are convinced that as 
the batteries come into more widespread use the price per kilometer 
could drop to .54 mark (31 cents) per kilometer by the year 2000. 
Bundespost consultants have estimated the procurement cost of an EFL 
vehicle at about 50,000 marks ($28,600), about twice that of a 
diesel, but likewise predict that as more electric vehicles are 
purchased, they will eventually become less expensive than diesels 
(WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE). If the field trials go well, 80 percent of the 
Bundespost mail delivery fleet will be electric "within a few 
years," according to Guenter Tumm. 
   It has not yet been decided who will build the cars and batteries 
for the field trials (WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE). The Bundespost says it 
wants to buy them, not make them. Some German automakers who had 
participated in the market research, including Mercedes-Benz and 
Volkswagen, have dropped out of the project to avoid further 
development costs. Domestic battery manufacturers such as Varta, 
Bosch, and Hoppecke are also described as hesitant. 
   Bundespost official Walter Trux has said everyone will have an 
opportunity to bid on the project, including some foreign firms that 
have already demonstrated an interest in building EFL vehicles (DIE 
WELT 2 Jun 93). The Italian firm Montedison has already been 
licensed by EFL to produce batteries in Italy, France, Spain, and 
Portugal. The first series production was due to begin in Europe by 
the end of 1993, according to EFL chief Yehuda Harats 
(WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE). In addition, Montedison has contracted with the 
sports car manufacturer Lamborghini to build a prototype vehicle 
specially designed for an electric drive: a lightweight 
intermediate-class van with an all-plastic body. 
   Montedison and Italy's National Electricity Board (ENEL) have run 
joint tests of the EFL zinc-air battery (IL S0LE-24 ORE 10 Nov 93). 
These tests, like those in Munich, confirmed a range of about 300 
kilometers, far superior to the 180-kilometer range of sodium-sulfur 
batteries and the 90-kilometer range of nickel-cadmium batteries of 
the same weight. Some EFL batteries are being tested on the 
prototypes currently under development by Lamborghini. The official 
presentation of these electric vehicles is scheduled for the first 
half of 1994. 
   Montedison plans to continue research on the battery for another 
two years (investments to date total about 15 billion Iire, or $8.8 
million) before going on to actual industrial-scale production. The 
company is seeking partners for both production and marketing. 
Montedison's agreement with EFL also provides for joint research and 
for setting up an electrode reprocessing facility in Trofarello, 
Italy (IL SOLE-24 ORE). 
   Sharon W. 733-6395 
   JAPAN: DRIVE TO DEVELOP ELECTRIC VEHICLE INDUSTRY 
   Japanese government agencies and private companies are developing 
the technologies and support infrastructure for the Japanese 
electric vehicle industry. 
   Impending environmental regulations in California and 
other US states requiring sales of zero-emission vehicles (ZEVs) are 
spurring Japanese efforts to develop electric vehicles (EVs) 
competitive in performance and price with conventional vehicles. The 
industry's most recently developed EVs were the main attraction at 
the Tokyo Motor Show in October. Japanese researchers meanwhile 
believe that battery technology remains the key to EV development. 
   The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) and its 
auxiliary organizations, the Environment Agency, and local 
governments are providing support to Japan's nascent EV industry. 
Government officials are supporting R&amp;D, promoting industry 
standards, and procuring electric vehicles in order to stimulate 
production. Japan's electric power companies, automobile 
manufacturers, battery makers, tire companies, and other firms are 
developing their own products to meet the tougher standards. (For 
previous reporting on electric vehicle development in Japan, see 
PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 6, 31 May 93.) 
   MITI's Agency of Industrial Science and Technology (AIST) 
reportedly is promoting domestic EV industry standards compatible 
with international ones to facilitate international trade (DENKI 
SHIMBUN 23 Aug 93). An official in the Electric Power Technology 
Division, Public Utilities Department, of MITI's Agency of Natural 
Resources and Energy (ANRE), predicts that California's 1998 
legislation is likely to result in large-scale popularization of EVs 
(SEISAN TO DENKI Jul 93). MITI has also decided to call on the 
United States and Europe for joint development of electric vehicles 
beginning in fiscal year 1994 "in the hope of easing trade friction" 
(NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 25 Sep 93). 
   MITI Promoting R&amp;D, Use, Standards 
   MITI is seeking sharply increased funding from the Finance 
Ministry in fiscal year 1994 (April 1994 through March 1995) for its 
EV development and commercialization projects. In this second year 
of its 10-year, 14-billion-yen ($127 million) lithium battery 
development project, MITI is requesting 1.264 billion yen ($11.5 
million); funding for 1993 is 685 million yen ($6.2 million). The 
ministry is also seeking 1.634 billion yen ($14.9 million) in 1994 
for its Ecostation 2000 plan to establish a nationwide 
infrastructure of EV recharging facilities; 1993 funding is set at 
850 million yen ($7.7 million). MITI is thus preparing to spend 
approximately 90 percent more on each of the projects in 1994 than 
it did in 1993. The ministry is also planning to fund two new 
projects: 100 million yen ($909,000) for research on developing 
hybrid electric vehicles and 3.3 billion yen ($300 million) in 
financing to promote the acquisition of EVs and other low-pollution 
vehicles and the leasing of fuel supply facilities. Preferential 
financing would cover half the price of acquiring the vehicles; with 
EV prices averaging 4 million yen ($36,400), the plan would 
facilitate the acquisition of 1,500 EVs (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Oct 
93). Through the Japan Electric Vehicle Association (JEVA), MITI has 
provided subsidies to local governments, power companies, and other 
organizations to promote the leasing of 400 electric vehicles 
(SEISAN TO DENKI Jul 93). 
   MITI's request for 100 million yen to develop hybrid electric 
vehicles marks the start of a seven-year project to design vehicles 
combining an internal combustion engine with an electric motor. The 
ministry has tasked the Japan Automobile Research Institute (JARI), 
which is establishing a committee of industry representatives to 
survey the relevant technology during fiscal years 1994 and 1995. 
MITI will then oversee a subsequent five-year development phase. 
Hino Motors has already developed its HIMR hybrid bus, which uses 
electric power for starting and stopping, but MITI envisions 
developing hybrid EV technology that will provide power 
continuously. Although the overall budget and funding obligations of 
MITI and the project's corporate participants have not been set, 
total spending over the life of the project is estimated at more 
than one billion yen ($9 million) (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 28 Sep 93). 
   In fiscal year 1992 MITI also began a five-year, 2.3-billion-yen 
project conducted by the New Energy and Industrial Technology 
Development Organization (NEDO) and JARI that will develop 
technology for recharging stations, conduct EV fleet tests using the 
recharging equipment, and study how to install the necessary 
infrastructure (SEKIYU May 93). The MITI system consists of a 
battery that is charged at night; this battery then becomes the 
power source for a daytime EV rapid recharging stand (NIKKEI RYUTSU 
SHIMBUN 8 Jun 93; NEDO NEWS May 93). MITI has provided Nippon 
Express Co. and two other companies with electric vehicles and 
recharging facilities to collect data. According to NIKKEI RYUTSU 
SHIMBUN (8 Jun 93), in June Nippon Express began "full-scale" use of 
its recharging facilities, described as "Japan's largest." In 
addition, a public corporation supporting MITI's Ecostation 2000 
plan is conducting technical research and surveys on such topics as 
reducing the size of EV recharging facilities (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
17 May 93). 
   MITI has also been promoting standardization as indispensable to 
the development of electric vehicles (ASAHI SHIMBUN 26 Jul 93). In 
1993 JEVA formed a standardization committee, headed by a MITI 
official, in the Vehicle Engineering Division of AIST's Mechanical 
Engineering Laboratory. The committee consists of four subpanels: 
EV bodies, batteries, infrastructure, and Ecostations (SEKIYU May 
93; NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 19 Apr 93). On 24 November MITI announced 
standards covering EV batteries, motors, connecting devices in 
recharging equipment, and other components that the ministry and 
JEVA had jointly devised. By 1996 these standards will become the 
basis for codification by AIST as Japan Industrial Standards (JIS). 
MITI hopes the national standards will eliminate the production of 
incompatible products by individual Japanese companies that have 
developed EV equipment according to their own standards. MITI also 
expects the parts standards to enable manufacturers to lower costs 
through mass production and to facilitate joint development among 
companies (YOMIURI SHIMBUN 25 Nov 93; NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Jun 
93). 
   Beyond JIS, the ministry also wants to coordinate its standards 
with the International Organization for Standardization and the 
International Electrotechnical Commission in order to facilitate 
international trade (DENKI SHIMBUN 23 Aug 93). JEVA is reportedly 
conducting its domestic standardization activities while keeping an 
eye on overseas developments (ASAHI SHIMBUN 26 Jul 93). Meanwhile 
MITI will adopt the JEVA standards for its Ecostation 2000 plan, 
first applying them to the 13 ecostations slated for startup in 
fiscal year 1993 (YOMIURI SHIMBUN, NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 25 Nov 93). 
   According to YOMIURI SHIMBUN (25 Nov 93), Japan is the first 
country to devise unified EV standards. With companies in Japan, the 
United States, and Europe pursuing their own development plans, such 
elements as recharging times and plug receptacles have been "all 
over the board." Having asked Ford, Germany's Daimler-Benz, and 
other foreign companies to participate in devising the Japanese 
standards, MITI "will call for their adoption as global standards" 
and seek joint EV development as part of the US-Japanese framework 
talks. On 29 November, MITI announced it was setting standards for 
EV rapid recharging systems to be installed at conventional gas 
stations (YOMIURI SHIMBUN 30 Nov 93). On 17 December the Ecostation 
Support Association announced plans to provide 33 million yen in 
subsidies to each of 11 facilities to install EV recharging 
equipment. The association plans to allocate additional subsidies to 
support MITI's proposal to establish some 100 ecostations in Japan 
by fiscal year 1995 (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 18 Dec 93). 
   Environment Agency Promoting EV Use 
   The Environment Agency (EA) is also seeking to promote the use of 
electric vehicles in Japan. An advisory organization to EA's Air 
Quality Bureau published an interim report in September 1993 that 
proposed combating air pollution by putting 200,000 to 300,000 low- 
pollution vehicles, including 120,000 to 160,000 EVs, on Tokyo 
metropolitan area roads by the year 2000. In November the agency 
sent letters to 128 central and local government offices and related 
organizations in the Tokyo metropolitan area inquiring whether 
officials were considering purchasing low-pollution vehicles for the 
fleet of some 323,000 government vehicles. The agency, which is 
considering launching a new "assistance system," is also 
contemplating using the information as a basis for consultations on 
switching to low-pollution vehicles (SANKEI SHIMBUN 22 Nov 93; 
KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 23 Sep 93; MAINICHI SHIMBUN 24 Sep 93). 
   Local Governments Planning to Use EVs 
   In addition to central government agencies and their auxiliary 
organizations, some 140 local governments throughout Japan are 
already procuring low-pollution vehicles. Osaka reportedly has 
Japan's most advanced EV support structure. Osaka's EV promotion 
committee, which includes the municipal and prefectural governments, 
Japan Storage Battery, Daihatsu Motors, Kansai Electric Power 
Company, and other local public and private organizations, opened 
the world's first rapid recharging stand in spring 1993. With aid 
from MITI, Osaka has to date built a total of 10 recharging stands, 
each within 5 kilometers of another (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 29 Jun 93; 
ASAHI SHIMBUN 26 Jul 93). In March 1993 the city produced its own EV 
operating manual and in October 1993, Osaka's prefectural government 
announced a tentative plan that proposes obtaining low-pollution 
vehicles, including EVs, for official use to reduce nitrogen oxide 
(N0x) pollution levels by approximately 30 percent by fiscal year 
2000 (ASAHI SHIMBUN 27 Oct 93). The Osaka Science and Technology 
Center is meanwhile at the center of an advanced battery technology 
research forum involving 28 companies that is attempting to develop 
high-performance EV batteries (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 7 May 93). 
   Tokyo is also incorporating electric vehicles into its plans to 
combat pollution. The municipal government announced on 15 November 
a plan to reduce the volume of NOx emissions from vehicles to 33,000 
tons, approximately 63.5 percent lower than the 1990 level, by the 
year 2000; 6,300 tons of the total reduction is to be accomplished 
in cooperation with local governments in Osaka, Kanagawa, and three 
other areas through the introduction of 310,000 low-pollution 
vehicles, including 40,000 EVs and 35,000 natural gas-fueled 
vehicles. The city will also offer subsidies for procurement and 
maintenance (YOMIURI SHIMBUN 16 Nov 93; NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 16 Nov 
93). But an ASAHI SHIMBUN (16 Nov 93) article noted that at that 
time the number of electric and natural gas vehicles combined was 
only 319, a far cry from the target. The article also asserted that 
the cost of such vehicles remains prohibitive even with subsidies 
covering half the price. Despite Tokyo's having budgeted subsidies 
for 55 low-pollution vehicles in fiscal year 1992, subsidies were 
requested for only five vehicles. 
   Local governments in the Chubu region are also promoting EV use. 
In June 1993 Aichi Prefecture, the cities of Nagoya and Toyota, and 
22 private companies formed a study group, called CEV, to examine 
ways to popularize EVs. The roster of companies includes: Daihatsu, 
Suzuki, Toyota, and four other automobile manufacturers; five 
battery producers; Idemitsu Kosan and five other oil/trading 
companies; and Chubu Electric Power and three other 
communications/power companies. Over a three-year period the 
organization will build some 10 rapid recharging stands at public 
utilities, supermarket parking lots, and existing fuel supply 
centers to support the trial operation of approximately 100 
vehicles. The models to be used are EV versions of existing vans: 
Daihatsu's Hijet, Suzuki's Carry, and Toyota's Townace (NIKKAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 2 Jun 93; SEISAN TO DENKI Jul 93; ASAHI SHIMBUN 3 Jun 93; 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 3 Jun 93). CEV members will use a magnetized 
card that enters the vehicle's voltage and current specifications 
into the recharging stand's vehicle signal system; a vehicle will 
recharge in 30 minutes to over 50 percent of its capacity (NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Dec 93). CEV is implementing its plan in 
cooperation with the local gasoline stations chosen by MITI as model 
enterprises for Ecostation 2000 (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 8 Dec 93). 
   Electric Vehicles Stars of Tokyo Motor Show 
   Electric vehicles took center stage this year at the 35th Tokyo 
Motor Show hosted by the MITI-affiliated Japan Automobile 
Manufacturers Association from 24 October to 5 November (KAGAKU 
KOGYO NIPPO 24 Sep 93; NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 21 Oct 93). All nine 
Japanese car makers displayed EVs, which the NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
article refers to as the industry's "trump card of environmental 
measures" (NIKKEI MATERIALS &amp; TECHNOLOGY Dec 93). 
   NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN (21 Oct 93) also noted that hybrid vehicles 
combining battery technology with other power sources were the 
mainstream" EV offerings. Daihatsu Motor Company for example, 
displayed its 660-cubic-centimeter engine EV Sedan (NIKKEI 
MECHANICAL 13 Dec 93). Honda Motor Company unveiled its EVX, which 
has a top speed of 130 kilometers per hour and features an auxiliary 
battery powered by roof-top solar panels as well as a three-speed 
automatic transmission. Suzuki's EE-10, which combines electric 
power with a 660-cubic-centimeter methanol engine, will feature a 
sodium-sulfur battery that Yuasa Corporation is now developing 
(NIKKEI MATERIALS AND TECHNOLOGY Dec 93). Mitsubishi Motor 
Corporation's ESR uses the Series Hybrid Electric system, which 
combines an alkaline battery with a compact AC induction motor and 
motor controllers, a 1,500-cubic-centimeter internal combustion 
engine for generating electricity, an AC generator, an energy 
regenerative braking system that converts the kinetic energy in 
braking for battery use, and roof-top solar cells. 
   GRAPHIC: color photo of ESR 
   The ESR operates both by battery alone and in hybrid mode when 
the battery runs low and has reportedly reached a top speed of 200 
kilometers per hour and a maximum cruising range of over 500 
kilometers at 40 kilometers per hour (JAPAN 21ST Dec 93). (For 
photographs of the Daihatsu EV Sedan, Honda EVX, and Suzuki EE-10, 
see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 11, 30 Nov 93.) 
   Automakers Aiming for US Market 
   Japanese corporations have been developing electric vehicles with 
the US market in mind. Analysts for the automobile technical journal 
JIDOSHA KOGAKU (Oct 93) and NIKKEI ELECTRONICS (20 Dec 93) note that 
EVs are the only viable option capable of meeting the stringent 
California requirements for zero-emission vehicles, given the 
present state of automotive technology.  One analyst estimates that 
each Japanese company must sell at least 700 EVs to comply with 1998 
California requirements that 2 percent of all cars sold there be 
nonpolluting. He says Japan's auto industry is aiming to develop 
products for fall 1997 to meet the 1998 deadline. 
   Daihatsu has the industry lead in building a mass production 
system for electric vehicles. With over 90 percent of Japan's 
registered on-road EVs, Daihatsu Shatai (Daihatsu Auto Body), the 
company's wholly-owned subsidiary and manufacturer of Daihatsu's 
Hijet van series, reportedly is the only Japanese company with mass- 
production capability.  It plans to produce 400 EVs in fiscal year 
1993, approximately 20 percent more than it produced in 1992. 
Moreover, Daihatsu Shatai is strengthening joint R&amp;D with its parent 

corporation to develop dedicated EV auto body and recharging 
technology (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 3 Jul 93). 
   Counting on government assistance, Daihatsu is planning to expand 
annual production to 10,000 vehicles by 1995 or 1996. In May the 
company announced plans to develop a one- or two-seat EV measuring 
about 3 meters long by 1 meter wide, weighing less than 500 
kilograms, and featuring a top speed of around 100 kilometers per 
hour. Priced at under 1 million yen ($9,000), the car would sell for 
about one-third the price of the cheapest EVs to date.  Daihatsu's 
vehicle "appears to be the trump card" of MITI's plan to have 
200,000 EVs on the road by the year 2000, according to ASAHI SHIMBUN 
(26 May 93), which also noted that MITI will seek the relaxation of 
tax, registration, and licensing regulations in order to stimulate 
sales. 
   On 19 October Daihatsu and Kansai Electric Power Company (KEPCO) 
announced the joint development of an experimental four-wheel mini 
EV intended for light commercial transport or personal shopping. The 
vehicle, an improved version of the three-wheel mini-EV KEPCO 
developed in 1989, is 2.4 meters long by 1 meter wide, and weighs 
440 kilograms; it reaches a top speed of 60 kilometers per hour and 
features a fiber-reinforced plastic body and a sealed, six-cell lead 
battery capable of powering the vehicle for a distance of 70 
kilometers on a single charge (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, NIKKAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN, YOMIURI SHIMBUN 20 Oct 93). Daihatsu plans to begin selling 
the vehicle in two years for under 1 million yen ($9,000) (HOKKAIDO 
SHIMBUN 20 Oct 93). Daihatsu also hopes to begin selling an improved 
EV Hijet van with a low-maintenance lead battery in March 1994. The 
new version will house a computer system to monitor the battery's 
electrolytic solution, automatically adding distilled water from an 
on-vehicle tank when necessary (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 4 May 93). 
   Daihatsu relies on government procurement of official vehicles 
for sales of its EVs. For example, Daihatsu EV engineer Ariyoshi 
noted that the MITI-affiliated Japan Electric Vehicle Association 
has long provided support through its "test-drive system." In 
addition, the Environment Agency's subsidies to local governments 
for the purchase of electric vehicles has resulted in a modest rise 
in local government EV procurement, according to a Daihatsu 
engineer. Local governments accounted for nearly half the sales of 
Daihatsu's 465 Hijet electric vans from 1990 to 1992. Japan's 
electric power companies and the quasi-public Nippon Telegraph and 
Telephone Corp. accounted for another quarter of the total (NIKKAN 
KOGYO SHIMBUN 24 Jul 93; JIDOSHA GIJUTSU Aug 93). 
   Japan's press has been reporting relatively little on EV 
development efforts by Toyota and Nissan--Japan's Big Two automobile 
manufacturers--compared with its coverage of government EV policies 
and Daihatsu's activities. Within the industrial group centered 
around Toyota, a number of companies--including the previously 
mentioned member company Daihatsu--are developing EV technology 
(JAPAN COMPANY HANDB0OK, FIRST SECTION 5 Nov 93). Nissan is reported 
to be planning to sell 50 Cedric EVs a year beginning as early as 
December 1993 at a cost of 2 to 2.4 million yen ($18,200 to $21,800) 
apiece (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 16 Apr 93); recharging equipment 
costing around one million yen ($9,000) will also be sold. 
   Battery Technology Key to EV Development 
   According to a NIKKEI ELECTRONICS (20 December 93) analyst, 
automotive experts, including most Japanese battery makers, believe 
that breakthroughs in battery technology are necessary to popularize 
electric vehicles. Sealed lead batteries are the "most likely 
candidates" to power the first Japanese EVs in the fall of 1997 to 
meet California's initial requirements for zero emission vehicles, 
but the increasing number of EV sales required by 2003 (10 percent 
of vehicles sold) will necessitate batteries with better 
performance. The analyst reports that Japan's battery makers, 
including those conducting R&amp;D on nickel metal hydride batteries, 
see lithium as the follow-on technology to nickel metal hydride 
(NIKKEI ELECTRONICS 20 Dec 93). 
   Furukawa Battery, Matsushita Battery Industrial, Sanyo Electric, 
and other companies are developing nickel metal hydride battery 
technology. Honda, whose Tokyo Motor Show display included a nickel 
metal hydride battery developed by Ovonic Battery Company and 
Matsushita Battery Industrial, recently concluded an agreement with 
Ovonic for joint development of a next-generation nickel metal 
hydride battery for use in Honda electric vehicles (NIKKAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 12 Jan 94). An unidentified source from a battery 
manufacturer complains nevertheless that nickel metal hydride 
battery costs are three to four times those of lead batteries for 
less than twice the energy density. An anonymous Matsushita Battery 
Industrial Company source notes that his company must find ways to 
lower the battery temperature during recharging and to lengthen the 
battery's short life span (NIKKEI ELECTRONICS 20 Dec 93). 
   MITI is already pursuing lithium battery technology. NEDO, an 
organization under the auspices of MITI, is conducting a 10-year 
lithium battery R&amp;D project (1992-2000) through the Engineering 
Research Association for Lithium Battery Energy Storage Technology 
(LIBES). The Central Research Institute of Electric Power Industry 
(CRIEPI), a public corporation under ANRE's administration, has 
oversight responsibility for "total system research."  Ten companies 
are responsible for the following areas of research: 
   Long-life battery R&amp;D: Hitachi Ltd., Mitsubishi Electric Corp., 
Sanyo Electric Co., Yuasa Battery Co. 
High-energy-density battery R&amp;D: Japan Storage Battery Co., 
Matsushita Battery Industrial Co., Nippondenso Co., Toshiba Corp. 
Materials R&amp;D: Mitsubishi Petrochemical Co., Osaka Gas Co. 
(NEDO NEWS May 93) 
   A Japanese journalist, reporting on the contract signed in 
December by the US firm Minnesota Mining and Manufacturing, the US 
Department of Energy's Argonne National Laboratory, and the Canadian 
utility Hydro-Quebec to develop a thin-film lithium polymer battery 
for the US Advanced Battery Consortium (USABC), speculated that 
Yuasa Corporation's links to Hydro-Quebec could permit the Japanese 
company "to join indirectly in the USABC development project." Yuasa 
and Hydro-Quebec agreed in January 1992 to work together to develop 
a lithium polymer battery by 1998 (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 17 Dec 93). 
   Sodium-sulfur batteries have some advantages over nickel metal 
hydride ones. They currently have an energy density of 100 watt- 
hours per kilogram, or 2.5 times that of conventional lead 
batteries. Sodium-sulfur batteries also have an output density of 
150 watts per kilogram and a life span of 1,000 cycles, which is 
comparable to that of lead batteries. Yuasa's sodium-sulfur battery 
for the Suzuki EE-10 sandwiches a beta-type alumina (beta-Al203) 
between a sodium anode and a sodium-sulfur (Na2Sx) electrode (NIKKEI 
MATERIALS &amp; TECHNOLOGY Dec 93). 
   GRAPHIC: color photo of sodium-sulfur battery 
   Working with Japan Storage Battery, Nissan has also developed the 
SQC-N, a sealed nickel-cadmium battery with an energy density of 55 
watt-hours per kilogram. The SQC-N, capable of a 40-percent rapid 
recharge in six minutes, is featured in the experimental Nissan FEV 
electric car (KINO ZAIRYO Sep 93). 
   Kyushu Electric Power Company and Tokyo R&amp;D, which has designed 
and produced Tokyo Electric Power Company's IZA and Chubu Electric 
Power Company's Dream Mini (shown below), have developed a miniature 
EV that features a nickel-zinc battery developed by Kyushu Electric 
and Yuasa Corporation. With twice the energy density of conventional 
lead batteries, the new battery gives the vehicle a maximum range of 
about 175 kilometers, roughly one-third better than the 130 
kilometers possible with lead batteries.  Kyushu Electric and Yuasa 
are now working to extend the battery's life, which is only half 
that of lead batteries. Kyushu Electric Power Research Institute, 
the utility's affiliated R&amp;D company, is also seeking to stretch the 

life of nickel-zinc batteries from the present 70 cycles to 400 
cycles. Kyushu Electric is planning to market the vehicle in 1996 
(JIDOSHA KOGAKU Oct 93; DENKI SHIMBUN 23 Aug, 14 Oct 93; NIKKAN 
KOGYO SHIMBUN 15 Oct 93; ASAHI SHIMBUN 17 Oct 93; NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 17 Aug 93). 
   GRAPHIC: b/w photo of Dream Mini 
   A team of researchers from the Tokyo University of Agriculture 
and Matsushita Electric Industrial Company is developing a thin-film 
battery with composite electrodes using an organic sulfur compound; 
the new battery lasts ten times as long as nickel-cadmium batteries 
(NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 7 Oct 93). 
   EV-Related Products 
   Japanese companies are also developing EV-related products. 
Yokohama Rubber Company has fabricated a low-resistance tire for a 
light van developed by Mitsubishi Motors and Tokyo Electric Power 
Company. Yokohama Rubber, using its light-truck tires as a base, 
devised a new compound and structure to make 10-percent lighter 
tires with 30 percent less rolling resistance. The company 
reportedly sees its deal with Mitsubishi as a way to catch up to 
Toyo Tire &amp; Rubber Company, which had previously begun deliveries of 

EV tires to Toyota and Nissan (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 22 Jun 93). In 
April 1993 Bridgestone announced its Ecopia EV tire, which also 
incorporates a new rubber compound and design, has 30 percent less 
rolling resistance, and is 10 percent lighter than the company's 
previous tires (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 27 Apr 93). 
   In October 1993 Nihon Protector introduced a waterproof, on- 
vehicle recharging device for electric vehicles.  The device, which 
employs "direct high-frequency switching" technology, measures 50 x 
26 x 16 centimeters, weighs 17 kilograms, and plugs into a 2OO-volt, 
30-ampere AC outlet. The recharging mechanism can power an EV for 
approximately 40 kilometers on a one-hour charge and 10 kilometers 
on a 15-minute charge.  Nihon Protector hopes to begin selling the 
device in the summer of 1994 to automobile companies and other 
customers at a price of under 100,000 yen ($910) (NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 8 Jan, 21 Oct 93). 
   Specifications of Japanese Electric Vehicles 
   Daihatsu 
   Rugger (developed by Kansai Electric Power Company) 
Gross curb weight:  2,400 kg 
Load capacity:  not available 
Occupants:  2 
Maximum authorized gross weight:  2,510 kg 
Top speed:  90 kph 
Maximum range:  200 km at 40 kph 
Motor type: DC shunt 
Rated power/voltage/hour:  2OkW/120V/1hr 
Control:  chopper transistor 
Battery type:   lead 
Battery cells, voltage:  10 cells, 120V 
Standard recharging time:  8 hours 
(KINO ZAIRYO Sep 93) 
   Isuzu Motors 
   Co-op EV 2000 
Gross curb weight:  4,850 kg 
Load capacity:  1,250 kg 
Occupants:  2 
Maximum authorized gross weight:  6,220 kg 
Top speed:  110 kph 
Maximum range:  100 km at 40 kph 
Motor type: DC shunt 
Rated power/voltage/hour:  33kW/108V/1hr 
Control:  chopper transistor 
Battery types:  lead and solar 
Capacity, voltage:  15OAh/5hr, 12 V 
Battery cells, voltage:  27 cells, 108V 
Standard recharging time:  6 hours 
(KIN0 ZAIRYO Sep 93) 
   Kyushu Electric Power Company/Tokyo R&amp;D 
   Experimental Vehicle (no name given) 
Total weight:  970 kg 
Occupants:  2 
Top speed:  121 kph 
Maximum range:  175 km 
Motor type: AC 
Battery type:   nickel-zinc 
Standard recharging time:  8 hours 
(DENKI SHIMBUN 14 Oct 93) 
   Mazda Motor Corporation 
   Bongo EV 
Gross curb weight:  1,980 kg 
Load capacity:  not available 
Occupants:  7 
Maximum authorized gross weight:  2,365 kg 
Top speed:  75 kph 
Maximum range:  80 km at 20 kph 
Motor type: DC shunt 
Rated power/voltage/hour:  12kW/90V/1hr 
Control:  chopper thyristor, chopper transistor 
Battery type:   lead 
Capacity, voltage:  105 Ah/5hr, 12V 
Battery cells, voltage:  10 cells, 120V 
Standard recharging time:  8 hours 
(KINO ZAIRYO Sep 93) 
   Shikoku Electric Power Company 
   Pivot (developed by Shikoku Research Institute, Inc.) (previously 
introduced as the Yonden, renamed in Oct 93) 
Gross curb weight:  2,200 kg 
Occupants:  4 
Total weight:   2,420 kg 
Top speed:  100 kph 
Maximum range:  200 km at 40 kph 
Motor type: DC brushless 
Rated output/number of cells:  6.8kW/4 
Voltage/time:   288V/continuous 
Battery type: lead 
Capacity, voltage:  75Ah/5hr, 12V 
Battery cells:  24 cells 
(DENKI KYOKAI ZASSHI Jul 93; DENKI SHIMBUN 18 Oct 93) 
   Suzuki 
   Every Super Multiroof 
Gross curb weight:  1,345 kg 
Load capacity:  not available 
Occupants:  2 or 4 
Maximum authorized gross weight:  1,655 kg 
Top speed:  75 kph 
Maximum range:  230 km at 40 kph 
Motor type: DC shunt 
Rated power/voltage/hour:  14kW/125V/1hr 
Control:  chopper transistor 
Battery type:   nickel-zinc 
Capacity, voltage:  24OAh/3hr, 13.2V 
Battery cells, voltage:  10 cells, 132V 
Standard recharging time:  10 hours 
(KINO ZAIRYO Sep 93) 
   Electric Vehicle Debate 
   The Japanese press has published numerous articles touting the 
advantages of developing electric vehicles. NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (29 
Jun 93), for example, has described expectations in Japan that EVs 
will play the "main role" among low-pollution vehicles. ANRE 
official Keiichi Yumoto, has called for a comprehensive national 
policy on EVs (SEISAN TO DENKI Jul 93). Some industry 
representatives have nevertheless questioned the benefits of 
electric vehicles. INFODIA (Oct 93), a Mitsubishi Corporation 
journal, recently published an article asserting that higher vehicle 
prices and potential pollution problems resulting from battery 
disposal and increased consumption of electrical power cast doubt on 
the real value of electric vehicles. The article postulated that 
Japanese companies were developing EVs simply to prove their 
environmental credentials while continuing to sell conventional 
automobiles in the United States. A NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN (21 Oct 
93) article suggested that full conversion to electric vehicles is 
not feasible because of high electrical consumption. 
   Other commentators have suggested strategies by which Japan could 
develop and "cash in on" the low-pollution vehicle industry. Asahi 
Research Center, the think tank of Asahi Chemical Industry Co., has 
proposed that MITI accelerate its EV development timetable to avoid 
losing market share in international competition and has called on 
MITI to concentrate recharging stands in selected cities rather than 
both in cities and along highways, as the ministry's plan proposes 
(NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 18 May 93). An unidentified executive in 
Yamato Transport Co., which had begun trial operation of 13 low- 
pollution vehicles, suggested encouraging the purchase of EVs by 
providing "administrative assistance" (YOMIURI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 93). A 
MAINICHI SHIMBUN (28 Sep 93) editorial recently urged the government 
to direct its environmental regulations and preferential policies to 
the popularization of low-pollution vehicles. 
   Stephen M. 733-6343 
   JAPAN: LOW-POLLUTION VEHICLES 
   Japanese industries, backed by government financing, are 
promoting the development and marketing of low-pollution vehicles. 
   Japanese automobile manufacturers and electric power and gas 
companies have been cooperating in government-backed efforts to 
promote the development and sale of low-pollution automobiles, 
including those that use natural gas, hydrogen, methanol, solar 
power, electric batteries and combinations of these as energy 
sources. Much of the current effort focuses on natural gas vehicles. 
   Much of the current Japanese effort to promote the development 
and sale of low-pollution automobiles focuses on natural gas 
vehicles, which use methane-based city gas, and which are 
categorized according to method of fuel storage: compressed natural 
gas vehicles (CNGVs), liquefied natural gas vehicles (LNGVs), and 
absorption natural gas vehicles (ANGVs). As of November 1993, there 
were 123 natural gas vehicles (NGVs) in use in Japan, mostly owned 
by city gas companies; eighteen of them are leased to local 
governments under the auspices of the Ministry of Transport. Most of 
the NGVs operating in Japan are CNGV types (ENERGY Nov 93). 
   Osaka Gas Company plans to help encourage the use of NGVs by 
increasing the number of refueling stations in Kinki region from two 
to six, with a total of 10 new stations to be built in the country 
by 1995 at an estimated cost of 100 to 150 million yen ($900,000 to 
$1.3 million) each. The company also aims to increase the number of 
NGVs in use in the corporate sector from 54 to 300 vehicles by 1995 
(NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Dec 93). In early June Osaka Gas improved 
the output of an NGV test engine to approximately 95 percent of 
gasoline engine output by enlarging the Venturi diameter of the fuel 
supply mixer from the traditional 22 millimeters to 28 millimeters 
and by raising the compression ratio from 9.2:1 to 12:1. The test 
engine was a four-cylinder water-cooled four-stroke in-line spark- 
ignition engine with a displacement of 1,468 cubic centimeters 
(KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 7 Jun 93). 
   Tokyo Gas Company doubled its fiscal year 1993 budget to 1 
billion yen ($9 million) to promote the practical application of NGV 
technology. Osaka Gas, Toho Gas, and Tokyo Gas plan to allocate a 
total budget of some 2 billion yen ($18 million) for NGV promotion 
in fiscal year 1994. Tokyo Gas plans to procure 86 NGVs, 64 for its 
own use and 22 for other organizations to conduct fleet tests in 
fiscal year 1993. The company is to procure about 600 additional 
NGVs by the end of fiscal year 1995 (KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 17 Feb 93). 
   Nissan Diesel Motor Company and Nippon Carburetor Company are 
researching ways to address some of the problems associated with CNG 
engines. To keep the gas pressure high enough to run the engine 
smoothly, the companies designed a special mixer based on electronic 
fuel injection equipment developed for gasoline-powered engines and 
a regulator that adjusts the pressure between the cylinder and the 
intake manifold. A microelectronic chip was installed in a CNG bus 
engine to maintain the fuel/air ratio at a constant level and a 
turbocharger was used to boost horsepower to a maximum of 235. In 
Nissan's road tests of the new CNG bus, NOx and CO2 emissions were 
reduced by 68 percent and 2 to 3 percent, respectively, compared 
with diesel engines (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Dec 93). 
   GRAPHIC: Line drawing of a CNG lean-burn engine 
   Working with Cataler Industrial Company, Toyota Motor Corporation 
has developed a catalyst that absorbs NOx using lean-burn 
technology. More than 60 percent of the NOx is removed from exhaust 
and fuel efficiency improves by 2 to 4 percent when using the 
catalyst. The catalyst is a porous material to which alkaline rare- 
earth metals and precious metals such as platinum and rhodium 
adhere. The companies have tested the catalyst for its purification 
efficiency, reliability and service life and plan to use it with 
1,600-cc-, 1,800-cc- and 2,O0O-cc-class Carina lean-burn engines 
(NIHON KOGYO SHIMBUN, NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 26 Nov 93). 
   Automobile manufacturers have also been accelerating the 
development of hydrogen-powered vehicles. For example, Mazda Motor 
Corporation hopes to roadtest a hydrogen-fueled vehicle with a 
rotary engine by 1995 and to market the vehicle by the year 2000. 
   GRAPHIC: Color photo of Mazda rotary engine 
   CAPTION: Mazda hopes to market a vehicle with this type of engine 
by 1995 
   The company's Kapera Cargo model, whose performance matches that 
of Mazda's HR-X2 hydrogen-powered prototype (exhibited at the Tokyo 
Motor Show in October) (see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 11, 30 Nov 93), 
is slated for testing at Nippon Steel Corporation's Hirohata 
Ironworks. Mazda also recently tested its newly developed vehicle 
powered by a hydrogen fuel cell (JIDOSHA GIJUTSU Aug 93; NIKKAN 
KOGYO SHIMBUN 18 Nov 93). 
   The Japanese government has increased funding for projects to 
popularize low-pollution vehicles. The table below compares MITI's 
fiscal year 1993 expenditures to its fiscal year 1994 budget 
requests for these projects, including three new ventures (NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Oct 93). (For previous reporting on efforts to 
develop Japan's electric vehicle industry, see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 
No. 6, 31 May 93.) 
   MITI-Funded Low-Pollution Vehicle Projects 

Agency          Project          FY93    FY94      % change 
                                 (billion yen) 

NEDO            Li Batteries     0.685   1.264     +84.5 
Petroleum       Methanol 
Energy          Vehicle 
Center          Testing          1.428   1.285     -10 
Japan Gas       NGV Develop.     0.095   0.150     +57.9 
Assoc.          NGV Promotion    0       0.600      *** 
Ecostation      Ecostation 
                2000             0.850   1.634     +92 
Japan Auto.     Hybrid 
Research Inst.  Vehicle          0       0.100      *** 
Japan Dev.      LPV Promotion    O       3.3        *** 
Bank/ 
Hokkaido- 
Tohoku 
Dev. Finance 
Corp. 



   *** Denotes new venture 
   The first of MITI's new ventures involves the development of 
hybrid electric vehicles, whereas the other two seek to popularize 
low-pollution vehicles. For example MITI has requested 100 million 
yen ($900,000) to subsidize half the cost of converting gasoline- 
powered cars to natural gas for auto leasing companies, with the 
Japan Gas Association acting as the intermediary. The ministry is 
also lobbying for 3.3 billion yen ($9.6 million) for the leasing of 
fuel supply facilities and for low-rate financing to encourage the 
purchase of some 1,500 low-pollution vehicles beginning in 1994 at 
an average cost of 4 million yen ($36,000) each (for an electric 
vehicle). MITI's FY94 funding, if approved by the Ministry of 
Finance, will total 8.33 billion yen ($75 million), nearly three 
times the FY93 expenditure of 3.058 billion yen ($27.5) (NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN 7 Oct 93; NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Oct 93). 
   Japan's Environment Agency also plans to establish a policy on 
low-pollution automobile technologies by the end of 1994 to channel 
car makers' R&amp;D efforts into vehicles that comply with stringent 
zero-emissions requirements being implemented in the United States. 
The Ministry of Transport is meanwhile scheduled to begin a four- 
year plan to develop technologies to convert diesel trucks to 
compressed natural gas vehicles next year (KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 5 Nov 
93, 1 Dec 93). 
   Ritsuko G. 733-6333/Stephen M. 733-6343 
   REPORTS 
   REPORTS surveys science and technology trends as detailed in 
articles, books, and journals. It also includes summaries and 
listings of articles and books that may serve as potential sources 
for future research. 
   EUROPE:  CAUTIOUS APPROACH TO LOW-POLLUTION VEHICLES 
   Tougher clean-air standards to be implemented in both California 
and Europe by the year 2000 will dictate the sale of zero-emission 
and ultralow-emission vehicles. European automakers are taking a 
cautious approach in preparing for the new standards. In many cases 
this means converting conventional models to electric drive; in 
other cases it means designing scaled-down models with smaller, less 
polluting internal combustion engines. The most advanced designs, 
now on the drawing boards, will not be marketed before the year 
2000. 
   Uncertain consumer acceptance, the absence of a recharging 
infrastructure, and lack of batteries capable of providing 
satisfactory range have combined with high price tags to cause many 
European automakers to take a conservative approach to electric 
vehicles, according to an article in INDUSTRIES ET TECHNIQUES (Nov 
93). Even large companies have tended to do no more than electrify 
the smallest of their utility-vehicle production models and produce 
them in limited numbers. Utility vehicles are relatively easy to 
convert, because they are technically less sophisticated and better 
able to accommodate today's heavy, bulky batteries. 
   Renault plans to begin series production of its Master model in 
March 1994 and its Express model in October of the same year, 
although neither production line will exceed 1,000 vehicles per 
year. Both are powered by lead-gel batteries. Electric versions of 
the Renault Clio and Peugeot's 106 and AX models, slated to hit 
showrooms in 1995, will be produced only in very limited numbers as 
well. The Clio and the 106, four-seat passenger cars with in-city 
ranges of 80 and 90 kilometers respectively, are powered by nickel- 
cadmium batteries. The 106 and AX models will be tested by 50 
drivers in La-Rochelle for a year and a half prior to their launch 
on the market. During this time the city will also be able to test 
its network of smart-card recharging stations that will provide slow 
charging at parking lots and fast charging at selected gas stations. 
   GRAPHIC: color photo of electric Peugeot 106 
   Renault, Citroen, and Fiat all have cars on the drawing board 
that are designed for electric propulsion (the Zoom, the Citela, and 
the Downtown) but have no immediate plans for series production and 
marketing. Other companies, such as BMW, have designed cars with 
hybrid electric and internal combustion drives (see PERSPECTIVES 
Vol. 7 No. 4, 30 Apr 92). In all cases, price is a problem. Demand 
remains low, so production numbers will be few, keeping prices high. 
   The table below lists new European designs for passenger vehicles 
planned for introduction in the year 2000. 


Company   Model     Seats  Drive      Battery  City Range     Max. 
Speed 
                                                  (km)       (kph) 
Citroen   CiteIa    2      DC/2OkW    NiCd        110         110 
                                      14 kW 
Fiat      Downtown  3      2 x syn-   NaS         190         100 
                           chronous   165kg 
                           AC/14kW 
Opel      Twin      4      2 x three  LiC         250         120 
                           -phase     250 kg 
                           AC/2OkW 
Renault   Zoom      2      autosyn-   NiCd        150         120 
                           chronous   350 kg 
                           AC/ 25kW 
VW        Chico     4      hybrid;    NiCd         **          60 
                           AC/6kW     72V/3OAh 
Volvo     ECC       4      hybrid;    NiCd         85         175 
                           35kW       120V; 315kg 


   ** information unavailable 

   GRAPHIC: color photo of Opel Twin 
   To meet both the tougher air-quality standards of the year 2000 
and the lower fleet average fuel consumption requirements also 
expected by then, European automakers are designing small vehicles 
to be powered initially by small internal combustion engines--which 
inherently emit less pollution--and later by electric propulsion 
(SCIENCE &amp; VIE Nov 93). Small cars are a familiar tradition for most 

European automakers, but some builders of large luxury cars are 
having to design scaled-down models for the first time. The Vision A 
minivan (shown below), a Mercedes designed to compete with vehicles 
such as the Renault Twingo, is slated to hit the market around 1996. 
Its engine, a three-cylinder, 1.2-liter, 55-horsepower experimental 
model, is under the passengers' feet. The Vision A's under-floor 
area can also accommodate a nickel chloride/sodium battery pack, a 
54-horsepower asynchronous motor, an electronic control module, and 
bulky cooling equipment for the electric version. The prototype has 
an aluminum body, which saves about 70 kilograms in weight compared 
with conventional steel structures. However, Mercedes admits an 
aluminum body will not be feasible for the production model, so the 
fuel economy will be less spectacular than the city/highway average 
of 3.8 liters per 100 kilometers (about 62 miles per gallon) claimed 
for the diesel-powered prototype. 
   GRAPHIC: color photo of Vision A 
   The Vision A by Mercedes is 3.35 meters long, 1.66 meters wide, 
1.57 meters high, and weighs 715 kilograms (gasoline version) or 735 
kilograms (diesel version) 
   Ioan M. 733-6334 
   NETHERLANDS/GERMANY:  CLEAN MANUFACTURING FOR ELECTRONICS 
INDUSTRY 
   Siemens' Laboratory for Production Techniques in Oostkamp, 
Netherlands is designing environmentally friendly processes for 
manufacturing electronic subassemblies. According to an article in 
the December 1993 issue of the Dutch publication TECHNIVISIE, 
researchers began a project in 1988 to develop environmentally 
friendly materials for manufacturing electrical appliances, which 
led to the development of injection-molded components with 
integrated conductive paths. The technology combines the functions 
of electromagnetic compatibility (EMC) shielding, heat removal, and 
conductors between connector pins using a strong, heat-resistant, 
injectable plastic. Researchers metallized the plastic with a copper 
layer, developed a three-dimensional conductor using a laser-based 
process, and designed a method to solder without causing damage. 
Siemens uses the technology to fabricate the substrate for a 
programmable logic control (PLC) circuit. 
   Siemens' new method of PLC fabrication offers significant 
advantages compared with the previous technique. The new process 
reduces the number of components from 11 to just one, and it uses 
only two materials--copper and plastic--both of which are 
recyclable. Siemens' process is also shorter and the company expects 
lower production costs if it can mass-produce the PLCs. A fourth 
advantage of this new process is that 100-micron laser structuring 
allows direct integration of surface-mounted devices, bare 
integrated circuits, or microengineering components. 
   Siemens has yet to produce a prototype PLC but plans to do so 
using stereolithography. Researchers are optimistic about the 
method's marketability, and even though it remains in the design 
phase, Siemens at Oostkamp has offered to teach other electronics 
manufacturers how to integrate the new fabrication method into their 
own products. 
   Siemens researchers have also developed a new software package 
that analyzes the environmental impact of various electronic 
assembly manufacturing processes. The software is designed to help 
manufacturers and distributors of electrical and electronic 
appliances ensure that their products are completely recyclable in 
compliance with Germany's January 1994 recycling legislation. 
Siemens-Nixdorf has already begun marketing the new software. 
   Renee McG. 733-6339 
   CHINA: ENVIRONMENTALLY FRIENDLY CARBON/CARBON COMPOSITE 
   Researchers in the Materials Science and Engineering Department 
at Northwest Polytechnical University (NPU) in Xian have developed a 
crosslinking catalytic method to modify the matrix of domestic 
industrial mesothermal (coal tar) pitch, which results in an 
improved carbon/carbon (C/C) composite. The NPU method, described in 
an article in the Beijing technical journal GAO JISHU TONGXUN (Sep 
93), will not damage equipment and is not harmful to human health. 
The method rearranges the small-molecule hydrocarbons (arenes) in 
the pitch matrix into a large planar molecular network, increasing 
the carbon-to-hydrogen ratio (C/H) and improving the carbon yield. 
The method also results in greater compressive strength at both room 
temperature and high temperatures. The composite--which exhibits 
better material integrity, lower porosity, and better heat 
resistance than earlier-generation composites--is made from the 
modified pitch as matrix precursor by constant-pressure soaking and 
carbonization technology. 
   The technique uses industrial mesothermal pitch (softening 
temperature 82 degrees Celsius, average molecular weight 460) made 
by the Wuzhu Steel Company. The test agents are commercially pure 
chemical reagents.  The pitch is first pulverized, then mixed with 
the cross-linking catalyst--idealIy formaldehyde monomer or para- 
toluene sulfonic acid--and dissolved in a solvent. This is done in 
argon where the solution is heated in an oil bath and then rapidly 
cooled. For comparison, both modified and unmodified pitch are used 
as matrix precursors. They are soaked, then carbonized to make two 
different C/C composites. Both composites are analyzed for C/H 
value, carbon yield, softening point, and weight-loss onset 
temperature (thermal gravimetric analysis), as well as for 
compressive strength at both room temperature (90-degree direction) 
and high temperature (900 degrees Celsius, 90-degree direction, in 
air). Results are given in the table below. 
   Pitch Properties, Before and After Modification 


      C/H      Carbon Softening    Temp. at          Compressive 
      (atomic yield  point         onset of          strength (MPa) 
      ratio)   (%)   (deg. C)      weight      Rm. temp.  High temp. 
                                   loss 
                                   (deg. C) 
Pre- 
modif. 1.62    50.0    82           220          95         82 
Post- 
modif. 2.01    85.5   108           302         200        191 
Increased 
rate 
(%)   24.1     71.0    31.7          37.3       110.5      132.9 



   Note:  all values are averaged. 
   Thomas T. 733-6342 
   JAPAN: CLEAN ENERGY POLICY, EXPENDITURES 
   Japanese government ministries are departing from their usual 
inter-ministerial squabbling over policy and budget issues and are 
cooperating to promote the application of new energy technologies 
such as photovoltaic power generation and clean-energy vehicles. The 
Ministry of Trade and Industry (MITI), the Ministry of Construction 
(MOC), the Ministry of Transport (MOT), the Ministry of Home Affairs 
(MHA), and the Environment Agency (EA) are jointly proposing 
strategies for a low-interest loan system to encourage 
commercialization of low-pollution vehicles and for the 
incorporation of photovoltaic power and other energy conservation 
systems into residential housing. MITI and MHA are also intensifying 
their efforts to promote wind power generation and the use of waste 
materials to generate power. 
   The fiscal year 1993 Science and Technology Research Survey 
report published by the Management and Coordination Agency in the 
Office of the Prime Minister says that fiscal year 1992 energy 
research expenditures totaled some 1.05 trillion yen ($9.4 billion), 
a 7.4-percent increase over the fiscal year 1991 figure. More than 
8,000 organizations, including companies capitalized at over 100 
million yen and scientific research organizations and universities, 
participate in the agency's annual survey. The following table shows 
fiscal year 1992 energy research expenditures. 


Research Area                Fiscal Year 1992 Expenditure 
                                     (billion yen) 

Fossil energy                        95.1 
  Petroleum                          46.2 
  Natural gas                         7.3 
  Coal                               35.2 
  Other                               6.4 
Natural energy                       35.6 
  Geothermal                          4 
  Solar                              22 
  Ocean                               1.3 
  Wind                                1.5 
  Biomass                             4.9 
  Other                               1.9 
Nuclear energy                      488.2 
 Power generation                   205.3 
 Multipurpose reactors               16.7 
 Nuclear fuel cycle                 109.5 
 Nuclear fusion                      50.1 
 Nuclear powered ships                1.7 
 Radiation use                       26.6 
 Radiation safety                    42.7 
 Other                               35.6 
Energy conservation                 411.2 
 Industrial sector                   41.5 
 Home affairs                        40.8 
 Transportation                     254.5 
 Energy conservation/storage         54.1 
 Hydrogen energy                      7.4 
 Other                               12.9 
Other                                17.8 
Total                             1,047.9 



   (KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 3 Dec 93, 14 Dec 93) 
   Junko A. 733-6346 
   JAPAN: FUEL CELLS 
   Fuel cells convert chemical energy directly into electrical 
energy, producing electric power from the chemical reaction between 
the electrolyte and fossil fuel. Because fuel cells require no steam 
cycle, they are efficient power generators, reaching about 80- 
percent efficiency when exhaust heat is added. Fuel cell-powered 
facilities can be located inland because the cells require no 
cooling water. They create a minimum amount of noise and emit little 
carbon dioxide (CO2) or nitrogen oxide (NOx) (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
29 Sep 93. 
   Fuel cells are thought to have considerable potential for use in 
large power plants, cogeneration systems, on-site public and 
residential facilities, and electric vehicles. So far, 76 phosphoric 
acid-type fuel cell power plants (18,500 kilowatts) have been 
installed in Japan (NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 
   Led by MITI's Agency of Industrial Science and Technology (AIST), 
fuel cell development projects have been under way since 1981. The 
New Energy and Industrial Technology Development Organization 
(NEDO), a MITI-affiliated R&amp;D organization, is actually responsible 

for granting R&amp;D contracts to various companies and research 
corporations (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 
   Phosphoric Acid Fuel Cells (PAFCs) have been the object of the 
most intensive development and testing in Japan. Two 200-kilowatt 
normal-pressure PAFC pilot plants--one in Osaka and the other on 
Okinawa--have operated continuously for 13,000 hours and 8,500 
hours, respectively. A 5,O00-kilowatt pressurized-type fuel cell 
power plant under construction at Kansai Electric Power Company's 
Amagasaki Technoland is scheduled to begin operating in fiscal year 
1994. A 1,O0O-kilowatt normal pressure on-site plant is being built 
at the Tokyo Gas Co. Research Institute and is scheduled for 
operation in fiscal year 1995. In addition, some thirty 50- to 100- 
kilowatt plants will have been constructed by 31 March 1994 for 
field tests (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 
   The LP Gas Promotion Center and Fuji Electric Co. have developed 
a 100-kilowatt prototype PAFC plant that uses butane as fuel. Butane 
is about 10 percent cheaper than propane, and propane can also be 
used for the fuel cells designed for butane. Previous problems of 
damage to the reformer catalyst caused by the use of butane have 
been solved by substituting a special precious metal catalyst. The 
efficiency of the butane fuel cell is expected to be about 40 
percent, generally the same as that of natural gas or propane gas 
fuel cells. Overall development cost is estimated at 550 million yen 
(about $5 million), including evaluation tests on design and 
operation scheduled for 1994 (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 22 Dec 93). 
   After PAFCs, the next type of fuel cell targeted for development 
is expected to be the molten carbonate fuel cell (MCFC). In fiscal 
year 1994 NEDO is scheduled to begin development of a 1,000-kilowatt 
power plant based on MCFC technology (KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 9 Sep 93). 
   NEDO recently claimed a world-record 129 kilowatts of electric 
power generated using a stack of 102 MCFC cells with electrode areas 
of 1 square meter (see PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8 No. 11, 30 Nov 93). At 
the same time, NEDO tested a normal-pressure internal-reformer-type 
cell stack with electrode areas of 0.5 square meters in which 
natural gas can be used; this stack generated 33 kilowatts. NEDO has 
also operated a 5-kilowatt internal-reformer-type cell stack for 
more than 10,000 continuous hours with a voltage drop of 0.5 percent 
per 1,000 hours (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 
   MITI's AIST and its MCFC Power Generation System Technology 
Consortium have succeeded in putting MCFCs to practical use. The 
consortium includes equipment manufacturers and utility companies 
(see table). A 100-kilowatt MCFC plant located at the Central 
Research Institute of Electric Power Industry's Akagi Experimental 
Center in Gunma Prefecture achieved 0.8 volt per square centimeter 
of electrode area and 150 milliamperes of current for 1,000 hours of 
operation. Even then, electric output dropped by a little over 1 
percent. The Consortium was to begin drafting a design for the 
world's first 1,O0O-kilowatt experimental plant by the end of 1993. 
The electricity generated is expected to cost 14 to 15 yen (about 13 
cents) per kilowatt and power generation efficiency should reach 54 
percent, with an overall energy efficiency of 76 percent--figures 
that are thought to be commercially viable (NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 
Nov 93). 
   Solid oxide fuel cells (SOFCs) have a power generation efficiency 
of 60 percent, about 1.5 times that of large thermal power plants. 
Not only do they emit almost no NOx, but exhaust heat temperature is 
high, making them ideal for cogeneration systems in urban areas 
(NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 24 Dec 93). 
   Basic research and development of S0FCs started in fiscal year 
1989 and was aimed at developing a flat-plate cell stack capable of 
generating more than 10 kilowatts by fiscal year 1997. A 500-watt 
stack is now being developed using cells with an electrode area of 
200 square centimeters (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). Osaka Gas 
Company is working toward producing a 5-kilowatt cell module 
prototype in 1995. 
   According to NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN (14 Dec 93), Chubu Electric 
Power Company and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries have claimed a record 
in generating power continuously for 7,000 hours using two stacks of 
7.5- x 7.5-centimeter advanced SOFCs. These cells feature monolithic 
layers of electrolyte, fuel electrode (cathode), and air electrode 
(anode). This reduces the surface area of electrodes coming into 
contact with one another by half, thereby decreasing the drop in 
power output to 1/10 that of conventional SOFCs. Each cell has a 
projected electrode area of 25 square centimeters, resulting in a 
0.5-watt output density--three times that of conventional SOFCs. 
   Meanwhile Toho Gas Company has claimed a world record for output 
density, achieving 1.61 watts per square centimeter for a single 
cell test-produced for a flat-plate SOFC stack (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
27 Dec 93). 
   Initial research for solid polymer fuel cells, or proton exchange 
membranes, under way since fiscal year 1992, is aimed at development 
of 1-kilowatt cell technology by fiscal year 1995. At present a 200- 
watt stack of cells with electrode areas of 100 square centimeters 
is being developed (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 
   For fuel cells to be commercially viable, both longevity and 
performance must meet certain standards. In December 1993, a report 
on the prospects for clean energy by the Advisory Committee on 
Energy and ANRE's Electricity Utility Industry Council estimated a 
fuel-cell-generated power supply of 160,000 kilowatts in the year 
2000. This figure was in sharp contrast to a June 1990 estimate of 
1.2 million kilowatts. According to ANRE, the 1990 estimate badly 
misjudged the technical difficulty of dealing with cell longevity. 
The objective was a life of 40,000 hours (five years) for a cell 
stack and reformer catalyst, but the best achieved so far is 15,000 
hours of operation at 0.08 watt per square centimeter in 1987 
(KAGAKU KOGYO NIPPO 6, 13 Dec 93). 

   FUEL CELL R&amp;D PARTICIPANTS 


ANRE/AI ST 
      NEDO            PAFC Develop.  PAFC Consortium, Fuji Electric, 
                                     Co., Toshiba, Hokkaido Electric 
                                     Power Co., Tohoku EPC, Tokyo 
                                     EPC, Chubu EPC, Hokuriku EPC, 
                                     Kansai EPC, Chugoku EPC, 
                                     Shikoku EPC, Kyushu EPC, 
                                     Central Research Inst. of 
                                     Electric Power Industry 
                                     (CRIEPI), Tokyo Gas Co., Toho 
                                     Gas Co., Osaka Gas Co., Seibu 
                                     Gas Co., Inst. of Applied 
                                     Energy 

                      MCFC Develop.  MCFC Consortium, Hitachi Ltd., 
                                     Ishikawaj ima-Harima Heavy 
                                     Industries, Mitsubishi Electric 
                                     Corp. (MELCO), Yokogawa 
                                     Electric Corp., Fuji Electric 
                                     Co., Ube Industries, Ebara 
                                     Corp., Chiyoda Chemical 
                                     Engineering &amp; Construction Co., 

                                     Toshiba, Kobe Steel, Toyo 
                                     Engineering, Institute of 
                                     Electric Power Industry, Japan 
                                     Research &amp; Development Center 
                                     for Metals, Mitsubishi 
                                     Materials, Nippon Kokan, Nissin 
                                     Steel Co., Sumitomo Metal 
                                     Mining Co., Kawasaki Heavy 
                                     Industries, Matsushita 
                                     Electric, Electric Power 
                                     Dev. Co. 
                      SOFC Develop.  Fuji Electric, Sanyo Electric, 
                                     Fine Ceramics Center, Fujikura 
                                     Ltd., Mitsubishi Heavy 
                                     Industries, Murata Mfg. Co., 
                                     Mitsui Engineering &amp; 
                                     Shipbuilding Co., CRIEPI, 
                                     Electric Power Dev. Co., JRCM, 
                                     Sumitomo Precision Products 
                                     Co., Sumitomo Metal Mining Co., 
                                     Kobe Steel, Kubota Corp., Ebara 
                                     Corp. 
                      SPFC Develop.  Toshiba, MELCO, Sanyo Electric, 
                                     Asahi Chemical Industry Co., 
                                     Asahi Glass Co., Hitachi, Ltd., 
                                     Sumitomo Electric Industries, 
                                     Aisin Seiki Co., Imura Research 
                                     Institute for Materials 
                                     Development 
      Government Institutes          Electrotechnical Lab. 
                                     Government Industrial Research 
                                     Institute in Osaka, National 
                                     Institute of Materials &amp; 
                                     Chemical Research, National 
                                     Institute for Resources and 
                                     Environment 


   Junko A. 733-6346 
   SPECIAL PUBLICATIONS 
   KOREA: NUCLEAR SAFETY WHITE PAPER 
   A special issue of the JPRS Report series: SCIENCE &amp; 
TECHNOLOGY/KOREA entitled "White Paper on Nuclear Energy Safety" 
(JPRS-KST-93-001, 22 Dec 93) published by the Korea Institute of 
Nuclear Safety, Ministry of Science and Technology, presents 
information on Korea's nuclear energy safety management system. The 
report also provides the status of selected Korean R&amp;D projects in 
the field of nuclear energy technology for 1991. This is the premier 
issue of a new FBIS report covering Korean Science and Technology 
Issues. This report will be published on an irregular basis. 
   Shireen H. 733-6346 
   JAPAN: ELECTRIC VEHICLES 
   A special issue of the JPRS report series SCIENCE &amp; 
TECHNOLOGY/JAPAN entitled "Electric Vehicle Policy, Technology 
Developments" (JPRS-JST-93-091-L, 12 Nov 93) presents information on 
Japanese government and corporate efforts to develop competitive 
electric vehicles. 
   Stephen M. 733-6343 
   PROCEEDINGS 
   The Technology Issues Division has acquired the proceedings and 
other conference-related papers listed below, copies of which are 
available upon request for a period of six months from the date of 
this PERSPECTIVES--contact Chris R. X6500. 
   All contractor requests must be received in writing, by letter 
(FBIS/GIG/TID, PO Box 2604, Washington DC 20013) or fax ((703) 834- 
3847), on the sponsoring agency's letterhead and signed by the 
contracting officer technical representative. 
   Please use the number in parentheses at the end of the paragraph 
when requesting proceedings. 
   ENERGEX '93, THE FIFTH INTERNATIONAL ENERGY CONFERENCE, held from 
18 to 22 October 1993 in Seoul, South Korea. The six-volume set of 
proceedings in English comprises about 250 papers by authors from 
Europe, Asia, the former Soviet Union, and the United States. The 
volumes are entitled: 
I.   Keynote Address, Plenary Sessions, and Participants List 
II.  Rational Use of Energy 
III. New and Renewable Sources of Energy 
IV.  Fossil Fuels and Clean Fuel Technologies 
V.   Environmental Control and Waste Recycling 
VI.  Energy Policies and Economics 
(v9nl-1) 
   SEMICON/KOREA 93 TECHNICAL SYMPOSIUM, held 9 and 10 November 1993 
in Seoul, South Korea. The two-volume set of proceedings contain 37 
papers in English by authors from Korea, Japan, Belgium, Israel, and 
the United States on Iithography, evaluation technology, thin films, 
manufacturing science, and compound semiconductors. (v9n1-2) 
   KOREA TELECOM INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM '93, held from 3 to 5 
November 1993 in Seoul, South Korea. The 288-page proceedings 
contains 39 papers in English by authors from Korea, Japan, Germany, 
Belgium, Poland, Canada, China, the United Kingdom, and the United 
States on management issues such as requirements; management of 
distributed systems; network management; service management, and 
management tools and applications. (v9n1-3) 
   SMMIB 93, EIGHTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON SURFACE MODIFICATION 
OF METALS BY ION BEAMS, held from 13 to 17 September 1993 in 
Kanazawa Japan. The 209-page volume of proceedings in English 
contains 179 abstracts of papers and poster sessions by authors from 
Europe, Japan, China, Russia, Ukraine, Belarus, Uzbekistan, 
Kazakhstan, Lithuania, India, and the United States. Topics covered 
include fundamentals of surface modification, properties of ion- 
beam-modified metals, novel techniques of ion implantation, thin 
films, and technical applications. (v9n1-4) 
GIG/rmcg  cka 08/1744z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24649 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-09FEB94-ISRAEL 
<H3> <TI>      Newspaper Accuses Foreign Minis try of Lying </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The  English-language newspaper THE JERUSALEM POST, which has a 
strong right-wing orientation and as Israel's only English- 
language newspaper is regarded as influential among foreign 
readers, has rebuked the Israeli Foreign Ministry for its recent 
decision to cancel more than 1,000 of the ministry's 1,200 
subscriptions to the paper's weekly international edition and to 
reduce subscriptions to its weekly French edition from 125 to 14 
(both papers are routinely distributed among Israeli legations 
abroad).  In an article on 21 January, POST editor David Bar-Ilan 
reported that Foreign Ministry spokesman Yosi Gal had attributed 
the cancellations to budgetary considerations, but rejected this 
explanation as "bald lying in public by a government official." 
Bar-Ilan called the ministry's action retaliation against an 
"unfriendly paper."  Casting further doubt on Gal's statement, 
Bar-Ilan said that the ministry had "flatly rejected" POST 
publisher Yehuda Levi's offer to send the paper free of charge to 
all ministry subscribers.  Moreover, Bar-Ilan noted that the 
ministry had almost simultaneously doubled its subscriptions to 
Israel's weekly Spanish-language newspaper AURORA, which he 
depicted as "super-dovish" and "enthusiastically supportive of 
government policies." 
   To reinforce his claim that the Foreign Minstry's curtailment of 
subscriptions was a political act--rather than a cost-cutting 
exercise--Bar-Ilan said that an undated article by Sarah Helm in 
the British daily THE INDEPENDENT had reported that Foreign 
Minister Shim'on Peres is concerned about the POST's effect on 
international opinion, since, "as the only English-language 
daily, it is an international opinion-former" and has "declared 
war" on the POST because the paper "is undermining the 
government's peace efforts."  According to Bar-Ilan, Helm 
reported that the Foreign Ministry believes that a 10 December 
POST article about an alleged Israeli Government plan to return 
to the Palestinians all the territories seized in 1967 had been 
"planted" to "stir up" opposition to the Israel-PLO Declaration 
of Principles among Jews abroad. 
   (AUTHOR:  RAILEY. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SM 09/2104Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24650 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S, GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-09Feb94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Agrarian Lobby Pushes Through Costly Farm Program </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                            The agricultural lobby--f resh from success in the 12 December 
parliamentary election and format ion of one of the largest 
factions in the State Duma--has quickly demonstrated its power by 
winning cabinet approval of a program of government support for 
state and collective farms that will cost trillions of rubles 
and, according to reformers, set off a wave of inflation.  Deputy 
Premier for agriculture Aleksandr Zaveryukha appears to have 
orchestrated the drive, instigating the Agrarian faction in the 
Duma to press for the new program and taking advantage of the 
resignation of the cabinet's tight money defenders, First Deputy 
Premier Yegor Gaydar and Deputy Premier Boris Fedorov, to push it 
through the cabinet.  Although the program still must gain Duma 
approval, the close cooperation between the powerful Agrarian 
faction in the Duma and Zaveryukha in the cabinet, aided by a 
sympathetic Premier Viktor Chernomyrdin, has so far proved to be 
a powerful force in the first post-election struggle over 
resources. 
                              END SUMMARY 
   Zaveryukha, targeted by reformers as one of the cabinet's main 
foes of reform and fiscal discipline, appears to have played the 
central role in designing the new.agricultural program and in 
organizing the cabinet's approval of it.  As the second part of a 
two-pronged campaign, he encouraged Agrarian leaders in 
parliament to press for greater financial support for agriculture 
and manuevered within the government to pave the way for the 
Agrarians' moves in parliament: 
   --On the eve of the 11 January opening of the Duma, Zaveryukha 
and Agriculture Minister Viktor Khlystun met with the Agrarian 
faction and spoke on the financial crisis in agriculture, 
appearing to encourage them to press the cabinet for more money 
for agriculture (Selskaya Zhizn, 11 January). 
   --An Agriculture Ministry report issued in early January said 
that the government owed farms 1.3 trillion for agricultural 
products purchased in 1993 and 800 billion in funds allocated to 
agriculture but not delivered (Interfax, 14 January).  The 
Agrarian faction in the Duma later used these figures in a 
resolution calling on the cabinet to pay these debts. 
   --According to the 13 January Rossiyskaya Gazeta, the cabinet had 
already prepared a draft decree "On Functioning of the 
Agroindustrial Complex in 1994" apparently strengthening the role 
of the Agriculture Ministry (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 13 January). 
According to Deputy Finance Minister Aleksey Krasnopivtsev, the 
decree called for 25.6 trillion rubles for agriculture (Interfax, 
20 January).  At a mid-January conference on the decree, 
Zaveryukha urged that the draft be submitted to the cabinet by 20 
January (Interfax, 20 January).  Thus the decree was 
substantially prepared before the Agrarian faction in the Duma on 
19 January proposed a resolution calling for a decree "On 
Functioning of the Agroindustrial Complex in 1994." 
   --The Agrarian faction took up its part of the drive within days 
after the Duma opened its first session on 11 January.  It moved 
to both press agriculture's financial demands in the wake of 
Gaydar's resignation on 16 January and to protect Zaveryukha 
after Fedorov issued a 17 January ultimatum refusing to rejoin 
the cabinet unless Zaveryukha was removed.  At the 19 January 
Duma session, Chairman of the Duma's Agrarian Committee Aleksandr 
Nazarchuk demanded immediate discussion of the agricultural 
situation.  The Agrarian faction called on the Duma to approve a 
statement defending Zaveryukha, assailing Fedorov as "personally 
responsible for the financial catastrophe in agriculture," and, 
using the figures in the Agriculture Ministry report, called on 
the government to pay its debts to the farmers.  The Agrarians 
also presented a resolution asking the Duma to call upon the 
cabinet to adopt within five days a decree "On the Functioning of 
the Agroindustrial Complex in 1994" which would satisfy the 
financial demands of the agrarians (Segodnya, 2O January).  The 
Duma rejected the statement as too extreme (ITAR-TASS, 19 
January; Sovetskaya Rossiya, 2O January), but adopted the 
resolution (ITAR-TASS, Radio Rossii, 19 January; Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 20 January). 
   The resolution was approved only on the second vote and, to much 
surprise, after receiving support from a highly unlikely side- 
-Russia's Choice leader Gaydar (Radio Rossii, 19 January; 
Segodnya, 20 January), whose party has been the main foe of the 
Agrarians and whose tight money policies have stopped government 
payments to farms.  The hostility between Gaydar and the 
Agrarians had been reflected on the eve of the Duma opening when 
Agrarian Party Chairman Mikhail Lapshin assailed Russia's Choice 
for stating that it would not negotiate with "extremists" like 
the Agrarian Party (Selskaya Zhizn, 11 January).  Journalists 
were "amazed" at Gaydar's support for the Agrarians' resolution, 
according to the 20 January Segodnya, which reported speculation 
that he may have been motivated by suspicions that the cabinet 
was already considering a decree on agricultural subsidies that 
would be even more "destructive "--suspicions that were probably 
well founded in view of Zaveryukha's activities. 
   --By 24 January, Zaveryukha told reporters that the cabinet had 
prepared a draft decree on a program for the agroindustrial 
complex in 1994 in response to the Duma's demand.  He said that 
the program would pay 1.3 trillion to farms for their 1993 
products, allow farms to postpone repayment of their 1993 credits 
until the next harvest, and keep present state subsidies for 
equipment, parts, fuel, and fertilizer.  He insisted the program 
would cost the budget only 13-14 trillion, not the 26 trillion 
that "monetarist-critics" were claiming, and that the budget "can 
cope" with this amount (Segodnya, 25 January; Interfax, 26 
January). 
   Chernomyrdin Cooperation 
   Zaveryukha has appeared to have Premier Chernomyrdin's support in 
his efforts to boost spending on agriculture despite criticism 
from reformist quarters.  The two traveled to a 25 January Orel 
conference on agriculture in the Central Russian provinces and 
made statements pledging large sums to agriculture, setting off 
alarm among reformers that the cabinet was abandoning tight money 
and selling out to the farm lobby.  According to the 26 January 
Segodnya, Chernomyrdin promised 2.3 trillion to pay for 
government debts to farms and large sums to develop Central 
Russia's agriculture, while Zaveryukha promised even more--40 
trillion for Central Russia by the year 2000--prompting the 
premier to rebuke him for "excessive openness."  Novaya 
Yezhednevnaya Gazeta on 29 January said Chernomyrdin's promise of 
2.3 trillion caused monetarists "to accuse the new cabinet of an 
'economic coup'" and reported Yeltsin's press secretary 
Vyacheslav Kostikov's 27 January statement that the president was 
dissatisfied with the cabinet's new agricultural policy. 
Chernomyrdin quickly asserted that Zaveryukha's 4O trillion was 
intended to cover agriculture all the way to the year 205O and 
defended his deputy, complaining that he was being turned into a 
"scapegoat" (Ostankino TV, 26 January).  Zaveryukha also 
complained that the press was trying to discredit him (Izvestiya, 
29 January). 
   Cabinet Approval 
   Zaveryukha scored a major success when the cabinet Presidium met 
on 3 February and approved the decree "On Functioning of the 
Agroindustrial Complex in 1994."  The Agriculture Ministry 
declared the cost of the program mandated in the decree to be 
14.2 trillion rubles, but critics objected that its real cost is 
34 trillion rubles--or "22 billion dollars at the present 
[exchange] rate" (Segodnya, Kommersant-Daily, 4 February; Andrey 
Illarionov in the 8 February Izvestiya). (See Note 1 )  The 
cabinet vigorously debated--for two and a half hours, according 
to the 5 February Selskaya Zhizn--the cost of the program and how 
the money would be used.  Acting Finance Minister Sergey Dubinin 
objected that the program would disrupt financial stabilization, 
and Deputy Premier Anatoliy Chubays objected to provisions for 
importing agricultural equipment (Izvestiya, 4 February).  Even 
Chernomyrdin cautioned that support for agriculture must be 
balanced against the need to prevent hyperinflation (Selskaya 
Zhizn, 5 February), but he went along with the agricultural 
lobby. 
   (Note 1) The session was closed and reporters were able to learn 
details only from various participants, resulting in somewhat 
differing accounts in Segodnya, Izvestiya, Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
and Selskaya Zhizn.  The pro-agricultural lobby paper Selskaya 
Zhizn minimized the size of the program, declaring that it 
totalled only 14 trillion, while the reports in the pro-reform 
Segodnya, Izvestiya, and Kommersant-Daily stressed statements by 
the Ministry of the Economy and Chernomyrdin aide Andrey 
Illarionov that it would total over 34 trillion. 
   Reaction 
   The cabinet decision brought pleasure to the Agrarians but dismay 
to reformers.  Although the decree reportedly did not meet 
agricultural demands in full, Agrarian Party leaders at a 3 
February news conference proclaimed themselves satisfied with it 
and with the program's restoration of state orders for the main 
agricultural products (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, Izvestiya, 4 
February).  In contrast,  one of Chernomyrdin's top economic 
advisers, leader of the premier's Analysis and Planning Group 
Andrey Illarionov, protested that spending measures in the 
program will set off hyperinflation and resigned.  Illarionov, 
although a leader of Gaydar's 1992 Working Center for Economic 
Reforms, had been chosen by Chernomyrdin to head the new Analysis 
and Planning Group set up in April 1993 to help the new premier 
deal with macroeconomics (Kommersant-Daily, 4 May 1993). 
Illarionov told reporters after the cabinet meeting that the 
January 1994 program provided not only 14.2 trillion of budget 
subsidies but also 14.5 trillion credit for equipment and 6 
trillion credit for the spring sowing--a total of 34.7 trillion. 
He added that only 8.2 trillion of this 34.7 trillion can be paid 
for with existing funds and the rest will come from credit 
emissions and therefore boost inflation to 35 percent a month in 
April and 50 percent in June and lead to an explosion of 
"hyperinflation" (Izvestiya, Segodnya, 4 February).  In addition 
to talking to reporters, Illarionov wrote an article published on 
the front page of the 8 February Izvestiya assailing the cabinet 
for caving in to the agricultural lobby and complaining that the 
farmers are "feeding off the people" instead of feeding the 
people.  Illarionov on 7 February sent a letter of resignation to 
the premier, protesting the allocation of so many resources to 
the "agroindustrial lobby," the cabinet's abandonment of its 
anti-inflationary course, and the premier's reliance on 
agricultural lobbyists (Russian TV, 7 February). (See Note 2) 
   (Note 2) A cabinet spokesman subsequently announced that 
Illarionov had been fired for "violating labor discipline" 
(giving lectures in Britain without informing the government) and 
asserted that his statement of resignation over policy was just 
an attempt to conceal his dismissal (Interfax, 8 February). 
   Implications 
   The quick post-election victory of the agricultural lobby over 
reformers and monetarists dims prospects for holding back 
inflation and fighting off similar claims by other segments of 
the economy that are still dependent on government support. 
Chernomyrdin, although voicing concern about inflation, stuck by 
Zaveryukha and appeared to give the agricultural lobby most of 
what it wanted.  With a big faction in the Duma and a close 
alliance with the Communist Party faction, the Agrarians stand a 
good chance of winning approval for their program when the 
cabinet presents it to the Duma. 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SM 09/2122Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24651 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-09FEB94-RUSSIA 
<H3> <TI>      Duma Factions Successfully Negotiate Committee Assignments </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              In contrast to their protracted wrangling over the election of 
the State Duma's chairman, legislative factions apparently worked 
together relatively smoothly in nominating candidates to fill the 
positions of the Duma's deputy chairmen and the chairmen and 
deputy chairmen of all the committees.  In an apparent effort to 
counter fears that the Duma will, like the old Supreme Soviet, 
become a bastion of hardline opposition to President Boris 
Yeltsin, pro-communist factions evidently made a deliberate 
effort to ensure that reformist and centrist party factions would 
be well represented among the committee chairmen.  As a result, 
the Duma has attained a politically balanced and professionally 
competent committee leadership that will make it a far more 
credible source of institutional opposition to Yeltsin than the 
old Supreme Soviet. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Demonstrating that the competing factions in the new Duma are, so 
far, willing and able to work together, at least on 
organizationl matters, after two days of closed-door discussions 
the Duma's factions reached agreement on a package of nominees 
for deputy speakers and the leadership of 23 committees.  The 
package distributed the committee assignments about evenly across 
the political spectrum, giving each of the major party factions 
the leadership of at least one key committee.  The sharing out of 
committee positions may have been made easier by the Duma's draft 
rules of procedure, which stipulate that the chairman and deputy 
chairmen of committees cannot belong to the same faction (See 
Note 1).  Once the final package was drawn up, the Duma heard 
speeches by eight of the committee chairmen nominees but cut off 
further debate and adopted the entire package by a vote of 290 to 
63 with 8 abstentions (Interfax, 17 January; Izvestiya, 18 
January). 

   (Note 1) The framers of the package evidently made an exception 
for the agriculture and geopolitics committees, however, since 
agriculture has a chairman and one deputy from the Agrarian 
Party, and geopolitics has a chairman and a deputy from the 
Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (Kommersant-Daily, 19 
January). 

   Balancing the Factions 

   While it seems possible, judging by the success of pro-communist 
forces in electing the Duma's chairman, that they could have 
imposed their own nominees for most committee heads, they 
evidently chose to avoid the risk of an immediate return to the 
mutual hostility that characterized relations between Yeltsin and 
the old legislature by proposing a provision in the Duma's 
temporary rules mandating the "proportional representation" of 
factions among the committees (Interfax, 18 January).  The 
provision, which the Duma approved, allocated the committee 
leadership positions in approximate relation to the numerical 
strength of the factions (see box).  According to a deputy from 
the Party for Russian Unity and Accord (PRES), an alliance of 
centrist and hard-line factions would have been able to keep 
reformers out of leadership positions if Duma Chairman Ivan 
Rybkin--who the deputy contended wanted to avoid the dominance of 
the "anti-presidential opposition" in the Duma--had not proposed 
the proportional concept (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 25 January).  The 
reformist newspaper Segodnya (26 January), however, credited the 
idea to Communist Party (CPRF) leader Gennadiy Zyuganov, who also 
reportedly devised a mathematical system for assigning points to 
each leadership post, allowing factions to "buy" positions based 
on their numerical strength.  According to Segodnya, the Russia's 
Choice faction, though numerically greater than the Liberal 
Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR), received fewer committee 
chairmanships because it used up more "points" to elect faction 
member Mikhail Mityukov as the Duma's first deputy chairman. 

   Press reports have shed little light on the factions' 
negotiations, but the negotiators evidently used a variety of 
techniques to reach a consensus on the the final list.  They all 
reportedly worked together to prevent ultranationalist Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy from heading the important international affairs 
committee that he had openly coveted or any other prominent 
position in the Duma (Interfax, 14 January; ITAR-TASS, 17 
January).  In addition, reformers and pro-communists may have cut 
a deal to split two other key committees, defense and security, 
between Russia's Choice and the CPRF, respectively.  In some 
instances, the negotiators appear to have made an effort to match 
committee assignments with deputies' expertise.  In an apparent 
effort to satisfy the factions' aspirations to gain a prominent 
platform through committee portfolios, several committees were 
added, boosting the total number to 23 instead of the 17 agreed 
upon by the Yeltsin-appointed commission charged with forming the 
Duma's structures (ITAR-TASS, 4 January).  Similarly, the 
negotiators added a third deputy chairman position for each 
committee, thereby enabling almost one-fourth of the deputies to 
attain a "leadership" position (Nezavisimaya' Gazeta, 25 January). 

   Key Committees 

   With the exception of the LDPR, which the factions evidently 
maneuvered to exclude from prominent committee positions, the 
major party factions each got the chairmanship of at least one 
key committee.  Before the factions met, the CPRF was reportedly 
angling for both the defense and security portfolios  (Interfax, 
5 January), but in the end, it won only the security 
chairmanship.  For its part, the Agrarian Party gained the 
chairmanship of the important judicial and legal reform 
committee. 

   Defense.  Despite holding the military rank of colonel, committee 
chairman Sergey Yushenkov, a Russia's Choice member, appears to 
have limited experience in military matters.  The Defense 
Ministry reportedly regards committee deputy chairman Aleksandr 
Piskunov, a member of the New Regional Policy group of non-party 
deputies, as "more sophisticated in military matters" than 
Yushenkov (Krasnaya Zvezda, 25 January; Kommersant-Daily, 27 
January).  Piskunov was deputy chairman of the former Supreme 
Soviet's defense and security committee. 

   Security.  The CPRF's Viktor Ilyukhin, a former USSR deputy 
prosecutor general who once attempted to have ex-President 
Mikhail Gorbachev tried for treason for his role in the 
dissolution of the USSR, became head of the security committee 
(ITAR-TASS, 17 January).  Citing an unidentified source in the 
Federal Counterintelligence Service, Kommersant-Daily (27 
January) reported that the service regards Ilyukhin as "a man 
with whom one can talk," in part because of his reported 
commitment to strong, centralized security bodies.  His committee 
also includes such hardline nationalist figures as television 
anchorman Aleksandr Nevzorov and Yuriy Vlasov (Kommersant-Daily, 
27 January). 

   International Affairs.  The choice of former Ambassador to the 
United States Vladimir Lukin, a member of the Yavlinskiy bloc, to 
head the international relations committee most likely satisfies 
hardliners' minimum aims to bring a less Western-oriented point 
of view to foreign policy while simultaneously assuring reformers 
that the committee is not likely to be extremist in its views. 
Before his appointment as ambassador, Lukin chaired the Supreme 
Soviet's international affairs committee.  Although it is not 
clear if the CPRF had its own candidate for this post, Russia's 
Choice reportedly was prepared to back either Lukin or former 
First Deputy Foreign Minister Anatoliy Adamishin (also a member 
of the Yavlinskiy bloc), and the two sides evidently cooperated 
to find a mutually acceptable candidate to prevent Zhirinovskiy 
from heading the committee (Interfax, 14, 17 January; AFP, 17 
January).  As a PRES deputy observed, "Communists and Agrarians 
do not want the complete discreditation of the Duma" 
(Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 25 January), and the selection of 
Zhirinovskiy would have led to polarized relations with the 
executive and made the committee a less credible instrument in 
the opposition's struggle against Yeltsin's pro-Western foreign 
policy.  Nevertheless, the LDPR's Aleksey Mitrofanov, who holds 
the foreign ministry portfolio in the LDPR's "shadow cabinet," 
was elected as a deputy chairman (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 30 November 
1993). 

   Legislation, Judicial, and Legal Reform.  The selection of the 
Agrarian Party's Vladimir Isakov, a determined advocate of strong 
powers for the legislature, to head this committee places him in 
a position to assert the legislature's interests on major 
political reform issues.  The committee is responsible for the 
preliminary examination of all draft legislation on the judicial 
system and on the civil and criminal codes, as well as all 
"federal constitutional laws"--approximately a dozen key laws 
governing presidential and parliamentary elections, the 
procedures for forming the Federation Council in the future, the 
holding of referenda, and the specific powers of and 
interrelationship among the president, the Government, the 
Federal Assembly, and the constitutional court (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 27 January).  Isakov, who headed the Supreme Soviet's 
Committee for Constitutional Legislation and spearheaded many of 
that body's attempts to limit Yeltsin's presidential powers and 
had expressed early interest in heading this committee, is likely 
to continue to push for amendments to the constitution, which he 
says contains "inherent contradictions" between the executive and 
legislative branch, though the constitution outlines a very 
difficult and cumbersome amendment process (Interfax, 5 January; 
RIA, 25 January).  Any anti-presidential initiatives by Isakov 
will be opposed by reformers on the committee, including deputy 
chairman and Russia's Choice member Boris Zolotukhin, the 
experienced legislator Viktor Sheynis (Yavlinskiy bloc), and 
Vladimir Tumanov, a PRES deputy and legal specialist at the 
Russian Academy of Sciences Institute of State and Law 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 5 February). 

   Proliferation of Committees 

   In the original list of 17 committees, only one oversaw foreign 
policy issues, but the final list added one for relations with 
the CIS, headed by PRES deputy Konstantin Zatulin, and one on 
"geopolitics," headed by the LDPR's Viktor Ustinov and staffed 
predominantly by other LDPR members (ITAR-TASS, 4 January, 20 
January).  The presence of three committees overseeing foreign 
policy--in addition to the security and defense committees--will 
probably complicate the Duma's handling of foreign policy issues, 
especially toward the CIS, and, as Nezavisimaya Gazeta's foreign 
desk editor Mikhail Karpov suggested, may allow Yeltsin and 
Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev to exploit differences among 
these committees (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 19 January). 

   Geopolitics.  According to Russia's Choice member Arkadiy 
Murashev, the creation of the geopolitics committee was a 
concession to the LDPR after the factions successfully kept 
Zhirinovskiy off the international affairs committee (Interfax, 
17 January).  Even here, however, the negotiators denied 
Zhirinovskiy the chairmanship, choosing instead the LDPR's Viktor 
Ustinov to head it.  Of the committee's 14 members, nine are from 
the LDPR faction (Rossiya, No. 5, 2-8 February). 

   CIS Relations.  As a businessman who attempted to unite Russian 
entrepreneurs and enterprise directors in his association, 
Entrepreneurs for a New Russia (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 31, 1 
August 1993; ITAR-TASS, 7 September 1993), Zatulin appears to 
have a vested interest in promoting close relations with CIS 
member states as a way of restoring the economic ties that bound 
the former USSR republics together.  He has stated that PRES 
supports the "reorientation" of foreign policy "toward the near 
abroad [CIS member states] and the creation of a confederation 
within the CIS framework" (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 11 January). 

   Information Policy.  Russia's Choice became another beneficiary 
in the committee proliferation game when the negotiators agreed 
to create a new committee on the media and nominated Russia's 
Choice member and former media tsar Mikhail Poltoranin to head 
it.  The new Committee on Information Policy and Communications 
also has ample representation of opposition figures among its 
deputy chairmen: Gennadiy Seleznev, a CPRF member and former 
chief editor of Pravda; Oleg Finko, an LDPR member and chief 
editor of the legal newspaper Yuridicheskaya Gazeta; and Igor 
Klochkov, an Agrarian Party member and former chairman of the 
traditionalist Federation of Independent Trade Unions of Russia 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 26 January). 

   Ethnic Policy.  This committee, which was not on the original 
list of committees, appears to have been added as a concession to 
the New Regional Policy group of non-party deputies, whose 
member, Bair Zhamsuyev, was selected to head it.  Zhamsuyev was 
elected to the Duma as a non-party candidate from the Aga-Buryat 
autonomous okrug (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 28 December 1993). 

   Economic Committees 

   The failure of Russia's Choice to receive the top post in any of 
the three committees concerned with economic matters is a setback 
for the faction and reflects continuing fractiousness among 
reformers, who reportedly failed once again to unite against the 
more organized opposition, particularly the CPRF and Agrarian 
Party (Kommersant-Daily, 19 January).  Both the proposed and 
final list included three economic committees, but the final list 
realigned the committees' responsibilities somewhat, creating 
overlaps in important areas that may hamper the adoption of 
economic legislation. 

   Budget, Taxation, Banking, and Finance.  This committee--the 
largest by a wide margin with 43 members (Rossiya, No. 5, 2-8 
February)--is headed by Mikhail Zadornov, a member of the 
moderate reformist Yavlinskiy-Boldyrev-Lukin bloc and a former 
associate at Grigoriy Yavlinskiy's Economic and Political 
Research Center (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 20, 19 May 1991; 
Krasnaya Zvezda, 25 January).  According to Interfax (16 
January), Russia's Choice proposed Aleksandr Pochinok, who was 
chairman of the analogous committee in the Supreme Soviet--to 
head this committee but was willing to compromise on Zadornov, 
with Pochinok ending up as one of the committee's deputy chairmen 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 26 January).  While the original list 
proposed one committee for budget and taxes and another for 
banking, finance, and monetary policy, the faction negotiators 
apparently decided to combine fiscal and monetary oversight 
functions, greatly expanding the committee's purview.  In a major 
win for reformers, ex-Finance Minister Boris Fedorov was elected 
to head the subcommittee on credit and monetary policy, giving 
him an official role in overseeing Central Bank policy, which he 
has vociferously criticized (Radio Rossii, 8 February).  Many 
committee members are reportedly former directors of small 
enterprises, trading firms, commercial banks, or private 
investment funds rather than economists, leading Krasnaya 
Zvezda's parliamentary reporter Vladimir Yermolin to conclude 
that the committee will divide between private and corporate 
interests rather than between monetarists and industrialists (25 
January). 

   Property, Privatization, and Economic Activity.  In a major boost 
for the New Regional Policy group of non-party deputies--which is 
second in numerical strength after Russia's Choice--one of their 
members, Sergey Burkov, was chosen to head this important 
committee.  Burkov was elected without party affiliation from a 
single-seat constituency in Kemerovo Oblast, where he served as 
adviser on economic matters to the oblast soviet (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 28 December 1993).  As committee chairman, Burkov will be 
in a position to defend regional interests as the focus of 
privatization shifts toward the regions. 

   Economic Policy.  As with the choice of Lukin for the 
international affairs committee, the selection of Sergey Glazyev, 
a member of the centrist Democratic Party of Russia (DPR) and 
former minister for foreign economic relations, appears to 
reflect a conscious decision by faction negotiators to find a 
mutually acceptable candidate to head this broadly mandated 
committee.  With only 15 members in its faction (ITAR-TASS, 19 
January), the DPR may not otherwise have been a contender to 
chair such an important committee.  The committee itself was 
added to the original list, which had given responsibility for 
overall economic reform to the property and privatization 
committee (ITAR-TASS, 4 January).  Glazyev has indicated a 
preference for a more moderate reform course, saying that he 
would like to stimulate production by reducing the "excessive tax 
burden" currently imposed on enterprises (Segodnya, 3 February). 
He is reportedly planning to present to the Duma an economic 
program that calls for price controls and "temporary" wage 
freezes and would reassert state management over certain sectors 
while also reserving for the state "veto power" over shareholder 
decisions in the case of large industrial enterprises undergoing 
privatization (Segodnya, 8 February). 

   Party and Professional Expertise 

   Several of the committee chairmanships appear to have gone to the 
factions with a strong vested interest in the subject matter, 
perhaps as a result of these factions' bidding under Zyuganov's 
"points" system.  For example, members of PRES, which billed 
itself as the "party of the regions" during the election 
campaign, head the Committee on Local Self-Government and the 
Committee on Federation Affairs and Regional Policy.  The latter 
committee's functions may overlap with those of the Committee on 
Ethnic Policy.  The Committee on Agricultural Issues is headed by 
a member of the Agrarian Party faction, and 19 of its 27 members 
are also from the Agrarian faction (Rossiya, No. 5, 2-8 
February).  Likewise, the Women of Russia faction, whose election 
campaign focused on the need to protect women and families from 
the adverse impact of economic reforms, heads the Committee for 
Women, Family, and Youth. 

   For some of the less high-profile committees, the factions appear 
to have tried to match committee chairmanships with the 
professional expertise of individual deputies.  For example, 
Bella Denisenko, a Russia's Choice member and former first deputy 
minister of health, heads the Committee on Health.  She also 
served on the former Supreme Soviet's Committee for Public 
Health, Social Insurance, and Physical Culture and even resigned 
her government position to retain her committee position after 
the Supreme Soviet passed a law preventing government members 
from serving simultaneously in the legislature (ITAR-TASS, 18 
December 1992; Kuranty, 13 February 1993). 

   Similarly, the LDPR's Mikhail Lemeshev, who heads the Ecology 
Committee, is a long-time environmental activist whose interest 
in environmental protection appears to have led him to embrace 
the nationalist cause.  He has held a number of environmental 
posts, including as an "expert" with the UN, and was once a 
member of the governing board of the Committee To Save the Volga 
(Podmoskovye, No. 17, 27 April 1991; Rabochaya Tribuna, 31 
October 1991).  Lemeshev also served as president of the USSR 
Anti-Nuclear Society, in which capacity he advocated energy 
conservation--in part through higher energy prices--as an 
alternative to nuclear energy (Svet (Priroda i Chelovek), No. 3, 
March 1991).  Like other nationalists, Lemeshev has condemned 
overreliance on the export of natural resources to earn hard 
currency and the exploitation of Russian oil fields by Western 
companies (Podmoskovye, No. 17, 27 April 1991). 

   Mixed Views on Compromise Process 

   Deputies from various factions across the spectrum have praised 
the decision to draw up a package of candidates for a single vote 
as a way of streamlining what might otherwise have been a 
protracted, contentious process.  The Agrarian Party's Isakov 
said that the package vote was a "reasonable" compromise that 
made it possible "to avoid wasting weeks on voting on 
appointments," while Vyacheslav Shostakovskiy of the Yavlinskiy 
bloc succinctly termed it an "achievement" (ITAR-TASS, 20 
January).  Even PRES chairman Sergey Shakhray, who initially 
opposed the negotiations and package vote, said that ultimately 
the process was beneficial: "Had we nominated heads of 
parliamentary committees person by person, the political spectrum 
would have been more uniform, and the factor of professional 
qualification for the post would not have been always taken into 
account" (Interfax, 17 January; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 25 January). 

   Other deputies, however, particularly those not affiliated with a 
faction, complained that the factions' closed-door negotiations 
did not take into account the interests of non-party deputies and 
expressed concern that factions are playing a disproportionate 
role in the Duma's decisionmaking.  However, because here are no 
more than 58 unaffiliated deputies in the Duma, their voice is 
likely to go unheeded by the factions: 

   --  Commenting on the factions' compromise, Vasiliy Lipitskiy, 
who heads the non-parliamentary People's Party of Free Russia but 
was elected as an unaffiliated deputy from a single-seat 
constituency, complained that the Duma "vacillates between utter 
uncontrollability and too rigidly controlled decision-making by 
the heads of groups [factions]" (ITAR-TASS, 20 January). 

   --  Similarly, deputies who have affiliated with the Union of 12 
December group, started by Economic Freedom Party leader Irina 
Khakamada, and Sergey Baburin's nationalist Russian Way group- 
-neither of which has yet gained enough members to register as a 
faction--expressed pique that their groups were slighted in the 
negotiations, with the Russian Way calling the package vote a 
"black day for Russian patriots" (Segodnya, 26 January). 

   Implications 

   By reaching a consensus relatively quickly on the distribution of 
committee assignments, factions demonstrated their ability to 
overcome significant party differences, negotiate, and 
compromise.  Deputies may in the future try to use package votes 
like the kind successfully employed in this case as one tool of 
compromise, though it will be more difficult to apply this 
technique to substantive issues like legislation.  The factions' 
negotiations also indicate that they are likely to play a 
dominant role in the Duma, possibly making it a more disciplined 
and less capricious body than the former Supreme Soviet. 

   By agreeing on compromise candidates for some committees and 
distributing key committees among the major factions, the pro- 
communist opposition successfully pursued what appears to have 
been a deliberate tactic not to provoke an immediate 
confrontation with Yeltsin.  Having sought an organizational 
structure that is not overwhelmingly dominated by their own 
members, Yeltsin's opponents in the Duma appear intent on making 
the legislature become a more credible, and therefore more 
effective, institution than the former Supreme Soviet, thus 
increasing pressure on Yeltsin to take its views into account. 

   BOX 

   Distribution of Committee Chairmanships in the Duma 
         (Faction Size Indicated in Parentheses) 

BOT 

Russia's Choice (76) 

First Deputy Speaker                       Mikhail Mityukov 
Defense                                    Sergey Yushenkov 
Health                                     Bella Denisenko 
Information Policy and Communications      Mikhail Poltoranin 
Internal Organization of the Duma          Vladimir Bauer 

New Regional Policy (65) 

Property, Privatization and Economic Activity       Sergey Burkov 
Ethnic Affairs                             Bair Zhamsuyev 
Education, Culture and Science             Lyubov Rozhkova 

Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (63) 

Deputy Speaker                             Aleksandr Vengerovskiy 
Ecology                                    Mikhail Lemeshev 
Geopolitical Issues                        Viktor Ustinov 
Industry, Construction, Transport and Power Vladimir Gusev 
Labor and Social Support                   Sergey Kalashnikov 
Natural Resources                          Nikolay Astafyev 

Agrarian Party (55) 

Legislation, Judicial and Legal Reform     Vladimir Isakov 
Agriculture                                Aleksandr Nazarchuk 

Communist Party (45) 

Deputy Speaker                             Valentin Kovalev 
Security                                   Viktor Ilyukhin 
Public and Religious Organizations         Viktor Zorkaltsev 

Party of Russian Unity and Accord (30) 

Relations With CIS and Compatriots         Konstantin Zatulin 
Federation Affairs and Regional Policy     Sergey Shapovalov 
Local Self-Government                      Anatoliy Sliva 

Yavlinskiy-Boldyrev-Lukin Bloc (25) 

Budget, Taxation, Banking, and Finance     Mikhail Zadornov 
International Affairs                      Vladimir Lukin 

Women of Russia (23) 

Deputy Speaker                             Alevtina Fedulova 
Women, Family, and Youth                   Galina Klimantova 

Democratic Party of Russia (15) 

Economic Policy                            Sergey Glazyev 

EOT 

   Sources: Rossiyskiye Vesti, 19 January; Interfax, ITAR-TASS, 20 
January; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 26 January. 

   END BOX 

(AUTHOR:  O'CONNELL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6070.) 

ENEAG/BLOUGH/JF 10/0051Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24652 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-09FEB94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Japanese Politicians Not Yielding on Objective Criteria Issue </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               Japanese press reporting and statements in the press by senior 
Japanese officials suggest that Foreign Minister Tsutomu Hata is 
coming to Washington in advance of the 11 February summit with no 
immediate plans to make concessions on the issue of setting 
objective criteria to assess Japan's trade performance.  Tokyo 
may in fact be calculating that by continuing to take a hard line 
at this point, it will force the United States to make 
concessions.  It may also hope that its recent announcement of 
its economic stimulus package and plans for a tax cut will 
satisfy to some extent U.S. demands that Tokyo take steps to 
reduce its huge trade surplus. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   Senior Japanese political and government leaders who commented to 
the press on Foreign Minister Hata's last-minute trip to 
Washington to try to break the impasse in the stalled U.S.-Japan 
framework talks all stressed that the Japanese Government had no 
intention of making concessions on the issue of setting objective 
criteria.  Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa reportedly told a 
news conference on 9 February that Japan would find it 
"impossible" to accept objective criteria (Kyodo, 9 February). 
Chief Cabinet Secretary Masayoshi Takemura, in announcing Hata's 
trip, stated that Hata would conduct negotiations in Washington 
in line with Tokyo's "basic stance" that "it is very difficult to 
accept the proposal for numerical targets," according to a 9 
February Kyodo report.   Kyodo on 9 February also quoted an 
unnamed government source as stating that Tokyo would continue to 
reject any calls to establish objective criteria, and hinted that 
Japan would consider taking the case to the General Agreement on 
Tariffs and Trade if the United States were to invoke sanctions. 
Hata himself was a bit less categorical on the objective criteria 
issue, noting only that he would "discuss the matter keeping in 
mind the potential implications," according to another 9 February 
Kyodo report. 

   Both Hata and the unnamed government source quoted by Kyodo also 
alluded to a concern that may in part be driving the Japanese 
resistance to objective criteria, namely, that other countries- 
-particularly, in the near term, the European Union--that have 
trade deficits with Japan might use any U.S.-Japan agreement 
incorporating objective criteria to press for criteria to assess 
Japan's trade performance with regard to them.  Hata reportedly 
told the press before leaving for Washington that among the 
issues he would consider in his negotiations would be "what the 
implications could be internationally" (Kyodo, 9 January).  The 
unnamed government source was quoted by Kyodo as stating that any 
concessions by Japan on objective criteria would have an impact 
not only on U.S.-Japan relations, but also on other countries 
throughout the world. 

   Such statements have recently marked the commentary of other 
Japanese officials and businessmen on the issue of objective 
criteria.  For example, on 18 January Asahi Shimbun quoted an 
unnamed senior Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) official as stating that "the European Union and Asian 
nations are paying much attention to how Japan handles trade 
issues with the United States" and warning that Tokyo must 
therefore "not make unnecessary concessions."  Similarly, in an 
interview in the 2 February Mainichi Shimbun, Yutaka Kume, 
Chairman of the Japan Automobile Manufacturers' Association and 
Chairman of Nissan Motor Corporation, also warned that if Japan 
were to agree to extend the voluntary plan to purchase U.S.-made 
auto parts announced during former President Bush's trip to Tokyo 
in January 1992, "I do not think the European Union will remain 
indifferent." 

   Expectation of U.S. Concessions 

   Some officials in Tokyo may anticipate that by continuing to take 
a hard line, the Japanese Government will force the United States 
to make concessions in order to achieve an agreement at the talks 
before the summit between President Clinton and Prime Minister 
Morihiro Hosokawa.  The 5 February Mainichi Shimbun quoted an 
unidentified source close to the framework negotiations as 
stating that during his recent trip to Tokyo, U.S. Trade 
Representative Mickey Kantor indicated that the United States 
would not stick to its "conventional calls" for setting objective 
criteria--a move which the source apparently interpreted as a 
prospective U.S. concession.  Another report in the same edition 
of Mainichi Shimbun quoted members of the Japanese negotiating 
team as arguing that the United States would "withdraw its 
demands in the end because Japan is doing its best" and as 
warning that the "possibility of cooperation will expand only if 
the United States withdraws its demands on numerical targets." 

   Stress on Economic Stimulus 

Some officials may also hope that the package of economic 
stimulus measures that Tokyo has just announced, including a 53 
billion dollar tax cut, will satisfy Washington's demands that 
Tokyo take steps to help promote imports and reduce its trade 
surplus.  The 8 February Mainichi Shimbun quoted an unnamed 
senior Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) official as predicting 
that "the atmosphere surrounding the ongoing economic framework 
talks will be greatly changed" depending on the way Japan 
presented its macroeconomic policies, including the stimulus 
package, at the summit.  Before his departure for Washington, 
Foreign Minister Hata told reporters that one of the main goals 
of his discussions with U.S. officials would be to clear up a 
"lack of understanding" in the U.S. Government about the full 
extent of the Hosokawa government's efforts to stimulate the 
Japanese economy and increase imports of foreign goods (Kyodo, 9 
February). 

   Outlook 

   In his talks in Washington, Hata will probably continue to resist 
the concept of objective criteria in any form that might be 
interpreted in the future as specific targets to which Washington 
would attempt to hold the Japanese Government.  One factor that 
might encourage him to make some limited concessions, however, 
will be the pressure on Prime Minister Hosokawa to be able to 
portray his 11 February summit with President Clinton as 
successful.  Hosokawa has come in for considerable criticism in 
Tokyo--from within the ruling coalition, from the opposition 
parties, and from the media, which has until recently generally 
been sympathetic to him--for his bungling of his initial 
announcement on 2 February of a large tax cut and the delayed 
imposition of a 7 percent national welfare tax.  A weak 
performance at the summit--or any suggestion that it failed in 
some major respect--would almost certainly open him up to further 
domestic criticism of his leadership. 

(AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 

EAG/BIETZ/JF 10/0111Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24653 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-03-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 9 FEBRUARY 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Table     of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nissan Affiliate To Expand U.S. 
Procurement of Auto Parts; Saison Group To Market Chrysler 
Automobiles in Japan 

   Economic Trends - NIES Studies Population Redistribution To 
Reduce Energy Consumption 

   Environmental Issues - NEDO To Develop High-Performance 
Industrial Furnaces, Boilers 

   Financial Issues - Japanese Banks Expanding Activity in Mexico; 
Measures on Nonperforming Assets Expected in Stimulus Package 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - BURMA:  Government Behind in Debt 
Payments to Japan; CHINA:  JGC To Enter Pharmaceutical Plant Design- 
Engineering Field; NEC To Begin Marketing Digital Mapping Systems 

   Governmental Affairs - Government Resumes ODA to Iran for Dam 
Construction 

   Insurance Industry - FEATURE:  MOF Continues To Criticize U.S. 
Position in Insurance Talks 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  MT Firms Emphasizing Foreign 
Manufacturing, Procurement; Nachi-Fujikoshi Records FY93 Current 
Losses of $35 Million; Toyoda Machine Works Receives Cam Grinder 
Order From Renault; Citizen Watch Furloughs MT Plant Workers Because 
of Poor Sales 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Fujitsu's VPP500 
Supercomputer Falls Short of Expectations; Tokyo Electron To Boost 
Overseas Procurement of Parts, Materials 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  Divergent Views Evident 
on Future Fiber Optic Network; MELCO, Raytheon To Develop Maritime 
Communications Systems; Mitsui, U.S. Firm Sign Communications 
Cooperation Agreement 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Macroeconomic Control Creates New 
Debt Problems for Enterprises; Pudong To Invest 15 Billion Yuan in 
Infrastructure in 1994; Nature of Guangxi's Economic Cooperation 
Reportedly Changing; Nanning Upgrades Transport Infrastructure 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Value of Most Agricultural 
Imports, Exports Decrease in 1993; Hong Kong Trade With Mainland 
Expected To Increase Again in 1994; Tianjin Signs Housing, Auto 
Contracts With Malaysian Firm; Tianjin Signs Two Construction 
Contracts With Hong Kong Firm; Tianjin Establishes Business Ties 
With ROK; Heilongjiang Establishes Joint Venture With Japan; 
Heilongjiang's Harbin Increases Foreign Investments; Liaoning 
Approves 404 Taiwan-Funded Investments in 1993; Shenyang Foreign 
Economic, Trade Achievements; Steel Industry Utilization of Foreign 
Capital in 1993; Jiangsu Joint Polyester Project With U.S., Japan; 
Oingdao Bonded Zone Attracts Foreign Investment of $63 Million; 
Foreign Investment in Fujian in 1993 Exceeds Last 14 Years; Taiwan 
Corporation Invests in Tianjin; Taiwan Invests in Shanghai 
Industrial Zone; Austrian Government Funds Guangxi Water Project 

   Taiwan:  Government Moves To Meet U.S. Tariff Demands; National 
CEPD Takes Steps To Facilitate Financial Liberalization; Singapore 
To Serve as Model for Financial Liberalization; Investment in 
Mainland Expected To Continue; Japanese Investment Decreased 35 
Percent in 1993; Investments in Southeast Asia Increase 40 Percent 
in 1993; Investment in PRC Goes Mainly to South But Shift Noted; 
Kuomintang To Reduce Its Party-Run Investments From Vietnam; New 
Guidelines on Investment in the PRC Take Effect 20 Jan; Export 
Orders in 1993 Increase 6.13 Percent; Hong Kong Up by 30 Percent; 
Foreign Trade Up by 5.5 Percent in 1993; Economics Minister on Steps 
To Increase Accession to GATT 

   NORTH KOREA:  Pyongyang Alcohol Plant Begins Soju Export 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  KOTRA Expanding, Increasing Support to 
ROK Exporters; FEATURE:  Press Reacts to U.S. Court Order Against 
Iljin; FEATURE:  ROK To Export Nuclear Equipment and Technology; 
FEATURE:  Firms Planning Major Drive into LCD Market; Business Laws 
Restricts Foreign Investment; Machine Toolmakers Report Increase in 
Orders; Increase in Export of Automobile Spare Parts Reported; Anam 
Electronics Projects Show Increase in Domestic Sales; Kyongin 
Promotes Globalization Strategy; Dongyang Exports Steel to Asian 
Markets; Hanil Plans To Build Textile Plant in China; Samik Musical 
Instruments To Expand Indonesian Plant; Hyundai To Install Crude 
Oil, Gas Production Equipment in India; Hansol Paper Company To 
Build Plant in Malaysia; Kia To Produce Car Equipment Jointly With 
Foreign Partners; Business Corporations Increasing U.S., Canadian 
Investment; Samsung To Build Oil Tankers for Greek Company; Pungsan 
To Supply Copper Pipes to Saudi Arabia; Hyundai Motors To Break 
Ground for Malaysian Plant 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Thai Firm To Build Dams, Roads, Port in 
Burma 

   INDONESIA:  New Incentives for Oil Exploration Announced; 
Transportation, Energy Budget for 1994-95 Reported; Ministry Issues 
Jakarta Minimum Wage Decree 

   MALAYSIA:  Joint Venture Company To Establish Third LNG Plant; 
Small, Medium-Size Industries To Acquire Russian Technology; Company 
Receives Orders for Amphibious Aircraft 

   LAOS:  Germany To Give Aid for Telecommunications, Agriculture 
Projects 

   PHILIPPINES:  Customs Computerizes Procedures at Ports, Airport; 
BOI Says 1993 Investments Below Target; Petrochemical Project 
Approved; Phone Pact With France Signed 

   SINGAPORE:  LPG Storage Terminal Established in PRC 

   THAILAND:  Government Reports Rise in Deficit; Plan To Build 
Power Plant in Rayong Announced; Firm Signs Telecommunications 
Agreement With Laos; Bank Reviews Trade Volume With Indochina; 
Increase in Investment Applications in 1993 Reported; Increase in 
Car, Parts Exports Noted 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investment Lagging in Central Vietnam; 
Manufacturers Reluctant To Invest in Equipment, Facilities; 'Record 
Turnover' for Hanoi's Industrial Sector Reported; Light Industry 
Export Figures for 1993 Reported; Contract Signed With Hong Kong To 
Build Commercial Center; Increase in 1993 Agricultural Output 
Reported; Joint Venture Producing Phone Cables; Hanoi Nonstate 
Economic Sector Registers Increase in 1993; Saigon, Haiphong Ports 
Improve Handling Capacity 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-03) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nissan Affiliate To Expand U.S. 
Procurement of Auto Parts -- Kansei Corp., one of three auto parts 
manufacturers affiliated with Nissan Motor, is moving to expand its 
overseas procurement of parts and materials.  The company will 
increase overseas purchases from last year's 3.5 billion yen ($32 
million) to 4 billion yen ($36 million), of which Kansei will 
procure about 20 percent from Kantus Corp., its U.S. manufacturing 
subsidiary in Tennessee.  Given the Iiigh yen, Kansei is trying to 
find ways to lower production costs and increase profits. 

   Kansei will also try to expand procurement from other U.S. parts 
manufacturers.  On 23 January the company dispatched a group to the 
United States to survey parts manufacturers and to select parts for 
procurement. The survey group will visit about 20 U.S. producers of 
electronics parts, electronic substrates, and resins to search for 
suitable parts and materials.  Depending on orders placed during the 
survey, it is quite possible that Kansei will increase its overseas 
procurement "well beyond 4 billion yen." 

   Until 1992, the company's overseas purchases had been limited to 
a variety of resins.  But because of the high yen and increased 
product quality overseas, Kansei began purchasing other items, such 
as wire harnesses and crossing coils.  Kansei also purchases parts 
from the Philippines, Thailand, and Taiwan.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 24 Jan 94 p 10) 

   Saison Group To Market Chrysler Automobiles in Japan -- The 
Saison Group has revealed plans to market three of Chrysler Corp.'s 
new models in Japan.  Seibu Motor Sales, a subsidiary of the group, 
has reached agreement with Chrysler Japan Sales (CJS), a joint 
venture between Chrysler and Osawa Sales Co., which is also part of 
the Saison Group, to import and sell Chrysler vehicles through Seibu 
Motor Sales' 300 dealer outlets. 

   The Saison companies want to import three models that are 
referred to as "Japanese car-killers" because of their "high quality 
and low price."  The companies are already preparing to import the 
"Eagle Vision" as early as March, and are particularly interested in 
the "Neon," which has a low price of $8,975 (980,000 yen) and an 
engine larger than 2,000 cc.  However, regarding the Neon and 
another Chrysler model, the "Cirrus," CJS officials say they have 
not yet decided what action to take. 

   Osawa Sales Co. currently markets the Dodge "Viper" and Chrysler- 
made recreational vehicles (RVs).  Chrysler also has an arrangement 
with Honda Motor Co., which markets Chrysler RVs imported by CJS 
through 1,700 of its sales outlets.  Chrysler is also negotiating 
with Mitsubishi Motor Corp., "which has shown interest in selling 
Chrysler sedans."  (Tokyo NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN 25 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Economic Trends - NIES Studies Population Redistribution To 
Reduce Energy Consumption -- The Environment Agency's National 
Institute for Environmental Studies (NIES) has revealed that a 
regional redistribution of Japan's population could reduce energy 
consumption in the transportation sector by as much as 20 percent, 
according to a general simulation study it recently conducted.  The 
study was based on factors such as the long-distance transport of 
goods, intra-city and inter-city traffic, national land use, and 
global environmental issues.  As one example derived from the 
exercise, it was found that redistributing 30 percent of the 
population in Tokyo and Osaka metropolitan areas by shifting half 
the population in the Kanto and Kinki regions to the Chugoku and 
Shikoku regions would result in an optimum 20 percent reduction in 
energy consumption in the transportation sector, from 724 trillion 
kilocalories to 594 trillion kilocalories.  This reduction in turn 
would have a favorable impact on protecting the global environment. 

   The simulation study is part of a larger "international 
comparative study on the status of social economic systems for the 
purpose of protecting the global environment" currently being 
conducted by the NIES Global Environment Research Center.  Results 
from this larger study of cities worldwide reveal that an even 
distribution of "compact cities" requires less energy consumption by 
the transportation sector than a scattering of high-density cities, 
and that this is also favorable in terms of preventing global 
warming.  The NIES will pursue future comparative international 
studies and will examine target policies in light of its findings. 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 21 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Environmental Issues - NEDO To Develop High-Performance 
Industrial Furnaces, Boilers -- The New Energy and Industrial 
Technology Development Organization (NEDO), which is affiliated with 
the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI), this year 
will initiate a project to develop high-performance industrial 
furnaces that consume 30 percent less energy and boilers which 
consume 5 percent less energy than current models.  The project will 
be subsidized by MITI at a cost of 25 billion yen ($227 million) 
over a period of 7 years.  Currently, industrial furnaces used for 
heating, heat treatment, and melting account for 5 percent of 
Japan's total energy consumption.  NEDO calculates that the use of 
new furnaces will result in national energy savings of 5 percent. 

   NEDO will study data from research on combustion in microgravity 
environments to develop ways of controlling the furnace flame to 
improve fuel efficiency and develop methods for reducing harmful 
emissions, which it will apply to the design of both furnaces and 
boilers.  It will consign the research on combustion and the work to 
develop furnace flame control technologies to the Japan Space 
Utilization Promotion Center and work with the Japan Microgravity 
Center's drop tower facility in Kamisunagawa-cho, Hokkaido, and 
Bremen University's drop tower in Germany.  It will also exchange 
research results and data with French researchers, who have been 
experimenting with aircraft in microgravity environments. 

   NEDO will consign the development of a trial furnace to the Japan 
Industrial Furnace Manufacturers Association and the development of 
a trial boiler to the Japan Society of Industrial Machinery 
Manufacturers.  It will then appraise the performance of the trial 
models.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 Jan 94 p 5) 

   Financial Issues - Japanese Banks Expanding Activity in Mexico -- 
Major commercial banks and long-term credit banks are intensifying 
business efforts in Mexico now that the North American Free Trade 
Agreement (NAFTA) has gone into effect, according to the 18 January 
NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU).  The idea is to gain a firm 
foothold in the Mexican market, where the mutual opening of the 
three NAFTA markets is expected to stimulate investment and where 
there is the greatest potential for growth.  The banks involved are 
Bank of Tokyo (BOT), Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan (LTCB), Fuji 
Bank, and Sakura Bank. 

   The BOT is currently considering establishing bases for operation 
in Mexico.  It appears to be considering two methods to achieve 
this:  setting up subsidiaries through its U.S. affiliates and 
increasing the number of its representative offices.  According to 
the 1 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), it is also increasing 
its correspondent arrangements with local Mexican banks by 
commissioning them to represent BOT in conducting branch operations 
in Mexico.  In addition, according to the 24 December NIKKEI, BOT 
decided to enhance its cooperative relationship with the Mexican 
Development Bank (NAFIN).  It originally established the 
relationship in April 1990, but recently it expanded that 
cooperative activity to the U.S. by setting up an "information 
service" office in New York where it will conduct seminars on 
investing in Mexico for Japanese companies. 

   The LTCB concluded a business cooperation agreement with the 
government-run Foreign Trade Bank of Mexico in November 1993. 
According to the 23 November NIKKEI, LTCB believed the cooperation 
agreement would give it an advantage over other Japanese banks going 
into Mexico.  LTCB's objectives in signing the agreement, according 
to the NIKKEI KINYU, are to provide information on Japanese 
companies seeking to invest directly in Mexico, to exchange 
information about companies wanting to establish cooperative 
technological arrangements and to assist Japanese companies trying 
to penetrate the Mexican market. 

   The NIKKEI KINYU reports that Fuji Bank's wholly-owned financial 
subsidiary, Heller Financial, located in Chicago, established a 
factoring company (a financial institution to purchase accounts 
receivable) in Mexico City.  According to the 15 October NIKKEI, 
"Heller Mexico" is expected to begin operations early this year.  It 
will purchase domestic and U.S. accounts receivable from Mexican 
manufacturers of automobile parts, foodstuffs, and textiles.  The 
factoring market in Mexico was worth roughly $20 billion in 1992 and 
is expected to expand as Japanese anal U.S.-owned manufacturing 
companies hoping to export to U.S. and Canada in the wake of NAFTA 
set up bases of operations there.  "Heller Mexico" will also lease 
factory facilities and aims to solicit new business from Japanese 
companies going into Mexico by cooperating with Fuji Bank's Japanese 
branches. 

   Sakura is one of the banks expanding the types of credit it 
offers in Mexico.  Previously its range of credit was restricted to 
credit for trading purposes only, but now Sakura will finance any 
type of company going into Mexico when a guarantee is provided by 
the Japanese or U.S. parent company. 

Foreign banks have been virtually excluded from the Mexican 
market, according to a 5 January NIKKEI KINYU article.  (Presently 
Citibank is the only foreign bank with an authorized branch there.) 
The article reports that limits on foreign ownership of Mexican 
banks may gradually be lifted, but the Mexican government will 
retain the right to exercise "safeguards" on stock ownership until 
2004.  Nevertheless, since Mexican President Salinas' visit to Japan 
late in December 1993 and in anticipation of NAFTA taking effect, 
the 28 December NIKKEI reports, penetration of the Mexican market by 
major Japanese, U.S., and Canadian banks has become a central topic 
of discussion.  A statement made by Mexican Secretary of Finance and 
Public Credit Aspe to the Mexican congress in particular sparked 
some speculation.  The article cites him as saying he foresaw 
"between 20 and 25 foreign banks establishing subsidiaries in Mexico 
as the financial market is liberalized in 1994."  The BOT and LTCB 
were discussed as being among those Japanese banks to be chosen. 

   Measures on Nonperforming Assets Expected in Stimulus Package -- 
The Ministry of Finance (MOF) is considering a new four-part plan to 
help private financial institutions expedite the disposal of 
nonperforming assets, according to the 25 January NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The paper summarizes the four points as follows: 
1) The MOF will create a framework to sell off nonperforming assets, 
particularly those held by nonbanks and housing loan corporations 
for which interest has been reduced or cancelled--including the 
establishment of a new company to purchase such loans;  2) the MOF 
will offer information on a systematic basis concerning 
collateralized real estate held by the Cooperative Credit Purchasing 
Corporation (CCPC) and financial institutions to national and local 
governments; 3) it will encourage financial institutions to issue 
preferred stock; and 4) it will be more flexible regarding disposal 
of nonperforming assets through taxable reserve accounts. 

   The first measure is expected to be finalized by an advisory 
group established by MOF's Banking Bureau in the spring of 1994. 
Previously, banks could not write off reduced or cancelled interest 
assets--loans made to nonbanks and housing lenders on which interest 
has been drastically reduced or even cancelled altogether as part of 
a "life-support policy" --unless that support plan had ceased. 
Under the new policy, banks would be able to sell the assets and 
write off the loss on the sale without being taxed once the extent 
of the support plan is clear.  It is believed that this measure will 
obviate the need to change restructuring plans currently in effect 
for the housing loan companies and nonbanks.  The MOF is considering 
a proposal to establish a company to purchase such assets, although 
there is some discussion about having the CGPC undertake this task. 

   Second, the National Land Agency has established a council to 
furnish information on collateralized real estate owned by financial 
institutions and the CCPC to national and local governmental organs. 
NIKKEI reports that governmental organizations were previously 
unaware of such real estate. The council's establishment thus will 
facilitate quicker real estate sales. 

   Third, the objective of encouraging banks to issue preferred 
stock is designed to allow them to maintain their net worth while 
writing off large amounts of nonperforming assets.  Currently only 
one major commercial bank is considering this step, but the MOF is 
calling on other financial institutions to take this step, NIKKEI 
observes. 

   Finally, the MOF is being "more flexible" with respect to taxable 
reserve accounts, according to the 21 January NIKKEI.  It is 
relaxing the standards applicable to reserve accounts for writing 
off specially designated assets.  Banks have always set aside 
reserves for assets determined by law to have gone bad due to 
bankruptcies, or for uncollateralized assets of companies that have 
been insolvent for a long period.  Now a bank will be able to set 
aside a reserve for a broader range of assets.  When it has 
determined that an asset for which interest has been not only 
delayed (longer than six months) but also reduced or even completely 
omitted, and deems that the asset is irretrievable, the bank can set 
aside reserves in a contingency account.  It must then report that 
it has done so to the MOF. 

   In the past the MOF has been cautious about authorizing the 
taxable accumulation of reserves so as not to highlight the 
differences in banks' health, since stronger banks are able to set 
aside larger reserves.   Previously it has been customary for banks 
to coordinate when they were going to accumulate reserves for a 
common borrower.  However, this has resulted in weaker banks being 
unable to accumulate large reserves, thereby slowing the write-off 
process.  Now a bank will be allowed to use its own judgment as to 
when it should accumulate the taxable- reserves.  The relaxed 
standard is expected to be included in the economic stimulus 
package, so that banks will be allowed to employ it in drawing up 
their March 1994 yearend financial statements for FY93. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - BURMA:  Government Behind in Debt 
Payments to Japan -- The Burmese government announced that it is in 
arrears on the repayment of its debt to Japan by 80 billion yen 
(US$727 million).  According to sources, Burma's late payments on 
its debt can be broken down into two parts.  Approximately 70 
billion yen (US$636 million) is for a yen loan through the Overseas 
Economic Cooperation Fund, and approximately 13 billion yen (US$118 
million) is for trade insurance issued through the Ministry for 
International Trade and Industry (MITI).  The loan and the trade 
insurance were borrowed for a petrochemical plant planned by the 
Myanmar Oil and Gas Enterprise and companies under the jurisdiction 
of the Energy Ministry.  MITI has already paid the insurance money 
to the Japanese creditors. 

   Burma paid back approximately 4 billion yen (US$36 million) in 
1991 and again in 1992.  With the Burmese economy looking up 
slightly in 1993, Burma paid back around 6 billion yen (US$54 
million), but this barely put a dent in the yen loan, which 
concerned sources estimate to be as much as 400 billion yen (US$3.63 
billion).  Although Burma has accepted foreign direct investment, 
its export industries, which earn foreign currency, are not yet 
fully developed, and this shortage of foreign currency is causing 
the late payments on Burma's debt to increase.  In an effort to 
acquire more foreign currency, Burma has sold petroleum and natural 
gas concessions to foreign enterprises.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
22 Jan 93 Evening Edition p 1) 

   CHINA:  JGC To Enter Pharmaceutical Plant Design-Engineering 
Field -- JGC Corp., a major petrochemical plant engineering firm, 
will cooperate with the Shanghai Pharmaceutical Design Institute to 
jointly undertake design and engineering work for pharmaceutical 
plants planned to be built in China by Japanese and European drug 
companies.  This will be JGC's first cooperative venture outside the 
field of petroleum and petrochemical plants.  The company, which 
already has three contracts to build drug plants in China, plans to 
use the venture to gather information on trends in China concerning 
drug approval procedures and product demand and distribution. 

   JGC will sponsor two employees from the Shanghai Pharmaceutical 
Design Institute for about six months of training.  The institute is 
China's largest designer and builder of pharmaceutical plants.  It 
performed design work for Ciba Geigy and has good contacts with 
"sources of foreign capital."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Jan 94 
p 3) 

   NEC To Begin Marketing Digital Mapping Systems -- NEC, Japan's 
largest manufacturer of PC's, will begin marketing digital mapping 
systems in China for the management of roads and water systems.  The 
mapping system consists of mapping information management software, 
Mapview, and Sun Microsystems system software to run on a NEC 
EWS4800 workstation.  NEC will sell the mapping software through 
Keligao Co., a Beijing-based software company, for $14,000 a copy. 
NEC has sold about 500 of these systems in Japan. 

   With China's rapid urban development, the company expects to sell 
about 100 systems annually.   Keligao will be responsible for sales 
in the China market and will also develop Chinese-language 
applications software for specific tasks.  NEC already sells library 
management systems software in China for use in workstations. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Jan 94 p 13) 

   Governmental Affairs - Government Resumes ODA to Iran for Dam 
Construction -- Japan has announced its intention to resume official 
development assistance (ODA) to Iran after an 18-year suspension. 
Although the ODA will finance construction of the fourth Karun dam, 
Japan is cautioning Iran that it could halt ODA "at any time."  This 
caution reflects Japan's awareness of the United States' desire to 
isolate Iran as a country that supports terrorism and to have other 
Western countries refrain from providing ODA to Iran.  Japan, on the 
other hand, is asserting a degree of "independence," stating that 
"supporting the Rafsanjani government, which is adopting pragmatic 
policies, will lead to stability not only in Iran but in the entire 
Persian Gulf region."  From the government's perspective, Iran will 
not change its attitudes toward the West even if it is isolated. 

   Another reason for Japan's cautious position is that it wants to 
keep Iran's sensitivities focused on Japan's "four principles of 
ODA," one of which prohibits Japan from extending ODA to a country 
which builds up its arms capabilities while receiving ODA.  Recently 
a rumor has circulated that Iran may buy "Nodong I" missiles from 
North Korea.  Japanese Ambassador to Iran Takeshi Ohara states that 
Japan has conveyed its concern to Iran over this rumor, and Iran has 
"officially denied this rumor."  Ohara further says that Japan will 
continue examining the provision of ODA to Iran with the four 
principles in mind. 

   Japan's ODA will help finance Iran's fourth Karun dam, which is 
estimated to cost 220 billion yen ($2 billion), of which Iran will 
pay 70 billion yen ($636 million).  Japan is expected to finance its 
150 billion yen ($1.36 billion) package in three installments. 
While Japan has announced its intention to extend a first 
installment totaling 38.6 billion yen ($351 million), it has 
"neither publicly announced nor notified Iran"  that it also will 
provide the second and third installments   (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 5 
Jan 94 p 8) 

   Insurance Industry - FEATURE:  MOF Continues To Criticize U.S. 
Position in Insurance Talks -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of Finance 
(MOF) remains critical of the U.S. Government position concerning 
the insurance industry in the Japan-U.S. framework talks and expects 
the talks to "remain extremely difficult, with the possibility of a 
breakdown," according to press reports.  Japan's life and non-life 
insurance sectors, which had been quiet concerning the negotiations, 
have begun openly criticizing the U.S. side and campaigning to win 
public support for their stands. 

   The MOF remains critical of the U.S. position on insurance issues 
in the Japan-U.S. framework talks, according to the 19 January NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  A senior MOF official, quoted by the 
paper, stated that "Japan cannot compromise in one-sided, 
unreasonable, and unfair talks."  In a similar vein, the 27 January 
MAINICHI SHIMBUN reports that the MOF strongly opposes setting up 
any "objective criteria" regarding a foreign share of the industry 
market, claiming that "objective criteria will inevitably end up 
becoming numerical targets."  A senior MOF official, quoted by 
MAINICHI, states that "the United States is selfish in asking Japan 
to exempt the "third area" of Japan's insurance market where a few 
U.S. insurers hold most of the market share, from liberalization." 
The "third area" refers to accident, sickness, nursing care, and 
other specialized personal insurance coverage. 

   MOF officials expect the talks to "remain extremely difficult, 
with the possiblity of a breakdown," according to the 19 January 
NIKKEI.  Many MOF officials "want to avoid the pattern of being 
forced to compromise in the end," as in previous Japan-U.S. 
negotiations, NIKKEI reports.  Some MOF officials hold an even 
tougher view that "a compromise would be rather harmful to future 
bilateral relations," the article notes. 

   The MOF still doubts the insurance sector has to be "an area for 
negotiations," according to the 19 January NIKKEI.  In the 
ministry's view, the U.S. insurance market is "more closed" than the 
Japanese market.  According to OECD statistics, the foreign shares 
in the Japanese and U.S. insurance markets in 1990 were 2.7 percent 
and 0.9 percent respectively; and Japan had $420 million in "net 
imports" from the U.S. insurance sector in 1990. 

   Insurance Industry Goes on the Offensive - Japan's life and non- 
life insurance industries, which had been quietly watching the 
governmental negotiations, have begun "openly criticizing the U.S. 
side," according to the 21 January MAINICHI.  Insurance industry 
leaders have become outspoken, criticizing the U.S. side in 
asserting that "the U.S. market is more closed than the Japanese 
market" and "the United States is asking Japan to adopt managed 
trade while it is advocating free trade," MAINICHI reports.  The 
article also observes that "some industry officials" have made even 
tougher remarks, such as "we are ready to fight the United States to 
the end." 

   Both industry sectors have begun campaigning to win public 
support for their position, according to the 21 January MAINICHI. 
Both have issued statements of their views, and industry leaders 
have held press conferences.  MAINICHI notes that this stems from 
the fact that the insurance sectors have recently realized that 
"they cannot completely leave this matter to the MOF" and that they 
must also speak out on their positions to win public support. 
According to the article, the insurance sectors "were not familiar 
with trade friction concerning the United States" and thus initially 
left the negotiations entirely to the MOF. 

   According to the 21 January NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, Takashi Onoda, 
chairman of Japan's Marine and Fire Insurance Association and 
president of Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance Co., on 20 January 
released a statement regarding the Japan-U.S. insurance talks.  It 
criticizes the U.S. position, claiming that the Japanese insurance 
market is more open than the U.S. market, where each state regulates 
insurance businesses with different-.-and often discriminatory- 
-regulations.  The statement further criticizes the U.S. proposal to 
delay liberalization of the "third area" as contradicting the U.S. 
position urging deregulation.  Further, the statement notes that the 
U.S. proposal to set numerical targets is "inappropriate," since it 
is the customer who decides which insurance policy to buy, and 
therefore the government "would not be able to achieve numerical 
targets even if they were adopted." 

   Toshiomi Urakami, chairman of the Life Insurance Association of 
Japan and president of Sumitomo Life Insurance, held a press 
conference on 21 January and criticized the U.S. Government for not 
"understanding the Japanese insurance market correctly," rebutting 
the U.S. claim that the Japanese market is closed, according to the 
24 January NIKKEI KINYU.  Urakami claimed that the Japanese life 
insurance market is "sufficiently open."  Concerning the U.S. 
proposal to set numerical targets, he stated that market shares 
result from the efforts of insurers and the choices of customers. 
"which the government cannot control." 

   Reasons for Deadlocked Bilateral Negotiations - In the 11 January 
SANKEI SHIMBUN, Washington correspondent Seiji Yajima points out 
that one reason for deadlock in the insurance talks is that neither 
government will compromise on their "principles."  According to 
Yajima, the U.S. side is sticking to its principle of attaining 
"results."  He notes that based on its experience of trade 
negotiations with Japan over 20 years, the U.S. Government has 
concluded that past trade agreements have not produced any concrete 
results, except in the semiconductor field.  Therefore, Yajima 
maintains, the U.S. Government will not abandon its "results- 
oriented approach."  Similarly, the Japanese side is adhering to its 
principle of "rejecting numerical targets."  The Japanese side is 
determined to "absolutely reject numerical targets themselves, 
anything similar to numerical targets, anything that may result in 
numerical targets, and all such things" as elements that do not 
belong in a free market economy, Yajima observes. 

   Another reason for deadlock, pointed out by the MOF, is that the 
U.S. agency in charge of insurance talks is the USTR, according to 
the 19 January NIKKEI.  A senior MOF official quoted in the article 
states that "USTR officials in charge of the negotiations lack an 
understanding of the insurance sector, which makes it impossible for 
us to conduct discussions based on the actual state of the insurance 
sector."  One example cited by the senior official is that USTR 
officials "were not aware that the brokerage system, which the 
United States is asking Japan to introduce, is not available in 12 
states in the United States."  As another example, USTR officials 
reportedly did not know that "New York and some other states have 
discriminatory regulations, such as requiring foreign insurers to 
place assets in trust equivalent to reserve funds for liabilities." 

   In addition, MOF officials are critical of reference materials 
prepared by USTR, according to Yoichi Funabashi, chief of ASAHI 
SHIMBUN's America Bureau.  Writing in the 27 January ASAHI, 
Funabashi reports that the atmosphere during a negotiating session 
"stiffened" after a senior MOF official, who once lectured at 
Harvard, pointed out "problems" in the U.S. reference materials and 
reportedly told the U.S. negotiators that "if I were a Harvard 
professor, I could not give this paper anything higher than a 'C'." 
An official in the MOF's International Finance Bureau also 
criticized the foreign market share figures for the G-7 countries 
presented by the U.S. side as "groundless and inappropriate for use 
in negotiations," the 27 January MAINICHI reports. 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  MT Firms Emphasizing Foreign 
Manufacturing, Procurement -- SUMMARY:  Japanese machine tool (MT) 
manufacturers are beginning to increase foreign production and 
procurement to reduce costs and are emphasizing foreign sales 
because of the slump in the domestic market, according to press 
reports.  MT companies whose efforts have been reported in these 
areas include Koyo Kikai Kogyo, Sodick, and Ikegai. 

   Koyo Kikai Kogyo--According to the 28 January NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Koyo Kikai Kogyo, a wholly owned subsidiary of the bearing 
manufacturing firm Koyo Seiko, has reached agreement with Wuxi 
Machine Tool Co. to form a joint venture (JV) company to assemble 
centerless grinding machines in Wuxi City, Jiangsu Province, China. 
The two companies are the largest manufacturers of centerless 
grinding machines in their respective markets; Koyo Kikai has a 33 
percent share of the Japanese market, and Wuxi Machine Tool holds a 
70 percent share of the Chinese market. 

   The JV company, Wuxi Koyo Machine Tool Co., will be established 
in March 1994 and will be capitalized at $2.1 million, with Koyo 
Kikai investing 51 percent and Wuxi Machine Tool 49 percent.  The JV 
firm will have 30 employees by September, when it will begin 
assembling Koyo Kikai's KC200 centerless grinders.  Initially all 
parts will be shipped from Japan, but in five years the local parts 
procurement ratio should rise to 60 percent.  Also, by that time the 
JV is expected to have 90 employees and should be producing about 
$20 million worth of centerless grinders annually.  This is the 
first Sino-Japanese joint venture that involves technical 
cooperation and the production of machine tools.  Fanuc's JV 
production of numerical control equipment in Beijing is said to 
involve only technical cooperation, NIKKEI SANGYO notes. 
   Sodick--According to the 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, Sodick 
Co., a major manufacturer of electrical discharge machines (EDM), 
will establish a corporation in Singapore in February to sell and 
service numerically controlled EDMs and procure electrical and 
machine tool parts.  The company will be capitalized at the 
equivalent of 6.8 million yen ($61,800).  The 24 January NIKKEI 
SANGYO reports that Sodick will use the Singapore company to build a 
network of subcontractors in Southeast Asia from which it can buy 
heavy cast parts, such as bases and frames.  Sodick hopes to reduce 
its manufacturing costs by about 10 percent by increasing its ratio 
of foreign parts procurement to "nearly 10 percent." 

   The 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO also reports that Sodick will 
consolidate its domestic production of numerically controlled EDMs 
at its main plant in Kaga City, Ishikawa Prefecture, and will shut 
down its Kanazawa plant, located in Matsuto City in Ishikawa. 
NIKKEI SANGYO adds that Sodick has already closed its Takaoka plant 
in Toyama Prefecture and its Morioka plant in Iwate Prefecture, and 
has solicited "voluntary" retirements from among its workers. 

   Ikegai--According to the 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, Ikegai 
Corp., a medium-size MT manufacturer specializing in numerically 
controlled lathes, is reorganizing its export structure to expand 
sales to China and Southeast Asia.  Ikegai will create a foreign 
trade division within its sales subsidiary, Ikegai Machine Sales, 
and will integrate sales of MT equipment and plastic injection 
molding equipment.  Ikegai will also open an office in Beijing, and 
is considering opening offices in Hong Kong and Singapore.  The 
Beijing office will be responsible for the inspection and 
maintenance of lathes exported to China, and initially will use 
technicians on loan from an unidentified Chinese MT trading company. 
Ikegai decided to raise its export ratio from "under 10 percent to 
over 20 percent" because "there is little hope for a major recovery 
in domestic demand," NIKKEI SANGYO adds. 

   Nachi-Fujikoshi Records FY93 Current Losses of $35 Million -- 
Nachi-Fujikoshi, Japan's largest cutting-tool manufacturer, recorded 
sales of 112.48 billion yen ($1.02 billion) during the company's 
1993 fiscal year, which ended in November.  This was a drop of 15.1 
percent from 1992.  The company's current losses were 3.85 billion 
yen ($35 million), and net income after taxes came to a minus 6.453 
billion yen ($58.66 million).  By taking 7.426 billion yen ($67.5 
million) in extraordinary losses, Nachi-Fujikoshi will eliminate its 
"financial engineering" problems.  The company's FY93 sales by 
corporate divisions is as follows: 


Division            Sales           Sales         Change from FY92 
                    (billion yen)  (million $) 

Cutting tools        22.229         $202.1        - 17.0 percent 
Bearings             41.472         $377.0        -  7.7 
Machine tools        20.33          $184.8        - 29.1 
Hydraulic equipment  17.357         $157.79       - 11.8 
Steel products       11.089         $100.8        - 10.7 

Total               112.477        1,022.49       - 15.1 % 



   The company's FY94 sales are expected to decline a further 4 
percent to 108 billion ($981.8 million), while net income after 
taxes should total 100 million yen ($909,100).  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 28 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Toyoda Machine Works Receives Cam Grinder Order From Renault -- 
Toyoda Machine Works (TMW), a machine tool company belonging to the 
Toyota Motor Group, has received a 800 million yen ($7.27 million) 
order from the French automaker Renault for 14 GWC-type 32-bit 
computer numerically controlled (CNC) masterless cam grinders.  This 
order reflects TMW's efforts to increase sales overseas because 
"domestic orders are being squeezed."  Seven grinders will be 
delivered in the fall of 1994, but a delivery date for the remainder 
has not been set. 

   While TMW has sold 73 of these grinders to Ford, this is the 
largest order from a European manufacturer.  Previously TMW sold 
three grinders to a Norwegian company, one in 1989 and two in 1990. 
(Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 14 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Citizen Watch Furloughs MT Plant Workers Because of Poor Sales -- 
Citizen Watch Co., which manufactures machine tools (MT) and 
industrial robots in addition to watches and automation equipment, 
furloughed all 320 workers at its precision machinery plant in 
Tokorozawa, Saitama Prefecture, for two days in January because of 
slumping sales.  The plant manufactures the company's MT products 
and robots.  Citizen furloughed half the workers on 20-21 January 
and the other half on 27-28 January. 

   This is the first time Citizen has furloughed its workers.  The 
firm is also considering reduction of its workforce over 10 years 
from the current 3,000 to 2,000 workers through normal attrition. 
(Tokyo MAINICHI SHIMBUN 29 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Fujitsu's VPP500 
Supercomputer Falls Short of Expectations -- SUMMARY:  Fujitsu has 
received only seven orders for its VPP500-series supercomputer since 
its introduction in late 1992, according to press reports.  All 
domestic orders were from public-sector institutions, and only one 
machine was sold overseas.  Despite claims of technological 
superiority, press reports indicate that Fujitsu may have won these 
bids in large part by extremely low bidding.  Fujitsu also failed to 
win several recent bids where existing Fujitsu supercomputers were 
in place. 

   Background to Development of Fujitsu's VPP500 - In September 
1992, Fujitsu Ltd. announced the development of its VPP500, a hybrid 
vector-parallel processing supercomputer.  Built in response to the 
scientific community's need for faster processing speeds, the VPP500 
is  the successor to the firm's VP and VPX series, according to the 
11 September 1992 NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  Fujitsu believed that 
demand for the VPP500 would be strong in the fields of space 
engineering and the natural sciences, such as atmospheric and 
environmental analysis, the 10 September 1992 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI) reports.  The company claimed the VPP500 was "the world's 
fastest" supercomputer, citing three key features to support its 
claim, according to the 11 September 1992 NIKKAN KOGYO: 

   1--The VPP500 carries VP-series vector processors made with 
highly integrated gallium arsenide (GaAs) large-scale integrated 
circuits (LSIs), which reportedly allow for higher speeds and more 
density than conventional silicon LSIs. 

   2--The VPP500 utilizes a "vector-parallel architecture" in which 
the vector processing units are linked in a parallel, or "crossbar" 
fashion, for faster processing.  A maximum of 222 processors can be 
linked in this way, each having a processing capability of 1.6 
billion floating point operations per second (1.6 gigaflops). 
Fujitsu claims that when the VPP500 is loaded with all 222 
processors, it can achieve a 355-gigaflop level. 

   3--The VPP500 carries a Fortran compiler tailored for parallel 
processing programming and recompilation software that allows it to 
run existing VP/VPX software.  The operating software uses 
"UXP/VPP," which is based on UNIX SVR4 and makes possible "parallel 
distributed processing." 

   Breakdown of Fujitsu's Seven VPP500 Orders - According to the 5 
October 1992 NIKKEI COMPUTER, Fujitsu won its first order for a 
VPP500 from the National Aerospace Laboratory (NAL), which falls 
under the Science and Technology Agency (STA), "soon after" the 
supercomputer's introduction in 1992.  The unit was procured as part 
of a joint project between NAL and Fujitsu that began in 1989 to 
develop a new "numerical wind tunnel" system, the 15 March 1993 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN reports.  The NAL also had a Fujitsu 
VP2600/10, according to the 28 April 1990 NIKKEI, so it is unclear 
whether the VPP500 is an upgrade or a separate unit. 

   On 24 June 1993 Fujitsu won its only overseas order for a VPP500 
from the University of Aachen in Germany, according to the 25 June 
1993 NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  The order was for a VPP500/4--four 
vector units with a capability of 6.4 gigaflops--at a lease price of 
30 million yen ($270,000) per month.  The university was already 
using a Fujitsu-made VP2600/20, but it decided to order the new 
machine to expand its capabilities.  Further, in mid-1994 the 
university plans to increase the number of processors from four to 
around 20.  The order will be filled via Siemens-Nixdorf Co., which 
produces the processors for Fujitsu on an OEM basis. 

   Fujitsu won its next domestic order on 2 July 1993, when the 
Institute of Space and Astronomical Science (ISAS) under the 
Ministry of Education selected a VPP500/7, according to the 3 July 
1993 NIKKAN KOGYO.  This order was among the four supercomputers 
purchased by the government under the FY93 regular budget.  ISAS was 
already using a Fujitsu VP-series supercomputer and decided to 
purchase a VPP500 because it could be connected with the older model 
and use the same software.  No price information was reported. 

   Fujitsu won four more orders for the VPP500 from government- 
related organizations with funds appropriated in the first 
supplemental budget of FY93.  According to the 30 November 1993 
NIKKEI, on 25 November Tsukuba University's Computer Center chose a 
VPP500 over an NEC-made SX-3R and a Cray C90 machine sponsored by 
Canon Supercomputer S.I. at a purchase price "around" 2 billion yen 
($18 million).  Tsukuba is a national university under the 
administration of the Ministry of Education.  Fujitsu's second order 
came on 30 November when the Communications Research Laboratories 
(CRL) of the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT) chose a 
VPP500 supercomputer over those offered by NEC, Cray Japan, and 
Hitachi, according to the 1 December 1993 NIKKEI.  CRL already has a 
Fujitsu supercomputer.  The winning bid was 540 million yen ($4.9 
million). 

   On 1 December 1993 Fujitsu won its third consecutive bid when the 
Angstrom Technology Partnership (ATP) announced that Fujitsu had won 
the bid over eight other competitors, according to the 2 December 
1193 NIKKEI SANGYO.  Fujitsu will supply its VPP500 combined with a 
CM-5 parallel processing supercomputer from the U.S. firm Thinking 
Machines at a price of 2.8 billion yen ($25.5 million).  According 
to the March 1993 KIKAI SHINKO, a computer industry monthly, the ATP 
is a cooperative organization consisting of Japanese and foreign 
companies (including Fujitsu) that conduct research with the 
National Institute for Advanced Interdisciplinary Research (NAIR) 
under MITI's Agency of Industrial Science and Technology (AIST). 
The 16 December 1993 NIKKEI SANGYO reports that on 15 December 
Fujitsu won its fourth bid, from the Institute of Physical and 
Chemical Research under the Science and Technology Agency (STA). 
With a bid of "between 1 and 2 billion yen" ($9-18 million), Fujitsu 
won over Hitachi, which sponsored a "CM-5" supercomputer made by 
Thinking Machines, according to NIKKEI SANGYO. 

   Competitors Feel Fujitsu Won by Making Very Low Bids - Following 
its string of winning bids, Fujitsu has become the "object of 
attention," the 7 December 1993 NIKKEI reports.  Although "it 
appears" that Fujitsu won based both in terms of price and system 
capabilities, rival firms believe Fujitsu set its prices at a level 
where "it cannot make a profit" and at which other firms "cannot 
win." 

   Regarding the Tsukuba University bid, in which Fujitsu competed 
against NEC and Canon Supercomputer, which sponsored a Cray 
supercomputer, Canon was judged to have a "small lead" over Fujitsu 
regarding technical considerations and a "large lead" over NEC, 
according to the 7 December 1993 NIKKEI.  However, in terms of 
price, Fujitsu's bid of 2 billion yen ($19 million) was "very much 
lower" than Canon's bid of about 3.5 billion yen ($33.3 million) and 
NEC's bid of 2.6 billion yen ($24.8 million).  Fujitsu claims it won 
the Tsukuba bid based on the performance of its machine, but "there 
are those within the industry" who believe Fujitsu won only because 
it tendered an "extremely low bid," the 30 November NIKKEI notes. 

   Concerning the ATP supercomputer, although nine firms tendered 
bids, Fujitsu won at a price of about 2.8 billion yen ($25.5 
million), according to the 2 December 1993 NIKAAN KOGYO. 
Reportedly, NEC and Hitachi also placed bids "in the 2 billion yen 
($18 million) range."  Cray Research and other "systems integration" 
firms that sponsored Cray products appeared to have bid over 3 
billion yen ($28.5 million), and the highest bid was said to be 4.6 
billion ($43.8 million).  Regarding Fujitsu's bid, however, "there 
are those who believe" that Fujitsu "bid a considerable lower price" 
to win, NIKKAN KOGYO observes. 

   VPP500 Orders Far Fewer Than Fujitsu Anticipated - When Fujitsu 
began marketing the VPP500, it hoped to sell or lease 50 units by 
the end of 1995, according to the 11 September 1992 ASAHI SHIMBUN. 
By the end of 1993, however, Fujitsu has only won seven orders. 

   Regarding the bidding for the eleven supercomputers under the 
FY93 supplemental budget, the 7 December NIKKEI observes, Fujitsu 
expected to win "at least 50 percent of the orders," which would 
mirror its domestic supercomputer market share.  However, even if 
the firm wins the final FY93 supercomputer bidding from the National 
Cancer Center in late February 1994, it will not achieve its sales 
goal. 

   In part, Fujitsu believed it could win 50 percent of the bids 
because three of the institutes were already using Fujitsu 
supercomputers.  According to an article in the September 1993 
ZAIKAI TEMBO, once a government agency has a supercomputer in place, 
the manufacturer "is likely to win any new bids" for upgrades.  In 
fact, the magazine notes, all four supercomputers procured by the 
government under the FY93 regular budget were "upgrades" to existing 
models, and three of those remained with the same manufacturer.  In 
addition, the VPP500 requires the use of a VP supercomputer as a 
"front-end machine," the 16 February 1993 NIKKAN KOGYO notes. 

   Fujitsu officials declared that they would "fight to the death" 
to win the bidding to place supercomputer upgrades at the CRL, the 
National Aerospace Laboratory (NAL), and Power Reactor and Nuclear 
Fuel Development Corp. (PNC), according to the 5 November 1993 
NIKKAN KOGYO.  Both the NAL and the PNC are administered by the STA. 
Although Fujitsu did win its upgrade bid from the CRL, contrary to 
earlier statements Fujitsu reportedly "did not even bid" for the NAL 
and PNC machines, whose contracts were won by Intel and Cray Japan, 
respectively, according to the 29 January NIKKEI SANGYO. 

   Cray Research Wins Secibd Government Supercomputer Bid - On 28 
January the Power Reactor and Nuclear Fuel Development Corp. (PNC), 
which is under the Science and Technology Agency (STA), formally 
announced that the U.S. firm Cray Research won the bidding to 
provide the PNC with a supercomputer.  This is the tenth of eleven 
supercomputers to be procured with funds from the first FY93 
supplemental budget.  Cray will provide its "T3D" massively parallel 
processing supercomputer at a price of about 600 million yen ($5.5 
million). 

   This is Cray's second winning bid.  The first was for a C90 
vector processing supercomputer from the Research Information 
Processing Center under the Agency of Industrial Science and 
Technology (AIST).  However, the most recent order  will be the 
first T3D installed in a "government-related organ."   In both 
cases, Cray was the sole bidder. 

   The final bidding for a supercomputer purchased under FY93 
supplemental budget funding will be held in February 1994 by the 
National Cancer Center.  Of the ten previous bids, Japanese and U.S. 
firms have "split evenly," with five wins each.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 29 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Tokyo Electron To Boost Overseas Procurement of Parts, Materials 
-- Tokyo Electron, a major producer of semiconductor manufacturing 
equipment (SME), is moving to expand overseas procurement of SME 
parts and materials.  Given the high yen exchange rate, the company 
wants to increase overseas procurement to lower manufacturing costs 
and strengthen competitiveness.  The company plans to raise its 
ratio of overseas procurement to about 30 percent from the current 
15 to 20 percent.  To achieve this goal, last October it established 
an "international procurement management office" in its technology 
support center.  The role of the office is to provide the integrated 
management of international procurement efforts and to identify 
suitable parts and materials from overseas and make bulk purchases. 
Formerly, each of Tokyo Electron's major plants, including its three 
subsidiaries in Yamanashi, Kyushu, and Tohoku, managed their own 
overseas parts and materials procurement. 

   Japanese SME manufacturers rely mostly on domestic sources for 
parts and materials.  Even with the high yen, they are not taking 
aggressive countermeasures because many of their products are made 
to order and many companies do not have overseas connections. 
However, now that "SME giant" Tokyo Electron is implementing a 
strategy to expand overseas procurement, other SME companies are 
likely to follow.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 10 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  Divergent Views Evident 
on Future Fiber Optic Network -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of Posts and 
Telecommunications (MPT) and Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) 
have independently revealed their visions of Japan's next generation 
fiber optic network and the future multimedia market, according to 
press reports.  In addition, the Telecommunications Council, an MPT 
advisory group, in its final report to be released in March, is 
expected to recommend that the private sector build the fiber optic 
network "with active government support."  As Japan plans for the 
next generation communications market, the struggle to control it 
has become severe between the various players. 

   MPT Minister Issues 'Rosy' Vision Statement - According to the 6 
January ASAHI SHIMBUN evening edition, MPT Minister Takenori Kanzaki 
held a press conference to outline the MPT's "medium to long-term 
vision" for nurturing Japan's information communications industry. 
The vision details MPT's plans to "design a program for building a 
basic communications infrastructure, address the issue of merging 
communications and broadcasting services, promote new businesses, 
and pursue international cooperation in the industry."  The MPT 
minister indicated that the future multimedia market will be worth 
123 trillion yen ($1.2 trillion) and will create 2.4 million jobs, 
according to ASAHI. 

   By issuing its vision statement, the MPT "made the first move in 
its struggle" with the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) over control of the multimedia industry, according to the 7 
January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  SANKEI notes that the MPT sketched a "rosy 
outlook" for the multimedia industry because "it hopes to use the 
communications industry to lead the Japanese economy out of its 
slump," and also because it wants to confirm as soon as possible 
that it, rather than MITI, is the "superior authoritative body" 
regarding multimedia issues.  The animosity between the two 
ministries over multimedia-related jurisdiction has developed into a 
"battle royal," and the MPT is also working against NTT to "snap up" 
control of the multimedia industry as soon as possible, SANKEI 
notes. 

   According to the 13 December issue of NIKKEI BUSINESS, the MPT 
hopes to use the U.S. information superhighway initiative as a model 
to support its position of requesting public funds to upgrade 
Japan's communications infrastructure as it vies with NTT to plan 
the next generation network.  NIKKEI BUSINESS notes that Japanese 
bureaucrats have reportedly interpreted the U.S. initiative as "the 
U.S. Government taking the lead to build a fiber optic network 
throughout the United States," but have "mistranslated" this 
interpretation into their version of a government-led 
"infrastructure program." 

   NTT Attempting To Carve Out Multimedia Role - On 12 January, NTT 
revealed its plans for Japan's future multimedia market that will 
tie the country together with fiber optic links by the year 2015 at 
an estimated cost of 45 trillion yen ($409 billion), according to 
the 13 January MAINCHI SHIMBUN.  NTT in 1995 will begin providing to 
households on a trial basis various multimedia services, including 
two-way interactive games and cable television (CATV).  By 1997, NTT 
will establish fiber optic networks in Tokyo and the major 
metropolitan regions, and by 2000-2005 it will complete hookups in 
the 12 largest cities and prefectural capitals. 

   NTT is "very conscious" of the MPT's vision, according to 
MAINICHI.  NTT feels that "government support is indispensable" for 
progress within the communications industry, but that the private 
sector should "carve out" the multimedia age.  The government, 
according to NTT, should be limited to addressing regulatory issues 
and nurturing the development of the software industry, MAINICHI 
notes. 

   Prior to its announcement, NTT was approached by U.S. Trade 
Representative Mickey Kantor at an unofficial meeting on 7 January 
with a "strong request" for foreign participation in building 
Japan's next- generation communications network, according to the 8 
January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  At the meeting, the U.S. 
side stated that "the Japanese market will be worth $400 to $500 
billion in the future," and that U.S. companies are hoping to 
participate in NTT's plans, from the initial stage.  NIKKEI adds 
that the U.S. side requested further meetings with NTT in March. 

   Telecommunications Council Backs 'Active Government Support' - 
The 18 January NIKKEI reports that the Telecommunications Council, 
MPT's advisory group, will recommend a joint private-public effort 
to build Japan's next generation fiber optic network because it is 
seeking to match the U.S. approach as defined in the Clinton 
administration's information superhighway initiative.  The Council, 
NIKKEI notes, "is firm" in its belief that "active government 
support is necessary."  It feels that if the private sector is given 
complete responsibility for building the network, it will be more 
interested in profitability, will not build the network as quickly, 
and may not ensure uniform services throughout the country once the 
network is completed.  NIKKEI observes that the council has yet to 
decide the government's contribution toward the estimated 30 to 50 
trillion yen ($272-454 billion) needed to build the network. 

   Private Sector Reactions - The MPT recently interviewed about 350 
"top" people from communications companies and from the "general 
working class," including university professors and heads of local 
governments, on how to build Japan's next- generation network, 
according to the 5 January ASAHI SHIMBUN.  About 50 percent of those 
interviewed agreed that the private sector should take the lead in 
building the fiber optic network, and that companies such as NTT 
should be the "central players" and should be backed by government 
support.  Those interviewed felt that private companies "are closer 
to the consumers" and "will consider economical and practical 
matters" in their plans, ASAHI notes. 

   According to the 21 January NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the private 
sector "feels strongly" that MITI's Machinery and Information 
Industries Bureau and MPT's Telecommunications Bureau, 
Communications Bureau, and Broadcasting Bureau should be merged to 
create an "authoritative body" for the telecommunications and 
multimedia industries.  The general belief within the private 
sector, according to NIKKEI SANGYO, is that it is unnecessary to 
divide multimedia-related issues between the two ministries and that 
discussions on which issues should be handled by which ministry are 
"fruitless" and "far removed" from the actual situation within the 
industry.  Private sector executives believe that a blend of 
"competition-minded" MITI bureaus and "regulations-minded" MPT 
bureaus would form a "fine authoritative body," NIKKEI SANGYO notes. 

   Future Outlook - The 24 January NIKKEI asserts that Japan must be 
facing "critical circumstances" in defining its future fiber optic 
network because the Hiraiwa Commission's final report recommends 
that the Japanese Government "refer to the U.S. inititiative" on 
this issue.  NIKKEI explains that the U.S. information superhighway 
initiative is designed around three information networks--the 
telephone, CATV, and personal computers--and is an "all-industry 
boom."  Japan's future infrastructure, however, is designed only 
around a communications network based on the telephone, because 
"there is no existing market or infrastructure" to support the other 
networks as outlined in the U.S. initiative. 

   NIKKEI notes that for Japan, promoting and nurturing the CATV 
market represents a "shortcut solution" to building its network as 
an "all-industry project," like that described in the U.S. 
intitiative.  Although the MPT considerably relaxed regulations last 
year to stimulate growth in the CATV market, NIKKEI notes, a more 
radical shift in policy is necessary to boost its current 2 to 3 
percent growth rate in Japan to the current U.S. level of 60 
percent. 

   The 13 December NIKKEI BUSINESS states that Japan should learn 
the "economic effects of integrating competitive principles into the 
market" from the United States.  The government should permit 
communications companies to offer broadcasting services and should 
allow active investment by non-broadcasting companies in the "dying 
CATV market" to improve its infrastructure. 

   MELCO, Raytheon To Develop Maritime Communications Systems -- 
Mitsubishi Electric Corp. (MELCO) has reached agreement with 
Raytheon, the U.S. defense equipment manufacturer, to supply 
telephones and transmission control devices for a maritime mobile 
communications system which Raytheon will market when it begins 
offering commercial mobile communications services via satellite 
early next year.  The two companies previously worked together under 
a cooperative agreement involving missile technology.  Raytheon, 
which has been attempting to rapidly shift to commercial activities 
with the end of the Cold War, and MELCO, which is eager to boost 
activities in the United States, met last summer and agreed to 
examine cooperative ventures in commercial markets. 

   MELCO--which will independently begin marketing communications 
terminal unit systems for automobiles in October 1994--teamed up 
with Raytheon, which possesses the technology to build antennas, to 
exploit the maritime communications market because Raytheon's future 
mobile communications service area includes the North American 
continent and areas up to 200 miles offshore.  MELCO has been 
developing the telephones and transmission control devices under an 
18-month exclusive sales rights agreement.  The company forecasts a 
large demand for maritime mobile communications systems because 
there are 35,000 commercial vessels and 20,000 recreational boats 
registered in North America.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 28 Jan 94 
p 10) 

   Mitsui, U.S. Firm Sign Communications Cooperation Agreement -- 
Mitsui &amp; Co. has signed a "strategic cooperation agreement" with 
Network Equipment Technologies (NET), a U.S. communications 
equipment manufacturer, to develop information communications 
products for the Japanese market.  Under the agreement, Mitsui will 
acquire exclusive rights to sell NET equipment in Japan, will 
provide $3 million in research and development funds to NET over a 
3-year period for developing equipment and products for the Japanese 
market, and will assist NET in establishing "technical cooperation 
ties" with other Japanese companies. 

   Mitsui will market LAN (local area network) equipment, which 
utilizes NET's "ATMX" ATM (asynchronous transfer mode) technology, 
through its affiliated information systems building companies, 
including Nihon Unysis.  The company estimates a turnover of 1 
billion yen ($9 million) the first year and 4 billion yen ($36 
million) after three years.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 27 Jan 94 p 
13) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Macroeconomic Control Creates New 
Debt Problems for Enterprises -- The State Council's Research and 
Development Center economist Yang Peixin recently noted that 
although the government's macroeconomic regulation policy has 
achieved initial success in certain areas, there are more debt 
chains among state enterprises than in 1989.  Since the official 
macroeconomic control policy was put into effect in June of 1993, 
the foreign exchange rate has started to stabilize.  Higher interest 
rates have also lead to a 144-billion yuan increase in savings 
deposits between July and October.  Accordingly, the growth of the 
money supply was reduced from 54 to 38.6 percent and the growth of 
banks cash reserves increased from 1 to 10 percent. 

   Despite these positive indicators, the tight money policy has 
created a serious cash shortage problem among enterprises, forcing 
many to reduce or stop production.  The increase in bank deposits 
only added to banks cash reserve and did not filter down to 
enterprises.  Moreover, part of the 150 billion which the central 
bank provided to specialized banks between August and October for 
relending to enterprises also failed to reach its intended targets. 

   Meanwhile, macroeconomic control has caused a new round of debt 
chains, which have already exceeded 600 billion yuan nationally and 
have adversely affected the steel, automobile, machinery, chemical, 
and textile industries.  For example, customers of Luoyang's 21 
enterprises owe the group 1.4 billion yuan, and the group in turn 
owes others 790 million; customers of Jilin Chemical Industry 
Company owe the company 900 million yuan, and the company owes 
others 600 million yuan.  As for steel companies, customers of the 
ten largest steel plants owe the plants 12.4 billion yuan.  Benxi 
Steel Plant could only pay workers one-half of their normal 
salaries, and Anshan Steel owes 1.6 billion in taxes.  In fact, all 
the 12 largest steel plants are faciiig difficulties.  Similarly, 
automobiles and trucks produced at the Second Automobile Plant are 
not being sold.  Yanshan Petrochemical Plant does not have money to 
purchase petroleum because funds were spent on capital construction 
and is forced to cut back on operating funds.  The enterprises that 
suffer the most are those large enterprises with good earnings. 

   According to estimates made by the Deputy Director of the 
People's Bank, Zhou Zhengqin, capital construction projects which 
were completed by 1993 and are ready for production would require a 
minimum 100 billion yuan of initial operating expenses.  In 1992, 
industrial and commercial loans totaled 1.5 trillion yuan.  Since 
industrial production increased by 20 percent in 1993, additional 
loans of 300 billion yuan would be needed.  Furthermore, raw 
materials cost increased by 44.8 percent in 1993 and this would 
require another 600 billion yuan in loans this year.  These three 
items, totaling 1 trillion yuan, are realities the state must face 
up to. 

   Yang believes that digging one hole to fill another and solving 
problems piece meal, such as preventing the raising of private funds 
when banks suffer from cash shortages or collecting money from 
localities and enterprises when the state runs a deficit, are not 
good solutions.  The state should further reform by enlivening state 
enterprises and help develop non-state sector to create more wealth. 
Yang maintains that the central government should adopt a flexible 
and comprehensive macroeconomic policy which will properly regulate 
credit and money supplies.  The state should ensure that price 
reform does not proceed too fast and stable prices are maintained 
for rice, foodstuffs, and fuels.  Macroeconomic regulation should 
also be conducted according to the rules of a market economy. 
Instead of the central government making arbitrary decisions, local 
banks should be permitted to exercise their own judgement in 
granting loans.  (Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO 11 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Pudong To Invest 15 Billion Yuan in Infrastructure in 1994 -- 
Pudong intends to invest 15 billion yuan in its infrastructure in 
1994, according to Shanghai's Deputy Mayor and Pudong New District's 
Management Committee Chief Zhao Qizheng.  In a speech given at a 
bankers association, Zhao noted that Pudong New District also 
invested a total of 15 billion yuan in infrastructure between 1991- 
1993, with 12 billion yuan coming in 1993 alone.  Seventy percent of 
these projects have been completed, with the remainder, including 
certain power and water plants as well as communications 
installations, still under construction.  Although China's current 
regulations prohibit foreign investment in communications, Pudong, 
being a new area which Zhao believes should follow new practices, is 
fighting hard for foreign participation in this sector.  So far, 
companies in Hong Kong, Australia, and Japan have already expressed 
interest.  Because the original ten major construction projects 
failed to meet projected needs, another ten projects are either 
under way or under discussion which includes a second airport for 
Shanghai. 

   As of October 1993, Pudong's GNP increased by 21.6 percent over 
the same period in 1992.  Foreign investment has also increased both 
in number of projects and value.  It is estimated that in 1993 the 
number of total foreign investment projects will reach 1,600. 
Projects in Pudong's Jinqiao Development Zone average $13 million, 
10 times the amount in other areas.  Hong Kong is the largest 
foreign investor in Pudong, with 52 percent; followed by the United 
States, with 13 percent, Taiwan with 12 percent, and Japan with 8 
percent. 

   Shanghai is striving to become the Far East's financial center. 
Among requirements are having sufficient Chinese and foreign banks 
establish branches there, having the banking system connected into 
the international network, and having modern computer hardware and 
software.  Scores of skyscrapers have already been built in Lujiazui 
which will become the heart of the financial center.  (Shanghai WEN 
HUI BAO 11 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Nature of Guangxi's Economic Cooperation Reportedly Changing -- 
Five changes have been observed in Guangxi's economic cooperation 
with the rest of the country, and the region is expected to come 
into the limelight again in the second half of this year.  The five 
changes are:  It has stopped being just a recipient of aid from 
other regions and has begun to offer mutually beneficial 
cooperation, inter-provincial cooperation has evolved to cooperation 
within the macroregion, related development has extended from the 
coastal areas to the hinterland, the focus on real estate has 
shifted to industrial and commercial enterprises, and the focus on 
processing industries has developed to building basic industries. 
Last year, over 2,200 cooperation projects were set up, bringing in 
more than 3.8 billion yuan of investment.   (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 0637 GMT 21 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Nanning Upgrades Transport Infrastructure -- Since its 
designation as a coastal open city in June 1992, Nanning, the 
capital of Guangxi, has been developing its transportation 
facilities in order to become the key transport center of southwest 
China.  According to Mayor Xie Ruxuan, Nanning invested 1.9 billion 
yuan building transportation facilities last year, including three 
bridges, three second-class highways, and three major roads.  An 
airport expansion project is also under way.  Investment in postal 
and telecommunications facilities was 240 million yuan in 1993, and 
all local telephone exchanges have been replaced with program- 
controlled equipment.  The mayor also revealed that the city had 
approved the establishment of more than 200 new foreign-funded 
enterprises and had utilized $90 million of foreign investment. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1220 GMT 30 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Value of Most Agricultural 
Imports, Exports Decrease in 1993 -- According to Customs 
statistics, at the end of October, the value of farm product imports 
and exports was $10.46 billion, a 12.6 percent decrease from the 
same period in 1992; This accounted for 7.2 percent of the total 
value of imports and exports.  The value of exports was $7.6 
billion, a 1.3 percent decrease, and the value of imports was $2.86 
billion, a 33 percent decrease. 

   While some exports declined and some increased, overall imports 
declined.  Exports of corn, sugar, produce, canned food, and tea 
increased 10 to 35 percent.  Rapeseed exports decreased 24.1 
percent.  Imports of wheat, feed, vegetable oil, and timber 
decreased 15 to 40 percent. 

   The proportion of ordinary trade declined.  Barter and processing 
trade rapidly developed. Sugar and canned meat exports changed from 
ordinary trade to barter trade.  Wool imports mainly involved 
processing trade. The value of imports and exports from ordinary 
trade was $7.15 billion.  The proportion of this trade dropped from 
81.4 percent during the same period in 1992 to 68.4 percent. 

   Export markets changed. Exports to East Asia, Southeast Asia and 
the European Community shrank, while exports to the former Soviet 
Union and East Europe grew.  The value of exports to East Asia, and 
Southeast Asia was $4.55 billion, an 8.3 percent decrease. The value 
of exports to the former Soviet Union and East Europe was $930 
million, a 47.5 percent increase, and the value of exports to the 
European Community was $880 million, a 4 percent decrease. 

   Japan was the largest importer of agricultural products.  The 
value of exports to Japan was $1.55 billion, a 3.2 percent decrease. 
Produce, corn, and rapeseeds were the major exports.  The value of 
exports to Hong Kong was $1.4 billion, a 19.1 percent decrease. 
Major exports were hogs and produce.  The value of exports to Russia 
was $800 million, a 62.7 percent increase.  Major exports were 
sugar, corn, and canned meat.  The value of exports to Korea was 
$540 million, a 15.3 percent decrease.  Corn was the major export. 
The value of exports to Germany was $340 million, a 6.8 percent 
decrease. 

   Agricultural imports from Australia, the United States, and 
Canada accounted for 50.4 percent of total imports. The value of 
imports from Australia was $510 million, a 34.4 percent increase. 
Wool was the major import.  The value of American imports was $480 
million, a 46.5 percent decrease.  Wheat was the major import.  The 
value of Canadian imports was $450 million, a 46 percent decrease. 
Wheat was the major import. 

   Major reasons for the trends reported above are: 

   1. Agricultural supplies are abundant because of the success of 
rural economic reform.  The level of dependence on imports has been 
reduced.  Changes in the renminbi exchange rate have caused the cost 
of agricultural imports to increase, which inhibits agricultural 
imports.  Another reason for the decline is that on 1 April 1993 
China abolished import subsidies on farm products. 

   2. Because farm product competition in the international market 
is intense, prices are low.  Although China has increased the 
quantity of agricultural exports, the value has actually decreased. 

   3. Quality is a major reason for the fluctuation of agricultural 
exports.  For example, the proportion of Chinese apples in the Hong 
Kong market has declined from 40 percent to 15 percent because of 
quality problems. Exports are also hindered by the separation of 
production from marketing and strict limits on farm product exports 
by the foreign trade system. 

   4. Because of declining agricultural output in the former Soviet 
Union and East Europe for several years, Chinese farm products have 
entered this market. 

   5. The lifestyle and eating habits of people in East Asia and 
Southeast Asia are similar to those in China, therefore Chinese farm 
products in these markets have expanded.  (Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO- 
PAO 20 Dec 93 p 11) 

   Hong Kong Trade With Mainland Expected To Increase Again in 1994 
-- The Hong Kong Trade Development Council forecasts that Hong 
Kong's foreign trade volume in 1994 will rise 5 percent faster than 
in 1993, reaching a total of 19 percent. The Council indicates that 
this is because its main source of trade is from the Chinese 
mainland.  Stimulated by the thriving trade with the mainland, Hong 
Kong may have exported to China as much as 28 percent of its exports 
in 1993, making the mainland its number one trade partner.  Since 
the mainland economy will continue to grow in 1994, Hong Kong is 
still "very optimistic" about its trade future with China despite 
China's possibly renewed inflation and economic retrenchment 
resulting from its tax decontrol. 

   The Council says that because the continuous opening of the 
Taiwan market to mainland raw materials as well as a relaxed 
restriction on mainland imports,  Hong Kong expects that China will 
have a great increase in imports and a slowdown of growth in exports 
in 1994, thereby narrowing the growing gap between Hong Kong's 
investment in Taiwan and in the mainland.  (Beijing JINGJI RIBAO 3 
Jan 94 p 3) 

   Tianjin Signs Housing, Auto Contracts With Malaysian Firm -- 
Tianjin Municipality signed a housing renovation contract with the 
Golden Lion Group of Malaysia on 4 January.  Tianjin and the Golden 
Lion Group of Malaysia will jointly renovate three tracts of 
condemned houses in Nankai District, covering an area of 270,000 
square meters, and build houses in a area measuring 870,000 square 
meters.  The Malaysian side will invest 2.5 billion yuan Renminbi. 
The Malaysian side also signed an agreement with a Tianjin vehicle 
company to help it transform and expand annual production capacity. 
Based on the agreement, the Malaysian side will invest 2 billion 
yuan Renminbi to help this company produce from 300,000 to 500,000 
tons of cold rolled plates and 2 million radial tires annually. 
Letters of intent were also signed on transforming and expanding the 
facilities of Tianjin Emporium, Dongfang Commercial Building, and 
Tianjin Hotel.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 4 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul Bureau 

   Tianjin Signs Two Construction Contracts With Hong Kong Firm -- 
The Hexi district people's government in Tianjin Municipality and 
Tianjin development zone general company signed two contracts with 
the Juchuan International Group Corporation Limited of Hong Kong on 
10 January.  These contracts include renovation of condemned and 
shabby residential houses in the east Liuzhuang village of Hexi 
district and the construction of a power plant in the development 
zone. The renovation project covers an area of 9.63 hectars, which 
also includes the construction of a small residential district with 
cultural, recreation, business, and trade facilities covering an 
area of 310,000 square meters.  The total investment for this 
project is 1 billion yuan. The power plant construction project 
involves an investment of 1 billion yuan, 250 million yuan of which 
comes from Hong Kong.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 11 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul 
Bureau 

   Tianjin Establishes Business Ties With ROK -- By the end of 1993, 
Dongli district in Tianjin Municipality had established 190 types of 
foreign-funded enterprises.  The agreements for these enterprises 
involved $148 million in investments, $101 million of which were 
registered investments.  Of these enterprises, 37 are ROK-funded 
enterprises involving $59.11 million in investments, $53.75 million 
of which are registered investments.  So fare 18 ROK-funded 
enterprises have begun operation and production.  As of the end of 
1993, these Korean enterprises had realized 150 million yuan in 
output value, accounting for 30 percent of the total output value of 
foreign-funded enterprises; realized $28.01 million in foreign 
exchange, accounting for 70 percent; and created 7.89 million yuan 
in profits and taxes, accounting for 16.2 percent of the total 
profits and taxes created by foreign-funded enterprises.  (Tianjin 
TIANJIN RIBAO 16 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul Bureau 

   Heilongjiang Establishes Joint Venture With Japan -- Harbin 
Electric Machinery Company in Heilongjiang Province and Hitachi 
Company of Japan established on 29 January a joint venture to 
develop new technology products in Harbin.  This is China's first 
joint venture to produce new and high-technology power equipment. 
Each side will invest $500,000.  Through the development of new and 
high-technology products, these two companies will jointly open up 
international and domestic markets.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 
GMT 29 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Heilongjiang's Harbin Increases Foreign Investments -- Harbin 
City of Heilongjiang Province has become a hot spot for investment 
by Hong Kong, Taiwan, and ROK businessmen.  Of the present 1,283 
foreign enterprises approved by Harbin city, 80 percent are invested 
in by businessmen from these three places.  In 1993, the city 
approved the establishment of 696 foreign-funded enterprises, 
surpassing the total number of enterprises approved during the past 
nine years.  These enterprises involved a total investment of $1.125 
billion.  Hong Kong and Taiwan ranked first in the number of 
enterprises established and in the amount of investments of the 26 
countries that made investments in Harbin.  Of the 28 newly approved 
projects, each with an investment of more than $100 million, Hong 
Kong invested in 20, Taiwan invested in three, and the ROK invested 
in two.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 22 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Liaoning Approves 404 Taiwan-Funded Investments in 1993 -- 
Liaoning Province achieved new progress in economic dealings with 
Taiwan in 1993.  It approved 404 Taiwan-funded projects involving 
more than $320 million, which is equal to the total amount made 
during the past 10 years.  (Shenyang Liaoning Radio 2300 GMT 26 Jan 
94) Seoul Bureau 

   Shenyang Foreign Economic, Trade Achievements -- Shenyang City of 
Liaoning Province created $540 million in foreign exchange through 
exports during 1993, up 16.6 percent over the previous year.  It 
signed 33 contracts on construction projects and export of labor 
services in 1993, involving more than $53 million.  Its business 
volume with foreign countries reached more than $38 million. 
(Shenyang Liaoning Radio 1000 GMT 23 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Steel Industry Utilization of Foreign Capital in 1993 -- 
According to a source in the Ministry of Metallurgical Industry, 
China's steel industry utilized $900 million of foreign capital last 
year.  The source said that China had managed to obtain foreign 
loans for the third phase of the Baoshan Iron and Steel Company and 
the Wuhan Iron and Steel Company "Double 700" project, and the 
Anshan Iron and Steel Company's seamless steel pipe project. 
Maanshan Iron and Steel Company, which obtained $500 million in 
funds through listing on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange, became the 
largest Chinese company listed abroad, and collected the greatest 
amount of foreign funds thus far.  In 1993, foreign direct 
investment in China's steel industry increased by $150 million. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1148 GMT 20 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jiangsu Joint Polyester Project With U.S., Japan -- With State 
Council approval, a Sino-Japanese-U.S. joint venture will invest 
$125 million to start a project to produce 60,000 tonnes of 
polyester annually in Jiangsu's Suzhou.  The project is one of 37 
key projects to be launched in Jiarngsu this year.  These will 
include two power plants, a railroad, an acetic acid plant, and a 
cement plant.  According to an unidentified vice provincial 
governor, Jiangsu will invest 11.6 billion yuan in the 37 projects, 
seven of which have already started.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0901 GMT 21 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Qingdao Bonded Zone Attracts Foreign Investment of $63 Million -- 
By the end of 1993, 77 foreign investment projects from 18 countries 
and regions, worth a total of $63 million, had been established in 
the Qingdao Bonded Zone.  Up to the present, 132 million yuan has 
been invested in infrastructure in this 2.5-square-km area, and a 
total of 172,000 square meters of floor space is under construction. 
According to analysts, Qingdao Bonded Zone owes its popularity among 
foreign investors to the following three factors: more preferential 
policies than special economic zones and economic and technological 
development zones; superior infrastructure for foreign investment 
with advantages in port facilities, roads, electrical supply, ferry 
services, communications, and other commercial and trade facilities; 
and a small but capable management committee.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 0601 GMT 20 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jiangsu Township Enterprises Increase Production by 58 Percent -- 
Township and town enterprises in Jiangsu Province in 1993 produced a 
total output value of over 400 billion yuan, an increase of 58 
percent over the previous year.  They also paid 19.9 billion yuan of 
profits taxes, a 58.9 percent increase.  Township and town 
enterprises have also become a major force in Jiangsu's foreign 
trade.  In 1993, their exports totaled 56.3 billion yuan, a 57.7 
percent increase over the previous year.  Data also shows that 
township and town enterprises are gradually developing into larger 
enterprise groups.  Last year, 89 provincial-level enterprise groups 
comprised of township and town enterprises were set up.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0501 GMT 22 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Foreign Investment in Fujian in 1993 Exceeds Last 14 Years -- In 
1993, Fujian signed contracts involving foreign investment of $11.2 
billion, exceeding the total amount of foreign capital attracted in 
the last 14 years.  Last year, there were 4,495 foreign-funded 
enterprises, and the amount of foreign capital actually utilized by 
them was $2.5 billion.  Foreign-funded enterprises account for one- 
third of the province's gross industrial output value, and their 
exports account for more than half of the province's total exports. 
In 1993, foreign-invested projects in Fujian, such as infrastructure 
and housing developments, proceeded at a much faster rate than in 
previous years.  These projects utilized foreign capital of $2.8 
billion, 87 percent of the total amount of foreign capital used in 
the last 14 years.  (Fuzhou Fujian People's Radio Network 2300 GMT 
25 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan Corporation Invests in Tianjin -- Hwano Group, a Taiwan- 
based company, is investing in Tianjin, and its total investment 
will exceed $400 million, not including a redevelopment project in 
Tianjin's old city, under which the group will develop 8 million 
square meters of housing.  Hwano has purchased 550,000 square meters 
of land in the Tianjin Development Zone to build a $51-million 
international resort, which will include a golf course, 48 deluxe 
office buildings, a five-star hotel, swimming pools, restaurants, 
and clubs.  In addition, it will invest $200-300 million to build a 
ship-breaking yard in the harbor area.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1052 GMT 26 Jan 1994) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan Invests in Shanghai Industrial Zone -- Huang Mao-hsiong, 
chairman of the Hong Kong Taiwan Chamber of Commerce and president 
of the Chien Lien Investment Company, says that he will establish a 
joint-venture with Shanghai's Chongming Island Company, a real 
estate firm, to develop 30,000-50,000 mu of land in the middle of 
Chongming Island to build residential units, villas, and an 
industrial zone to attract Taiwanese business to invest on the 
island.  Initial development will involve 6,000 mu of land, and work 
will begin shortly after the spring festival.  Taiwan investments at 
present include ship-breaking and garments, but Huang said that 
several large auto parts firms in Taiwan were interested in shifting 
production to Chongming Island.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 
0318 GMT 30 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Austrian Government Funds Guangxi Water Project -- Guangxi's 
Beihai City will use a loan provided by the Austrian Government to 
build an urban water supply project.  The loan of 46 million 
Austrian Shillings is the first by a foreign government used to 
develop the city's infrastructure.  The Construction Bank of China 
is also providing a 40-million-yuan loan to support facilities for 
the project, which will allow the city to supply 450,000 cubic 
meters of water each day.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0647 GMT 31 
Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan:  Government Moves To Meet U.S. Tariff Demands -- Of the 
699 products on which tariff reduction is demanded by the United 
States, Taiwan has agreed to lower tariffs on over 150 agricultural 
and industrial products, 47 of which will have their tariffs lowered 
roughly 30 percent.  The tariffs on over 100 other items will be 
lowered once Taiwan has revised its tariff regulations.  While 
automobiles are excluded, wood, paper, and some metal products are 
among the 47 items scheduled for tariff reduction.  The other 100 
items on which tariffs will be reduced once Taiwan has revised its 
tariff regulations will include processed food, iron and steel 
products, and household electrical appliances.  The Republic of 
China will increase work on lowering tariffs to meet the U.S. demand 
as soon as possible.  (Taipei CHING-()aHI JIH-PAO 24 Jan p 2) 
Okinawa 
Bureau 

   National CEPD Takes Steps To Facilitate Financial Liberalization 
-- The Council for Economic Planning and Development (CEPD) has 
drawn up a 20-point list of measures to facilitate financial 
liberalization.  CEPD Chairman Hsiao Wan-chang said the move is 
aimed at easing restrictions on foreign banks in establishing 
branches and at accelerating financial liberalization in Taiwan. 
The relevant list includes steps to review the opening of long-term 
foreign exchange businesses, relaxing operating terms for foreign 
exchange brokers, and easing stipulations restricting foreign banks 
from transacting financial business with the PRC.  Hsiao Wan-chang 
pointed out the move would be in line with Taiwan's bid to rejoin 
GATT and with its plan to develop the island into an Asia-Pacific 
business operations center.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 22 Jan 94 p 
2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Singapore To Serve as Model for Financial Liberalization -- The 
CEPD and the Central Bank of China (CBC) have reached a consensus on 
modeling their financial liberalization plan on Singapore by 
establishing a protective system while liberalizing the financial 
control system in order to offset any undesirable impacts the 
liberalization plan may have on local economy and finance.  CEPD 
Chairman Hsiao Wan-chang said as soon as a financial liberalization 
committee is established, relevant personnel will be sent to 
Singapore to study and draw from its experiences in this connection. 
The governor of the CBC also stressed that though financial 
liberalization is inevitable, it should be carried out by gradually 
opening up the financial market and lifting controls on fund 
transfers, otherwise our interests may be jeopardized before we can 
reap its benefits.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO  22 Jan 94 p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   Investment in Mainland Expected To Continue -- Taiwan expects to 
continue its vast amount of mainland-bound capital investment in 
1994 particularly in the areas of inland sales and the service 
industry.  Taiwan also expects to further clarify its cross-Strait 
import processing and compensation situation.  Taiwan's capital 
invested in the mainland last year was estimated to be nearly US $30 
billion. 

   According to an outside study done on behest of Taiwan's 
financial departments, the majority of Taiwan businessmen investing 
on the mainland reports profits.  The study, concluded in 1993, 
indicated that of the 280 Taiwan businesses interviewed in 
Guangdong, Shanghai, and Fujian, 55 percent reported varying 
profits, and 59 percent of Taiwan business owners want to continue 
investment on the mainland.  The survey also indicated that a Taiwan 
entrepreneur would need 56 percent of capital from Taiwan, and 
another 25 percent from the mainland locality in order to set up an 
operation on the mainland.  He would return to Taiwan 52 percent of 
the profit he makes, and save 30 to 40 percent to reinvest on the 
mainland locally. 

   Taiwan has suggested to the mainland that China should attract 
foreign investment on the priority basis in the areas of public 
construction projects and state-owned enterprises under reform.  It 
indicated that in order to get maximum profit returns, Taiwan-funded 
enterprises on the mainland will most likely be in large-scale 
projects in communication, electricity, energy, and transportation. 
(Beijing JINGJI RIBAO 3 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Japanese Investment Decreased 35 Percent in 1993 -- A sharp 
appreciation of the Japanese yen last year did not lead to an 
increase in Japanese investment in Taiwan.  On the contrary, 
Japanese applications for investment or technological cooperation 
markedly declined when compared with previous years.  According to 
the Investment Commission, there were only 88 cases of Japanese 
investment in Taiwan in 1993, totaling $272.51 million, a decrease 
of 35 percent from 1992.  Only 84 Japanese firms entered into 
technological cooperation with Taiwanese counterparts last year, 
down 13 percent as compared with 1992.  Nevertheless, Japan still 
leads foreign nations in investment and technological transfers in 
Taiwan, mainly in electronics, chemicals, transportation, services, 
and base metal manufacturing industries.  An Investment Commission 
official pointed out the decline was largely because of Japan's 
economic recession.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 17 Jan 94 p 9) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   Investments in Southeast Asia Increase 40 Percent in 1993 -- 
Taiwan's foreign investments were concentrated in the United States 
and Southeast Asia in 1993.  Investments in Southeast Asian nations 
totaled $430 million, representing an increase of 40 percent over 
1992 and accounting for 26 percent of Taiwan's total outbound 
investments.  Singapore and Vietnam led that growth with a nearly 7 
percent increase over 1992.  The Investment Commission predicted 
Southeast Asia will continue to be the focal point for Taiwan 
investors.  (Taipei CHING-CHI  JIH-PAO 17 Jan 94 p (3) Okinawa 
Bureau 

   Investment in PRC Goes Mainly to South But Shift Noted -- 
According to statistics released by the Investment Commission, 
Taiwanese investment in the PRC was still concentrated in the 
southern regions in 1993, but there was a gradual shift towards the 
Yangtze River Valley.  Total investment for the period exceeded $1.1 
billion, which almost equaled the 1993 total of inbound investments. 
A breakdown of the figures shows Guangdong Province topped the list 
with 3,053 instances of Taiwan investment valued at $1.04 billion, 
followed by Jiangsu Province with 2,016 instances valued at $830 
million.  Fujian Province claimed third place with 1,528 investments 
totaling $470 million, and Hebei Province came in fourth with 622 
investments totaling $190 million.  As regards cities, Shanghai took 
the lead with 1,046 investments, while Shenzhen and Dongguan came in 
second and third with 743 and 664 investments respectively.  (Taipei 
CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 19 Jan 94 p 6) Okinawa Bureau 

   Kuomintang To Reduce Its Party-Run Investments From Vietnam -- 
Liu Tai-ying, chairman of the Kuomintang-run Business Management 
Committee, disclosed that the party has decided to gradually 
withdraw its business investments from Vietnam and reduce its stakes 
in the Central Trade Development Company--an investment vehicle for 
Kuomintang-run businesses in Vietnam--from the current 75 percent to 
about 20 percent.  An official of the party-run business said the 
party intends to transfer investments to Siberia, Japan, and 
Indonesia.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 19 Jan 94 p 3) Okinawa Bureau 

   New Guidelines on Investment in the PRC Take Effect 20 Jan -- The 
"Guidelines on Screening Applications for Investment and 
Technological Cooperation in the PRC," promulgated by the Ministry 
of Economic Affairs, took effect on 20 January.  Under the 
guidelines, investments in the PRC exceeding $1 million will have to 
be carried out by a subsidiary company from a third region, and the 
investment amount must not exceed 40 percent of the total paid-up 
capital of the company unless it has been resolved otherwise at a 
shareholders' general meeting.  Capital may include cash, machinery 
and equipment, accessories and parts, raw materials, and semi- 
finished products.  The guidelines also cover rules governing 
company listings on PRC stock exchanges and other relevant details. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 21 Jan 94 p 1) Okinawa Bureau 

   Export Orders in 1993 Increase 6.13 Percent; Hong Kong Up by 30 
Percent -- According to statistics released on 20 January by the 
Ministry of Economic Affairs, foreign export orders were valued at 
$85.8 billion in 1993, an increase of 6.13 percent over 1992. 
Orders from Hong Kong increased more than 30 percent, while those 
from Japan and Europe declined by 3.5 percent and 0.26 percent 
respectively.  In terms of industries, last year's top performers 
were information and electronic products, which showed a 7.43 
percent growth, followed by chemicals with a 3.48 percent growth. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 21 Jan 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Foreign Trade Up by 5.5 Percent in 1993 -- According to the 
Executive Yuan's director general of Budget, Accounting, and 
Statistics, Taiwan's foreign trade totaled $162 billion in 1993, 
with exports totaling $84.95 billion and imports $77.08 billion, 
ranking 14th in world trade. Compared with 1992, the island's total 
foreign trade volume rose only 5.5 percent, the lowest in the past 
three years.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 24 Jan 94 p 1) Okinawa 
Bureau 

   Economics Minister on Steps To Increase Accession to GATT -- On 
24 January Minister of Economics Chiang Ping-kun said the ROC will 
increase efforts to initiate tariff concession talks in connection 
with its bid to join the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade 
(GATT).  It will also review automobile tariff adjustments, and will 
consider changing the current commodity tax on petroleum and cement 
by introducing specific duty rates instead of applying ad valorem 
duties on these two items.  It will also abolish the commodity tax 
on domestic-made home electrical appliances, while intensifying 
efforts to avoid damage to domestic industries as a result of 
opening up the market.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 25 Jan 94 p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   NORTH KOREA:  Pyongyang Alcohol Plant Begins Soju Export -- The 
Pyongyang Alcohol Plant has begun exporting its products.  The 
plant's export of local specialties, including Pyongyang soju, has 
attracted "great interest."  To meet the increasing international 
demand, the plant reached its January export production goal ahead 
of schedule, on 20 January.  (Pyongyang Korean Central Broadcasting 
Network 1200 GMT 25 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  KOTRA Expanding, Increasing Support to 
ROK Exporters -- SUMMARY:  The Korea Trade Promotion Corporation 
(KOTRA) is expanding its global reach at the same time it undertakes 
more direct efforts to support South Korea's export industries, 
according to press reports and a KOTRA brochure.  While other 
government-supported agencies face tighter budgets, KOTRA, in 
keeping with the government's new export-oriented policies, will get 
new overseas branches in areas of increased ROK trade activity. 
Information on foreign markets and products obtained from KOTRA's 
far-flung automated data network reportedly is being shared with ROK 
policymakers. 

   KOTRA, which is described in an official brochure as "a non- 
profit government-run organization to promote the expansion of 
Korea's external trade," is embarking on three separate programs 
aimed at improving its support of South Korea's export industries, 
according to Seoul press reports.  One plan calls for providing 
"concentrated support" to 80-100 ROK small and medium businesses 
(SMB's) annually, for a total of 450 companies, between now and 
1998, the 30 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) reports.  Companies 
to be sought as beneficiaries include those with (1) fewer than 100 
employees, (2) producing specialized goods, (3) holding patents or 
advanced technology, and (4) start-up enterprises that are 
technology-intensive. 

   According to MKS, the plan calls for using KOTRA's overseas 
offices to conduct market surveys for the selected companies' 
products, sounding out the feasibility of breaking into overseas 
markets, "providing information on competing products," and forming 
connections with foreign importers.  KOTRA reportedly will work with 
the chosen ROK firms to improve the design and packaging of their 
products, while acting as their proxy by making and distributing 
product catalogs, locating and introducing overseas buyers, setting 
up exhibitions, and helping them  "send  market development groups" 
abroad.  The newspaper cites one KOTRA official to the effect that 
the new policy seeks to lessen the risks SMB's take in getting 
started with export sales, and to redress some of their 
"inadequacies" in personnel and experience. 

   Although the plan is reported by MKS as "new," most of the 
support activities the newspaper describes appear as standard policy 
in a 16-page brochure titled "KOTRA 1992," which outlines the 
organization's functions, goals, and activities.  What seems to be 
new in the plan is the decision to single out particular South 
Korean companies for support, as opposed to what appears, according 
to the language of the brochure, to have been a more generic 
approach.  MKS states that the decision to focus on selected 
companies was undertaken "in accordance with the  provisions  of the 
government's New Economic Policy." 

   A second program, reported in the 31 December MKS, involves what 
that newspaper calls a "major expansion" of KOTRA's overseas 
facilities.  Four new offices reportedly will open in Dalian, in one 
other location in the "interior" of China, in Tel Aviv, and in 
Vietnam, in keeping with the "sudden increase" in ROK trade and 
investment in these areas.  According to MKS, KOTRA's expansion of 
its overseas network is "closely connected" to its plan to increase 
support for South Korean SMB's that run up against "barriers" in 
exporting to foreign markets.  Although other ROK Government 
agencies are downsizing, the newspaper states, KOTRA will expand 
into new areas while maintaining its present representation in 
advanced countries "in consideration of their importance and the 
need for a balance between the network of branches in competing 
countries." 

   The "KOTRA 1992" brochure lists 76 overseas "trade centers," 
including 17 in Asia, three in Africa, 25 in Europe, 11 in Latin 
America, eight in the Middle East, nine in North America (two in 
Chicago, and one each in Dallas, Los Angeles, Miami, New York, and 
Washington D.C.), and three in Oceania.  Five more were "to be 
established," according to the brochure, in Ho Chi Minh City, 
Sendai, Shanghai, Vladivostok, and San Francisco for a total of 81, 
the same figure cited in the 22 December MKS.  The four "new" 
offices reported in the 31 December MKS are in addition to that 
number.  Some other changes may also be in the works: while the 
brochure distinguishes the Moscow, New York, Paris, and Tokyo 
offices from the others by accrediting them with resident KOTRA 
vice-presidents, the 22 December MKS reports plans to make Los 
Angeles and Singapore the second and third "core cities" of KOTRA's 
information network after Brussels, indicating a reorganization or 
two separate channels for administration and information. 

   KOTRA's plan to upgrade its gathering, storing, and disseminating 
of trade information constitutes the third major change reported in 
the Seoul press in recent weeks.  According to the 22 December MKS, 
KOTRA is linking all of its overseas trade offices into a 
computerized data system, backed by a database holding trade 
information by country, which offices can access by on-line 
computer.  This report is consistent with the brochure's description 
of a multi-user databank and other on-line LAN (local area network) 
and VAN (value-added network) services "being developed" for 
domestic and international use.  The brochure states, "KOTRA carries 
out comprehensive market research activities to keep abreast of 
rapid changes in global trade, monitoring and analyzing economic and 
business conditions in specific countries and regions throughout the 
world.  On the basis of such information compiled by KOTRA's 
extensive overseas network, trade and investment opportunities are 
disseminated and government-level policy responses are recommended." 

   FEATURE:  Press Reacts to U.S. Court Order Against Iljin -- 
SUMMARY:  A U.S. federal court's ruling against a South Korean 
industrial diamond manufacturer charged with commercial espionage 
has triggered complaints in the ROK press that the firm was 
victimized.  A Seoul business magazine argues that the company's 
informal efforts to acquire U.S. technology are a "universal 
practice," and that the suit was upheld to protect a U.S. monopoly. 
Although "shocked" by the ruling, press articles neither call for 
nor report any move to curtail such practices, but point instead to 
Japan's success in dealing with similar U.S. suits through its own 
legal procedures. 

   According to reports in several ROK newspapers, a U.S. federal 
appeals court on 5 January ordered the South Korean company Iljin to 
suspend its manufacture of industrial diamonds for seven years.  The 
ruling reportedly was issued in response to a suit filed by the U.S. 
firm General Electric (GE), charging that Iljin had illegally 
obtained proprietary technology through a former GE employee. 
Iljin's response to the court order was "We absolutely cannot accept 
the U.S. court's one-sided ruling in favor of GE's claim, which 
comes close to sophistry," the 9 January HANGUK ILBO reports, adding 
that Iljin plans to appeal the ruling. 

   According to HANGUK ILBO, Iljin claims it developed industrial 
diamond manufacturing technology jointly with the Korea Advanced 
Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST) over a three-year 
period, and that GE's suit was merely the "arrogance of a large 
company that wants to monopolize the diamond market."  The 9 January 
CHUNGANG ILBO likewise reports Iljin's assertion that the technology 
was developed in South Korea under contract with KAIST, and that the 
"technological advice" it got from the GE employee was obsolete. 
The Seoul business magazine CHUGAN MAEGYONG on 19 January argues 
similarly that Iljin's diamond technology was co-developed with 
KAIST.  According to the magazine, GE filed the charge "to get rid 
of its competition," and the U.S. court allegedly "ruled that the 
factory be closed so that the (United States) could maintain its 
world monopoly."  Neither the sources cited above nor a related 
YONHAP report filed on 11 January suggest that the ROK company was 
guilty of any wrongdoing. 
   On the contrary, CHUGAN MAEGYONG defends Iljin's efforts to 
acquire GE's technology as a "general practice common in 
international society."  By the  magazine's account, in May 1985 
Iljin and KAIST began a joint program to "indigenize" industrial 
diamonds with a 1.2 billion won ($1.5 million) investment.  South 
Korea at that time reportedly was entirely dependent on foreign 
sources for industrial diamonds, which KAIST considered "critical 
material" for a host of civilian and military applications.  With 
KAIST's support, Iljin allegedly developed its own manufacturing 
technology by 1987, and "on that basis" built a factory in 1989 to 
produce the diamonds.  While the factory was being built, the 
magazine states, Iljin signed a "technical contract" with Sung 
Chien-ming, a China-born industrial diamond specialist who had left 
GE in 1983 to work for Norton, a U.S. competitor in the same field. 
The magazine asserts that Iljin's contract with Sung "followed a 
general principle of civil society which regards technical 
consultations with retired technicians in a given industry as a 
universal practice carried out by all companies in modern industrial 
society." 

   According to CHUGAN MAEGYONG, GE's suit was just one of many 
actions the U.S. company took to preserve its "monopoly" in the 
high-profit industrial diamond market.  GE reportedly bought out all 
other U.S. industrial diamond makers, and prevented them from being 
manufactured in Germany and Japan.  When Iljin was ready to go into 
mass production, the magazine asserts, GE filed suit on the premise 
that production technology which "GE developed and commercialized in 
the 1950's" still belonged to the company, and that even a person 
who had worked for the company a decade ago "and carries the 
company's technology in his head" cannot use it elsewhere.  The 
magazine states that when GE filed suit, it "mobilized" high-ranking 
U.S. Government officials to "pressure" the ROK Government to close 
Iljin.  GE allegedly moved to block the sale of Iljin diamonds in 
domestic and foreign markets, and tried to obstruct Iljin's attempts 
to buy manufacturing equipment, the magazine asserts.  Iljin, a mid- 
size company with sales less than 1/200 that of GE, is said by the 
magazine to have lacked GE's influence, not just in the United 
States but in South Korea.  It could not compete against the 
multinational giant's patent "offensive," especially in a U.S. court 
where "national interests" were at stake. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG observes that previously in cases of alleged 
patent rights violations, the two parties would agree on restitution 
and the matter would end.  What has drawn interest in the present 
case from everyone "here and abroad," according to the magazine, is 
the precedent of a U.S. court ruling on a "civil case" in support of 
U.S. interests.  The order for Iljin to suspend production was thus 
a  severe shock" to ROK manufacturers.  Although the ruling has "no 
force" in South Korea, it does have "political significance."  There 
is also potential for "retaliatory measures from the country 
affected," which could set off an "unwanted trade war." 

   Assessing the immediate fallout, the magazine reports that 
Iljin's U.S. assets will likely be frozen, but that these are small 
and "the damage would not be as bad as expected."  However, the U.S. 
Government "will probably exert diplomatic pressure" and find other 
ways to "browbeat" South Korea, such as banning tools made with 
Iljin diamonds.  Since 30 percent of the ROK's industrial diamond 
needs are supplied by Iljin, suspending production would cause the 
ROK to suffer a loss of $1 million monthly in import savings.  The 
magazine suggests that both governments "positively encourage 
reconciliation between Iljin and GE" and work toward a "satisfactory 
compromise." 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG's four-page report neglects to bring out some 
facts raised in the litigation that show Iljin's position in a less 
favorable light.  Absent from the account is any mention that the 
former GE and Norton employee Sung (AKA Larry King) was paid more 
than $1 million a year from Iljin for handing over materials 
purloined from the two U.S. companies, according to one well- 
documented study (Peter Schweizer, Friendly Spies, The Atlantic 
Monthly Press, N.Y., 1993 pp 176-185).  Nor is there any reference 
in ROK press reports to the main body of evidence on which the case 
was decided, namely, some 14 file cabinets of GE and Norton 
documents seized in Sung's home. 

   ROK press reports, however, do note a difference between the 
Iljin case and Japan's efforts to informally acquire U.S. 
technology.  CHUNGANG ILBO opined that U.S. companies, mindful of 
the Japanese's negotiating abilities regarding intellectual property 
rights, "do not touch Japanese firms lest they be countersued." 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG cites a case where a Japanese court overturned a 
U.S. court's ruling against a Japanese firm charged with stealing 
trade secrets.  Not only is Japan more successful than South Korea 
in defending itself against commercial espionage charges, the 
magazine notes, it does so despite the fact that its motivation for 
obtaining U.S. technology is less urgent.  "If even a 
technologically advanced country like Japan hastens  to learn from 
U.S. technology, then what more can be said about South Korea?" 

   FEATURE:  ROK To Export Nuclear Equipment and Technology -- 
SUMMARY:  South Korea will become involved "full-scale" in the 
export of nuclear power equipment and technology to developing 
countries, according to Seoul press reports.  China and Southeast 
Asia in particular will be targeted because of the rising demand 
there for electrical power.  The ROK is also forming its own 
nuclear power regulatory center" reportedly to "conduct its own 
inspections" to further peaceful use of nuclear power. 

   The Korea Electric Power Corporation (KEPCO) is moving ahead 
full-scale with plans to export nuclear power equipment, the 17 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) reports.  The South Korean 
Government-run corporation recently signed a contract with a Chinese 
nuclear power utility in Guangdong Province for "technical support 
and equipment service."  According to MKS, KEPCO will send 26 
employees in 1994-95 to the PRC nuclear plant as part of a 
comprehensive deal that will involve comparing designs and exporting 
ROK technology and equipment to remodel the installation. 

   KEPCO reportedly has also decided to step up its exports of 
nuclear power equipment and technology to other developing 
countries.  Projects now under consideration include reopening the 
Bataan nuclear plant in the Philippines and constructing a nuclear 
power plant in Akkuyu, Turkey.  The newspaper quotes a KEPCO 
official to the effect that demand for electrical power in China and 
developing Southeast Asian countries has risen rapidly, and the 
corporation is organizing teams to explore how South Korea can tap 
into this market either directly or through international 
cooperation. 

   KEPCO's plans coincide with the ROK Ministry of Science and 
Technology's (MOST's) new export policy reportedly outlined in the 
ministry's annual report to the president.  As reported in the 12 
January MKS, the minister stated that South Korea will "export 
design, construction, and operating technology for research reactors 
and for nuclear power development to the Philippines and other 
Southeast Asian countries."  The paper reports MOST "has also 
decided to set up a new nuclear power regulatory center at the Korea 
Atomic Energy Research Institute to conduct its own inspections 
apart from (pyoldoro) the International Atomic Energy Association's 
(IAEA's) inspections."  The center reportedly is being built "to 
promote confidence and transparency for the peaceful use of nuclear 
power domestically and abroad." 

   FEATURE:  Firms Planning Major Drive into LCD Market -- SUMMARY: 
South Korea's large electronics firms are investing heavily in 
technology and equipment for liquid crystal displays in an effort to 
make the ROK number two in this field after Japan, according to 
press reports.  Hyundai is developing advanced products through its 
U.S. subsidiary, while Samsung benefits from a joint technology 
agreement with a Japanese firm.  Although patents friction has not 
yet developed, the ROK Government expects this to become an issue as 
the product line expands. 

   South Korean electronics companies are investing heavily in thin 
film transistor-liquid crystal displays (TFT-LCD's), with a goal of 
transforming this into the industry's second highest value-added 
product after semiconductors, according to the 5 January MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  The newspaper reports that the ROK's three 
major producers--Goldstar Electron, the Samsung Group, and Hyundai 
Electronics--began work on TFT-LCD's only three years ago, but have 
already commercialized a number of high-quality products at the 
super VGA (video graphic array) level.  New assembly lines are being 
built which reportedly will enable South Korea to compete with 
Japan, currently the market leader. 

   MKS reports that Goldstar has become the second company in the 
world to develop a high-resolution 12.3-inch LCD panel.  The company 
plans to invest 500 billion won ($625 million) in new assembly 
lines, which, when completed in May 1995, will annually produce 
500,000 units in sizes ranging from 3 to 12.3-inches.  Tokyo NIKKEI 
MICRODEVICES in November reported that $400 million of that 
investment will be for 10-inch panels.  Both MKS and NIKKEI state 
that Goldstar will spend an additional $250 million by 1997 to raise 
its annual production capacity to 1 million units.  Another 140 
billion won ($175 million) will be invested in R&amp;D to improve 
product quality "beyond that of its Japanese competitors," MKS says. 

   NIKKEI and MKS also report that Hyundai began developing 10.4- 
inch TFT-LCD color panels at its U.S. research subsidiary Image 
Quest Technology in 1992.  It has now finished preparations for 
trial runs at a pilot plant in the United States, and expects to 
begin production in South Korea by 1995, the sources state. 

   According to the 5 January MKS, Samsung is working on a 
"comprehensive plan" to expand its production of TFT-LCD's. 
Different subsidiaries will build different parts, toward a goal of 
completely indigenous" production.  MKS reports the group will 
invest 450 billion won ($562.5 million) in LCD's in 1994.  The 8 
November MKS had stated that Samsung Electron Devices, one of the 
group's subsidiaries, was investing 300 billion won ($375 million) 
to increase LCD producition from 1 million units annually at 
present, to 2 million units by 1994, and 5 million by 2000.  The 5 
January MKS notes that Samsung is already producing small quantities 
of TFT-LCD's on a pilot line for use in its own notebook PC's. 

   The 8 November MKS had reported Samsung Electron Devices would 
"set up a local research institute in Japan to secure LCD 
technology," and would go ahead with arrangements for LCD technology 
transfer from Japanese companies.  On 28 December, the same 
newspaper carried Samsung's 27 December announcement that it had 
formed a "strategic cooperative relationship" with Japan's Toshiba 
to jointly develop integrated circuits for LCD's.  MKS reports that 
Samsung will "merge" its own basic technology with Toshiba's 
production and reliability technology."  The two companies 
reportedly are to cooperate through all stages of development, from 
basic standards through final reliability checks to create a product 
that "stands at the forefront of world technology."  According to 
MKS, Samsung believes the arrangement will further its goal of 
expanding sales in the United States, Europe, and Japan, at the same 
time it helps overcome South Korea's relative "weakness" in non- 
memory semiconductors.  Reporting the same event, Tokyo DENPA on 28 
December noted that work is to begin in the summer of 1994 on chips 
with applications for TFT-LCD's and STN (super twisted nematic) 
LCD's, and that the two companies would also work on standardizing 
pin arrangements, which has been an industry bottleneck. 

   South Korea's move into LCD's is raising concern about the need 
to devise "countermeasures" in anticipation of a foreign "patents 
offensive," the 13 January MKS reports.  Although LCD-related patent 
disputes have not yet been raised, the newspaper expects that will 
change in 1996 when South Korean firms begin mass producing advanced 
devices.  According to the ROK Patents Administration, patents 
applications from foreign countries in this field numbered 862 from 
1976-92, with companies in Switzerland, England, and Germany already 
demanding royalties from South Korea for premium color LCD's, TFT- 
LCD's, and liquid crystal materials.  South Korean companies, for 
their part, have filed 1,350 LCD-related patent applications, but 
most of them have been for black-and-white equipment, which means 
the industry can expect some "hard blows," NKS predicts.  The 
newspaper quotes a Patents Administration official who urges South 
Korean firms to "sign licensing agreements beforehand for techology 
where there is concern over patent infringements to reduce the 
damage to domestic companies." 

   Commenting on South Korea's LCD efforts overall, the 1 December 
SILMUL KYONGJE, a publication of the Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET), notes that the ROK's 1992 LCD production 
amounted to $88 million or just 2 percent of the world market. 
Present investment plans, however, will cause the domestic LCD 
industry to grow on average 51 percent annually between 1994 and 
2001, by which time South Korea will have 14 percent of the world 
market and rank second only to Japan.  KIET estimates the level of 
ROK production technology for LCD's at 90 percent that of Japan, 
although design and basic technology is only about half.  South 
Korean companies have the technology to mass produce TN (twisted 
nematic) LCD's at 90 percent Japan's rate, STN LCD's at 40 percent, 
and TFT-LCD's at slightly less than 70 percent of Japan's rate, 
SILMUL KYONGJE reports. 

   KIET states it would prefer that the various South Korean LCD 
manufacturers "develop components jointly, or form a cooperative 
structure by setting up a joint corporation."  In 1992, domestic 
firms reportedly organized a manufacturer's association that has 
focused its research on displays, which, according to KIET, helped 
reduce "overlapping investment."  Competition between ROK firms, 
however, will continue in KIET's view to stand in the way of joint 
efforts.  NIKKEI MICRODEVICES noted similarly that Samsung's and 
Goldstar's plans to manufacture their own components for TFT panels 
is at odds with the ROK Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy's 
policy of apportioning parts and materials production to small and 
medium businesses.  NIKKEI likewise saw little hope such a 
cooperative policy could succeed. 

   Business Laws Restricts Foreign Investment -- Under current 
business laws, restrictions on 31 categories of businesses are 
impeding the flow of foreign investment.  The 31 categories cover 
businesses in the marine, oil, shipping, aircraft, and mining 
industries.  Among the enterprises presently affected by the 
restrictions are those engaged in deep sea fishing, oil refining, 
sea cargo transport, air cargo equipment leasing, and coal mining. 
In most instances, foreign investment in any venture is limited by 
law to less than 50 percent, and foreigners are not allowed to 
represent businesses in the shipping and airline industries. 
Foreigners must receive approval from the National Assembly if they 
want to own more than 50 percent of a marine or mining business.  An 
unnamed  government official recently stated that, since the 
government is actively promoting "globalization and liberalization," 
contradicting laws and regulations will have to be revised.  (Seoul 
CHUNGANG ILBO 5 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Machine Toolmakers Report Increase in Orders -- Machine 
toolmakers last year received orders totaling $655.5 million, up 
38.9 percent from the previous year, according to statistics 
released by the Trade, Industry, and Energy Ministry.  Domestic 
orders reached $619 million, up 44.1 percent from 1992, while orders 
from abroad amounted to $36.5 million, down 14 percent.  According 
to business sources, domestic machine tool orders this year will 
rise about 30 percent, but orders from abroad will be "lackluster" 
as competition with Japan and Taiwan heats up, given the fact that 
the United States has lifted export "self-regulations" that were 
imposed on Japan and Taiwan.  (Seoul YONHAP 0143 GMT 3 Feb 94) Seoul 
Bureau 

   Increase in Export of Automobile Spare Parts Reported -- 
According to the Korea Industrial Cooperative Association, export of 
automobile spare parts amounted to $640 million in 1993, which is an 
increase of 7 percent compared with 1992.  Export of automobile 
spare parts to North America accounted for 45.4 percent; Asia, 23.2 
percent; Europe, 13.4 percent; Central and South America, 6.1 
percent; the Middle East, 6 percent.  Hyundai and Daewoo exported 
spare parts worth $116.6 million and $69.21 million, respectively. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Jan 94 p 17) Seoul Bureau 

   Anam Electronics Projects Show Increase in Domestic Sales -- Anam 
Electronics Co. projects domestic sales of audio and video equipment 
this year at $312.5 million, up 19 percent from last year.  Exports 
are projected at $62.5 million, up 31.5 percent.  Anam said it has 
drawn up an "aggressive business strategy" to improve the management 
of its agencies and prepare for the opening of the electronics 
market.  Sales projections include $182.6 million for color 
televisions, up 17 percent; $106.3 million for audio equipment, up 
23 percent; and $23.8 million for video cassette recorders, up 26 
percent.  (Seoul YONHAP 0237 GMT 20 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Kyongin Promotes Globalization Strategy -- Kyongin Corporation, a 
medium-size dyestuff company, is promoting a global management 
strategy by establishing a production base in Indonesia and a sales 
headquarters in Thailand.  Kyongin is also setting up a new product 
development center in the ROK.  The corporation invested an 
additional $7 million to expand its Indonesian plant and acquired a 
local trading company in Thailand for sales in Southeast Asia. 
Kyongin's Inchon plant will concentrate on the development of new 
products.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Jan 94 p 13) Seoul Bureau 

   Dongyang Exports Steel to Asian Markets -- Last year, Dongyang 
Steel Pipe Co. shipped $10 million worth of steel pipe to China, 
Vietnam, Thailand, Hong Kong, and other Asian markets.  Korean 
steel-pipe makers have been manufacturing mainly small-caliber 
pipes, but Dongyang has shifted its production to large-caliber 
pipes and will continue to focus on large bores, with projected 
shipments worth $20 million in 1994.  (Seoul YONHAP 0224 GMT 24 Jan 
94) Seoul Bureau 

   Hanil Plans To Build Textile Plant in China -- Hanil Synthetic 
Fiber Co. has signed a contract with China to set up a textile plant 
in Shandong Province.  It will invest approximately $12 million in 
the plant's construction.  The plant will begin operation late this 
year and will produce 4,000 tons of spun silk annually.  Seventy 
percent of its output will be exported and the remaining 30 percent 
will be sold domestically.  Hanil plans to send 17 employees, 
including nine technicians, to China and will transfer its 
technology on plant operations to the new plant.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 27 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau 

   Samik Musical Instruments To Expand Indonesian Plant -- Samik 
Musical Instruments plans to promote its plant in Indonesia--the PT 
Samik Indonesia plant--as the largest production base of string 
instruments in the world.  Since October 1993, PT Samik Indonesia, 
which had been operating as a piano spare parts plant, has invested 
an additional $28 million to establish a large-scale facility to 
produce string instruments.  Late last year, the Indonesian plant 
produced 6,000 guitars a month for export.  It is planning to 
increase its production to 10,000 guitars a month by April and to 
20,000-25,000 guitars a month by next year.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 24 Jan 94 p 17) Seoul Bureau 

   Hyundai To Install Crude Oil, Gas Production Equipment in India 
-- Hyundai Heavy Industries has agreed to install ultra large-scale 
crude oil and gas production equipment worth $1 billion for an 
Indian state-owned  oil company.  An installation team left for 
India on 20 January.  The equipment will be installed by mid-May, 45 
km southwest of Bombay.  The equipment will allow daily production 
of 130,000 barrels of crude oil or 2.6 million cubic meters of gas. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau 

   Hansol Paper Company To Build Plant in Malaysia -- Hansol Paper 
Co. will build a 250,0O0-ton-a-year newsprint plant in Malaysia in a 
$200-million joint venture with Malaysia's Genting Sanyen Co. 
Hansol will be responsible for engineering, technical training, and 
inspection.  Construction will start in the latter part of the year, 
and the plant is scheduled to go into operation in early 1996. 
Hansol plans to supply 50 percent of the total output of the joint- 
venture plant to Korea and to Southeast Asian markets.  (Seoul 
YONHAP 0239 GMT 21 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Kia To Produce Car Equipment Jointly With Foreign Partners -- Kia 
Group has established a joint venture company with the German 
company Boshe to produce electric accessories equipment, including 
electronic control devices for automobiles.  Kia plans to invest up 
to $10 billion, with Boshe holding a 40-percent share in the 
project. 

   Kia Electronics also concluded a technological and capital 
cooperation agreement with Japan's Alpine Co. to develop audio 
equipment for cars. Alpine will own 7.5 percent of the project. 

   Kia Automobile and Kia Precision Equipment, each holding a 30- 
percent share, recently established the Korea AB System Company, 
with the U.S. ITT Company to develop safety devices, such as a 
device to prevent brakes from malfunctioning and a traction control 
system.  The new company has $6 million in capital.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Business Corporations Increasing U.S., Canadian Investment -- 
Several major business corporations are increasing their investment 
to pursue continuous market growth in the United States and Canada 
as the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) goes into effect. 
Taenong is building a cotton spinning plant with 30,000-50,000 
spindles in Louisiana, and Kabul is moving ahead with the 
construction of a modern spinning and dyeing plant in Alabama, 
investing $20-30 million.  Samsung Electronics is planning to invest 
$40 million for a television parts plant in Mexico, which will begin 
operation in 1997.  Hyundai Motor Co. is expanding its plant in 
Canada to increase its annual production facilities of the Elantra 
model to 100,000 cars by 1995.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 2 Feb 94 
p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Samsung To Build Oil Tankers for Greek Company -- Samsung Heavy 
Industries Co. has obtained an order from Henamaris Ship Management 
Co. of Greece to build two 148,000-ton oil tankers worth $120 
million.  Under the contract signed in Athens on 20 January, Samsung 
will deliver the tankers in 1996.  Tide contract contains an option 
under which Samsung will receive an order for another tanker. 
(Seoul YONHAP 0239 GMT 21 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Pungsan To Supply Copper Pipes to Saudi Arabia -- Pungsan Co. 
will supply 12,000 tons of white copper pipes and white copper 
plates to be used in a $197-million lake project in Saudi Arabia. 
Pungsan signed a $65-million supply contract with Korea Heavy 
Industries Co. which received the initial orders for the project. 
Shipment of the copper pipes will begin in April and last until 
October 1995.  (Seoul YONHAP 0143 GMT 3 Feb 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Hyundai Motors To Break Ground for Malaysian Plant -- Under an 
agreement signed on 27 November 1993, Hyundai Motors has  applied to 
the Bank of Korea for an initial investment of $8.6 million. 
Hyundai will break ground for its plant in Malaysia in March.  The 
plant will be completed in September 1995 and will have an annual 
production capacity of 10,000 cars.  Hyundai owns 30 percent of the 
joint venture which has a paid-in capital of $90 million.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 29 Jan 94 p 9) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Thai Firm To Build Dams, Roads, Port in 
Burma -- ONK Mining and Construction Co. plans to build two 
hydroelectric dams, roads, and a port in Burma at a cost of $700 
million.  Construction of the dams, expected to last six to eight 
years, will be at Nam Ruak and Nam Kok in the Shan State.  Annual 
output is estimated at 25 mw and 100 mw, respectively.  Burma will 
buy 10 percent of the electricity output and the rest will be sold 
to Thailand's Electricity Generating Authority. 

   ONK will also build a 350-km, $1.8-million road from Mong Yai to 
Kengtung in the Shan State.  Construction will take three to four 
years.  In addition, the company plans to build an $800-million 
commercial port at Thilawa, 65 km from Rangoon.  (Bangkok THE NATION 
24 Jan 94 p B1) Bangkok Bureau 

   INDONESIA:  New Incentives for Oil Exploration Announced -- 
Indonesia has announced new incentives for oil exploration in its 
eastern region, and in remote and high-risk areas.  The 1994 oil/gas 
incentive package will give investors a more favorable share of 
production, going from the previous 80:20 ratio to a 65:35 ratio. 
Indonesia hopes the new incentives will attract more investors and 
delay the need to import oil until at least 2010.  Without new 
discoveries, the government said, it may have to import oil around 
the year 2000. 

   Faisal Abda'oe, president of the  tate-owned oil company 
Pertamina, said incentives will be granted to oil contractors 
operating in East Indonesia--except for Seram Island (Maluku) and 
the Salawati and Bintulu (Irian Jaya) oil basins.  Incentives will 
also be awarded to oil prospectors in Sumatra's western offshore 
area, Java's southern offshore area, West Kalimantan, Central 
Kalimantan, and some basins of Sumatra, as well as in any offshore 
area that is over 200 meters deep.  (Jakarta SUARA PEMBARUAN 4 Jan 
94 p 4) 

   Transportation, Energy Budget for 1994-95 Reported -- The 
transportation and energy sectors have been designated priority 
items in President Suharto's $33-billion state budget for 1994-95. 
Most of the $2.6-billion transportation budget will go toward road 
construction, mainly outside Java, while rural electrification will 
receive the largest  portion of the $1.75 billion appropriated for 
energy.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 6 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Ministry Issues Jakarta Minimum Wage Decree -- The Manpower 
Ministry has issued a decree stating that effective 1 January, 
workers in Jakarta will receive a 26-percent minimum wage increase. 
The decree stipulates that workers on a monthly-wage system are to 
get a minimum of $56 per month, while the minimum hourly wage is set 
at $2.  Incentive pay, overtime pay, and allowances are not covered 
under these guidelines.  Jakarta Deputy Governor Museno said the 
city administrration will take "firm action" against companies or 
employers who violate the decree.  Museno noted that approximately 
20 percent of the 24,000 enterprises in Jakarta have been paying 
their workers less than the minimum wage.  (Jakarta SUARA KARYA 3 
Jan 94 p 5) 

   MALAYSIA:  Second National Car To Be Introduced in 1994 -- 
Malaysia's second automobile company Perodua, a joint venture with 
Japan's Daihatsu Motor Company Ltd., plans to roll out 20,000 
"Kancil" cars in 1994, its first year of operation.  Perodua's 
Managing Director Ho Tet Kheong said that the cars, aimed at the 
growing middle class and increasingly affluent workers, will be 
built at a new plant 18 miles north of Kuala Lumpur.  Ho added that 
the plant has the capacity to eventually manufacture 45,000 cars 
annually.  Perodua plans to produce a basic model  and a deluxe 
model, priced between $8,800 and $10,000.  The company has no 
immediate plans to export its cars, but may do so in the future. 
(Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 28 Dec 93 p 10) 

   Joint Venture Company To Establish Third LNG Plant -- A recent 
gas discovery off the Sarawak coast by Occidental Petroleum 
Corporation will pave the way for the establishment of a third 
liquefied natural gas (LNG) plant, according to Tan Sri Azizan 
Zainul Abidin, president and chief executive of Malaysia's state- 
owned oil company Petronas.  Occidental made its fifth major gas 
discovery in Block SK-8, bringing the estimated combined discoveries 
in the area to more than 6 trillion cubic feet.  Although details of 
the project remain to be worked out, Azizan said that Petronas is 
expected to have 70 percent in equity in the joint venture, while 
Occidental Petroleum and Nippon Oil if Japan will share the 
remainder.  (Kuala Lumpur WATAN 4 Jan 94 p 13) 

   Small, Medium-Size Industries To Acquire Russian Technology -- 
Anuar Mohd Nor, executive officer of the Malaysian Institute for the 
Advancement of Technology, recently stated that the institute will 
serve as an intermediary for small and medium-size industries to 
acquire Russian technology.  Anuar said that Malaysia can make use 
of Russian technology in its ship repair, rubber, and chemical 
industries.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 3 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Company Receives Orders for Amphibious Aircraft -- Dornier 
Seastar Malaysia has recently received orders from Equalstar Company 
and International Business Consultants (IBC) for five amphibious 
aircraft.  Equalstar will use three of the aircraft for its 
operations in the Pacific Islands and Papua New Guinea, while IBC 
will use the other two in Indonesia.  To date, Dornier has received 
orders for 25 aircraft from nine parties.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS 
TIMES 22 Jan 94 p 4) Bangkok Bureau 

   LAOS:  Germany To Give Aid for Telecommunications, Agriculture 
Projects -- Germany will provide $14.7 million in assistance to Laos 
for a telecommunications project, a public works project, and 
agricultural promotion.  The projects are expected to be carried out 
over a two-year period.  (Vientiane Vitthayou Hengsat Radio Network 
1200 GMT 23 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 
   PHILIPPINES:  Customs Computerizes Procedures at Ports, Airport 
-- The Philippines' customs authorities have begun computerizing 
cargo clearance procedures at Manila, Batangas, Cebu, and Mactan 
Ports, and Manila International Airport.  The project, funded by a 
$27.4-million World Bank loan, will be completed at the end of the 
year.  An electronic mail system linking port authorities, and 
domestic and foreign shipping companies are already in operation. 
According to the customs commissioner, the computerized system will 
standardize procedures, curb pilferage, and reduce processing time 
from two days to two minutes.  (Manila BALITA 4 Jan 94 p 2) 

   BOI Says 1993 Investments Below Target -- The Board of 
Investments (BOI) reports that 1993 investments totaled $3.8 
billion, falling $200 million short of the $4-billion target.  Local 
investments surpassed foreign investments, with the largest projects 
concentrated in the construction industry.  Japan remained the top 
investor, followed by the United States, the Netherlands, South 
Korea, Singapore, and Germany.  (Manila PHILIPPINE DAILY INOUIRER 20 
Jan 94 p 15) Bangkok Bureau 

   Petrochemical Project Approved -- The Board of Investments has 
approved the $357-million petrochemical project proposed by JG 
Summit Holdings Inc.  The venture will produce both polypropylene 
and polyethylene resin at an annual capacity of 300.000 metric tons. 
(Manila PHILIPPINE DAILY INQUIRER 22 Jan 94 p 17) Bangkok Bureau 

   Phone Pact With France Signed -- The Philippine Government has 
signed a $12.8-million, 16-month contract with France to install 82 
public-phone offices in Southern Leyte, Western Samar, Albay, 
Camarines Norte, Sorsogon, and Biliran.  The project will be 
financed with a $10.6-million loan from France, and the Philippines 
will provide the remaining $2.2 million.  (Quezon City MALAYA 22 Jan 
94 p 11) Bangkok Bureau 

   SINGAPORE:  LPG Storage Terminal Established in PRC -- Singapore- 
based oil trading firm Vitol Asia, Hong Kong-based Fortune Oil, and 
Guangdong Province's Zhanjiang Gas Works Development Company have 
built a $13-million storage terminal for liquefied petroleum gas 
(LPG) in Guangdong.  The terminal will be used to store and 
distribute LPG on Hainan Island, in the Zhanjiang economic zone, 
Guangxi Province, and Western Guangdong Province.  Vitol has a 22.5- 
percent share in the project, while Fortune and Zhanjiang Gas Works 
have 27.5 percent and 50 percent, respectively.  (Singapore BUSINESS 
TIMES 28 Jan 94 p 5) Bangkok Bureau 

   THAILAND:  Government Reports Rise in Deficit -- The Thai 
Government has reported a $1.1-billion deficit in the first quarter 
of the 1993-94 fiscal year, a 50-percent increase over the same 
period in the previous year.  Bank of Thailand spokesman Phisit Li- 
atham attributed the higher deficit to increased expenditure and 
investment budgets.  He also pointed out that revenue collection had 
registered a 14.9-increase.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 22 Jan p 22) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Plan To Build Power Plant in Rayong Announced -- The Thai energy 
group Ban-Pu Coal has announced it will build an $800-million, 
large-scale power plant in Rayong, fueled by imported coal.  The 
plant will have a generating capacity of 1,000 mw.  (Bangkok BANGKOK 
POST 25 Jan 94 p B24) Bangkok Bureau 

   Firm Signs Telecommunications Agreement With Laos -- Chinnawat 
Inter Co. Chairman Phaibun Limpaphayom announced recently that the 
company has signed an agreement with Laos to establish a $60-million 
company named Lao Chinnawat Telecom to operate telecommunications 
services in Laos.  Chinnawat will have 70 percent in equity in the 
company, and Laos 30 percent.  The company will have a 15-year 
concession to operate telecommunications services, including 
cellular mobile phones, and to expand domestic and international 
phone services.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 28 Jan 94 p 21) Bangkok 
Bureau 

   Bank Reviews Trade Volume With Indochina -- The Thai Farmers Bank 
recently reported that trade volume between Thailand and the 
Indochinese countries during January to September 1993 totaled $520 
million, a 60-percent increase over the same period in 1992. 
Thailand exported $320 million worth of goods to Laos, Vietnam, and 
Cambodia, and registered a trade surplus of $112 million from 
Indochina.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 31 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Increase in Investment Applications in 1993 Reported -- The Board 
of Investments (BOI) recently reported a threefold increase in 
investment applications in 1993.  Most of the applications involve 
infrastructural projects, and agro-industry and farm products. 
Nearly 70 percent of the applications called for investment outlays 
in the $1-$20 million range, twice the percentage of the previous 
year.  Thirty-four applications required more than $40 million in 
investment, among which were a steel project submitted by NTS Steel 
Group, a pulp project submitted by Advance Agro Co., and a satellite 
service project proposed by Chinnawat Group. 

   Although investment capital dropped by 24.6 percent from the 
previous year, the BOI said that if projects involving $400 million 
or more were excluded from last year's calculations, foreign capital 
would register a 93-percent increase.  Japan remained the leading 
foreign investor in terms of size and number of projects, followed 
by the United States and Taiwan.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 29 Jan 94 p 
22) Bangkok Bureau 

   Increase in Car, Parts Exports Noted -- Suraphong 
Phaisitphathanaphong, spokesman for the Federation of Thai 
Industries' Automobile Industry Club, recently said that automobile 
and parts exports doubled in 1993 compared with the previous year. 
Car exports rose by 5,141 units to 10,049 units, a 104.7-percent 
increase, while exports of car parts, including engines, were worth 
$28 million.  The total export value of cars and parts was $125 
million, a 142.6-percent increase.    (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 28 Jan 
94 p 30) Bangkok Bureau 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investment Lagging in Central Vietnam -- 
SUMMARY:  Recent statistics show that investment in Central Vietnam 
is lagging.  According to two economic publications, the current 
situation is caused by a lack of policy, state support, local 
expertise, and proper planning. 

   According to the 2-8 December Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE 
SAIGON (TBKTS), to date Central Vietnam has obtained only 53 
investment projects capitalized $249 million, out of 730 projects 
nationwide, capitalized at $6.5 billion.  The 21-27 October Hanoi 
THUONG MAI (TM) reports that nine licenses have been revoked, 
leaving a total of 45 licensed projects for the central region.  The 
magazine notes that only a few projects are operating, most at the 
preliminary stage. 

   Both publications assert that although Central Vietnam has a 
wealth of natural resources--including oil, gas deposits, various 
mineral ores, and marine products--its people are living in poverty. 
TBKTS states that there has been little change in the region since 
the promulgation of the Foreign Investment Law.  It also says that 
foreign revenue is still scarce, with most of it coming from foreign 
aid and "scavenging" activities, such as picking up wartime scrap 
metal, or collecting sand and gravel.  The 1993 Autumn Trade Fair in 
Da Nang showed evidence of stagnant local industries, with "backward 
plants" producing low-quality goods, the magazine remarks. 
TM notes that the State does not yet have an adequate policy for 
investment in Central Vietnam and has not encouraged domestic 
investment. 

   TBKTS quotes Dong Van Tien, the director of the regional Chamber 
of Commerce and Industry, listing the following characteristics 
regarding investment in Central Vietnam: "chaotic investment" 
without proper planning; a desire to work only with foreign 
partners; and a lack of up-to-date information, resulting in the 
purchase of "obsolete machinery" at "inflated prices." 

   According to TBKTSG, many businessmen feel that Central Vietnam 
has been slow to attract foreign investment because of its "weak" 
infrastructure, "poorly prepared" projects, lack of expertise among 
local cadres, and unstandardized regulations.  The lack of qualified 
personnel is the "most important factor," according to TBKTS.  This 
includes those who draw up projects, investment partners, managers, 
and local administrators.  In many provinces in the central region, 
there is not a single foreign trade cadre, TBKTS notes, adding that 
education cadres and office workers with no foreign language skills 
have been appointed to leadership positions in the investment field. 

   Nguyen Van Viet, a specialist who reviews draft projects for the 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI), is quoted by 
TBKTS as saying that there is "a world of difference" between the 
Foreign Investment Law's original intent and its actual 
implementation in many localities.  TM points out that more support 
from the State and more cooperation from domestic and foreign 
investors are needed to help develop Central Vietnam.  TBKTS notes 
that there is a great need to train cadres in foreign investment and 
trade, and to retrain government workers in the administrative, tax, 
and other services.  The magazine also calls for the  State to come 
up with a policy promoting developmeddt of the region. 

   Manufacturers Reluctant To Invest in Equipment, Facilities -- 
While smuggled consumer goods flood the market and imports compete 
with goods manufactured domestically, Vietnamese manufacturers are 
reluctant to invest in new equipment in order to boost quality and 
cut costs. 

   The Dien Quang Lighting Company had taken a $1.6-million loan to 
install a new production line in order to increase its manufacturing 
capacity.  Subsequently, the company's sales stalled because 
imported fluorescent tubes flooded the market following a 
government-mandated cut in import duties.  The director of Dien 
Quang claims that enterprises are reluctant to invest in production 
facilities because government policies do not encourage such 
investments. 

   Private firms in Tan Binh and Phu Binh in Ho Chi Minh City, which 
invested millions in high-pressure textile dyeing equipment from 
Taiwan, currently face losses because of a flood of textile imports. 
Many poly- bag makers are also suffering "heavy losses" because 
competition has cut sale prices to or below cost.  Some firms are 
trying to sell their equipment at half price.  Others have refused 
to buy new equipment under a favorable repayment plan. 

   Domestic plastics firms are also not investing because they are 
facing stiff competition from price-cutting foreign firms and do not 
want to take more risks.  (Ho Chi Minh City TUOI TRE 11 Nov 93 p 3) 

   'Record Turnover' for Hanoi's Industrial Sector Reported -- In 
1993, Hanoi's local industrial sector achieved a "record turnover" 
of $16 million, a 40-percent increase over the previous year.  The 
increase is attributed to a boom in production and export 
activities.  Exports accounted for nearly 44 percent of the 
turnover.  Consumer goods made up a large part of the total 
production.  The city's industrial siector remitted $2.8 million to 
the State, a 42.3-percent increase oNjer the previous year.  (Hanoi 
VNA 0604 GMT 25 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Light Industry Export Figures for 1993 Reported -- In 1993, the 
light industry sector registered a total export value of $350 
million, of which textile and garment products exported to EU 
countries accounted for nearly $300 million.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 1100 GMT 25 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Contract Signed With Hong Kong To Build Commercial Center -- The 
Ben Thanh Tourist Service of Ho Chi Minh City and the Hong Kong- 
based New Vietnam Development and Investment Company have signed a 
joint-venture contract to build a commercial center at a cost of $45 
million.  The project, the biggest of its kind in Vietnam, will be 
located in Ho Chi Minh City's 1st District.  (Hanoi VNA 1337 GMT 22 
Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Increase in 1993 Agricultural Output Reported -- Agricultural 
output in 1993 totaled nearly $64 million, or 14 percent more than 
the previous year.  Food processing alone achieved $53.2 million, 
surpassing the yearly plan by 10 percent.  The total agricultural 
export-import value was $351.8 million--$235.7 million for exports 
and $116.1 million for imports.  (Hanoi VNA 1425 GMT 23 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Joint Venture Producing Phone Cables -- Vina-Daesung, a $4- 
million venture between the Vietnam Post and Telecommunications 
Company and South Korea's Daesung Electric Wire Ltd. is in 
operation, producing telephone cables of high standard for domestic 
and foreign consumption.  The Vietnamese company's share in the 
venture is 44.2 percent.  (Hanoi VNA 0624 GMT 29 Jan 94) Bangkok 
Bureau 

   Hanoi Nonstate Economic Sector Registers Increase in 1993 -- For 
1993, the Hanoi nonstate economic sector earned $38.1 million, up 80 
percent over the previous year, according to statistics released by 
the Hanoi Commerce and Industry Service.  (Hanoi VNA 0647 30 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Saigon, Haiphong Ports Improve Handling Capacity -- In 1993, 
Saigon Port and Haiphong Port modernized their facilities, using 
foreign loans totaling $76 million.  Both ports hope to triple their 
handling capacity by the year 2000.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1430 
GMT 1 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

EAG/9FEB94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/jf 10/0546Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24654 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000007994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT IS 
BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT 
COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS) 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-018--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN:  REALIZING GREAT POTENTIAL IN FUEL CELL TECHNOLOGY </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     Japanese Government is supporting the development of fuel 
cell technology in its search for breakthroughs in clean technology. 
The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) has budgeted 
approximately 57 billion yen ($520 million) for its 17-year fuel 
cell development project.  In 1993 the government organized a new 
national R&amp;D project, in coordination with the private sector, with 

the aim of becoming the world's leader in fuel cell technology. 

   Fuel Cell Technology 

   MITI has been promoting the development and use of fuel cell 
technology as a part of its R&amp;D project on advanced utilization of 
fossil fuels under its "New Sunshine Program. "  Fuel cell power 
generation is a highly efficient, yet environmentally friendly 
technology that generates very little pollutants, such as C02, SOx 
and NOx emissions, and creates little noise and no hot waste water. 

   Fuel cells generate power by converting fuel energy directly into 
electricity through chemical reaction.  Natural gas, methanol, and 
coal-derived gas are used as fuels.  The advantage of fuel cell 
power generation is that the technology is adaptable from small- 
scale dispersed systems to large-scale centralized power stations, 
with high energy efficiency as much as 40 to 60 percent.  If exhaust 
heat is added, the total energy efficiency can reach 80 percent. 

   According to the kind of electrolyte used, fuel cells are 
categorized into five types:  Phosphoric Acid Fuel Cell (PAFC), 
Molten Carbonate Fuel Cell (MCFC), Solid Oxide Fuel Cell (SOFC), 
Polymer Electrolyte Fuel Cell (PEFC), and Alkaline Fuel Cell (AFC). 
(SHIKEN KENKYUJO KENKYU KEIKAKU 1993) 

   New Sunshine Program 

   In order to promote comprehensive research and development in 
both the energy and environmental fields, in fiscal year (FY) 1993 
MITI initiated a new plan called the "New Sunshine Program," 
unifying three previously established projects--the Sunshine Project 
(new energy technology R&amp;D: established 1974), the Moonlight Project 

(energy efficiency technology development: established 1978), and 
the Global Environmental Technology Research and Development System 
(established 1989). 

   MITI has budgeted approximately 57 billion yen ($520 million) for 
fuel cell projects for a 17-year period from FY81 to FY97 (MITI 
HANDBOOK 1990 AND 1992).  The approximate budget allocation is as 
follows: 

                          Budget for Fuel Cell Projects 

                                 FY90       FY91     FY92      FY93 

(Unit: million yen)             3,180     3,738     4,332    5,039 
(Unit: million dollars)            29        34        39       46 

   (Budget increase between FY90 and FY93 is approximately 58 
percent.) 



   The total budget for the New Sunshine Program for FY92 was 
approximately 38 billion yen ($350 million) and was increased to 41 
billion yen ($373 million) for FY93.  MITI allocated approximately 
11 percent of the total budget for the fuel cell projects for FY92 
and 12 percent for FY93 (SHIKEN KENKYUJO KENKYU KEIKAKU 1993). 

   Fuel Cell Projects Under the New Sunshine Program 

   This systematic national R&amp;D project for fuel cell technology was 

started in 1981, sponsored by MITI's Agency of Industrial Science 
and Technology (AIST).  MITI's Agency of National Resources and 
Energy (ANRE) also started sponsoring a new field-test project, as 
well as a project for promoting fuel cell systems beginning in 1991. 
The New Energy and Industrial Technology Development Organization 
(NEDO), a quasi-government organization under ANRE, was founded in 
1980 to promote national R&amp;D projects on oil-alternative energy 
technologies and has been the primary agency overseeing the project 
since FY84 (JAPAN 21ST Nov 93, AIST 1993). 

   Over 50 on-site PAFC power generation units are currently being 
operated for evaluation and demonstration at a number of utility 
testing facilities and customer buildings of major electric and gas 
companies in Japan.  Some of these efforts are subsidized by MITI, 
with NEDO funding one third of the installation cost.  Two projects 
were initiated in 1991 and 1992, targeting early market entry of 
PAFC.  One of the projects is a private field test program 
subsidized by NEDO.  The other project involves the development of 
two large-scale PAFC power plants--a 5-MW PAFC power plant for urban 
energy center application, which is under construction at Kansai 
Electric Power Company's Amagasaki Technoland (operation scheduled 
in FY94), and a 1-MW on-site PAFC co-generation plant, which is 
under construction at Tokyo Gas Company's Research Institute 
(operation scheduled in FY95).  A PAFC technology research 
association, established in 1991 by 14 electric and gas utility 
companies, is promoting development and demonstration tests of these 
power plants (JAPAN 21ST Nov 1993, NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 

   Toward a "Comprehensive Policy Package" 

   The Advisory Committee for Energy was established in 1965 under 
the supervision of ANRE.  Its function is to review and evaluate, at 
MITI's request, critical issues regarding long-term comprehensive 
measures to be taken to stabilize and rationalize energy supply. 
The committee can submit its "views" to the minister on critical 
issues.  The Alternative Energy Subcommittee of the Advisory 
Committee for Energy consists of officials from quasi-government 
organizations, officers of Japanese companies, journalists, and 
national university professors.  A mid-term report entitled 
"Promoting New Energy Toward the Year 2000" was prepared by the 
Alternative Energy Subcommittee and appeared in MITI's information 
bulletin (TSUSANSHO KOHO 16 Dec 93).  In the report, the 
subcommittee suggested the construction of a "comprehensive policy 
package" including establishment of infrastructure for new energy 
dissemination in view of regulations. 

   Members of the Alternative Energy Subcommittee: 

   Chairman 

   Noboru Makino, director and senior adviser, Mitsubishi Research 
Institute 

   Members from organizations under the supervision of MITI 

   Hisao Oka, managing director, NEDO 
   Takao Tominaga, vice chairman, Japan Automobile Manufacturers 
Association (JAMA) 
   Koshiro Goda, managing director, the Japan Gas Association 
   Seiichi Takayanagi, chairman, Energy System Policy Committee, the 
Japan Electrical Manufacturers' Association (JEMA) 
   Riichi Hashimoto, chairman, New Energy Foundation (NEF) 
   Tadashi Yorita, chairman, Central Research Institute of Electric 
Power Industry (CRIEPI) 
   Hideaki Ikuta, managing director, The Institute of Energy 
Economics, Japan (IEE) 

   Other Members 

   Teiichi Yamamoto, director, Japan Development Bank 
   Haruki Asakawa, managing director, Central Electric Power Council 
   Ikuyo Takase, vice chairman, Japan Coal Association 
   Jiro Yamamoto, chairman, Technology Committee, Petroleum 
Association of Japan 
   Kazuo Inamori, chairman, Kyocera Corporation 
   Yoichi Kaya, professor, Dept. of Technology, The University of 
Tokyo 
   Toshio Ojima, professor, Waseda University 
   Takanobu Fujita, commentator, NHK 
   Katsuhiko Suetsugu, editorial writer, the Nihon Keizai Shimbun 
   Chikamori Kawagishi, editorial writer, the Yomiuri Shimbun 
   Noriko Kimoto, commentator 

   Government Incentives for Technological Development in the 
Private Sector 

   In order to encourage R&amp;D by the private sector, tax incentives 
are offered for technological development and the Japan Development 
Bank (JDB) provides financing for the development of industrial 
technology.  JDB was established in 1951 as a public financial 
institution whose mandate was to provide funds to private industry 
that would support government policies and initiatives. 

   Effective until 31 March 1995, deductions can be taken from 
corporate (or income) tax of an amount equal to 20 percent of the 
excess of current qualified R&amp;D expenditure over the highest amount 

of the previous R&amp;D expenditure as well as seven percent of the 
acquisition price of facilities for conducting R&amp;D in fundamental 
technologies.  Six percent of the qualified expenditure for 
collaborative research with national laboratories is tax deductible. 

   Conditional loans are also available for development of applied 
energy technologies to assist private companies in the development 
of energy source alternatives to oil, methods of energy 
conservation, and electric power generation technologies.  MITI 
budgets approximately 1.5 billion yen ($14 million) for development 
of applied oil-substitute technologies, 1.3 billion yen ($12 
million) for development of applied technologies relating to 
rational energy use, and 472 million yen ($4.2 million) for 
development of applied new power generating technologies for FY93 
(AIST 1993). 

   Development Targets and R&amp;D Schedule of the New Sunshine Program 


   The status of R&amp;D for each fuel cell type is described below. 
See also Attachment 1. 

   Alkaline Fuel Cells 

   R&amp;D for fundamental technology started in 1981.  The 1-kW-class 
cell stack was developed, tested, and evaluated.  R&amp;D was 
successfully concluded in 1984, with prospects for practical 
applications (SHIKEN KENKYUJO KENKYU KEIKAKU 1993). 

   Phosphoric Acid Fuel Cells 

   The development of PAFC has progressed the farthest among all 
types of fuel cells.  Between 1981 and 1984, fundamental technology 
R&amp;D for 1000-kW-class, low-temperature, low-pressure power plants 
and high-temperature, high-pressure power plants was conducted.  A 
low-temperature, low-pressure power plant was built at Kansai 
Electric Power Company's Sakai Minato Station and a high- 
temperature, high-pressure power plant was built at Chubu Electric 
Power's Chita No. 2 Station in 1985 (SHIKEN KENKYUJO KENKYU KEIKAKU 
1993). 

   Development of PAFC has already achieved an overall energy 
efficiency of 80.2 percent and cumulative power generating time of 
13,038 hours, in the case of the 200-kW-class combination module of 
thermal and electric power installed at the Osaka Plaza Hotel; and 
power generating efficiency of 39.7 percent with the cumulative 
operating time of 8,449 hours, in the case of the 200-kW-class power 
generating type installed on Tokashiki Island in Okinawa (SHIKEN 
KENKYUJO KENKYU KEIKAKU 1993, NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93). 

   The LP Gas Promotion Center has jointly developed, with Fuji 
Electric Co., a 100-kW PAFC prototype plant using butane as fuel. 
Power generation efficiency is expected to be about 40 percent. 
Since butane is about 10 percent cheaper than propane and propane 
can also be used for the fuel cells designed for butane, the plant 
should be highly marketable, especially for industrial applications 
(See FBIS PERSPECTIVES Vol. 9, No. 1, 31 Jan 94). 

   Molten Carbonate Fuel Cells 

   MCFC technology is at the center of the fuel cell development 
project, since the cells serve as an alternative energy source to 
thermal power and use gasified coal as fuel.  In FY94 NEDO is 
scheduled to inaugurate development of an MCFC-applied 1,000-kW 
power plant (KAGAKU K0GYO NIPP0 9 Sep 93). 

   Fundamental technology R&amp;D started in 1981.  NEDO has recently 
achieved the world record with its generation of 129 kW.  It used 
102 external-reformer-type, large-capacity cells, each with an 
electrode area of 1 square meter (See FBIS PERSPECTIVES Vol. 8, No. 
11, 30 Nov 93).  NEDO has also succeeded in continuous MCFC 
operation for 10,190 hours, with a voltage drop of 0.5 percent per 
1,000 hours, using a 5-kW internal-reformer type cell.  This 
achievement attained 33 kW with an electrode area of 0.5 square 
meters (NIKKAN K0GYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93).  However, experts say fuel 
cells will have to operate continuously for a minimum of 40,000 
hours before they can be used commercially (THE NIKKEI WEEKLY 2 Aug 
93). 

   MITI's AIST and the MCFC Power Generation System Technology 
Consortium have achieved their primary objective of putting MCFCs to 
practical use.  The consortium was formed under the supervision of 
AIST as part of the New Sunshine Program for the development of new 
energy with participation of equipment manufacturers and utility 
companies (See Attachment 2).  The performance test at the 100-kW 
plant at the Central Research Institute of Electric Power Industry's 
Akagi Experimental Center achieved 0.8 volts per 1 square centimeter 
of electrode at 150 milliampere of current for 1,000 hours of 
operation.  Electric output after 1,000 hours of operation dropped 
only by a little over 1 percent.  When the consortium builds the 
world's first 1,O00-kW experimental plant the electricity is 
expected to cost 14-15 yen (about 13 cents) per kilowatt, the power 
generation efficiency will reach 54 percent, and overall energy 
efficiency will reach 76 percent.  These figures indicate that the 
plant should be commercially viable (See FBIS PERSPECTIVES Vol. 9, 
No. 1, 31 Jan 94). 

   Solid Oxide Fuel Cells 

   R&amp;D for fundamental SOFC technology started in 1981 and several 
10-kW-class cell modules were successfully developed in 1991. 

   Chubu Electric Power Co. and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries have 
succeeded in generating power continuously for 7,000 hours, using 
two stacks of 7.5 cm x 7.5 cm advanced SOFCs, a world record.  Each 
cell has a projected electrode area of 25 square centimeters, 
indicating 0.5 watts of output density, three times more than that 
of the conventional SOFC.  Toho Gas Co. has set the world record for 
output density by achieving 1.61 watts per square centimeter for a 
single cell which was test-produced for a flat-plate SOFC (See FBIS 
PERSPECTIVES Vol. 9, No. 1, 31 Jan 94). 

   Polymer Electrolyte Fuel Cells 

   Fundamental PEFC technology R&amp;D started in 1992.  A 200-watt cell 

is being developed by layering cells with an electrode area of 100 
square centimeters (NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 Sep 93).  NEDO aims to 
develop 1-kW module and AIST targets to develop prototype 1-kW cell 
based on research at its Osaka Govern- ment Industrial Research 
Institute (See FBIS FOREIGN PRESS NOTE FB PN 93-169 19 Apr 93). 

   R&amp;D Programs of National Laboratories 

   The following is the list of national laboratories currently 
conducting R&amp;D activities for fuel cell technology under the New 
Sunshine Program and the budgets for specific projects for FY92 and 
FY93 (SHIKEN KENKYUJO KENKYU KEIKAKU 1993): 



                                            FY92            FY93 

National Institute of Materials and 
Chemical Research (NIMC), AIST              (Unit:thousand yen) 

SOFC (R&amp;D/wet type technology)                               2,938 
     (R&amp;D/evaluation)                                       23,941 
PEFC (R&amp;D/fundamental technology)                            1,000 
(Evaluation of characteristics                               5,010 
     of polymer film) 

Electrotechnical Laboratory (ETL), AIST 

SOFC (R&amp;D/dry type technology)                 5,130         4,784 
       (R&amp;D/efficiency of power generation)   46,600        46,000 
National Institute for Resources and 
Environment, AIST 

SOFC (Research on a system to collect 
      exhaust heat)                            1,800         1,393 
(Research on methods to evaluate 
      systems to collect exhaust heat)         6,400         6,278 

National Chemical Lab for Industry 
(NCLI), AIST 

SOFC (R&amp;D/wet type technology)                 2,715 
       (R&amp;D/evaluat ion)                      24,400 

Government Industrial Research 
Institute, Osaka (GIRI, Osaka), AIST 

MCFC (Research on new component 
       materials/composition materials)        4,130         4,036 
       (Test and evaluation of materials)    111,258        15,000 

PEFC (Research on cell materials)                            1,161 
       (Test and evaluation of fuel cells)    11,330        16,170 
       (Research)                              1,250 



   Diffusion of Fuel Cell Technology 

   The Advisory Committee for Energy submitted on 10 December 1993 
its views about diffusion of fuel cell technology to MITI.  In its 
report the committee recommended vigorous efforts for diffusion and 
R&amp;D of fuel cell technology.  The committee identified problems 
which presently prevent fuel-cell technology from diffusion as 
follows:  Although practical use of PAFC technology is on the way, 
long-term reliability of a cell and a fuel-cell plant has to be 
improved.  In order to popularize construction of fuel-cell plants, 
construction cost need to be drastically reduced.  Development 
should be focused on reliability and durability in long-term plant 
operation, utilizing all the data from field tests, as well as cost 
reduction, convenience for users, system standardization, and market 
expansion through diversification of fuel types.  R&amp;D objectives for 

PAFC, including large-unit operation, high efficiency, cost 
reduction, and commercialization, should be also applied to MCFC, 
SOFC, and PEFC at each technology level (TSUSANSHO KOHO 16 Dec 93). 

   The following chart compares the cost of new energy and existing 
power generation: 


                               Installation Cost     Power 
Generation 
Cost 
                               (Unit: thousand yen)      (Unit: yen) 
New Energy 

Photovoltaic Power                 1,000/kW                71/kW h 
Wind Power                           500/kW                32/kW h 
Fuel Cell                          1,500/kW             35-46/kW h 
(peripheral equipment and 
 protective devices not included) 

Existing Energy 

Petroleum Power                      190/kW                 11/kW h 
Coal Power                           230/kW                 10/kW h 
LNG Power                            200/kW                 10/kW h 
Nuclear Power                        310/kW                  9/kW h 
Hydraulic Power                      640/kW                 13/kW h 



   (ENERUGI SEISAKU NO AYUMI TO TENBO, ANRE 1993) 

   MITI's Efforts To Acquire Information from Overseas 

   MITI participates in a cooperative research and information 
exchange program under the Committee on Energy Research and 
Technology (CERT) of the International Energy Agency (IEA).  MITI 
joined the advanced fuel cell program in April 1990. 

   AIST conducts comprehensive, in-depth surveys of trends in 
technology policies and R&amp;D projects in major countries, opinions on 

Japan's R&amp;D activities, and obstacles to international cooperation 
in R&amp;D.  AIST procures a wide variety of publications, reports, and 

literature on foreign technology, mainly from the United States and 
Europe (AIST 1993). 

   Another Fuel Cell Development Program 

   The Ministry of Transport will begin development of vessels 
powered by fuel cells starting in FY94.  The ministry plans to 
establish an organization jointly with major vessel manufacturers, 
including Mitsubishi Heavy Industries and Ishikawajima-Harima Heavy 
Industries Co., in order to conduct a four-year plan to design, 
develop, and test a prototype vessel.  The R&amp;D budget projected for 

this plan is 400 million yen ($3.6 million) per year and will be 
shared equally by the government and the private sector.  The 
ministry aims to develop a 20-meter-class prototype vessel in four 
years (NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Jan 94). 

   Attachment 1: 


               NEDO'S FUEL CELL DEVELOPMENT SCHEDULE 

              81 82 83 84 85 86 87 88 89 90 91 92 93 94 95 96 97 

  PAFC        Basic research 

                     20O-kW &amp; IMW plant development 
                                              Commercialization 
                                              (1 MW &amp; 5 MW) 
                    Dispersed type 
                             On-site type 
  MCFC        Basic research 
                        10-kW stack development 
                                 100-kW stack development 
                                                   1-MW plant 
development 

  SOFC        Basic research 
                                       100-W stack development 
                                                 Above 10-kW stack 
development 

  PEFC                                           Basic research 
(1-kW stack) 

(Undecided) 
                 (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 SEP 93) 




     Attachment 2: 


     FUEL CELL R&amp;D PARTICIPANTS 



ANRE/AIST 
     NEDO             PAFC Develop.  PAFC Consortium, Fuji Electric, 
                                     Co., Toshiba, Hokkaido Electric 
                                     Power Co., Tohoku EPC, Tokyo 
                                     EPC, Chubu EPC, Hokuriku EPC, 
                                     Kansai EPC, Chugoku EPC, 
                                     Shikoku EPC, Kyushu EPC, 
                                     Central Research Inst. of 
                                     Electric Power Industry 
                                     (CRIEPI), Tokyo Gas Co., Toho 
                                     Gas Co., Osaka Gas Co., Seibu 
                                     Gas Co., Inst. of Applied 
                                     Energy 

                      MCFC Develop.  MCFC Consortium, Hitachi Ltd., 
                                     Ishikawaj ima-Harima Heavy 
                                     Industries, Mitsubishi Electric 
                                     Corp. (MELCO), Yokogawa 
                                     Electric Corp., Fuji Electric 
                                     Co., Ube Industries, Ebara 
                                     Corp., Chiyoda Chemical 
                                     Engineering &amp; Construction Co., 

                                     Toshiba, Kobe Steel, Toyo 
                                     Engineering, Institute of 
                                     Electric Power Industry, Japan 
                                     Research &amp; Development Center 
                                     for Metals, Mitsubishi 
                                     Materials, Nippon Kokan, Nissin 
                                     Steel Co., Sumitomo Metal 
                                     Mining Co., Kawasaki Heavy 
                                     Industries, Matsushita 
                                     Electric, Electric Power Dev. 
                                     Co. 

                      SOFC Develop.  Fuji Electric, Sanyo Electric, 
                                     Fine Ceramics Center, Fujikura 
                                     Ltd., Mitsubishi Heavy 
                                     Industries, Murata Mfg. Co., 
                                     Mitsui Engineering &amp; Ship- 
                                     building Co., CRIEPI, Electric 
                                     Power Dev. Co., JRCM, Sumitomo 
                                     Precision Products Co., 
                                     Sumitomo Metal Mining Co., Kobe 
                                     Steel, Kubota Corp., Ebara 
                                     Corp. 

                      PFC Develop.   Toshiba, MELCO, Sanyo Electric, 
                                     Asahi Chemical Industry Co., 
                                     Asahi Glass Co., Hitachi, Ltd., 
                                     Sumitomo Electric Industries, 
                                     Aisin Seiki Co., Imura Research 
                                     Institute for Materials 
                                     Development 

       Government Institutes         Electrotechnical Lab. 
                                     Government Industrial Research 
                                     Institute in Osaka, National 
                                     Institute of Materials &amp; 
                                     Chemical Research, National 
                                     Institute for Resources and 
                                     Environment 

                 (NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 29 SEP 93) 




     (AUTHORS: ANGEL, GRAY.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE 
CALL CHIEF, PACIFIC RIM BRANCH AT (703) 733-6346). 
GIG/7FEB/TENF/ECONF/TID/jf 10/0734Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24655 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   11 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-021--Russia 
<H3> <TI>      RUSSIA:  Welcome Back Cuba </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
In     recent press articles, Russian officials and media 
commentators have reacted favorably toward revitalizing contacts 
with Cuba, after a prolonged decline in Russian-Cuban cooperation. 
Officials viewed political and economic agreements signed in 
December as "logical" and "mutually beneficial" in furthering the 
development of bilateral relations.  Media commentators welcomed the 
economic agreements, citing the need to pursue investment and trade 
opportunities in Cuba, and emphasized Russia's moral responsibility 
to continue its long history of friendship with the Cubans.  This 
Foreign Media Note draws on press items selected from FBIS reports 
and articles not published elsewhere. 

   Russian officials and media commentators in recent articles in 
the Russian press have endorsed the revitalization of Russian-Cuban 
relations, including two bilateral agreements with Cuba signed in 
December.  After a period of waning economic and political contacts 
in the early 199O's, marked by Russia's voting for a UN resolution 
condemning Cuban human rights violations and abstaining on a 
November 1993 resolution to lift the economic and financial blockade 
of Cuba, Russia now appears ready to renew and develop cooperation 
with its longtime political and economic client. 

   Agreements Signed 

   On 3 December 1993, Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Georgiy 
Mamedov and his Cuban counterpart Isabel Allende signed agreements 
on reciprocal visa-free travel and scientific and cultural 
cooperation.  Mamedov stated that."the agreements became a logical 
link in the onward development of relations between Russia and Cuba" 
and noted the documents "are in keeping with the trend toward 
greater openness and democracy to which both Russia and Cuba are 
moving" (Moscow INTERFAX in English 1426 GMT 3 Dec 93, Daily Report 
FBIS-SOV-93-233 7 Dec 93 p 11). 

   On 24 December 1993 in Moscow, First Deputy Premiers Vladimir 
Shumeyko and Oleg Soskovets and Vice President of the Council of 
Ministers of Cuba Lionel Soto signed a memorandum on the results of 
bilateral negotiations and an agreement to set up a joint trade and 
economic association called "Roskuba," founded by approximately 3O 
major Russian financial, industrial, and banking groups including 
Rosneft, Tatneft, and Urals factories and nickel-producing plants. 
Shumeyko declared upon signing the memorandum: "Despite political 
differences, we have much in common with Cuba, and we have found the 
golden mean which enables us to develop relations with this country 
on a mutually beneficial basis."  Shumeyko asserted in an apparent 
de-emphasis on the level of government involvement in economic 
decisionmaking that the "Roskuba" agreement "lowered the level of 
economic and trade relations to that between manufacturers."  Trade 
terms in the memorandum state that Russia will receive about 1.5 
million tons of Cuban raw sugar in 1994 in exchange for four million 
tons of oil.  Shumeyko noted it was possible that the agreements 
would affect "the interests of third world countries" that purchase 
Cuban raw sugar to resell it later to Russia "at other prices" and 
"those who would like to impede the rapprochement of Russia and Cuba 
on political grounds" (Moscow INTERFAX in English 1738 GMT 24 Dec 
93, Daily Report FBIS-SOV-93-246 27 Dec 93 pp 28-29).  According to 
media commentator Leonid Velekhov, Shumeyko also remarked that 
"political assessments of the signed agreements, wherever they come 
from, do not interest him" and expressed the ambiguous hope that 
"Russia would henceforth select economic partners on the basis of 
economic, not political considerations" (Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 
No 1O5, 29 Dec 93 p 3, JPRS Report FBIS-USR-94-OO5 26 Jan 94 pp 56- 
58). 

   Media Comment 

   Media commentators from a wide range of newspapers have welcomed 
the revitalizations of Russian-Cuban relations: 

-- In his 29 December SEGODNYA article, Leonid Velekhov hailed the 
visit of the Cuban delegation that negotiated the trade agreement as 
evidence of "a new Moscow and Havana rapprochement and, at the same 
time, a final rejection by Russia, apparently, of attempts to get 
'on board' the anti- Cuban political situation."  However, he warned 
that "this new rapprochement must be employed wisely, so that it 
does not turn into a replay of the old friendship, which made 
neither of the two countries rich."  Velekhov noted that after the 
negotiations Russian Minister of Foreign Economic Relations Oleg 
Davydov became the first Russian government official to openly 
divulge the amount of Cuba's debt to Russia, announcing a debt of 
more than 2O billion dollars during the television program "Vesti." 
While Davydov stated that Cuban insolvency would preclude repayment 
of such a large sum, Velekhov pointed out the advantages of 
servicing the debt with commodities, expressing a fondness for 
"citrus fruit, the wonderful Cuban rum, liqueurs, and tobacco 
products long forgotten by us."  To achieve this, he noted, it might 
be worth holding off on reducing relations to "the level of 
manufacturers," for "to resolve this problem, it is exactly the 
notorious state level that is needed." 

-- IZVESTIYA correspondent Yevgeniy Bay welcomed moves to develop 
economic ties with Cuba as "quite logical on the surface."  He found 
the established trade terms beneficial to Russia, since "Russia can 
obtain from Cuba, on a stable basis and without any intermediaries, 
the quantity of sugar we need as and when we need it.  The shipment 
of oil takes place over a period of a few months, which is also 
within Russia's capability (with the Cubans providing a concealed 
interest-free financing of Russian imports)."  Bay commented that 
some of the sugar will also be paid for by "Russian goods that are 
uncompetitive in the world market," noting that "only Castro would 
accept something that nobody else needs any more" (Moscow IZVESTIYA 
in Russian 28 Dec 93 First Edition p 3, Daily Report FBIS-SOV-93-248 
29 Dec 93 pp 8-9). 

-- DELOVOY MIR's international correspondent Anatoliy Medvedenko 
argued that unless Russia presses ahead with economic ventures to 
overcome its past "withdrawal" from Cuba, vital opportunities will 
be lost.  He reported that 25O Cuban enterprises are in dire 
circumstances due to a lack of raw materials and spare parts and 
that the Cubans are ready to accept any proposals from Russian 
businessmen regarding joint ventures or capital investments with 
profit sharing.  Medvedenko asserted that "many capitalist 
countries" are showing interest in Cuba, attempting "either to renew 
cooperation with this Caribbean country or extend contacts that 
already exist."  Medvedenko observed that Russia has made 
considerable investments in Cuba in the past, creating "a rich and 
far-reaching infrastructure" composed of industrial and nuclear 
power installations and a major oil refinery, and warned of the 
"quite real possibility that others will profit from the fruits of 
our labor" (Moscow DELOVOY MIR 23 Dec 93 p 7). 

-- PRAVDA commentator Valeriy Mironov also raised the issue of past 
association, stating that "we should not forget the history of more 
than 3O years of cooperation between the former Soviet Union and the 
Republic of Cuba, which was our reliable political, trade and 
economic partner.  This cooperation was fruitful and mutually 
advantageous in every regard." Mironov asserted that the United 
States had pressured Gorbachev to curtail the Soviet Union's 
cooperation with Cuba, for "otherwise there would be no support for 
perestroyka."  Mironov argued that Russia has a moral responsibility 
to the Cubans, asking:  "How can we talk of morality in politics 
seeing that we had first drawn Cuba into our sphere of influence and 
then looked for new friends and partners--moreover, among those who, 
for the last 3O years or so, have dreamed of nothing but a 
convenient opportunity to settle accounts with the Cuban people once 
and for all?"  Mironov concluded:  "Our friendship with the heroic 
Cuban people, who are currently experiencing not the best period in 
their history, must be maintained in whatever direction the 
political winds may blow.  After all, history does not forgive 
weathervanes and traitors" (Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 5 Jan 94 p 6). 

(AUTHOR:  KENSKI.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
MILITARY/INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS BRANCH, CIS DIVISION, (7O3) 733- 
6375.) 
ENEAG/1OFEB94/POLCHF/CIS DIVISION/PF 10/1742z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24656 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   11 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-006--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Europe     Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 06, 10 
February 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most 
recent sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Latin America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. The EER is published in two 
editions, one for Western Europe (also including media coverage of 
Canada and Turkey), and the other for Eastern Europe.  Drawing 
primarily from domestic media sources of these countries but also 
using other foreign media where appropriate, the EER focuses on 
national and regional economic issues, such as economic 
competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic reforms and 
other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade and 
investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   FEATURES: 

   Germany--'Endangered' Role as Industrial Site Examined 

   France--Interest Rate Debate Heats Up 

   EU 

   France Wants EU Budget Shares Maintained 'For Now'; Study Finds 
Japanese Investment Drops in EU 

   FINLAND 

   Unemployment Rate at New Record High 

   FRANCE 

   Privatizations Cost State Fr5 Billion; Toubon, Carignon Differ 
Over Audiovisual Policy; Government Gives Fr2 Billion to 
Aerospatiale; Government's Recovery Plans Called 'Ambiguous' 

   GERMANY 

   Commentator Says Farmers Producing Wrong Products; Disagreements 
Among Ministries Slow Environmental Cleanup; Trust Agency Promotes 
Russian Investment; Kinkel Encourages Investment in Asia; 

   GREECE 

   Economic Course Discussed; Regional Development Bank Established 

   ITALY 

   Moderate Political Parties' Economic Platforms; Major Unions To 
Unite in 'SecondRepublic' 

   PORTUGAL 

   Farmers Receive Small Share of EU Aid 

   SWEDEN 

   New Volvo Chief Sees Bright Future for Company 

   SWITZERLAND 

   Study Says Joining EU Would Help Growth, Jobs 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France, Greece, Portugal 

   FEATURES 

   Germany: 'Endangered' Role as Industrial Site Examined 

   High labor costs, lagging innovation, bureaucratic obstacles, 
high taxes, and psychological factors are the main reasons Germany's 
competitiveness as an industrial location is "endangered," according 
to an article by Franz Thoma in the 25 January Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE 
ZEITUNG.  According to Thoma, Germany's high labor costs combined 
with its short working hours and production times increase prices 
for German goods and create a "serious handicap" in international 
competition.  Although some other industrial countries have higher 
wage rates, generous benefits make Germany's overall labor 
compensation the highest in the world at 42 German marks (DM) per 
hour in 1992.  The corresponding figures for Japan and the United 
States are DM30 and DM24.80, respectively.  At the same time, Thoma 
points out, working hours in Germany have been shortened more 
rapidly in recent years than in other countries.  Between 1980 and 
1992, he notes, manufacturing working hours in Germany dropped by 
11.9 percent.  In Japan, they decreased by 7.1 percent and in the 
United States they actually increased by 2.6 percent.  Germany also 
finished last among industrial countries in machine running times, 
with machines operating for just 53 hours per week, compared to 77 
hours in Belgium, the European leader in this category.  This is in 
turn reflected in Germany's lagging productivity, which grew just 38 
percent from 1980 to 1992, compared with 53 percent in the U.S. and 
60 percent in Japan. 

   Thoma also cites lagging innovation as a factor in Germany's loss 
of competitiveness.  Companies, he argues, have failed to develop 
new products and improve old ones to help compensate for increasing 
costs.  In the field of information technology, for example, German 
companies have had some success in producing individual products but 
have failed to respond to the demand for entire systems.  In 
biotechnology, the situation is even more stark:  as of late 1993, 
just six licensed biotechnology production facilities were operating 
in Germany, compared to 120 in Japan and 300 in the United States. 
Thoma also cites statistics from the German Patent Office showing 
Germany trailing both Japan and the United States in patent 
applications in the fields of vehicle technology, medicine, main 
frame computers, entertainment electronics, microelectronics, 
biotechnology, office technology, lasers, and aerospace. 

   Information on the bureaucratic barriers to German 
competitiveness could "fill volumes," writes Thoma.  In 1987, for 
example, the Bayer company decided to launch production of a new 
blood-clotting agent in the United States rather than in Germany, 
because of the difference in the time required for government 
approval of the new product.  U.S. authorities approved production 
after less than 10 months; approval time in Germany could not even 
be predicted.  Similarly, BMW had to wait five years for approval to 
construct a building in Munich, while an 11-story building in an 
earthquake-prone area of Tokyo was approved in just six weeks. 

   Thoma cites high taxes as yet another hindrance to German 
competitiveness, remarking that the country's 44.06 percent tax rate 
was among the highest in the world and that experts expected the 
rate to climb further to 48.69 percent by 1996.  The figures for the 
United States and Japan are expected to reach 30.7 percent and 29.3 
percent, respectively, by that date. 

   Thoma concludes that, while the problems he has described are the 
most important obstacles to Germany's competitiveness as an 
industrial location, there are other, less tangible "atmospheric" or 
psychological" weaknesses.  These, he argues, include a negative 
attitude toward technology and a work ethic which is "no longer as 
positive" as it was during the early postwar years.  (RoH)  (Munich 
SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 25 Jan 94 p 8) 

   France:  Interest Rate Debate Heats Up 

   Laurence Ville, chief economic editor for the Paris financial 
biweekly  L'EXPANSION, contends that the debate over French interest 
rate levels is heating up despite the fact that there "seems to be 
the notion" that expressing opposition to current government 
monetary policy is "taboo."  Ville claims that although the French 
Government policy of setting interest rates on a par with Germany's 
to maintain the value of the franc--called a "strong franc" policy- 
-is well entrenched, the circumstances that justified it have 
changed with business activity stagnating, recovery not yet in 
sight, and the growing fear of real deflation.  Among those who have 
spoken out against continuing this policy is former National 
Institute for Statistics and Economic Research (INSEE) Director 
Edmond Malinvaud, who has published a paper called "Ambition for a 
European Initiative" in which he recommends lowering interest rates 
in face of mounting unemployment.  Malinvaud counsels French 
authorities unilaterally to lower French interest rates if the 
Bundesbank continues to be "obstinate" and refuses to lower German 
rates.  The document is signed by several prestigious European 
economists, including France's current INSEE Director Paul Champsau, 
French Observatory for Economic Conditions (OFCE) President Jean- 
Paul Fitoussi, and National Bank of Paris (BNP) Economic Research 
Director Jean-Michel Charpin. 

   Ville predicts the government's monetary policy will become 
increasingly controversial.  He cites as evidence the Bank of France 
calling on Patrick Artus, director of the economic studies at the 
Caisse des Depots, to "explain himself" after publishing an article 
in the Paris daily LE FIGARO which was judged by unnamed top 
government officials as "a bit ambiguous" about the advantages and 
risks of changing monetary policy.  Additionally, Ville claims, the 
debate will likely "take a new turn" since the Bank of France (BOF) 
recently acquired independence and has replaced the government in 
setting monetary policy.  Although BOF Governor Jean-Claude Trichet 
is a partisan of the strong franc policy, a growing number of 
economists do not support his position and are now arguing that: 

   * A deep recession and a strong increase in unemployment call for 
a change of monetary policy priorities.  French authorities should 
take advantage of more flexible fluctuation bands within the 
European Monetary System (EMS). 

   * European Monetary Union (EMU) would not necessarily be 
threatened by allowing the franc to float more freely.  Exchange 
rate stability is not an obligatory condition during the second 
phase of EMU.  According to Institute of International Relations 
(IRI) economist Pierre Jacquet, it is "unlikely that the EU will 
return to narrow fluctuation bands before the final phase of EMU. 
Floating the franc or other currencies until then does not imply we 
reject the objective of a single currency." 

   * Maintaining the current level of real interest rates represents 
a considerable obstacle to recovery.  "The problem is not so much 
the date of the recovery...as its strength," according to Anton 
Brender, the director of economic studies at the Parisian Rediscount 
Company.  He adds, "A lowering of the interest rates is 
indispensable if one wants to achieve sustained growth sufficient to 
create jobs." 

   * Gradually reducing interest rates as the French Government 
advocates is "insufficient."  A "clear signal" is needed for 
household and business spending to increase.  Philippe Sigogne, 
director of analysis for OFCE, concludes market expectations must be 
reversed to persuade consumers that rates have bottomed out, which 
can only be done by lowering short-term rates "significantly and in 
one blow" so that they are sharply below long-term rates.  Ville 
adds that for a good number of economists, this is indispensable for 
recovery. 

   * The risks of lowering interest rates are limited.  Jacquet 
notes that while he wants to keep a strong currency, he believes 
current policy is based on a "mistaken definition" of how a strong 
currency is maintained.  In Jacquet's view, a strong currency is 
based on the domestic stability of prices and of buying power and 
not on a reference to an exchange rate. 

   * With a marked reduction in short-term interest rates, any 
depreciation in the franc would be limited and temporary.  The 
market would welcome such an initiative if it is "timely." 
Additionally, the German mark will be affected adversely by its own 
economic problems. 

   * The risk is greater in doing nothing because of the deep 
recession.  Brender contends, "The market knows that an interest 
rate reduction is vital if France wants to improve unemployment but 
also reduce the public debt." 

   * France may have to accept temporary depreciation to assure long 
term currency strength and economic health. 

   Ville concludes that if the status quo is maintained, a new wave 
of currency speculation and financial upheavals are possible in the 
next few months."  He reasons that it is better to take the step 
now rather than to be compelled to do so later by financial crisis. 
(DiI)  (Paris L'EXPANSION in French 20 Jan-2 Feb 94 pp 20-21) 

   EU 

   FRANCE WANTS EU BUDGET SHARES MAINTAINED 'FOR NOW'--According to 
an article signed J.-P.P. in LE FIGARO, French European Affairs 
Minister Alain Lamassoure "admitted" that the French Government "for 
now" does not intend to question the budget contribution 
apportionment among the member states of the EU.  Acknowledging 
Germany's complaints about being the largest contributor to the EU 
budget and its desire to end EU rebates to Britain, Lamassoure 
pointed out that Germany is the country which has benefited the most 
from membership in the EU, both commercially and politically.  He 
observed, "France pays for 27 percent of the (British) rebate when 
it only represents 20 percent of the Community wealth, while Germany 
only pays 22.5 percent of the rebate while having 30 percent of 
Community wealth." (DiI)  (Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in 
French 28 Jan 94 p IV) 

   STUDY FINDS JAPANESE INVESTMENT DROPS IN EU--Investment by 
Japanese industry in Europe had dropped to $7.6 billion by July 
1993, a decline of 24.7 percent over the previous year, according to 
a study by the German Chamber of Industry and Commerce in Japan 
(DIHKJ).  The study attributed the decline in part to the Japanese 
recession but also noted that the EU had "generally become much too 
expensive" for most Japanese companies.  The DIHKJ also pointed out 
that the EU's share of Japan's foreign investments had declined 
relative to the U.S. and Asian shares, and now represented barely 
one fifth of the $34.14 billion total.  (RoH)  (Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE 
ZEITUNG in German 18 Jan 94 p 21) 

   FINLAND 

   UNEMPLOYMENT RATE HITS NEW REC0RD HIGH--The Labor Ministry 
reported that the jobless rate rose to another high in December, 
21.8 percent. According to an article in the 18 January edition of 
HELSINGIN SAN0MAT, this meant that 537,000 Finns were without jobs 
at the end of December, up from around 500,000 at the end of 
November.  While traditional temporary furloughs between Christmas 
and New Year's account for part of this rise, Labor Minister Ilka 
Kanerva admitted surprise at the steepness of the increase.  Since 
the report for the preceding month had showed a slight decline, and 
because GDP growth surged to 8 percent for most of 1993, most 
economists had predicted a further decline in unemployment for 
December.  Especially troublesome was the worsening unemployment 
situation for youth (ages 16-25).  In December over 100,000 persons 
in this age group were jobless and the situation for the 25- to 30- 
year old group was not much better. 

   These latest figures on youth unemployment were the subject of an 
editorial in HELSINGIN SANOMAT on 22 January.  The editorial 
expressed concern that so many graduates of colleges and vocational 
schools were finding it impossible to enter their chosen fields and 
that a recent survey had found that over a third of the unemployed 
youth were so discouraged that they had stopped job hunting and were 
not interested in further education or training.  Those in the 25- 
to 30-year old group with degrees or diplomas in such diverse fields 
as business, engineering, waiting tables, and teaching "were even 
more discouraged than the 16-25 year olds."  In addition, the 
proportion of the long-term unemployed continued to increase.  Those 
without jobs for over 12 months amounted to a little over 50,000 in 
December 1992; by December 1993 the number had more than doubled to 
over 120,000. 

   Geographically, the worst off county was Kainuu, where the forest 
industry suffered from falling exports, according to an article in 
the 22 January HELSINGIN SANOMAT.  It had a registered unemployment 
of 29 percent, followed by Lappland with 28 percent.  As throughout 
Finland's three-year slump, women had a lower jobless rate than men: 
20 percent compared to 24 percent.  This is largely explained by the 
fact that such male-dominated sectors as forestry, metals, and 
chemicals suffered more job losses than government and services. 
(RB) 

   The hard copy version of this Foreign Media Survey has a graph on 
unemployment trends in Finland. 

   FRANCE 

   PRIVATIZATIONS COST STATE FR5 BILLION--Renaud de la Baume, 
writing in LIBERATION, claims the French Government will have lost 
Fr5.13 billion on its privatizations of BNP, Rhone-Poulenc, and Elf- 
Aquitaine because of its failure to set better offering prices for 
their shares.  In failing to receive the "correct" price for the 
public offerings, the government has "made a gift" for investors of 
the stock price gain, thereby losing money for government coffers. 
The amount of this "gift," based on de la Baume's research, was 
calculated by determining net stock price gains--adjusted to 
compensate for the general stock market rise during this period--for 
each investor category, some of which bought in at different 
offering prices.  Below are the results of de la Baume's research: 

   * BNP:  The total investor net gain was Fr1.77 billion.  The gain 
included a Fr20 per share net gain for small shareholders with 46.9 
million shares bought; Fr20 per share net gain for institutional 
investors with 27.7 million shares bought; an average net gain of 
Fr30 per share for BNP employees with 8 million shares bought; and a 
net gain of Fr8.30 per share for Stable Shareholders Group (GAS) 
investors with 5.7 million shares bought. 

   * Rhone-Poulenc: The total investor net gain was Fr0.25 billion. 
This included a Fr6.50 per share net gain for small shareholders who 
bought 52.3 million shares; a net gain of Fr10 per share for GAS 
investors who bought 15.1 million shares; net gain of Fr23 per share 
for Rhone Poulenc employees who bought 8.8 million shares; and net 
gain of Fr5 per share for institutional investors who bought 26.9 
million shares. 

   * Elf-Aquitaine: Not yet privatized, future total investor net 
gain was estimated to be Fr3.11 billion.  The research assumed a per 
share public offering price of Fr35 for some 89 million shares, 
assuming also the same percentage of stock market gains as occurred 
under the above privatizations.  De la Baume claims institutional 
investors were "very unhappy" with the lower gains they garnered in 
the Rhone-Poulenc privatization when the government offered an 
initial Fr135 per share compared to Fr240 per share for BNP. 
Consequently, the government has "clearly decided" to avoid 
irritating this crucial pool of investors and will offer a better 
deal to invest in Elf. (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 5, 6 Feb 
94 p 10) 

   TOUBON, CARIGNON DIFFER ON AUDIOVISUAL POLICY--Communication 
Minister Alain Carignon and Culture Minister Jacques Toubon 
"profoundly" disagree over the conduct of audiovisual policy, 
according to Emmanuel Schwartzenberg writing in LE FIGARO. 
Schwartzenberg cites unnamed Toubon staffers as saying Toubon was 
"astonished" by Carignon's establishment of a government working 
group on EU audiovisual policy.  Toubon himself openly reproached 
Carignon, who is also the mayor of Grenoble, in that city's daily 
DAUPHINE LIBERE of 28 January for having opened discussions on the 
EU directive on audiovisual policy "alone and without coordination." 
He stated, "An issue such as the Television Without Borders 
directive is by nature interministerial.  The Foreign Affairs 
Ministry itself says that the Communication Ministry cannot make 
Community policy for France.  Community policy can only be the 
result of governmental action."  Moreover, Toubon warned, "Since 
there have been several episodes like this, I think there must be a 
call to order."  He added that he will "question" the separation 
between these two ministries, noting that ministers must act as a 
"solid team."  Schwartzenberg concludes that Toubon's accusations 
are "serious" and demand to be quickly attended to or France's 
position in international negotiations will be weakened. 

   Carignon refused to make any official comment on Toubon's 
statements.  However, based on Toubon's statements over the last 
several weeks, Schwartzenberg contends that Toubon views his role as 
one of provoking debate, initiating discussions, then participating 
in interministerial coordination.  Such coordination should follow 
the debate and not come from closed-door negotiations where lawyers 
and technicians leave the public out. (DiI) 
(Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in French 29, 30 Jan 94 p 
VIII) 

   GOVERNMENT GIVES FR2 BILLION TO AEROSPATIALE--Louis Gallois, the 
president of Aerospatiale, who had asked the company's majority 
shareholder, the French Government, for 3 billion francs (Fr) to 
help the company move toward privatization, will receive only Fr2 
billion.  Aerospatiale has had a difficult year marked by low 
civilian and military sales.  Despite a 5-percent decrease in sales 
for 1993, the company was able to reduce its debt by 9 percent last 
year.  However, its balance sheet remains burdened by a "colossal" 
debt of Fr15 billion, or two times more than shareholders' equity 
(Fr6 billion). 

   "The state has done its shareholder duty," according to Economy 
Minister Edmond Alphandery.  He argues that the EU Commission cannot 
criticize the Fr2 billion capital infusion because Aerospatiale, 
unlike Bull, is not in difficulty.  The company has an austerity 
program in place and should break even by 1995.  In the meantime, 
however, privatization is not "the order of the day."  Additionally, 
Alphandery confirmed that the Fr2 billion will come from the Fr21 
billion budgeted by the government to support state-owned companies. 
(DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 3 Feb 94 p 13) 

   GOVERNMENT'S RECOVERY PLANS CALLED 'AMBIGUOUS'--According to 
LIBERATION'S  Chief Economic Editor Laurent Mauduit, Prime Minister 
Edouard Balladur is sending mixed economic signals.  On the one hand 
Balladur is trying to stimulate consumer spending; on the other, he 
is trying to attract savings and investment.  Because of the 
depressed state of consumer spending, the government has chosen to 
try to convince the French to spend more.  Mauduit argues, for 
example, that the new "prudent" Social Security plan which increased 
employer social benefit payments, was intended to stimulate savings 
without impacting consumer spending through new taxes.  Government 
remains ambiguous, however.  It is continuing to stimulate long-term 
savings, as it did last spring when it issued government bonds for 
the French to subscribe to, but is simultaneously continuing a 
privatization process, which is obviously designed to stimulate 
investment rather than consumption, Mauduit concludes.  (RM)  (Paris 
LIBERATION in French 31 Jan 94 p 3) 

   GERMANY 

   COMMENTATOR SAYS FARMERS GROWING 'WRONG' PRODUCTS--Government and 
academic proposals for reforming German agriculture overlook the 
fact that German farmers are growing the "wrong" products, according 
to a commentary by Klaus Kemper in the 22 January Frankfurt/Main 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE.  According to Kemper, the suggestions 
offered by government officials and agricultural economists to 
improve the competitiveness and income of German farmers are the 
same ones which have failed over the past 40 years.  These proposals 
include: combining many small farms into fewer larger ones, 
increasing set-aside subsidies for letting land lie fallow, 
developing new sources of income such as offering travel packages 
for "vacations on the farm," and decreasing the number of farmers 
per unit of land.  All of these proposals are valid, Kemper argues, 
if one assumes that German farmers should continue to produce 
relatively cheap crops, as they have in the past. 

   In Kemper's view, however, this assumption is false.  He 
maintains that, since German farmers have a large number of high 
income consumers at their doorstep, they should farm more 
"intensively" by growing products like fresh vegetables, fruits, and 
flowers, which are more difficult to transport and which yield more 
money per unit of land.  By continuing to produce low-income, easily 
transportable crops like wheat, barley, oilseed, and sugar beets, he 
argues, German farmers are surrendering their natural advantage in 
the high end of the domestic agricultural market to overseas 
producers.  Kemper concludes that farmers cannot manage the required 
shift in agricultural production without assistance and notes that 
German agricultural leaders and officials will need more imagination 
than they have shown thus far to implement the necessary changes. 
(RoH)  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 22 Jan 94 p 
11) 

   DISAGREEMENT AMONG MINISTRIES SLOWS ENVIRONMENTAL CLEANUP--The 
Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of the Environment are debating 
the anticipated expenditure of DM6 billion for the cleanup of former 
GDR industrial sites.  To date, some 20 major cleanup projects, each 
costing at least DM100 million, have been identified.  At issue is 
the application of the "Agreement Regulating Financing of Residual 
Ecological Burdens," which obligates the Finance Ministry's Trust 
Agency to underwrite 60 percent of general cleanup costs and 75 
percent of the costs incurred in designated major projects.  The 
Environment Ministry view is that cleanup must include preparing the 
sites for continued industrial use, thus averting continued 
industrial expansion into open land.  The Trust Agency preference is 
to limit cleanups to what is needed to avert present dangers, 
without pursuing further environmental goals.  (CW)  (Duesseldorf 
HANDELSBLATT in German 13 Jan 94 p 3) 

   TRUST AGENCY PR0MOTES RUSSIAN INVESTMENT--The Moscow office of 
the Trust Agency's East European Consulting Group has set up an 
April investor workshop for representatives of small and medium- 
sized German businesses interested in the privatization of Russian 
companies.  The areas targeted are wholesale and retail trade, food 
service, and transport operations.  Since 1992, the Trust Agency 
group has had some 30 specialists in 17 cities of the Moscow oblast 
assisting in privatization and restructuring, and it reports that 
about 80 percent of the 10,000 businesses in the pilot areas have 
been privatized.  In this case, "privatized" means that 51 percent 
of the shares in each company are held by the firm's employees, and 
investors are being sought for the remaining shares.  Additional 
consulting services are in the works for St. Petersburg, Vladimir, 
Irkutsk and Krasnojarsk, and the group has also been advising the 
Ministry for Privatization and the Russian Government's antimonopoly 
commission.  (CW)  (Frankfurt/Main BLICK DURCH DIE WIRTSCHAFT in 
German 27 Jan 94 p 2) 

   KINKEL ENCOURAGES INVESTMENT IN ASIA--Foreign Minister Klaus 
Kinkel, addressing a three-day conference of the German ambassadors 
to Asia, called on the German political and economic sectors to 
focus on "the most dynamic region of the world" and not "leave it to 
the United States."  He had already instructed the embassies to 
provide German firms with all the help possible in their dealings in 
Asia.  The goal is not just to increase German exports to the region 
but to invest there as well.  According to Kinkel, an earlier German 
involvement in Asia could have created 400,000 additional jobs in 
Germany.  Kinkel also promised that, in order to fully integrate 
Asia into the world market, Germany would work for Chinese and 
Taiwanese participation in GATT and would encourage democratic 
reforms in China, India, and Vietnam.  The German Government is 
planning to use its EU presidency, which begins in July 1994, to 
promote its Asia policy on the European level.  Kinkel was cautious 
on human rights issues, acknowledging the abuses should be clearly 
addressed but warning against a policy of "pointing fingers."  (WS) 
(Frankfurt FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU in German 27 Jan 94 p 4) 

   GREECE 

   ECONOMIC COURSE DISCUSSED--According to an article in VIMA TIS 
KIRIAKIS, the good news on the Greek economy which surfaced in 1994 
included: 

   * Reduced Deficit--The huge "black hole" of the 2.5-trillion- 
drachmas deficit inherited by the Panhellenic Socialist Movement 
(PASOK) government from the previous New Democracy (ND) 
administration has been "decisively plugged." 

   * Lower Interest Rates--Businessmen, workers, and industrialists 
reacted favorably to National Economy Minister Yiorgos Yennimatas's 
efforts to lower interest rates 3 percent, which will foster 
investment by both small and large companies. 

   * Booming Stock Market--The stock market recently broke the 
1,000-point mark, reaching the same level it did in February 1992, 
when investors still hoped that the ND government's economic policy 
would have positive results. 

   However, the good news was mitigated by the January announcement 
that four large textile mills are closing and the fact that the 
value of the dollar is constantly rising.  This adds a significant 
burden to the servicing of the foreign debt, the size of which 
demands heavy taxation and continued austerity.  EU Commission 
President Jacques Delors and Economics and Financial Affairs 
Commissioner Henning Christophersen have already met with Prime 
Minister Andreas Papandreou and Yennimatas to ask them to pursue 
such an austerity policy, the article reports.  While EU officials 
"showed understanding," they expressed doubts that the 1994 budget, 
which promises to lower the deficit, can be adhered to if austerity 
is not followed. 

   EU doubts are shared by Defense Minister Yerasimos Arsenis, 
Commerce Minister Kostas Simitis, and alternate National Economy 
Minister Ioannis Papandoniou, who also advocate austerity measures. 
They argue that of the three elections scheduled during the 
government's term--European Parliament, municipal, and legislative 
elections--the most critical one is the last, allowing the 
government time to enact politically costly austerity measures. 
While Papandreou shares his ministers' concern, he rejects tighter 
economic policies at this time, fearing that austerity will plunge 
the economy into an unprecedented recession from which it would be 
difficult to dig out.  He is thus advocating Yennimatas's policy of 
only tightening tax collection.  According to the article, this 
"formidable" task cannot be carried out by Yennimatas, who is ill 
with cancer, alone and Deputy Minister of Finance Alexandros 
Papadhopoulos may soon have his responsibilities expanded to help 
out. (RM)  (Athens TO VIMA TIS KIRIAKIS in Greek 9 Jan 94 p A4) 

   REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT BANK ESTABLISHED IN SALONICA--The Black Sea 
Economic Cooperation Organization, whose members are Albania, 
Azerbaijan, Armenia, Bulgaria, Romania, Georgia, Greece, Moldova, 
Russia, Turkey, and Ukraine, selected Salonica as the site for its 
newly-created Black Sea Development and Commerce Bank.  The 
selection of Greece for the bank is a significant challenge for 
Greece, as well as a "window of opportunity" for the country to 
promote Greek entrepreneurship and economic leadership in the 
Balkans and the Black Sea region.  The bank is scheduled to open in 
1994.  However, it may be delayed because of its members' different 
levels of development and national political and economic goals. 

   The bank presidency will rotate among its members.  The first 
governor will be Turkish and his deputy Bulgarian.  Greece will be 
responsible for the bank's organization and operation.  Each country 
will contribute to the financing of the institution with alternative 
funding to come from the "plethora" of EU, European Reconstruction 
and Development Bank (EBRD), European Investment Bank (EIB), and 
World Bank programs. (RM)  (Athens T0 VTMA TIS KTRIAKTS in Greek 9 
Jan 94 p D13) 

   ITALY 

   MODERATE POLITICAL PARTIES' ECONOMIC PLATFORMS--An article in the 
Rome daily IL MESSAGGERO reported answers from the economic experts 
of the five "moderate" parties running in the 27-28 March national 
elections who were asked where they stand on current economic 
issues.  Following is a summary of the positions the advocate: 

   * Mario Baldassari, Pact for Italy 

   --Guarantee a tax ceiling, reducing tax rate from 43 to 40 
percent.  Broaden the tax base through agreements with the self- 
employed.  Reduce the number of taxes from 200 to no more than 10, 
since 80 percent of revenues come from six taxes. 
   --Modify public assistance regulations.  Intervene to save the 
pension system by raising minimum pension age, establishing 
compulsory contributions, and creating private pension funds. 
   --Increase the pace of privatization and include municipal 
companies and local savings banks.  Create a network of merchant 
banks for small- and medium-sized companies. 

   * Giancarlo Pagliarini, Northern League 

   --Establish a tax ceiling, with a rate which has a "fair" 
percentage share of GDP. 
   --Pay for health care and pensions through the EU's budget. 
Change to a contribution-defined system rather than a benefit- 
defined system.  Those outside the system who do not contribute 
should receive state benefits.  Contributions should be managed by 
pension funds in competition with each other rather than by the 
National Agency for Social Security (INPS). 
   --Extend privatization to everything because "it makes no sense 
for the state to manage the economy." 

   * Roberto Pinza, Italian Popular Party 

   --Do not impose a tax ceiling before country's finances are in 
order.  Meanwhile, follow the policy established by the current 
legislature for the  next few years.  Simplify and return tax 
refunds as quickly as possible. 
   --Seek and maintain a balance between efficiency and state 
benefits, especially health-related benefits.  Give public 
assistance to those who really need it and require those less needy 
to pay for it. 
   --Privatize but keep strategic industries under state control. 
Additionally, Pinza is "worried" about privatizing savings banks. 
He would recommend not allowing local governments to control all the 
savings banks. 

   * Antonio Martino, Forza Italia 

   --Establish a tax ceiling to control spending. 
   --Find more efficient methods of parcelling out state aid. 
Provide non-negotiable vouchers to purchase health insurance plans, 
allowing personal choice of which one.  Martino claims this would 
produce more efficient health care for everyone at half the present 
health care cost 
   --Extend privatization to many industries which are currently 
under political and bureaucratic control.  Martino views the linkage 
of economic and political interests as the principal cause of 
corruption in Italy. 

   * Maurizio Gasparri, National Alliance 

   --Limit spending, either through a constitutional mandate or 
through law.  Reduce tax rates to fight tax evasion. 
   --Give more administrative autonomy to individual benefit 
categories.  For example, social security and health care could be 
self-managed by groups such as company employees or by larger 
classes such as public employees or steelworkers.  The state must 
guarantee a minimum of assistance to the neediest and public 
assistance must no longer be a political bargaining chip. 
   --Remove obstacles to privatization but maintain state control 
over certain strategic companies and over a part of the banking 
system to avoid being "colonized by the multinationals."  Diversify 
ownership of companies.  Remove the tax from reinvested company 
profits because such reinvestment stimulates the economy, increases 
production, and increases government revenues. (AB)  (Rome IL 
MESSAGGERO in Italian 26 Jan 94 p 2) 

   MAJOR UNIONS TO UNITE IN 'SECOND REPUBLIC'--On 20 January the 
national secretaries of three major unions--the Italian General 
Confederation of Labor (CGIL), the Italian Confederation of Trade 
Unions (CISL), and the Italian Federation of Trade Unions (UIL)- 
-announced that they will unite during the upcoming political and 
constitutional changeover to a "Second Republic" which will occur 
during 1994-95.  The new union will not be a merger of the three 
federations but a totally new entity that will have to identify its 
new functions and rationalize its activities.  According to Giorgio 
Lonardi writing in LA REPUBBLICA, the union will heavily affect the 
present unions' bureaucracy, and CGIL Secretary Bruno Trentin said 
that the number of full-time officials will be "drastically" 
reduced.  CISL Secretary Sergio D'Antoni agreed that the new union 
management will be slimmer and recognized that there will be a 
problem in redistributing its human resources.  The new union will 
be a "revolutionary order with precise definitions for the role and 
participation of the workers," according to D'Antoni. 

   Both Trentin and D'Antoni agreed that the new union will be 
apolitical.  It's institutions will be stronger this way, D'Antoni 
said, and the union's major role will be to represent the workers 
before whatever government may be in power.  This does not mean that 
the union cannot have its own positions or that individual leaders 
cannot make political choices, D'Antoni noted.  Trentin added, 
however, that the union's contribution to a discussion between 
political forces "is something else." (AB)  (Rome LA REPUBBLICA in 
Italian 21 Jan 94 P 40) 

   PORTUGAL 

   FARMERS RECEIVE SMALL SHARE OF EU AID--According to a statement 
by the Farmers' Confederation of Portugal (CAP), Portuguese farmers 
received less than a third of EU farm subsidies granted to the 
country.  A CAP-commissioned study showed that farmers received 
public funds from both national and EU sources of about 263 million 
contos between 1986 and 1992, a "far cry" from the 900 million 
contos touted as the total by the government.  Another study 
conducted by agronomist Sevinate Pinto and Francisco Avillez, 
professor at the Higher Institute of Agronomy, contends that the 
income of Portuguese farmers fell by almost half in the last three 
years.  The study showed that in the eight years since Portugal 
entered the EU, farmers received 346 million contos from EU 
subsidies and from the General State Budget (OGE).  In comparison, 
the country made interest payments of 412 million contos to 
financial institutions during this time.  The study contends that 
consumers, taxpayers, and the state have benefited from the sizable 
drop in national assistance to the agricultural sector and the 
significant drop in farm prices.  The authors also maintain that 
only 60 percent of the funds provided by the European Farm 
Orientation and Guarantee Fund (FEOGA) went to producers, with the 
remaining 40 percent shared in almost equal parts by exporters, 
consumers, and the state. (RM)  (Lisbon O INDEPENDENTE in Portuguese 
21 Jan 94 p 19) 

   SWEDEN 

   NEW VOLVO CHIEF SEES BRIGHT FUTURE FOR COMPANY--In his first 
interview since taking over as head of Volvo, Soren Gyll viewed 
Volvo's future and the state of the Volvo-Renault partnership with 
optimism.  He revealed that Volvo will return to being only a 
manufacturing company, shedding the diverse service businesses it 
was involved in previously.  Gyll saw a favorable economic climate 
for this streamlining, noting that "the positive factors in the 
market outweigh the negative ones."  Volvo's earnings are expected 
to total 5 billion kronor this year and 10 billion next year. 
According to Gyll, the company's passenger car division has captured 
new market shares in Sweden, Germany, and Great Britain.  Gyll also 
said that the Volvo-Renault partnership is being reviewed to see how 
common operations such as purchasing, quality control, and 
production planning can be divided.  The two firms are also 
examining which previously planned projects remain worthwhile. 
Mutual purchasing agreements will remain in effect.  (WS) 
(Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 17 January 94 p C1) 

   SWITZERLAND 

   STUDY SAYS JOINING EU WOULD HELP GROWTH, J0BS--If Switzerland 
joined the EU, its economy would grow "slightly" faster and 
potential job losses would be avoided, according to a study prepared 
for the Swiss government by the St. Gall Center for Future Research. 
According to the study, Switzerland's annual growth rate would 
accelerate from 1.2 to 1.5 percent by the year 2000 if it joined the 
EU.  Becoming part of the Union would also make overall employment 
prospects in Switzerland "less negative":  as an EU member, 
Switzerland could expect to lose about 13,000 jobs by the year 2000; 
if it remained outside the Union, however, it would face the 
prospect of losing 30,000 jobs in the same period. 

   The study found that those industries which are already 
internationally oriented would profit most if Switzerland joined the 
EU.  The service sector, for example, would register 25.5 billion 
Swiss francs (SFr) in annual growth in the EU, versus SFr22 billion 
outside.  Similarly, the Swiss chemical industry would grow by 
SFr4.4 billion inside the EU, but by only SFR3.1 billion outside. 
Other industries more oriented toward domestic consumption, however, 
would suffer in the event of Swiss EU entry.  The food and luxury 
goods industry, for example, could expect "slight" growth of SFr40 
million outside the EU but would shrink by SFr700 million if 
Switzerland joined the Union.  EU membership would also mean losses 
for the agriculture and clothing industries.  (RoH)  (Duesseldorf 
HANDELSBLATT in German 25 Jan 94 p 8) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France 

   --Sweden's Volvo, France's Renault to close Volvo Car Purchasing, 
their joint central purchasing agency, according to unnamed Volvo 
subcontractors. .. closure follows recent failure of merger plans 
between Volvo, Renault.. .Volvo reportedly ready to discuss joint 
development of cars with co-national car maker Saab. (LA TRIBUNE 
DESFOSSES 26 Jan 94 p 15) 

   --Returning from trip to Asia, Industry Minister Gerard Longuet 
announced French Asian initiative to be launched. . .goal to 
increase 
Asian share of French exports to 10 percent from current 7 percent. 
(LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement p IV) 

   --Small Toulouse-based company, Communications Telephoniques 
Internationales (CTI), is challenging France Telecom monopoly by 
offering 15-25 percent rate reductions on international 
communications.. .CTI system passes company communications through 
foreign operators. . .most clients belong to aerospace industry 
doing 
business in Britain, United States. (LE FIGAR0 Le Fig-Eco supplement 
3 Feb 94 p VI) 

   Greece 

   --Legislation pending to dismiss about 30,000 civil servants 
appointed by former New Democracy (ND) government. . .4,000 
temporary, 
permanent workers dismissed by ND to be reinstated. (TA NEA 15 Jan 
94 p 10) 

   Portugal 

   --Unemployment in Porto increased by 29,000 jobs from July 92 
through December 93 following steady decrease for seven years; 
textile, steel industries most affected. .. losses stem from lack of 
significant domestic, foreign investment, now concentrated in 
Lisbon, Setubal. (DIARIO DE NOTICIAS 28 Jan 94 p 2) 

   --In February Permanent Joint Commission for Mozambique's Cahora 
Bassa Dam to plan rebuilding electric lines to South 
Africa. .. Italy's $50 million financial withdrawal responsible for 
project delay. .. French, Norwegian, European banks proposing 
alternative financing. .. Portugal meanwhile burdened with yearly 3- 
million conto maintenance payment. (DIARIO DE NOTICIAS 21 Jan 94 p 
2) 

   Anilla B. (703-733-6285), Roger B. (703-733-6508), Robert H. 
(703-733-6504), Dian I. (703-733-6286), Rosa M. (703-733-6287), 
Wendy S. (703-733-6506), and Charles W. (703-733-6473) contributed 
to this Foreign Media Survey. 
ELAG/10 FEB/EC0NF/WED/PF 10/1818z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24657 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   11 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-020--RUSSIA 
<H3> <TI>      RUSSIA: 'WAR' ERUPTS OVER SCIENCE BUDGET </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     long-standing conflict between the Russian Academy of 
Sciences (RAS) and the Ministries of Science and Technology Policy 
and of Finance took a turn for the worse as a result of several 
recent presidential edicts and decisions on the budgets for the 
fourth quarter of 1993 and for 1994.  Other prominent S&amp;T 
organizations are now joining in the feud, some taking sides with 
the Academy, others supporting the science ministry. 

   Academy of Sciences leaders lashed out against the government 
ministries when they learned that, contrary to past practice, the 
Academy had been dropped as a separate line item in both the budget 
for the fourth quarter of 1993 and the new 1994 state budget.  Fuel 
was added to the fire when the budget announcements were followed by 
a Council of Ministers decree ensuring funds for the state science 
centers, but completely ignoring the Academy (Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA 
GAZETA 10 Jan 94).  In what several newspapers described as a 
"declaration of war," the Academy's leadership fired off letters to 
President Yeltsin and "bombarded the Ministry of Science with angry 
calls" (Moscow SEGODNYA 11 Jan 94).  They threatened to close eight 
or nine institutes and to take the "extreme step" of publicly 
expressing no confidence in the Russian ministers of science and 
finance (Moscow IZVESTIYA 23 Dec 93).  RAS President Yuriy Osipov 
described the Academy's situation as "catastrophic."  Other RAS 
leaders interpreted the budget decisions as steps in the Ministry of 
Science's "strategic plan" to bring about the "liquidation" of the 
Academy by diverting all science-designated financial resources to a 
system of ministry-controlled state science centers (Moscow SEGODNYA 
30 Dec 93). 

   There is evidence to support the Academy leadership's interpreta- 
tion of the government's actions.  Minister of Science and 
Technology Policy Boris Saltykov has often said that the Russian 
Academy of Sciences, in its present form, is one of Russia's most 
conservative organizations and can only be reformed through the 
creation of a system of parallel, alternative structures.  Saltykov 
proposed creating a system of federal or state science centers 
funded by the Ministry of Science, which were to compete for funds 
to fulfill priority state S&amp;T programs.  The centers would be drawn 

from RAS-owned institutes, thus effectively removing them from RAS 
control.  The Russian Academy of Sciences and conservative 
government bureaucrats lobbied intensely against the proposal, but 
President Yeltsin approved it on 22 June.  Efforts to derail 
implementation of the proposal continued despite Yeltsin's approval. 
(See FB PN 93-451, 7 Dec 93: "Russian Science: Improved Prospects 
for Reforms" and FB PN 93-307, 16 Jul 93: "Russian Academy of 
Sciences: Enemies Within, Enemies Without.") 

   The budget decisions appear to be a setback for RAS efforts to 
obstruct the state science center proposal.  Furthermore, the RAS 
may have lost credibility with President Yeltsin and his cabinet. 
Press accounts indicate that RAS President Yuriy Osipov, who has 
complained often and personally to Prime Minister Chernomyrdin and 
President Yeltsin about Saltykov and his policies, suddenly found in 
December that his access to the prime minister had been blocked. 
According to IZVESTIYA, Osipov said that he was unable to contact 
the prime minister for three weeks, even by phone.  "On various 
pretexts, the clerks manning the government telephones refused to 
put the Academy of Sciences president through to their boss" (Moscow 
IZVESTIYA 23 Dec 93; Moscow SEGODNYA 30 Dec 93). 

   Another media reports indicated that Osipov did finally meet with 
Chernomyrdin, who promised him that the Academy would be paid its 
arrears for the fourth quarter, amounting to 24 billion rubles 
(Moscow Television Network 1700 GMT 21 Dec 93).  Afterwards, Osipov 
publicly expressed doubts that the Academy would actually receive 
the money, and his doubts may be justified.  A 21 December 
presidential edict ordered the Ministry of Finance to "ensure that 
the amended expenditures of the republic budget of the Russian 
Federation for the fourth quarter be financed as budget revenues are 
received."  The edict reaffirmed the very policy which has been the 
major point of contention between the Academy and the Ministry of 
Finance.  In order to control inflation, the Ministry of Finance 
releases funds as it receives them.  Often there is not enough money 
in the treasury to go around, and many organizations, including the 
RAS, do not receive the amount of funds allocated by the Supreme 
Soviet or promised by the Council of Ministers (Moscow INTERFAX 29 
Dec 93). 

   Other major science institutions experiencing similar budget 
problems, especially in the medical and biological sciences sector, 
are now becoming more vocal in their complaints against the Ministry 
of Finance.  The Ministry of Finance owes the Ministry of Health 
nearly 14 million rubles, the Russian Academy of Military Sciences 
15 million rubles, and the State Committee for Sanitary and 
Epidemiological Supervision 931 million rubles.  The Russian Academy 
of Medical Sciences received only two thirds of the funds it was 
supposed to get in 1993 and is complaining that this shortfall has 
disrupted many of its programs.  The president of the Academy of 
Medical Sciences warned of a "brain drain" and complained that "a 
crisis has come about in the medical and biological industry, which 
if left unresolved, will force us to buy large quantities of 
medicine abroad" (Moscow Russian Television Network 1700 GMT 21 Dec 
93; Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA 23 Dec 93). 

   Not everyone is complaining, however.  Directors of nine leading 
R&amp;D institutes addressed a letter to President Yeltsin in support of 

Saltykov and the Ministry of Science, urging the government to 
continue its competitive financing policy and to bring an end to 
"departmental financing. "  Among the letter's authors were 
directors of the Kurchatov Institute of Nuclear Physics, the RAS 
Institute of Physics, the Institute of Physical Chemistry, Russian 
Research Center for Applied Chemistry, and the All Russian Institute 
of Electrical Machinery (Moscow ITAR-TASS 1220 GMT, 9 Jan 93). 

   Likewise, at a routine session of the Governmental Commission for 
Operational Questions, First Vice Premier Oleg Soskovets, a doctor 
of sciences and a professor, warned that, while it is impossible to 
"live" on 60-70 percent of what the state promised, it is also "an 
impermissible luxury to have several institutions studying one and 
the same problem." Soskovets said that scientists must reorganize 
themselves, because the days are gone when scientists do not have to 
account for the funds that they receive or for the work that they do 
(Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA 23 Dec 93). 

   (AUTHOR:  TYSON.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, COMMONWEALTH OF INDEPENDENT STATES BRANCH AT (703) 733-6332). 
GIG/10JAN94/POLCHF/TID/PF 10/2151z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24658 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   15 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-14FEB94-DPRK-U. S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI> </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Pyongyang       Sees U.S., IAEA Shift, Limits Rhetoric 

                         SUMMARY 

   Responding to what it has portrayed as a "clarification" of 
Washington's and the International Atomic Energy Agency's (IAEA) 
stance on the nuclear inspection issue, Pyongyang has hinted at a 
willingness to compromise on the nuclear inspection issue. 
Pyongyang's tentative search for common ground comes amid other 
signs of leadership efforts to limit both the scope and tone of 
its current public criticism of Washington. 

                        END SUMMARY 

   Pyongyang's intimation that it is seeking a possible compromise 
solution on the nuclear issue came in a Foreign Ministry 
spokesman's remarks ostensibly made to a KCNA reporter on 12 
February (Pyongyang Television).  In stating that Pyongyang has 
conveyed its 31 January public allegation of U.S. bad faith to 
Washington through "a relevant channel," the Foreign Ministry 
spokesman also claimed that the U.S. side has "clarified" points 
raised by North Korea--a formulation that could conceivably 
provide Pyongyang with an acceptable way to modify its stance 
without losing face.  The spokesman, softening Pyongyang's 
recently heightened rhetoric, claimed that Washington has assured 
Pyongyang that: 
   + IAEA nuclear inspections should be "purely to ensure the 
continuity of safeguards."  (The spokesman did not elaborate on 
what constitutes the "continuity of safeguards "--a point of 
contention between Pyongyang and the IAEA.) 
   + There is no change in the U.S. willingness to continue DPRK- 
U.S. talks and that Washington is ready to discuss improvement of 
bilateral relations, along with the nuclear issue, at the next 
round of high-level talks. 
   In a further move that could provide Pyongyang with the context 
to amend its heretofore rigid stance on the nuclear issue, the 
spokesman on 12 February also claimed that the IAEA has modified 
its demands, asserting that the IAEA has "hinted" at "renouncing" 
its "absurd former demands" for "full-scope inspection." 
   Pyongyang's Demands     Pyongyang apparently still expects 
Washington to make concrete moves to demonstrate the resolve to 
negotiate the nuclear issue, including the cancellation of the 
U.S.-ROK joint maneuvers.  The spokesman said that if Washington 
is "truly" interested in a negotiated settlement on the nuclear 
issue, it should prove its good faith "by action."  Without 
directly listing Pyongyang's demands, the spokesman called on 
Washington to halt its "pressure" tactics, expressing, in 
particular, a concern about the following recent developments 
that cast "deep doubts" about U.S. sincerity: 
   + Team Spirit preparations.  To underscore the importance North 
Korea attaches to this issue, Pyongyang radio in a commentary on 
14 February revived the once standard warning that staging Team 
Spirit would be an "intolerable" act that would bring the Korean 
peninsula "to the brink of war." 
   + Reported U.S. moves toward sanctions against the DPRK, 
including a U.S. Senate resolution on that issue and U.S. 
discussions of the topic with other UN Security Council permanent 
members. 
   + Continued demands by "U.S. hardline conservatives" for the 
application of "pressure" against the DPRK. 
   Efforts to Limit Rhetorical Scope     Suggesting that Pyongyang 
wishes to avoid expanding the scope of current polemics with 
Washington, the spokesman avoided mentioning the issue of 
deploying the Patriot missile to South Korea.  The Patriot issue 
had previously generated a considerable amount of criticism in 
Pyongyang media (Pyongyang radio, 28, 31 January). 
   North Korea's monitored central media have also failed so far to 
even mention a 6 February New York Times article on purported 
U.S. war plans, which received extensive, and even sensational, 
coverage in South Korean media.  Instead of reporting on the 
article in its central media, Pyongyang relegated protests over 
the article to the clandestine radio Voice of National Salvation 
(VNS), which is beamed from the North to the South.  Going beyond 
merely reiterating Pyongyang's recent charges that Washington is 
pursuing DPRK-U.S. talks solely for the purpose of "crushing the 
DPRK," VNS's 8 February commentary on the New York Times article 
depicted the United States as a "vampire who cannot live even a 
single day without blood" and with whom North Korea "cannot live 
under the same sky"--harsh rhetoric that has not appeared in 
central Pyongyang media criticism of Washington in recent years 
(SEE NOTE). 
   NOTE: The last monitored use of similar language was against ROK 
President No Tae-u's government in 1991.  Protesting against 
Seoul's crackdown on student demonstrations in which one student 
was killed, KCNA called the ROK government a "vampire" with whom 
"no one can live under the same sky" (18 June 1991). 
   The fact that Pyongyang central media appears to be passing up 
opportunities to publiciZe what could be characteriZed as 
evidence of U.S. intentions to "crush" the DPRK suggests that the 
North Korean leadership is taking the New York Times article 
seriously and is attempting to avoid provoking a potential 
showdown with Washington.  In the past, North Korea tended to 
delay authoritative comment when the situation on the Korean 
peninsula became critical, as was the case after the 
assassination of ROK President Pak Chong-hui in 1979 and student 
riots in Kwangju in 1980, both of which resulted in the 
proclamation of martial law in South Korea. 
   Implications     Pyongyang media treatment of recent developments 
surrounding the nuclear inspection issue suggests that while the 
North Korean leadership is still reluctant to foreclose 
negotiations, it has no illusions about the seriousness of the 
situation.  The Foreign Ministry spokesman's 12 February 
pronouncement suggests that Pyongyang is hoping to use perceived 
shifts in U.S. and IAEA "clarifications" to justify a compromise 
on the nuclear issue.  Nevertheless, Pyongyang is signaling a 
concurrent readiness to risk aggravated international isolation- 
-or worse--if Washington and the IAEA do not provide a symbolic 
concession, such as cancellation of Team Spirit. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/cth 14/2351z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24659 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-15FEB94-ALGERIA 
<H3> <TI>      Regime, Islamists Call for Dialogue, But Doubts Persist </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               Both newly installed President Liamine Zeroual and spokesmen for 
the banned Islamic Salvation Front (FIS) have affirmed a desire 
for political dialogue to find a way out of Algeria's violent, 
protracted political crisis.  Neither side, however, has thus far 
indicated a clear willingness to adopt positions sufficiently 
flexible to permit serious negotiations.  In addition, pressure 
from both hardliners within the regime and the Islamist 
opposition as well as apparent divisions among militant Islamists 
further diminish the prospects for an easing of current tensions. 
                           END SUMMARY 
   In his first major speech to the nation on 7 February, Zeroual 
evidently attempted to strike a balance between indicating his 
readiness to negotiate with Islamist opponents of the regime and 
reassuring regime hardliners that he will not back off from a 
nationwide campaign to crush violent opposition.  Algeria's 
political crisis, he said, "can be solved only through dialogue 
and with the participation of the national political and social 
forces--without exception."  He pledged broad reforms, saying 
that "radical solutions to the political, economic, social, and 
cultural issues are inevitable," but as has generally been the 
case in major speeches by regime leaders, he failed to go beyond 
generalities.  Moreover, despite his implicit appeal to Islamists 
to negotiate with his government, Zeroual went on to vow that the 
government "will use all resources to contain violence and end 
the bloodletting" and "will never tolerate those who are trying 
to sow the seeds of sedition and chaos."  "No religious, 
political, or cultural reason," he asserted, "can explain or 
justify the crimes that have been committed against people and 
property," and he warned that "political pluralism and democratic 
practice do not mean the weakening of the state." (Algiers TV). 
   While clearly warning that the military-dominated regime will 
continue its fight against opponents whom it regards as 
terrorists, Zeroual nonetheless adopted a more accommodating tone 
toward Islamists than he did in the weeks preceding his 
installation as president on 31 January.  For example, speaking 
in his former capacity as defense minister on 16 January, he 
acknowledged the need for reform but, in alluding to Islamists, 
repudiated the claims of some leaders to be seeking genuine 
negotiations with the regime, denouncing their "parasitic 
political tendencies" and the "blatant contradictions between the 
programs and ideas of some parties and their noncompliance with 
the terms of the Constitution" (Algiers TV, 16 January). 
   Measured FIS Response 
   Interviewed from exile in Germany, prominent FIS official Rabah 
Kebir reacted cautiously to Zeroual's 7 February speech, 
attempting to shift to the government the onus for making 
concessions to start negotiations.  Kebir asserted that 
''negotiations are the key to a solution in Algeria" but added 
that "we must wait for actual deeds" from the government and 
charged that Zeroual's speech contained "contradictions."  "On 
the one hand," Kebir said, "Liamine Zeroual insists on using 
violence . . . while on the other he is insisting on dialogue." 
To prove its "serious desire" for negotiations, Kebir said, the 
government must begin by "releasing all prisoners," most notably 
the FIS' two top officials, Abbassi Madani and Ali Belhadj.  FIS 
leaders, Kebir added, could reach a "final decision" on any 
regime offer to negotiate "once they are able to meet with their 
historic leadership," that is, prominent leaders imprisoned by 
the regime (London MBC TV, 8 February). 
   Anouar Nasr-al-Din Haddam, identified as head of the FIS 
"parliamentary mission in Europe and the United States," echoed 
Kebir's cautious position in another interview.  He first 
dismissed Zeroual as "just the other side of the same coin" and 
charged that the current Algerian regime, through Zeroual's 
appointment, "is trying to remain in power but with a new face." 
He went on, however, to voice hope that "this new face will focus 
on the basic factors behind the Algerian crisis and extricate the 
country from it."  Haddam also hinted several times at quiet 
contacts between FIS and the government, saying in one instance 
"we always prefer that our contacts with Liamine Zeroual or 
others remain away from the limelight."  Nevertheless, he 
insisted that the government must recognize "free popular choice 
as the basis for any political authority" and, lest there be any 
doubt, explained his allusion by recalling the FIS victory in the 
1990 elections, which prompted the current regime to seize power. 
Haddam also warned that FIS would not be satisfied with a token 
release of prisoners, saying that "we are not primarily 
interested about one person or a small group of persons" (Paris 
Al-Watan Al-'Arabi, 11 February). 
   A Regime Gesture to Islamists? 
   In an interview conducted while he was in Brussels for a meeting 
of the European-Algerian joint economic council, a principal 
vehicle for European aid to Algeria, Algerian Foreign Minister 
Mohamed Saleh Dembri reiterated Zeroual's call for dialogue but 
hinted that the government is still not willing to deal with some 
fundamentalist leaders.  Dialogue, he said, is "open to all the 
children of Algeria . . . without exception," but he added that 
"the only people excluded would be those for whom violence and 
terrorism are a way of achieving or maintaining power," a charge 
that the regime has at times leveled at Islamist opponents in 
general.  Dembri answered "absolutely" when asked if the proposed 
dialogue would include Islamic fundamentalists, explaining that 
"Algeria needs all its children to get out of a crisis with many 
aspects."  However, again seemingly excluding some Islamists from 
such a dialogue, he attached the ambiguous condition that "there 
were more qualified formulations concerning certain persons who 
had violated the laws" (Brussels La Libre Belgique, 8 February). 
On 9 February, the London-based Saudi daily Al-Sharq Al-Awsat 
reported that Dembri had told the paper "a general amnesty will 
be issued soon for all political prisoners," but the paper 
provided no details. 
   Islamists' Divisions Hamper Dialogue 
   Even if the government were to make significant gestures toward 
Islamists, both the refusal of some militant fundamentalists to 
renounce violence and reported rivalries within various Islamist 
movements would seriously complicate any attempt at negotiations. 
For example: 
   --The London weekly Al-Wasat carried an interview with Sayfallah 
Ja'far, identified as a leader of the Armed Islamic Group (GIA), 
a shadowy organization linked with numerous recent terrorist 
attacks in Algeria, in which he denounced FIS leaders for having 
"sold out the cause" and even professed not to recognize the name 
of FIS.  Ja'far vowed to continue "direct military action," 
including attacks on foreigners in Algeria, whom he branded as 
"part of an infidel, colonialist scheme" and "spies for the 
infidels in the Islamic world."  Moreover, he explained, by 
"killing and fighting" foreigners, his organization establishes 
"practical evidence of the weakness of the infidel regime" [in 
Algiers] (24 January). 
   --On 7 February, the French news agency AFP reported receiving a 
communique from the GIA announcing the "execution" of 70 members 
of another violent, underground Islamist organization, the Armed 
Islamic Movement (MIA).  According to AFP, the communique accused 
the MIA of trying to "suppress" the GIA and accused its leader of 
being a "traitor and agent of the government services." 
   --An article appearing in the London daily Al-Hayah may have shed 
further light on the reported GIA communique.  Citing an unnamed 
source in the FIS, the paper reported differences between 
political and "military" wings of the organization, adding that 
some FIS members are planning a "serious" escalation of anti- 
regime violence.  According to the source, FIS members have 
formed their own "Islamic Salvation Army" after resolving a 
dispute with the MIA and have successfully recruited "most 
members" of the GIA away from that organization (4 February). 
   Implications 
   It is unlikely that any concessions President Zeroual might offer 
will persuade many Algerian Islamists to abandon their opposition 
to the current regime.  In particular, those actively engaged in 
violent attacks seem almost certain to remain unmoved.  In 
addition, the regime faces a formidable task in rallying support 
among a broader, disaffected Algerian public, most of which 
probably does not embrace militant Islamic fundamentalism but 
which has also lost confidence in the existing government 
following three years of unfulfilled promises of reform. 
   (AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/PF 15/2019z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24660 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-023--SYRIA 
<H3> <TI>      SYRIA: NEWSPAPER TREATMENT OF PRESIDENT CLINTON'S STATEMENT </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Syrian         press coverage of the joint press conference held by 
       Presidents Clinton and al-Asad at the conclusion of their 
       summit meeting in Geneva on 16 January suggests that Damascus 
       sought to achieve at least two objectives in its coverage: to 
       emphasize the comprehensiveness of an eventual Middle East 
       peace settlement, while obscuring the notion of normalizing 
       relations with Israel, and to embellish al-Asad's role in the 
       peace process and his status as reflected in President 
       Clinton's remarks. 

   On 16 January 1994, at the conclusion of the Geneva summit, 
Syrian President Hafiz al-Asad and U.S. President Clinton held a 
joint press conference in which both presidents made opening 
statements.  The entire press conference, including President 
Clinton's remarks, was carried live on the Damascus Syrian Arab 
Television Network and was published in the 17 January editions of 
the Arabic-language Damascus dailies AL-BA'TH, organ of the Arab 
Socialist Ba'th Party, AL-THAWRAH, and TISHRIN.  An English text was 
also published by the English-language Damascus daily THE SYRIA 
TIMES. 

   An examination of the official U.S. Government text of President 
Clinton's statement and the corresponding Syrian versions, both 
Arabic and English, reveals discrepancies that, in several 
instances, change the emphasis of President Clinton's original text. 
The three Arabic-language Damascus dailies carry the same text of 
President Clinton's statement.  The English text published in THE 
SYRIA TIMES is basically identical to the Arabic version but 
contains some inconsequential stylistic changes.  They all digress 
from President Clinton's original by omitting, substituting, or 
reformulating some of the President's ideas. 

   Below are examples of the most noteworthy discrepancies between 
the official U.S. text of Clinton's statement and the Syrian 
version, which is translated from the Arabic text, except where 
noted.  The portions between slantlines are where the texts 
differed.  The examples below are arranged in the order in which 
they appear in President Clinton's statement. 

U.S.:      From the first days of my administration, the achievement 
           of a comprehensive peace //between Israel and its Arab 
           neighbors//,based on Security Council Resolutions 242 and 
           338 and the principle of territory for peace has been 
           //one of the highest foreign policy objectives.// 

Syrian:    Since the first days of my administration, the 
           achievement of comprehensive peace //in the region 
           based// on Resolutions 242 and 338 and the principle of 
           land for peace was (one of) //the priorities of my 
           administration.// 

U.S.:      ....I'm now pleased to have had this opportunity to hear 
           personally President al-Asad's views about how to best 
           make this year a year of breakthroughs.// 

Syrian:    //I am personally happy to have held this meeting with 
           President al-Asad and to listen to his point of view on 
           the best ways to make peace.// 

U.S.:      During our meeting //I told President al-Asad// that 
           I was personally committed to the objective of a 
           //comprehensive and secure peace that would produce 
           genuine reconciliation among the peoples of the Middle 
           East.//  I told him of my view that the agreement between 
           Israel and the PLO constituted an //important// first 
           step by establishing //an agreed// basis for resolving 
           //the Palestinian problem.//  //I also told// him that 
           I believe //Syria is the key to the achievement of an 
           enduring and comprehensive peace that finally will put an 
           end to the conflict between Israel and her Arab 
           neighbors. 

Syrian:    During our talks, //I assured// (akkadtu li-) President 
           al-Asad// that I was personally committed to the 
           achievement of //peace in the Middle East,// and I told 
           him that the agreement between Israel and the PLO 
           constituted a //first step toward creating a basis for// 
           resolving //the conflict.  I assured him that Syria's 
           role is a decisive one if we want to produce a real and 
           lasting peace in the region.// 

U.S.:      President al-Asad, as you have just heard, shares this 
           objective: not just an end to war, but the establishment 
           //of real and comprehensive peace with Israel that will 
           ensure normal, peaceful relations among good neighbors.// 

Syrian:    President Hafiz al-Asad, as you have just heard, shares 
           this objective with me: //the achievement of a lasting 
           and comprehensive peace.// 

U.S.:      Crucial decisions will have to be made by //Syria and 
           Israel// if this common objective is to be achieved.... 
           Accordingly, //we pledged today to work together// in 
           order to bring the //negotiations that started in Madrid 
           over two years ago to a prompt and successful 
           conclusion. // 

Syrian:    Decisive decisions have to be made by the //concerned 
           parties// for achieving peace. . .Today, //we have worked 
           together// to make the peace //negotiations that started 
           in Madrid a success.// 

U.S.:      //Critical issues// remain to be resolved, especially the 
           questions relating to withdrawals, to peace and 
           security--//excuse me--the question of relating 
           withthdrawal to peace and security.// 

Syrian:    There are //numerous problems// (THE SYRIA TIMES text has 
           "several problems") that must be solved, and there are 
           //questions relating to withdrawal, peace, and security. 
           We shall try to find solutions to these questions.// 

U.S.:      President al-Asad and I also discussed the state of 
           relations between the United States and Syria, and 
           //agreed on the desirability of improving them.  This 
           requires honestly addressing the problems in our 
           relationship. // 
Syrian:    We also discussed bilateral relations between Syria and 
           the United States, and we //agreed to improve these 
           relations.//  We want that.  //This requires making 
           efforts to improve these relations.// 

(QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/15 Feb/POLCHF/NEASA Division/PF 15/2050z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24661 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-024--SO. KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      SOUTH KOREA:  Press Sources Urge Patience in Dealing With North </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Korea 

    SUMMARY:  Two South Korean press reports warn that U.S. and ROK 
leaders would be making a "grave mistake" in thinking that the third 
round of U.S.-North Korea talks would lead to an agreement with 
North Korea, allowing the two Koreas to exchange special envoys and 
the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) to conduct full-scale 
inspections of DPRK nuclear sites.  Both press reports conclude that 
North Korea will not easily relinquish its "nuclear card" and that 
the United States and the ROK should not be too optimistic when 
dealing with the DPRK. 

   According to the 2O January CHUNGANG ILBO, several Beijing-based 
diplomats of former Eastern Bloc nations and western analysts with a 
background on PRC and DPRK affairs believe that North Korea will 
hold on to its "nuclear card" as long as it is useful.  These 
experts said the DPRK is "well aware that the nuclear issue is only 
the beginning," and once that is settled, the Clinton administration 
will just move on to the human rights issue, which will eventually 
lead up to Kim Il-song and Kim Chong-il. 

   CHUNGANG's sources opined that North Korea will stand firm on the 
nuclear issue until the U.S. Government guarantees it will:  1) 
suspend Team Spirit, 2) refrain from imposing economic sanctions on 
North Korea, 3) re-establish diplomatic relations with the DPRK, 4) 
recognize and accept the current North Korean political structure, 
and 5) give aid to North Korea.  CHUNGANG notes that a "high-ranking 
ROK Embassy official" in Beijing agrees with this assessment, and 
furthermore is of the opinion that since "the PRC leaders know what 
North Korea is after, they can only go so far in influencing and 
advising the North on the nuclear issue." 

   The February WOLGAN CHOSON quotes Yi Tong-pok--an expert with 2O 
years of experience on North Korean affairs at the National Security 
Planning Board (NSP) and a special assistant to the NSP director 
until December 1993--who holds the view that the DPRK created the 
nuclear weapons program to sustain its political structure, in other 
words, to "keep the Kim dynasty alive."  Yi also sys that North 
Korea will not give up its "nuclear card," unless it is a matter of 
life or death.  Furthermore, he affirms, the North "cannot 
financially afford to start a war against the United States and 
South Korea at this time, or in the near future."  He also states 
that the North is playing a waiting game, hoping that the 
"impatient" U.S. Government will "cave in" first.  Fortunately, the 
U.S.-South Korean side has the advantage, because the North "can 
only buy so much time," given the state of its economy, Yi says.  He 
further advises that approaching the North with only "carrots" would 
give the wrong signal, because this will be viewed as a "sign of 
weakness," whereas using "more sticks" might bring better results. 
Many experts believe that economic sanctions will not hurt North 
Korea since it has so little trade with other countries, but in Yi's 
opinion, the country will be "hurt badly" if the sanctions can 
effectively stop the flow of cash from the "Chochongnyon" (pro-North 
organization of Koreans in Japan). 

   Yi goes on to say that continuing efforts to carry on a dialogue 
with the North to deter it from making or attempting to make nuclear 
weapons and to prevent it from "weakening or destroying" the 
International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) and the Non-Proliferation 
Treaty (NPT) are the "current tasks" of the U.S. Government.  He 
believes that both the United States and South Korea must show that 
they do not fear North Korea and know how to cope with the 
situation, even if that country already has one or two nuclear 
weapons.  As long as the United States shows patience in dealing 
with the DPRK, time is on its side, according to Yi. 

   (AUTHOR:  TOMPKINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, SOUTHEAST ASIA/KOREA BRANCH AT (7O3) 733-6522) 
EAG/15FEB94/POLCHF/ASIA DIVISION/SMB 15/2036Z FEB 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24662 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
VIENNA PLEASE PASS TO BOSNIA. 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-15FEB94-CROATIA-BOSNIA 
<H3> <TI>      Croatia--Bosnia-Herzegovina </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Statements     Suggest Scope of Zagreb's Intervention in Bosnia 


                         SUMMARY 

   Zagreb has agreed under threat of sanctions to consider 
withdrawing forces it admits are present in border areas inside 
Bosnia-Herzegovina  while continuing to deny that it has 
intervened in the Bosnian war.  At the same time, some recent 
statements from Zagreb suggest that Croatia is more deeply 
involved in the Bosnian war than its leaders have previously 
admitted. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   In the wake of a UN Security Council demand issued on 2 February 
that Croatia withdraw all elements of its army from Bosnia- 
Herzegovina--and having received warnings from the United States 
and from European Union of the possibility that it could be put 
under economic sanctions like Yugoslavia--Zagreb has promised to 
comply with the UN's ultimatum.  At the same time, the government 
of President Franjo Tudjman has claimed that it is only minimally 
and indirectly involved in aiding the war efforts of the Bosnian 
Croats.   Zagreb television, apparently attempting to downplay 
the Croatian government's implicit acknowledgment that Croatian 
Army (HV) units are present in Bosnia-Herzegovina, reported that 
Foreign Minister Mate Granic had sent a letter to UN Secretary 
General Butrus Butrus-Ghali assuring him of Croatia's "readiness" 
to "reduce tensions" between the Croatian and Muslim sides" in 
the Bosnian war (Zagreb TV, 11 February).  In a television 
interview the next day, Granic explained that HV units would 
withdraw from "border areas," but that Croatia would insist that 
the UN establish "control" over the Croat-Bosnian border (Zagreb 
TV, 12 February).  At a 14 February UN Security Council session, 
Croatian Ambassador to the UN Mario Nobilo, without directly 
addressing the issue of the HV's intervention in Bosnia, 
reiterated Zagreb's willingness to cooperate with the Security 
Council.  He stressed that the Croats hoped that the success of 
recent talks between the Croatian side and the Bosnian government 
would reduce the threat to Bosnian Croats (Zagreb TV, 15 
February). 

   Denials of Large-Scale Intervention 
   Despite the announcement that it would comply with the Security 
Council's demand that it withdraw its forces from Bosnia, the 
Croatian government has continued to deny that its army units are 
fighting against Bosnian government forces.  Insisting that 
troops arriving from Croatia to fight are volunteers of "Bosnian 
origin," the Croatian Council of Defense and Security, a body 
chaired by Tudjman, declared that "about 2,000 volunteer 
soldiers" had been "allowed" to leave the Croatian Army and "go 
to help their kin" in order "to protect them from aggression and 
ethnic cleansing."  These soldiers "deployed" in Bosnia Croat 
units did "not engage in any operations to capture territories 
that belong to somebody else but only defended their centuries- 
old hearths."  While the statement claimed that the "Croatian 
public has supported" those who went to fight in Bosnia, it did 
not elaborate on whether that support was material in nature 
(Zagreb radio, 5 February). 

   At the same time, the Council of Defense and Security statement 
acknowledged that, according to the terms of an agreement between 
Bosnian President Alija Izetbegovic and Tudjman signed in July 
1992, some HV units are present on Bosnian territory.  However, 
the statement insisted that "Croatian army units are deployed 
only in the border area" between Croatia and the Herzegovina 
region of Bosnia-Herzegovina "above Dubrovnik toward Stolac and 
the Neretva River" (Zagreb radio, 5 February).  The statement did 
not specify which units nor how many soldiers were involved, but 
Stolac is about 20 kilometers from the Croatian border, while the 
Neretva valley stretches north from the border through Mostar, 
suggesting that the Croats may have adopted a loose definition of 
"border areas."  Responding to the UN Security Council's demand 
that Croatia withdraw its forces from Bosnia, Croatian Ambassador 
to the UN Mario Nobilo, echoing recent remarks by Tudjman, 
insisted that the presence of these troops was justified on the 
basis of the July 1992 Izetbegovic-Tudjman agreement, adding that 
their removal would "seriously jeopardize the territorial 
integrity and security of Croatia" (Zagreb radio, 4 February and 
11 January). 

   Hints of Deeper Involvement 

   Statements from other Croatian leaders suggest a more significant 
commitment of military resources to the Bosnian war than that 
acknowledged by the 5 February Council of Defense and Security 
statement.  Croat leaders including Tudjman have hinted at the 
need for such support for the Bosnian Croats since fighting broke 
out between Serbs and Croats in northern Bosnia in March 1992, 
but have denied that Croatia provided direct aid: 

   Bobetko.  Croatian Army Chief of Staff General Janko Bobetko has 
made several statements that suggest a much higher level of 
support to the Bosnian Croats than the Croatian government has 
admitted. During a 29 December 1993 interview on Zagreb 
television Bobetko, claimed that "a large number" of Croats with 
roots in Bosnia-Herzegovina "are now defending Bosnia," adding 
that when the Yugoslav Chief of Staff Momcilo Perisic claims that 
there are 60,000 Croatian soldiers fighting in Bosnia- 
Herzegovina, "it seems he has a good computer and can count the 
heads."  Bobetko maintained that it should be "no surprise" that 
there would be a large Croatian force in Bosnia because the 
Croats there are "being subjected to the kind of genocide 
experienced at Vukovar" and elsewhere within the territory of the 
Republic of Croatia.  Bobetko asserted that "it is a fact" the 
aid to Bosnia "represents a big part of our"--presumably, the 
Ministry of Defense's--"expenditure."  He insisted that the 
"Croatian people must accept" these expenditures "both 
politically and financially."  Similarly, in a 31 January 
interview on Zagreb television, Bobetko referred to "thousands 
and thousands" of Croats born in Bosnia and currently living in 
Croatia who were affected by the war, asking rhetorically, "Who 
has got the right to forbid me or any Croat from Bosnia" the 
right to defend his family? 

   Susak.  Without referring specifically to sending troops to 
Bosnia, Defense Minister Gojko Susak has also suggested that 
Croatia has provided significant military aid to the Bosnian 
Croats.  In a television interview he stated that "Croatia has 
helped . . . and it will do all it can to help" the Croats in 
Bosnia in the future (Zagreb TV, 28 December 1993). 

   General From Zagreb 

   The appointment of General Ante Roso as commander of the Bosnian 
Croat forces in November 1993 further suggests the degree to 
which the Croatian military has intervened in the Bosnian war and 
raises questions about the claimed origins of the "volunteers" 
who have purportedly returned to their native Bosnia-Herzegovina 
to serve in the Bosnian Croat forces.  Roso, an emigre and former 
French Foreign Legion officer who returned to Croatia after 
independence and joined the Croatian army, was a prominent HV 
general before his switch to the Bosnian Croat army.  He rose to 
prominence in the 1991 war in Croatia and played an important 
role in the January 1993 operation to take back the approaches to 
the Maslenica bridge, then held by the Serb separatists.  A 24 
November article in the Split weekly Nedjeljna Dalmacija asserted 
that, despite Roso's claim that his family is from Herzegovina, 
some claim" he is from Imotski, a town near the border with 
Herzegovina but within Croatian territory. 

   Implications 

   Croatia's reluctance to acknowledge the depth of its direct 
direct involvement in the Bosnian war suggests that it will try 
to evade full compliance with the UN Security Council's demand 
that Croatian forces withdraw from Bosnia.  While wary of 
incurring economic sanctions, the Croatian government has 
repeatedly voiced its fear that the Croats of Bosnia are 
threatened with genocide and is unlikely to withdraw military 
support to the HVO and the so-called Republic of Herzeg-Bosna 
established by the Bosnian Croats.  Like Belgrade, Zagreb is 
likely to continue to insist that it has no direct presence in 
Bosnia but merely lends political support to the efforts of its 
ethnic brothers across the border. 

(AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120) 

ELAG/GILISON/jf 16/0051Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24663 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-16FEB94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Russia:  Zhirinovskiy's Vision of Russia's Future:  "The Last </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Dash  to the South" 

                           SUMMARY 

   In his book, Last Dash to the South (FBIS-SOV-94-022-5, hereafter 
LDTTS), published during the fall 1993 Russian legislative 
campaign, Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR) leader 
Vladimir Zhirinovskiy lays out his vision of Russia as it is 
today--a humiliated nation whose achievements have been 
denegrated and people impoverished--and his strategy for 
restoring Russia to what he sees as its rightful place among the 
world's great powers.  He sees Russia moving, under his 
leadership, from its current stage of humiliation, through a 
stage of national, economic, and military regeneration, and 
ultimately to a stage he calls the end of Russian history, a 
millennium.  The Russian millennium will be achieved when Russia 
consolidates control over its southern sphere of influence, 
stretching south to the Indian Ocean and in so doing puts an end 
to military threats from the region and ushers in an era of peace 
and prosperity for the Russian people.  In Zhirinovskiy's view, 
Russia's regeneration, the prosperity of the Russian people, and 
his own rise to achieve his destiny are interlinked in this three 
stage process.  While The Last Dash to the South presents these 
views in their most focused form, Zhirinovskiy has been 
consistently articulating the elements of this vision in campaign 
appearances, interviews, and other statements at least since his 
emergence on the national political scene as a candidate in 
Russia's 1991 presidential election. 

                           END SUMMARY 

Table of Contents 

Analytical Synopsis 

Appendix of Quotations 

  Humiliation 

     Humiliation of Russia and Russians 

     Humiliation of the army 

     The West as an agent of Russia's humiliation 

     Linking Russia's humiliation to his own 
     On the humiliations of growing up as a Russian in Kazakhstan 

  Regeneration 

     Zhirinovskiy campaigns for the presidency:  A blatant appeal 
to special interests, especially the military 

     Beginning Russia's regeneration 

     Restoring Russia to its former glory under Tsarist and 
Soviet rule, recreating Russia within the borders of the former 
USSR 

     Restoring Russia's economy and military might 

  Bringing the Millennium 

     Russia and the other great powers divide the world into 
spheres of influence 

     Russia consolidates its sphere of influence in the South 

   Analytical Synopsis 

   The three-stage historical process of Russia's regeneration that 
Zhirinovskiy describes in the autobiographical "Last Dash to the 
South" is a comprehensive statement of a vision that he has been 
developing and articulating since the 1991 presidential campaign. 
He sees the vision being fulfilled in a three-stage process, a 
linear and progressive movement from humiliation through 
regeneration to the Russian millennium.  Since he does not regard 
economics, politics, or social issues as separate problems to be 
addressed through separate policies and sees himself a thinker on 
a grand scale rather than an ordinary politician who focuses on 
nuts-and-bolts policy, Zhirinovskiy often makes contradictory 
statements on specific policy issues.  As he sees it, the most 
important thing is to lead Russia to regeneration and the 
millennium; once that is done, the lesser problems will all be 
solved.  While inconsistent on matters of specific policy, his 
statements are consistent in the broad terms of his three-stage 
vision:  Russia's present state of humiliation, Russia's 
regeneration in the near term, and achievement of the Russian 
millennium in the longer term. 

   Zhirinovskiy's vision of Russia's humiliation is national, 
ethnic, and personal, and particularly emphasizes Russia's 
military as prime victims of humiliation.  As a nation, Russia is 
a victim of the tragic disintegration of a great and good empire. 
Russia has been the world's savior on numerous occasions, but the 
world is not grateful.  External enemies, with help from internal 
collaborators, have brought Russia down, destroying its economic 
and military might.  The Russian people, a hard-working and noble 
people, are humiliated and impoverished at home, exploited and 
oppressed by corrupt new rulers.  Russians have been turned into 
second class citizens in the states of the former USSR.  Russia's 
soldiers have been humiliated at home and abroad and the terms 
soldier and officer have become almost curse words.  Zhirinovskiy 
often parallels his own personal humiliation and poverty (The 
Last Dash highlights his personal struggle against hide-bound 
bureaucracy and crushing poverty, casting him as the under- 
appreciated and oppressed underdog) with the Russian people's 
daily struggles.  He sees humiliation as pervasive (he is 
constantly reminding his audience of its, and his own, 
humiliation) but also as a stimulus to taking action to begin the 
regeneration. 

   Again linking his own fate to Russia's, Zhirinovskiy implies, 
particularly in his campaign rhetoric during the fall 1993 
legislative elections, that Russia's restoration to its past 
glories and the revitalization of its military and economic 
strength will begin almost as soon as the voters bring the LDPR 
to power.  Trying to persuade voters to do so, Zhirinovskiy makes 
grand promises to improve the lot of groups who have suffered 
under reform.  He promises that, once elected, he will restore 
Russia to the borders of the former USSR, while eliminating 
internal borders drawn on ethnic lines.  He will revive Russia's 
economy, chiefly by reconverting plants to military production 
and selling their products on the world arms market.  Russia will 
be restored to the greatness it enjoyed under the tsars and the 
Communists. 

   In the longer term, LDPR rule will-bring Russia to the 
millennium, an era that Zhirinovskiy sees as the end point of 
Russian history, the ''resolution of a global task,'' Russia's last 
great historical mission," which will usher in a period of world 
peace and stability.  Russia and the other great powers--the 
United States, Germany, and Japan--will agree to divide the world 
into spheres of influence.  This agreement will enable Russia to 
turn its attention from East-West relations to its agreed sphere- 
-the area from its present southern border to the Indian Ocean. 
Zhirinovskiy envisions that the consolidation of Russian 
domination over this region will end the threat to Russia from 
the conflicts now taking place on Russia's southern borders in 
the Caucasus and Afghanistan, save Russia from the pan-Turkic 
designs of Central Asians, and free the world from the Islamic 
radical threat.  This move to push its dominance southward will 
free Russia, which has been pushed "into the tundra," where 
nothing can live and develop," (i.e., the northern latitudes to 
which a truncated Russia would be confined) and will gain it a 
warm water "platform" and access to the world's markets.  Russia 
will ally itself with India and Iraq, who will guard Russia's 
flanks.  The drive to the south will simultaneously fulfill 
Russia's historic fate and accomplish the "task of saving the 
Russian nation" from destruction. 

   Similarities with Other Russian Nationalists 

   Although Zhirinovskiy's prescriptions for the future differ from 
those of other extreme Russian nationalists, his view of Russia's 
present difficulties is essentially the same as theirs.  For 
example, the now infamous open letter "Word to the People," 
printed in the pro-communist and nationalist newspaper, 
Sovetskaya Rossiya in July 1991, spoke of "greedy and 
pompous.. .apostates," who, in league with foreign "money 
grubbers," were plotting the "slavery and subordination" of 
Russia to "our all-powerful neighbors."  The letter called the 
Soviet Army the savior of Europe, saying it had "won the respect 
of mankind" for the "selfless deed" of saving civilization from 
Hitler and called "the homeland and the state" the "supreme and 
most sacred object of life" (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 23 July 1991). 
The letter, commonly believed to have been a call to arms for the 
upcoming August 1991 coup attempt, was signed by Gennadiy 
Zyuganov, presently chairman of the Russian Communist Party, 
Aleksandr Prokhanov, then chief editor of the ultranationalist 
newspaper Den, nationalist writer Valentin Rasputin, and 
Sovetskaya Rossiya journalist Eduard Volodin, among others, all 
of whom would emerge in the post-coup period as prominent 
oppositionists.  Two years later, Zyuganov authored another 
article in Sovetskaya Rossyia, "The Russian Question," which 
accused the West of plotting the "enslaving of Russia,"  as part 
of the efforts of "secret political societies [and] religious 
sects" to "eliminate Russia."  The article viewed the current 
plots as merely the latest attempt by these dark forces to 
destroy Russia, efforts which began "more than a thousand years" 
ago (Sovetskaya Rossiya, 3 July 1993). 

   Appendix of Quotations 

   This appendix contains reports about and statements made by 
Zhirinovskiy on the themes he has stressed in outlining his 
strategy for the regeneration of Russia.  They are arranged in 
chronological order of publication or broadcast within each 
section. 

   HUMILIATION 

   Humiliation of Russia and Russians 

   So, as a possible future president of Russia I want to raise the 
Russian issue, not because I want the Russian nation to lord it 
again, but because we have raised all the ethnic issues as they 
relate to all regions but have forgotten about the Russian 
people; ; 155 million Russians that nobody needs!  They find 
themselves in a particularly sorry plight in the national 
republics; 25 million Russians there have become second class 
citizens. . . . In a word, the words Russian and Communist have 
now become almost an insult.  This cannot be allowed. 
everything is permitted and we have bacchanalia, anarchy, and 
nobody knows anything. . . . Today they [the union republics] 
recoil from us.  We [Russians] are people who are not needed by 
anyone, down with you!  Get out!. . . When 100 or 200 years ago 
the Georgian tsar sent his delegation [to Russia], Georgia was 
perishing, awash with blood spilt by alien invaders.  This treaty 
says: with Russia, for eternity.  This was Georgia that was 
asking, but today it rejects us, and today the Transcaucasus 
Military District troops are occupiers. . . . There then is the 
gratitude of our very close brothers.  To begin with, they threw 
us out of Eastern Europe. . . . This is a blow one must not 
endure any longer.  (Speech to the Russian Congress of People's 
Deputies, Russian TV, 22 May 1991) 

   For decades you have been deceived, made fools of, and stuffed 
full of various dogmas. . . . I shall represent you,. . . those 
who received, and still receive in these terrible years, only 200 
rubles and live in two room apartments. . . . You are made to do 
nothing but work; work so that those at the top get rich. . 
If I do not win the elections, I will not be the loser.  You, the 
inhabitants of Russia, will be the losers.  (Address by 
Zhirinovskiy on Russian TV, 6 June 1991) 

   A leadership crisis really does exist.  The August events 
exacerbated it.  Today many republics are flowing with blood. 
Attempts at peacemaking are not bringing results. . . . In Tver 
you are rationed to 300 grams of bread.  There is also strict 
rationing in Moscow.  And what will be happening by spring?. . 
. We expected a normal life.  The new democratic forces have 
been. . . unable to guarantee this normal life.  Because again 
there has been incompetence at all levels. . . . Now more and 
more ordinary, simple people are joining us."  (Sovetskaya 
Rossiya, 2 October 1991) 

   Vladimir Zhirinovskiy has spoken for sending Russian volunteers 
"to lands where Russian blood is shed, where the honor and 
dignity of Great Russians are trampled on." . . . As an example 
he named the developments in Moldova where large scale dismissals 
of Russians are conducted. . . . "Employees are fired on various 
pretexts, but there is only one reason: that they are Russians." 
(INTERFAX, 2 October 1991) 
   When the monologue [Zhirinovskiy's] starts to deal with the 
injustice done to the Russian people, he begins to scale the 
heights.  He gesticulates with his hands and his words come like 
bullets from a machine gun. . .  "In the spring Boris Yeltsin's 
regime will collapse.  Tens of millions of hungry and unemployed 
Russians will sweep him aside. . . . Russia is moving toward a 
total economic collapse."  (Report on an interview with 
Zhirinovskiy, Oslo Aftenposten, 4 November 1991) 

   "The goals of the Commonwealth of Independent States will mean 
the death of Russia," Zhirinovskiy said, adding that many other 
national groups would be better off at the expense of the Russian 
people.  "Russia will simply perish.  Not right away, but 
gradually, over the next 20 to 30 years, as new groups decide to 
'secede,'" Zhirinovskiy said.  "The only remaining Russians will 
be street cleaners, sanitation workers, truck drivers; everyone 
else will have broken away."  (Comment on Zhirinovskiy press 
conference, TASS, 18 December 1991) 

   For some reason Russians are not supposed to have their own state 
where they were born, where they live, where their forebears 
died, and where they founded cities.  (LDTTS, p 1) 

   Russia once saved the world from the Ottoman Empire by sending 
its troops to the south . . . and seven centuries ago we stopped 
the Mongols. . . . We have saved it [Europe] several times: from 
the south, from the east, from the north, and from the center of 
Europe itself. . . . The world should be grateful to Russia for 
its role as savior.  (LDTTS, pp. 32; 33) 

   Humiliation of the army 

   "Officer" likewise has become an insult.  (Speech to the Russian 
Congress of People's Deputies, Russian TV, 22 May 1991) 

   I think that an officer should be.proud of his rank. . . . Alas, 
in this country today the titles "soldier" and "officer" have 
almost become swear words. . . . It is absolutely necessary to 
save the Army from indiscriminate criticism, to create the best 
material conditions for servicemen.  (Interview on military 
issues, Krasnaya Zvezda, 30 May 1991) 

   Why did they [Soviet troops] enter Prague on 9 May [1945]?  Why 
did millions shed their blood?  Today they insult us there. . 
[Our veterans] are spat upon today.  Why did they shed their 
blood?  (Interview with Zhirinovskiy, Russian TV, 31 May 1991) 

   I am in favor of nobody ever being able to insult servicemen. 
  Russians are the most humiliated and insulted nation.  (Moscow 
radio, 11 June 1991) 

   The West as an agent of Russia's humiliation 

   Zhirinovskiy also claimed that the CIA is in the process of 
waging a weaponless "third world war" against Russia.  Instead of 
sending the technology Russia needs to overcome its current 
economic crisis, the U.S. is trying to poison the Russian people 
with "vodka, Pepsi, and propaganda."  (Comment on Zhirinovskiy 
press conference, TASS, 18 December 1991) 

   The leader of the Liberal Democratic Party, Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy, has said that after robbing Africa and Latin 
America the West has started robbing Russia. . . . He claimed 
that the West is supported by Democratic Russia and the 
government who are "fulfilling Western orders and embezzling, not 
so much because of an inclination to corruption, but because they 
realize they will not remain in power long."  (Comment on 
Zhirinovskiy speech, INTERFAX, 7 May 1992) 

   It [the Russian Foreign Ministry] is engaged in servicing 
American diplomacy, and uses its veto at the UN in the interests 
of America. . . . Russia will be driven to the northern swamps. 
(Interview with Zhirinovskiy, INTERFAX, 24 November 1992) 

   But nobody will help Russia itself. . . . Gorbachev and Yeltsin 
made all kinds of concessions to the West, the United States, the 
CIA, Israel.  And what did they get for it? Nothing.  (LDTTS, pp. 
36; 37) 

   Linking Russia's humiliation to his own 

   I know, I myself am an ordinary citizen, I myself represent the 
middle strata, which get 200 rubles and live in a two-room 
apartment.  I am just like you, and I understand that these awful 
prices in commercial and cooperative stores are beyond our 
pocket. . . . Women of Russia! . . . I know things have been hard 
for you.  This I know from my own mother. . . . A few days before 
she died she said: Volodya, there is nothing to remember.  In all 
her 73 years, she had not lived a single day of joy. . . . I know 
all of your anxieties: the eternal lines, the shortages,.... 
eternal thoughts about how to feed the family properly. . . . I 
would like to address the older generation, who are also finding 
that people are blackening them. . . . You must be provided for. 
(Moscow radio, 11 June 1991) 

   Zhirinovskiy on his mother: [After his father's death] Mom was 
left without a livelihood. . . . She would grovelingly beg the 
cook [at the cafeteria where she worked] for some soup. . . . I 
never had enough to eat.  (LDTTS, p.2) 

   On his childhood:  It was a joyless childhood.  All 18 years. 
.Even my bed was not my own.  I slept on a trunk. . . . Mom never 
had any time, she was working. . . . Sometimes I would not see 
her for days on end.  (LDTTS, p 2) 

   I had absolutely nowhere to play; either in the room or in the 
corridor.  You always had to wait in line to use the toilet and 
it always stank. . . . I was the smallest.  Then there was the 
"hazing" you get in a communal apartment; people pick on the 
smallest person. . . . Who will defend him?  No brother, no 
father.  (LDTTS, p. 3) 

   This [humiliation] was clearly the lot of our entire people.  My 
mother and my father were born under the Russian Empire, my 
father in 1907 and my mother in 1912.  They were in torment 
throughout their lifetime. . . . perpetual removals. 
passports, registrations. . . . We put the whole nation on the 
move. . . . We got into space, we smashed the Germans.  But we 
destroyed every family.  (LDTTS, p. 5) 

   In the seventh grade I began to make something of an impression, 
and I was elected chairman of the detachment council.  Our class 
teacher was Vera Yevgenyeva Chebotova, a mathematics teacher.  By 
eighth grade we had a different class teacher.  They often 
changed, our class had no luck.  In ninth grade our class teacher 
was Yelena Mikhaylovna Blinder.  I later learned that her real 
name was Esterna Moiseyevna [a Jewish name]. . . . At first she 
picked me out and helped my election as Komsomol organizer for 
class nine.  But after a few months she became disappointed with 
me, realizing that I was. . . not a "tame" Komosomol organizer. 
Then she used her authority in the opposite direction . . . There 
were some toadies who began to make accusations against me. 
(LDTTS, p. 5) 

   On the humiliations of growing up as a Russian in Kazakhstan 

   I would ask Mom:  Why do we have such bad housing conditions? 
Why can't we get an individual apartment?  Mom replied: "We 
aren't Kazakhs. . . . Kazakhs get.priority.  (LDTTS, p. 6) 

   Mom worked in an institute cafeteria, and the lecturers would 
often tell her about the examinations and about how they felt 
sorry for the Russian kids.  A Russian would give an answer and 
get a "2," and a Kazakh would give just the same answer and get a 
"4."  (LDTTS, p. 6) 

   REGENERATION 

   Zhirinovskiy campaigns for the presidency:  A blatant appeal to 
special interests, particularly the military 

   In return for the support of the military, Zhirinovskiy is 
promising to take special care of them. . . . Every officer who 
supports Zhirinovskiy can buy a Soviet made car of any model. 
(Comment on Zhirinovskiy stump speech, INTERFAX, 9 December 1991) 

   Zhirinovskiy promised to quickly provide everyone with everything 
necessary, to allow Russian people to take a trip to Paris. 
.Maybe then people will believe V. Zhirinovskiy, who is promising 
to feed the people in 72 hours?  (Comment on Zhirinovskiy stump 
speech, Izvestiya, 9 December 1991) 

   Zhirinovskiy predicted that he would be elected president by next 
April.  (Comment on Zhirinovskiy speech, TASS, 18 December 1991) 

   Khrushchev . . . had absolutely no education in the humanities. 
. .  Andropov too was an uneducated person. . . . So all of 
Russia's rulers have lacked a classical education . . . even 
Ulyanov [Lenin]. . . . I realized that these dull-witted, 
sometimes simply stupid people reached the heights merely thanks 
to the system that allowed them to do so. . . . But even in early 
childhood something dawned on me.  It was a kind of ultimate idea 
which was like the intellect governing the world.  Even when I 
was a small boy walking along the quiet street from home toward 
the Nikolskaya church and Nikolskiy market, there was something; 
even then, as a barefoot boy, thoughts of something great were 
hovering in my head. . . . But even then I saw I was obviously 
destined for big-league politics.  And this came to pass.  This 
was no accident. . . . An educated man with two university 
degrees who speaks European languages; where did he pop up from, 
this throwback to the prosperous Russia of the last century? 
(LDTTS, pp. 13-14) 

   Beginning Russia's regeneration 

   "The LDP's [Liberal Democratic Party] most important task is to 
secure a proper living standard for all members of society. . . 
The Baltics are Russian land". . . . He [Zhirinovskiy] would 
restore the 1977 Soviet Constitution, under which there were no 
sovereign formations and no need for any.  He would return all 
these republics to the way they originally were.  (Excerpts from 
LDPR party documents and comments on Zhirinovskiy policy 
positions, Izvestiya, 25 September 1991) 

   The leader of Russia's ultranationalists, Vladimir Volfovich 
Zhirinovskiy, makes no secret of his ambitions: Boris Yeltsin and 
Mikhail Gorbachev will be pensioned off. . . . Zhirinovskiy 
himself will take power in Russia, restore the former borders 
from the czarist era, and get the country on its feet again. 
. . "When I take power, law and order will be restored. . . . Every 
week the mafia from the Caucasus republics  kill taxi drivers in 
Moscow.  In Volgograd people of the southern nationalities are 
running amok and are killing young Russian men. . . . I will 
introduce an economic blockade to force the Baltic region to 
return to Russia.  I would use military means to solve the 
problem of Kazakhstan.  Against the Ukraine I would use some 
military means and some economic measures."  (Interview and 
comment on interview with Zhirinovskiy, Oslo Aftenposten, 4 
November 1991) 

   The path to victory is the implementation of ideas via the 
victory of the party and its leader.  This is all interconnected. 
(LDTTS, p. 22) 

   Russians, proud people, the 21st century will belong to us 
despite everything.  In the next seven years we will finally stop 
all the revolutions, all the perestroykas. . . . We will put an 
end to Yeltsinism and Burbulisism. . . . And we will enter the 
21st century changed and pure.  (LDTTS, p. 31) 

   Restoring Russia to its former glory under Tsarist and Soviet 
rule, recreating Russia within the borders of the former USSR 

   He goes on to describe how, under his presidency, Russia would be 
restored to its former glory as an integral state in which the 
army would not have to shed blood within the country.  He says 
the Russian Soviet Federated Socialist Republic is an artificial 
creation, and that the new Russia will encompass the whole of the 
present USSR.  (Comment on a Zhirinovskiy TV address, Russian TV, 
6 June 1991) 

   The future prospect which I envision is the gradual abandonment 
of the national-territorial division, which will help us solve 
the nationality issue.. . . Order needs to be restored. 
(Zhirinovskiy campaign statement, Trud, 11 June 1991) 

   Lithuania will understand this [the strength of the Union] 
through economics.  Give them an opportunity to separate, but 
only in the 1940 borders.  But who in Europe will buy Lithuanian 
cheese? We need it, but there no one does. . . . The other way: 
back to the union. . . Who, for example, will reconcile the 
Chechen and the Ingush? Only a Russian governor.  (Interview with 
Zhirinovskiy, Leningradskaya Pravda, 25 June 1991) 

   Under Stalin's regime we were a closed country.  That was 
positive to some extent.  For instance, with respect to the fact 
that we were almost completely free of venereal diseases.  And 
morality in general was at a high level.  (LDTTS, p. 24) 

   There was something good in czarist Russia.  There were 
merchants, there were courtiers, workers, civil servants. . 
All this should have been perfected.  (LDTTS, p. 24) 

   A covert civil war is in progress and in some regions it has 
become open.  Like a disease. . . . It saps the living organism. 
. . . Our Motherland must no longer be tormented, she is tired 
and we have worn her out with all these name changes.  The 
artificial name USSR, the still more artificial CIS.  The state 
has its own name:  Russia.  This is a historical name, it is a 
geographical concept. . . . It is the Eurasian continent. . 
Only a single state with the name of Russia can exist.  But 
without suppressing other ideas or particular population groups. 
. . . Pluralism, multiplicity in everything, diversity in 
everything.  (LDTTS, p. 25) 
   Restoring Russia's economy and military might 

   When there, on the foreign market, there is no longer a customer 
for the output of our military factories, that is the time they 
should begin a gradual switch to civilian production.  Instead, 
ideology gets in the way again here and we ask ourselves why we 
are selling tanks.  We must sell everything there!  (Speech to 
Russian Congress of People's Deputies, Russian TV, 22 May 1991) 

   I have a whole concept [for improving living conditions of 
soldiers]: in the plan for training, and in the plan for creating 
everyday living conditions, and in the use of armies abroad.. 
soldiers under contract for hard currency could serve and perform 
tasks assigned by the world community.  You will ask, but where 
will you get the resources to implement such grandiose plans? 
What about the sale of weapons abroad?! . . . Why destroy our 
tanks and weapons and, in the process, become poorer and poorer. 
(Interview with Zhirinovskiy, Krasnaya Zvezda, 30 May 1991) 

   We are in favor of a market economy, but one which would not 
strike a blow at a majority of our citizens, the state sector, 
and the military-industrial complex. . . . Let military plants. 
. . turn out market products, let.them continue to sell.  These 
plants should be switched over gradually to peaceful production 
when the foreign market is saturated and they stop buying 
weapons. . . . The foreign market demands weapons; sell them, 
obtain billions of dollars, and purchase foodstuffs, clothing, 
and so on.  (Zhirinovskiy campaign statement, Trud, 11 June 1991) 

   What is wrong with the administrative economy?  It has its 
drawbacks, but why destroy it?  A huge number of plants and 
kolkhozes are working and producing output which we all need. 
(LDTTS, p. 24) 

   I think the pensioner will support us, he will be at peace.  He 
will have a roof over his head, he will always have something to 
eat, something to wear. . . . And it [Zhirinovskiy's ascension to 
power] means that some of the population will live very well, 
because people will have the opportunity to work honestly, and 
after that, a secure old age.  Because there will be no more 
revolutions and perestroykas in our country, we must put an end 
to all that.  (LDTTS, p. 27) 

   How do I see Russia?  I do not see Russia weeping. . . . I see a 
proud Russia, a Russia wherein the glorious traditions of its 
army will once again be realized, where talented Russian 
engineers and industrialists will create examples of the latest 
technology. . . . We have a huge number of inventors, 
rationalizers. . . . Russian mercantile traditions must be 
restored. . . . This is how I see Russia.  It will have the 
world's strongest army, strategic forces, our missiles with 
multiple launchers. Our space combat platforms, our "Buran" 
spaceship and "Energiya" rockets.  This is the country's rocket 
shield. . . . We have no rival.  (LDTTS, p. 29) 

   BRINGING THE MILLENNIUM 

   Russia and the other great powers divide the world into spheres 
of influence 

   At the same time he criticized the foreign policy of the current 
leadership of the country, stating that because of its lack of 
foresight the Soviet Union was losing influence in the world 
arena and in various regions of the world.  Vladimir Zhirinovskiy 
came out in favor of "a division of the world into spheres of 
influence between the USSR, the United States, Europe, and 
Japan."  (Comment on statement by Zhirinovskiy, TASS, 29 March 
1991) 

   We should reach agreement with them [the West] on disputed points 
and switch [our attention] to the south.  That is where our 
vitally important interests are.  (Interview with Zhirinovskiy, 
Russian TV, 31 May 1991) 

   But if we switch to another foreign policy formula and abandon 
East-West relations we will gain significantly in the moral, the 
political, and the economic sense. . . . We will be able to 
gradually reach the shores of the Indian Ocean and the 
Mediterranean, and in this southern region there is a great deal 
of food and raw materials for light industry.  (Zhirinovskiy 
election speech, Moscow radio, 11 June 1991) 

   Again and again Zhirinovskiy returned to what he will do when- 
-and, according to Zhirinovskiy himself, this will be fairly 
soon--he takes over power in Russia.  New spheres of influence 
must be established, and according to the nationalist leader, 
Russia's natural route of expansion is to the south. . . . He 
ended with the following salvo: "A year ago I was in Turkey.  On 
Turkey's beautiful beaches I saw thousands of German and Italian 
tourists.  These beaches should instead be recreational areas for 
Russian workers!"  (Comment on interview with Zhirinovskiy, Oslo 
Aftenposten, 4 November 1991) 

   For North America there will be Latin America, for Western Europe 
there will be Africa, for China, Japan, there will be South East 
Asia, . . . for Russia, only three states:  Turkey, Iran, 
Afghanistan.  It is a region of vitally important interests for 
Russia. . . . And farther to the south, the warm Indian Ocean. . 
. . If we unite the Russian north (with its heavy industry) with 
the south, where there is basic food stuffs and raw materials for 
light industry, then YES, we will have a market economy. 
(Zhirinovskiy article published in LDPR newspaper, Liberal, No.2, 
1993) 

   The division of spheres of influence is better [for managing 
world affairs]. . . . The Japanese and Chinese can go south into 
Southeast Asia. . . . Russia can go south. . . . West Europe can 
go south into the African continent.  Finally, Canada and the 
United States can go south--the whole of Latin America. . . . So 
allocation according to this geopolitical formula would be very 
favorable for all mankind. . .. Both world order in general and 
economic order--via external ties--would be established.  We 
would also save the planet environmentally.  (LDTTS, p.19) 

   Russia consolidates its sphere of influence in the South 

   In foreign policy, one must move from the East-West relationship 
to the North-South relationship. . . . We will . . . come to an 
accommodation with Germany.  A strong Turkey and Iran are in the 
South but Russian soldiers will no longer shed their blood in the 
Transcaucasus.  We will reach accord with the Turks and with Iran 
all the sooner.  (Speech to Russian Congress of People's 
Deputies, Russian TV, 22 May 1991) 

   Mr. Zhirinovskiy promised that if he comes to power, he will 
restore order in Europe by forming an alliance with Germany. . . 
. "Let the Germans move east to the new Soviet-German border 
while we move south," Mr. Zhirinovskiy said.  He also voiced the 
need to support the liberation struggle of the Kurds with the 
help of "Cuban mercenaries and Russian weapons" and "explode 
Turkey and Iran" with their hands.  (Comment on Zhirinovskiy 
stump speech, INTERFAX, 7 May 1992) 
   According to Zhirinovskiy, Russia is losing its positions in the 
Middle East, where "Iraq is its most reliable ally." . . . V. 
Zhirinovskiy said that in the eastern and southern directions 
Russia ought to bank on building allied relationships with Japan, 
China, and India. . . . He added "As for the allied relationship 
with India, it will depend largely on whether Russia helps it 
repulse the Muslim threat.  . . . Zhirinovskiy believes that 
access to the Indian Ocean should become a goal of Russia's 
foreign policy in the southern direction.  In this case 
Afghanistan, Iran, and Turkey will have to be "neutralized," 
which, according to him, "will be applauded in Europe." 
(Commentary on Zhirinovskiy statement to the press, INTERFAX, 24 
November 1992) 

   My two years in the army [1970-72] were very useful to me. 
First, I got to know the army itself. . . . I had quite a good 
knowledge of the nationalities problems even previously, but the 
Transcaucasus region was different from Central Asia. . . . All 
Russia's problems are in the south.  So until we resolve our 
southern problem we will never extricate ourselves from the 
protracted crisis, which will periodically worsen.  (LDTTS, p. 
12) 

   I had already begun to develop my own geopolitical concept. . . 
The last "dash to the south" and Russia's outlet to the shores of 
the Indian Ocean and Mediterranean Sea are really the task of 
saving the Russian nation.  For when other parties talk about 
cutting off Kazakhstan, Kirghizia, and Central Asia, they do not 
realize that we are pushing Russia into the tundra, where mineral 
resources are all that can exist, where nothing can live and 
develop.  The development of civilization has always begun in the 
south. . . . We may quite unnecessarily drive ourselves into 
unviable regions and destroy the nation once and for all. 
(LDTTS, p. 17) 

   So the idea emerged of the last "dash"--last because it will 
probably be the last repartition of the world and it must be 
carried out in a state of shock therapy, suddenly, swiftly, and 
effectively.  This immediately solves all the problems, because 
we gain tranquillity. . .. we also gain tranquil neighbors. 
Friendly India.  Enmity will cease forever.  ( LDTTS, p. 17) 

   The principle of division [within the new empire] will be purely 
territorial inside the country--guberniyas, oblasts, provinces. . 
. The blending of peoples as a result of the economy, the 
dominance of the Russian language and the Russian ruble, and the 
dominant position of the Russian Army as the most combat capable; 
this is an historical fact.  We must ensure stability throughout 
our region for Russia and for the world community as a whole. 
(LDTTS, p. 17) 

   I dream of Russian soldiers washing their boots in the warm 
waters of the Indian Ocean and switching to summer uniform 
forever. . . . We must pacify the region forever.  So that there 
are vacation centers, youth camps, sanatoriums, and preventative 
treatment centers there on the shores of the Indian Ocean and the 
Mediterranean Sea. . . . The single economy and single legal and 
political space would create favorable conditions for the 
development of all trades and for culture, education, life, and 
the family structure, as everyone wants.  (LDTTS, pp. 17-18) 

   New armed forces can be reborn only as the result of a combat 
operation.  The Army cannot grow stronger in military 
commissariats and barracks.  It needs a goal, a task. . . . All 
this provides a stimulus for the development of the economy, 
transport, and communications and for obtaining raw materials for 
food and light industry. . . . Russia will grow rich.  Our plants 
will always have enough manpower in the north . . . because the 
population will migrate from south to north in a quest for work. 
Unfortunately, some of the population will die because the south 
does not currently have sufficient medicines. . . . Natural 
survival, assimilation, and adaptation will take place.  (LDTTS, 
p. 19) 

   Russia will only do what is foreordained and will fulfill the 
great historical mission--liberate the world from wars, which 
always begin in the south. . . . It [the drive to the south] is a 
purely Russian variant. . . . Otherwise Russia will be unable to 
develop and will perish and we will be crammed with nuclear 
stations and nuclear weapons which will destroy the whole planet. 
(LDTTS, p. 20) 

   Russia's move to the south is primarily a defensive measure, a 
countermeasure, because today there is a threat from the south . 
. from the direction of Tehran, which is building plans for the 
pan-Islamic seizure of vast territories, from the direction of 
Ankara, where plans for a greater Turkic state were prepared long 
ago. . . Nothing would happen to the world even if the entire 
Turkish nation perishes, although I do not wish that upon it. 
(LDTTS, p. 34) 

(AUTHOR:  ALLENSWORTH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 

ENEAG/BLOUGH/jf 16/0151Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24664 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000008994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-013--JAPAN 
<H3> <TI>      JAPAN TO LAUNCH H-II ROCKET ON 1 FEBRUARY AS SCHEDULED </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Summary:      The Japanese press reports that the National Space 
Development Agency of Japan [NASDA] will keep its 1 February launch 
date for the H-II rocket despite difficulties experienced during a 
23 December fueling rehearsal.  The launch will be a major event 
attracting nearly 1,000 government and company representatives, and 
members of the press. 

   NASDA announced on 18 January that it will launch the H-II rocket 
on 1 February, according to the 19 January MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN. 
NASDA held an unscheduled fueling rehearsal on 14 January after 
problems were discovered during the scheduled rehearsal on 23 
December.  During the December rehearsal problems arose in eight 
places, including a leak in the helium pressure valves on the LE-7 
main engine which resulted in insufficient pressure, according to 
the 18 January MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN.  During the 14 January 
rehearsal the moveable nozzles on the the solid rocket boosters 
developed problems, but NASDA "determined that they were not major" 
and decided to keep the 1 February launch date. 

   NASDA may feel under pressure to proceed with the launch of the 
H-II, which cost 2.7 trillion yen ($2.45 billion) to develop.  The 
H-II launch has already been rescheduled twice, delaying the launch 
about two years because of problems in developing the LE-7 main 
engine.  In 1991 the LE-7 engine exploded during a pressure test and 
killed a technician.  In 1992 another LE-7 caught on fire during a 
combustion test, according to the 25 January NIKKEI SANGYO. 
Furthermore, the launch of "Japan's first indigenously developed 
large rocket" is being touted as "placing Japan on par with the 
United States and Europe in space technology," and, according to the 
23 January YOMIURI SHIMBUN, will attract "nearly 1,000 members of 
the press, and NASDA and company representatives to Tanegashima." 
The H-II rocket will be launched from the Yoshinobu launch pad at 
the Tanegashima Space Center at 7 am on 1 February, according to the 
19 January MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN.  It will carry a 3.27-metric ton 
payload consisting of the 865 kg OREX vehicle, and the 2.4-ton VEP. 
The 24 January NIKKEI BUSINESS reports the objectives for the launch 
are to 1) launch the rocket, 2) place the VEP in a transfer orbit, 
and 3) have the OREX reenter. NASDA reportedly will consider the 
launch a success if objectives one and two are accomplished. 

   The VEP, which is a dummy of experimental technology satellite 6 
(ETS-6), is scheduled to separate 28 minutes after launch and enter 
an elliptical stationary transfer orbit with an apogee of 36,200 
kilometers and a perigee of about 450 kilometers.  Because its 
apogee-motor fuel tanks will be loaded with water rather than fuel 
it will remain in this transfer orbit.  The VEP's batteries will 
give it a life of 100 hours and it will transmit H-II vibration and 
orbit-positioning accuracy data to the ground during that time, 
according to the 5 January SANKEI SHIMBUN. 

   The OREX will separate 14 minutes after launch and orbit the 
earth once at 450 kilometers, according to the SANKEI SHIMBUN. 
About 1 hour and 40 minutes after launch the OREX will fire its 
retro rockets and reenter the atmosphere, according to the 27 
October 93 NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Two hours after launch OREX will 
splash down in the Pacific near Christmas Island, according to the 5 
January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  The 5 November MINAMI NIHON SHIMBUN reports 
the OREX will not be recovered after splashdown because of the costs 
that would be involved. 

   (AUTHOR:COOK.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF JAPAN 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6534) 

EAG/28JAN94/TECHTF/ASIA DIVISION/SDJ 28/2102Z JAN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24665 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-28Jan94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Kozyrev's Remarks on Russian "Military Presence" Spark Furor </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                              Reports that Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev called for 
maintaining Russia's military presence in the states of the 
former Soviet Union have sparked vehement protests from the 
Baltic states.  Although he and other foreign ministry officials 
later claimed that his remarks had been taken out of context and 
that Russia's policy on withdrawing troops from the Baltics 
remains unchanged, they nonetheless defended Russia's right to 
protect Russian interests and criticized negative Western 
reactions to the reports.  Boosted by strong support for Russia's 
"new" foreign policy course from domestic media and pressed by 
critics in the Duma, who have attacked him for neglecting Russian 
interests, Kozyrev will very likely continue his course of more 
aggressively championing those interests despite Western 
concerns. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   In a speech to a 18-19 January gathering of Russia's ambassadors 
to the CIS and Baltic states, Foreign Minister Kozyrev reportedly 
called for maintaining a Russian military presence in former 
Soviet republics and stressed that Russia must protect its 
interests and the rights of ethnic Russians in the near abroad. 
The text of Kozyrev's speech has not been observed to have been 
published, but ITAR-TASS reported that Kozyrev told the 
ambassadors that "Russia should not withdraw from those regions 
which have been the sphere of Russian interests for centuries." 
Kozyrev reportedly added, "We should not fear these words about a 
military presence" (18 January).  The ITAR-TASS report also 
indicated that Kozyrev labelled the CIS and Baltic states a 
region of "priority vital interests for Russia" where there are 
also "major threats to [these] interests."  Kozyrev was also 
quoted as contending that as soon as Russian troops leave the 
region, a "security vacuum" will emerge, and it will "inevitably" 
be filled by forces "often not friendly and, in many cases, 
directly hostile" to Russian interests. 
   Baltic Protests 
   The Baltic states immediately protested Kozyrev's remarks, 
charging that Moscow had departed from its previous official 
position supporting a complete withdrawal of troops.  The prime 
ministers of the three Baltic states signed a statement on 19 
January, stating that this "new" policy is "contrary" to Russia's 
international obligations and complicates the troop withdrawal 
talks (Riga radio, 19 January).  In a press release, the Estonian 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MFA) characterized Russia as a "big 
bully terrorizing smaller, weaker neighbors" and charged that 
from Kozyrev's statements it was "clear" that Russia views Baltic 
independence as a "temporary annoyance" ( Estonian MFA press 
release, 18 January).  Estonia's representative to the CSCE 
requested that the CSCE security forum make an official inquiry 
(Tallinn radio, 19 January). 
   Russian Clarifications 
   Apparently stung by what Kozyrev termed the "hysterics" and 
"panicky" reaction from abroad (Interfax, 19 January), he and 
other ministry officials responded with a series of 
recriminations, denials, and clarifications: 
   -- Kozyrev, appearing on Russian television on 19 January, 
charged that "Latvia... and some of the mass media in the other 
Baltic states" had launched a "completely artificial" campaign 
that "deliberately distorted" his words with the "obvious aim" of 
"yet again gaining the sympathy" of the West.  He said that 
rather than raising "this absolutely unfounded screaming," Latvia 
should concentrate on drawing up agreements on the conditions for 
a troop withdrawal, adding that Russia would then be ready to 
continue the withdrawals.  Clearly miffed at what he termed the 
"hurried," "inappropriate," and "unbalanced" reaction of the U.S. 
State Department, Kozyrev also complained that "our partnership 
merits having the State Department spokesman get [the facts] 
right" before criticizing Russia's foreign minister. 
   -- Kozyrev's foreign policy adviser Galina Sidorova claimed that 
ITAR-TASS had distorted Kozyrev's remarks.  She insisted that the 
foreign minister had not advocated the continued presence of 
Russian troops in the Baltics (Moscow radio, 19 January). 
   -- MFA press chief Grigoriy Karasin also claimed that the ruckus 
resulted from an "inaccurate choice of quotes" which "several 
politicians" had tried to use as "an argument of insinuations" 
(Interfax, 19 January).  Karasin stressed that there is "no 
question" of any change in Russia's approach toward the Baltic 
states.  He explained that although Kozyrev had started 
discussing the former Soviet republics, including both the CIS 
and the Baltics, when he stated that Russia should maintain a 
military presence, he was referring only to those states in the 
CIS that have bilateral agreements with Moscow.  In later 
remarks, Karasin said that the "hullabaloo" over Kozyrev's 
comments generated "incomprehension and indignation" in Moscow 
and he called for an evaluation of the full text of Kozyrev's 
speech.  Complaining that unnamed persons either still retain an 
"enemy image" of Russia or are trying to restore it, Karasin 
huffed that rather than criticizing a Russian minister the West 
"should concentrate its attention" on how to "properly safeguard" 
the rights of Russians in Latvia and Estonia (ITAR-TASS, 20 
January). 
   Baltic Anxieties Persist 
   Apparently unmollified despite Russian explanations, Latvian and 
Estonian officials continued to criticise Kozyrev's remarks: 
   -- Estonian MFA official Raul Malk said that the Russian view 
that it had "stragetic interests" in its "near abroad" should 
cause anxiety in the international community.  He added that such 
a stance contradicts the US.-Russian summit declaration that no 
dividing lines should be drawn in Europe, noting that calling 
some states the "near abroad" in itself draws dividing lines 
(Tallinn ETA news release, 20 January). 
   -- After receiving the full text of Kozyrev's comments that the 
Russian MFA apparently supplied him, Latvian Foreign Minister 
Georgs Andrejevs, stressing that Kozyrev's comments were 
"ambiguous" and allow for "various interpretations," said that 
Latvia stands by its negative assessment (Tallinn BNS, 20 
January). 
   -- Latvian President Guntis Ulmanis, who reportedly received a 
call from U.S. President Bill Clinton (ITAR-TASS, 21 January), 
said that the call had "dispell[ed]" many "suspicions" about the 
talks between the U.S. and Russia, adding that the U.S. 
President's words "allow Latvia to calm down somewhat."  He 
emphasized, however, that Latvia "should always be prepared" for 
an "agressive" Russian policy. 
   Russian Media Reaction 
   With the exception of the reformist and usually pro-Yeltsin 
Izvestiya, the Russian media's reaction to Kozyrev's remarks was 
largely supportive.  In some cases, the media applauded outright 
both his speech and his complaints about the international 
reaction. (See Note 1)  Despite some continued disagreement about 
what Kozyrev said--Rossiyskiye Vesti, for example, maintained 
that Kozyrev did include the Baltics in his statement about 
keeping a military presence in the near abroad, thus 
contradicting MFA denials--most commentators, using remarkably 
similar arguments, gave short shrift to what they viewed as a 
biased Western response to justified remarks about legitimate 
Russian interests. 
   (Note 1)  Sovetskaya Rossiya, whose commentators have criticized 
Kozyrev for a pro-Western orientation, was not observed to have 
commented on the foreign minister's remarks. 
   -- A 21 January article in the government-owned Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta alluded to double standards, asking why, after the "world 
community" regarded "with understanding" U.S. actions in Panama 
and Grenada and the "punishment" the United States meted out to 
Libya for terrorist acts against Americans in Berlin, Russia 
should be "forbidden" to be "firm and resolute if the life and 
safety of its compatriots are at stake?"  The article stressed 
that the MFA's "new course," focused on the countries of the 
former Soviet Union and on "its own compatriots," reflects the 
interests of Russians "first and foremost," adding that "whether 
some people like it or not, a great power has to protect its own 
interests."  Charging that "some people are quite willing to play 
the tired old record of 'imperial pretensions,'" against Russia, 
the article warned that "if [Moscow and Washington] want our 
peoples to remain friendly and our states partners," it is 
"necessary to spike the propaganda guns" and for the West to 
adopt a "serious attitude" toward Russia. 
   -- A 21 Moscow radio commentary by Vladislav Kozyakov chided the 
U.S. spokesman for expressing his "displeasure" at Kozyrev's 
comments with "surprising" "haste."  Asking why there should be 
this "hasty desire" to "put in doubt" Russia's political course, 
Kozyakov stressed that such a critical response, "even at the 
high level of cooperation between Moscow and Washington," serves 
as a reminder that the American side still "sometimes displays 
signs of the past policy of double standards."  Echoing 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta, the article noted that the United States had 
resorted to military intervention in Panama, Grenada, and other 
"zones of its national interests," and contended that for the 
United States and other countries to maintain "partnership" with 
Russia, an "understanding of Russia's vital interests" in states 
of the former Soviet Union is "essential." 
   -- The Defense Ministry's newspaper Krasnaya Zvezda in a 20 
January article titled "Neighboring Foreign Countries Were, Are, 
and Remain a Zone of Russia's Vital Interests," strongly, if 
somewhat ironically,  supported Kozyrev for "unambiguous[ly] and 
definitive[ly]" stating that the CIS and Baltic countries are 
regions of Russia's "paramount interests."  After declaring that 
Russia cannot "close [its] eyes" to the "shameless and at times 
humiliating pressure on our fellow countrymen" in neighboring 
states, which the article called acts of "criminal disrespect," 
the article warned that "attempts by anyone anywhere to assume 
the role of interpreter and organizer" of Russian affairs in such 
countries will be viewed as "unfriendly acts."  The article ended 
by noting that Russia is "making it plain" that states that want 
to live "in love and fond accord" with Russia should take account 
of its "geopolitical interests." 
   -- In a 19 January article, the reformist Kommersant-Daily 
maintained that Kozyrev's speech--and the whole tenor of the 
conference--constituted an "urgent" foreign policy revision in 
response to the December elections.  Claiming that the thesis 
that the Liberal Democratic Party's electoral success resulted 
from a backlash on economic issues, and not nationalism was 
partly a "delusion," the article claimed that the USSR's 
disintegration is still "painfully perceived" by many Russians--a 
fact understood by Kozyrev who was now making "adjustments." 
Commenting on the "masses of Russian refugees" in 1993, the 
article also noted with apparent approval Kozyrev's statement 
that the protection of ethnic Russians in the near abroad was now 
a strategic priority--a sharp contrast, the article pointed out, 
to the provisions of the Concept on Foreign Policy adopted by the 
Russian Security Council in March 1993 which ignored the subject. 
   Izvestiya Dissents 
   In contrast to most of the media, Izvestiya, which in the past 
has supported Kozyrev on many issues, (See Note 2) took issue 
with both his statements and the MFA's subsequent actions.  In a 
a 20 January report, Maksim Yusin castigated Kozyrev and the MFA 
for responding with "remarkably limp" denials to ITAR-TASS' 
initial "annoying blunder," adding that this response had led to 
"far from favorable" foreign commentary.  Even stronger criticism 
appeared in a 22 January article titled "Lithuania Takes Fright 
and Changes Foreign Policy Orientation; But This Is Not the Way 
To Help the Russian Minority."  The article distinguished between 
an idealistic "early Kozyrev" and a "late Kozyrev" whose "new 
tough-talking approach" is, it contended, only apt to increase 
the Baltic states hostility toward their Russian minorities and 
drive the Baltics into NATO.  The article noted that "it is the 
task of diplomats not to cause frictions between their country 
and its neighbors, but to make them friends," as the "early 
Kozyrev" had done. 
   (Note 2)  For example, Izvestiya supported Kozyrev after his 14 
December 1992 "shock" treatment speech to the CSCE in Stockholm. 
See the Trends of 23 December, 1992, page 10. 
   Outlook 
   Kozyrev has been under pressure from critics such as Liberal 
Democratic Party leader Vladimir Zhirinovskiy and Vladimir Lukin, 
the new head of the State Duma's International Affairs Committee 
and a longtime rival, who have championed protection of Russian 
national interests while criticizing what they have portrayed as 
Kozyrev's inattention to those interests.  Now that these two are 
perched in positions in the new State Duma, they may turn up the 
heat on Kozyrev.  In apparent response to the critics, Kozyrev 
has become progressively more assertive on Russian interests over 
the past year.  He may backtrack or tone down statements--in 
Krygyzia, for example, he apologized for what he termed "fascist 
statements" that he had made in Moscow recently, while continuing 
to emphasize that Russia cannot "remain indifferent to violations 
of Russians' rights (Interfax, 25 January).  Nevertheless, 
Kozyrev is unlikely to substantially retreat from his tough 
stance on the rights of ethnic Russians, despite international 
concerns. 
   (AUTHOR:  BELLINGER.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CB 29/0020z Jan 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24666 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-026--MAGHREB 
<H3> <TI>      MOROCCAN PRESS REVIEW No. 3 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
This     press review series focuses on economic, social, and 
demographic issues in Algeria, Libya, Morocco, and Tunisia. 
   MOROCCO 
   Moroccans Among Islamic Guerillas Killed in Eritrea 
   Algerian daily LIBERTE reported on 3 January that, according to 
Eritrean President Issaias Afewerki, two of the 20 Islamic 
guerrillas killed in a recent skirmish with Eritrean forces were 
Moroccans.  Afewerki claimed that the 20 guerrillas were Islamic 
fundamentalists of various nationalities who had crossed into 
Eritrea from Sudan and, in the manner of Afghani jihad movements, 
were conducting operations to "liberate the entire region. " 
Afewerki also claimed that guerrillas included "foreigners from ... 
Tunis, Afghanistan, or Pakistan."  He further stated: "The source of 
the problem is found in Sudan; we are trying therefore to resolve 
the problem through collaboration with the Sudanese government and 
the other forces in Sudan.  We do not wish that this war against 
Eritrea remain a secret; thus, we are making it public knowledge." 
(Algiers LIBERTE 3 Jan 94) 
   UMA To Study Creation of a Maghreb Free Trade Zone 
   The Ministerial Commission of the Arab Maghreb Union (UMA) 
dealing with economy and finances recently adopted at its seventh 
session in Tunis a project to eventually declare the creation of a 
Maghreb free-trade zone.  In a commentary on this "major event in 
the process of edifying the UMA," ALMAGHRIB declared this to be "an 
excellent opportunity for the industries of these countries to be 
assured that their products would flow into a market which, although 
not gigantic or possessing great purchasing power, is still capable 
of sustaining and absorbing a good portion of these locally made 
products."  The creation of a UMA free-trade zone would, the paper 
claimed, "represent the dream of entrepreneurs in the region who 
would thereby be able to jointly face the challenge of globalization 
of markets and competition among regional economic blocks."  Among 
the regional entrepreneurs working to achieve this are members of 
the Maghreb Union of Textile and Leather Industries (UMATEC) who, at 
a convention in Tunis 29-30 November 1993, articulated a program 
which included the intention "to see to it that the textile sector 
represent the first building block in the construction of the Grand 
Arab Maghreb market, after the fashion of the coal and steel sectors 
in the European market."  (Rabat ALMAGHRIB 18 Jan 94; Casablanca LA 
VIE ECONOMIQUE 14 Jan 94) 
   Moroccan Central Bank Governor Heads Investments Oversight 
Committee 
   King Hassan II has instructed the Central Bank (Bank Al-Maghrib) 
governor to form a committee for encouraging and completing foreign 
and domestic investment projects.  The committee includes the 
directors of the kingdom's seven principal banking establishments: 
Abdelaziz Alami, M'Hamed Bargach, Jawad Benbrahim, Abdelhaq Bennani, 
Mustapha Faris, Abdellatif Jouahri, and Abdellatif Laraki.  The 
committee is to meet regularly and as often as necessary to assist 
investors with any measures needed to bring their projects to a 
successful conclusion with the shortest possible delays.  The 
committee will report to the King any difficulties it may encounter 
in exercising its mandate.  (Casablanca MAROC SOIR 12 Jan 94) 
   November Cost of Living Indicators 
   In November 1993, the cost of living index, based on the 1989 
price of 385 articles, dropped to 130.3 from 131.4 in October, a 0.9 
percent decline.  Food items saw the greatest decrease, dropping 2 
percent, due in large measure to seasonal variations in fresh fruits 
and vegetables.  Wholesale prices rose 0.6 percent in November to an 
index level of 320.7 from 318.7 in October, principally due to 
increases in clothing and textiles (3.6 percent), textile products 
and haberdashery (6.8 percent), metallurgic industries (0.8 
percent), transportation materials (1.4 percent), vegetable oils 
(6.9 percent), and dried vegetables (3.1 percent).  This rise in 
wholesale prices represents a 4.2 percent increase over their 
November 1992 level.  (Casablanca LA VIE ECONOMI()UE 14 Jan 94) 
   November Improvement in Balance of Payments Deficit 
   The ministry of foreign commerce, investments, and tourism 
announced a slight drop in the November balance of payments deficit, 
which improved by 0.4 percentage points over the previous year (from 
53.5 percent to 53.9 percent).  November 1993 imports were valued at 
DH55.8837 million (Moroccan dirhams], compared to DH56.347 in 
November 1992, while 1993 exports were valued at DH3O.149 million, 
the same as the previous November (9.6 DH = 1 U.S. dollar).  Aside 
from phosphates and phosphate derivatives, general exports increased 
13.6 percent in the January-November 1993 time period, while crude 
oil imports diminished by 11.3 percent.  However, wheat imports rose 
26.4 percent through November 1993 and imports of chemical products 
rose 14.2 percent.  Agricultural produce exports rose 2.6 percent 
while natural and chemical fertilizer exports rose 7.3 percent. 
Exports of phosphoric acid dropped 4.5 percent.  (Rabat ALMAGHRIB 2 
Jan 94) 
   Shell International Buys Control of Shell Morocco 
   The minister of privatization has announced the purchase by Shell 
International of 51 percent of the shares of Shell Morocco from the 
state-owned Companie Marocaine des Hydrocarbures. Sources said the 
deal cost DH450 million (Moroccan dirhams) (about $50 million). 
Shell is considered the largest distributor of petroleum products in 
Morocco, owning nearly 35 percent of all gas stations in the country 
and recording annual sales of over DH1 billion (about $22 million). 
Privatization Ministry sources said that Moroccan shares of Total 
and Mobil oil companies will soon be offered for sale also. (London 
AL-HAYAH 27 Jan 94) 
   King Hassan II Pardons 607 Inmates 
   In commemoration of Morocco's petition for independence, King 
Hassan II issued a general amnesty to 607 inmates and reduced the 
sentences of 487 others.  The king also commuted four life 
sentences, freed 34 other inmates from detention while maintaining 
the fines levied against them, excused eight other individuals from 
punitive detention, and released four others from their prison 
sentences and fines.  (London AL-SHARO AL-AWSAT 9 Jan 94) 
   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/17 Feb/ECONF/NEASA Division  cka 17/1640z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24667 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-17Feb94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Russia Ouestions Safety of Nuclear Weapons in Kazakhstan </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              In an effort to generate international pressure on an apparently 
recalcitrant Kazakhstan to agree to the speedy removal of nuclear 
weapons from its territory, Russian military officials appear to 
have instigated charges that conditions at nuclear weapons sites 
in Kazakhstan have deteriorated so sharply that a nuclear 
accident is possible.  Although Kazakhstani officials 
acknowledged they have suspended the withdrawal of missiles 
pending negotiations on the terms of their removal, they have 
strongly denied the safety allegations, which were leaked to a 
prominent Russian journalist on the eve of Kazakhstani President 
Nursultan Nazarbayev's visit to the United States.  The Russian 
allegations, similar to those the Russians have made--and 
continue to make--about Ukraine-based weapons, suggest that 
Moscow is prepared to use the same pressure tactics to assure an 
acceptable and timely settlement with Kazakhstan as it used on 
Ukraine. 

                        END SUMMARY 

   In the first public indication of a serious rift with Kazakhstan 
over the withdrawal of nuclear weapons, Izvestiya on 12 February 
published a front-page article by its veteran military-affairs 
commentator Viktor Litovkin (See Note 1) reporting that "informed 
sources at the Russian Ministry of Defense" allege that 
Kazakhstan-based nuclear weapons at Zhangiz-Tobe and Derzhavinsk 
face "a critical situation" in a number of respects, including 
safety and security.  The article charged that: 

   -- Fire suppression systems and electrical service at warhead 
maintenance facilities "are literally on their last legs and 
virtually do not work." Some of the divisions' warhead 
maintenance buildings lack heat and water and are in danger of 
collapse. 

   -- Security equipment at warhead storage and maintenance 
facilities--including electrified fences, "signal rockets," and 
mine fields--"have been disconnected" from their power supply, 
allowing intruders to violate the perimeter of the complexes 
undetected. 

   -- The security guard force is so undermanned and undertrained 
"that you can only be amazed that no one has yet stolen a single 
atom bomb."  The morale among officers at the bases "could not be 
worse," and several--including four nuclear warhead 
"specialists"--have deserted. 

   (Note 1)  Litovkin is a longtime military-affairs commentator who 
often appears to use his articles to provide a platform for the 
views of Russian military officials.  In an indication of the 
favor in which he is held by military officials, Litovkin was 
among the first group of journalists invited to visit and write 
about a Typhoon-class ballistic missile submarine, the world's 
largest and Russia's newest class of missile submarines 
(Izvestiya, 28 February 1992). 

   Political Overtones 

   The allegations appear linked to a slowdown in negotiations 
between Russia and Kazakhstan on the removal of the weapons to 
Russia.  The article explicitly blamed the problems at the sites 
on the absence of an agreement between Russia and Kazakhstan on 
the "status" and "future fate" of the strategic nuclear forces in 
Kazakhstan and accused Kazakhstani officials of prohibiting the 
removal of the weapons to Russia for maintenance and the delivery 
of maintenance-related equipment to the missile bases.  "Repeated 
requests" by Russian military authorities to address these 
problems have gone unanswered by Kazakhstani of ficials, the 
article asserted, concluding that the Russian military "is afraid 
that this process might drag on indefinitely." 

   Kazakhstani Reaction 

   A Kazakhstani Government official denied the allegations, saying 
that they had been fabricated by forces in Russia hoping to 
disrupt the talks and complicate Nazarbayev's visit to the United 
States.  Kazakhstani State Adviser Tulegen Zhukeyev held a press 
conference the day Litovkin's article was published to deny the 
statements as "absolutely untrue."  He acknowledged, however, 
that Kazakhstan had "suspended" the withdrawal of missiles from 
the country because of the "unsettled problem of compensation" 
and charged that the Izvestiya report was "instigated by forces"- 
-including the "Russian military and industrial complex"--that 
want to "introduce additional difficulties" in negotiations to 
settle the problem.  Zhukeyev, noting that the allegations 
appeared on the eve of Nazarbeyev's visit to the United States, 
also claimed the Izvestiya article was timed to generate 
"international pressure" on Kazakhstan, but he insisted that 
Kazakhstan would not be bullied.  "The problem can be settled 
only through civilized negotiations with due account of the 
interests of all sides," he said.  Zhukeyev also asserted that 
nuclear weapons in Kazakhstan "are completely safe and well- 
controlled" and denied that Kazakhstan has ever "hampered the 
delivery of spares" or maintenance equipment (ITAR-TASS, 12 
February; Kazakhstani radio, 14 February). 

   Echoes of Ukraine 

   The allegations in the Russian press that Kazakhstan's nuclear 
weapons are unsafe are strikingly reminiscent of similar warnings 
in regard to Ukrainian weapons.  For example,  Litovkin touched 
off a controversy in early 1993 when he published an article in 
Izvestiya--also citing unnamed Russian military officials- 
-alleging that nuclear weapons in Ukraine had deteriorated to the 
point of threatening "a second Chernobyl" (16 February 1993). 
Litovkin's article was followed by public statements by Russian 
military officials alleging nuclear weapons hazards in Ukraine. 
These charges have continued to surface, even after the 14 
January signing by Presidents Clinton, Kravchuk, and Yeltsin of a 
trilateral agreement in which Ukraine agreed to dismantle and 
remove its nuclear weapons.  For example, in a widely reported 18 
January press conference at the Russian Ministry of Defense, Col. 
Gen. Yevgeniy Maslin, introduced as the ministry's "chief expert 
in the area of nuclear safety," said the physical condition of 
the warheads in Ukraine is becoming "intolerable."  Saying that 
"nuclear safety in Ukraine is continuing to get worse," Maslin 
asserted that warhead storage facilities are "packed" beyond 
"standard limits," that "background radiation" at the facilities 
has increased, and that warranty periods on "most component parts 
have expired."  Maslin also said that some military officials in 
Ukraine understand the safety hazards of the weapons there "but 
wish to retain their positions in the new structures that emerged 
there to supervise the nuclear weapons."  He criticized Ukrainian 
lawmakers, saying they are too concerned with "playing the 
nuclear card" in exchange for economic benefits without 
appreciating the danger posed by the weapons (ITAR-TASS, Moscow 
radio, 18 January; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 19 January; Russian TV, 
18, 20 January). 

   Outlook 

   Although Russian Ministry of Defense officials have not yet been 
observed to comment publicly on the issue of the safety of 
nuclear weapons in Kazakhstan, it appears highly probable that 
Litovkin is fronting for them in this case just as he appeared to 
do earlier on the Ukrainian safety issue.  By raising the spectre 
of nuclear accidents in Kazakhstan, Moscow is probably hoping to 
generate international as well as domestic Kazakhstani pressure 
on the government in Almaty to accede to a timely settlement 
acceptable to Russia.  If they follow the same tactics they have 
used toward Ukraine, Russian military and government officials 
can be expected to raise the safety issue publicly in the coming 
months, particularly if Kazakhstan is seen to be holding out for 
a settlement unacceptable to Moscow.  With regard to Ukraine, the 
resumption of the use of scare tactics by the Russian military- 
-even after the signing of the trilateral agreement--suggests 
that Moscow wants to keep pressure on Ukraine until the terms of 
the trilateral accord are fulfilled. 

(AUTHOR:  ROBERTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 18/0039z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24668 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-17FEB94-PALESTINIANS 
<H3> <TI>      Cairo Accord Generates Unenthusiastic Palestinian Response </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              The 9 February agreement between Israel and the PLO on measures 
to implement the Gaza-Jericho plan has been received warily by 
many mainstream Palestinians, both within the PLO and inside the 
occupied territories.  Apart from those PLO officials directly 
involved in the negotiations, monitored mainstream comment since 
the announcement of the agreement has ranged from open criticism 
to cautious neutrality.  PLO leaders have launched an effort to 
rally mainstream support for the accord, but many Palestinians 
will withhold judgment until they see its practical consequences. 

                         END SUMMARY 
   Within some PLO leadership circles, announcement of the agreement 
evidently rekindled both anger over PLO leader Yasir 'Arafat's 
tight control over the negotiating process and concerns that he 
is making too many concessions to Israel because he has staked 
his political future on the success of the Oslo agreement. 
According to press reports, 'Arafat was unable on 13 February to 
muster a quorum for a meeting of the PLO Executive Committee, 
several of whose members have reportedly already been boycotting 
committee meetings since the signing in September 1993 of the 
Declaration of Principles negotiated with Israel in Oslo (London 
Al-Sharq Al-Awsat, 13 February).  Three committee members (out of 
a nominal membership of 18) indicated explicitly their 
dissatisfaction in recent statements appearing in the Jordanian 
press: 

   --In a statement reported by the daily Al-Ra'y on 14 February, 
Sulayman al-Najjab confirmed that he refused to attend the 
Executive Committee meeting called for 13 February "to protest 
the manner in which the Executive Committee was treated." 
According to Al-Ra'y, al-Najjab charged that committee decisions 
concerning negotiations "were not respected" and specifically 
that the Cairo agreement violated committee decisions.  Al-Najjab 
went on to call on the Executive Committee to reject the 
agreement and to charge that the PLO leadership is conducting 
negotiations "without any terms of reference or any clear 
negotiating plan that is committed to the Palestinian 
understanding of the Oslo agreement." 

   --'Abdallah Hurani also called for rejection of the Cairo 
agreement according to a report appearing in Al-Ra'y on the 15th. 
Apparently referring to the 13 February Executive Committee 
meeting, Hurani branded as "illegal" any committee meeting held 
without a quorum.  The report said that Hurani called on 
Palestinians in the territories to engage in "assertive and 
vigorous popular action" to "call a halt to these concessions" 
[to Israel] and also called on the PLO leadership to "rethink" 
its position on the Oslo agreement. 

   --Samir Ghawshah, though somewhat equivocal, complained about 
both the Cairo agreement and the nature of PLO deliberations in 
an interview.  The Cairo accord, he said, is "not ideal," an 
"incomplete step," and "not a positive start for the resumption 
of negotiations on various issues."  Elsewhere in the interview, 
he called the agreement a "possible step" but "not a step that 
responds to the minimum level of our demands."  Perhaps referring 
to Egyptian efforts to bring about the agreement, Ghawshah said 
that the Palestinian delegation in Cairo was subjected to 
"tremendous extortions," even though it "resisted some of them." 
Nonetheless, he added, the delegation "could not impose its 
concept of the agreement in a manner that meets the minimum 
[Palestinian] demands."  Referring to an Executive Committee 
meeting held prior to the Cairo accord, Ghawshah described the 
meeting as "incomplete"--apparently an allusion to boycotting 
members--and said that "many arguments took place." (Amman Al- 
Dustur, 16 February). 

   Editorial Coolness 

   The leading East Jerusalem Palestinian daily Al-Quds was 
strikingly reserved in its assessment of the Cairo agreement. 
Perhaps hinting at resentment of alleged Egyptian pressure, an 
editorial on 11 February said that the accord "was drafted with 
considerable help from our Egyptian brothers" and that its 
implementation "will require tireless and continuous efforts." 
Both conflicting Israeli and Palestinian interpretations of the 
Oslo agreement and the continued deterioration of conditions in 
the territories, Al-Quds argued, "have cast a dark shadow over 
any positive expectations during the past weeks."  Although it 
acknowledged that the Cairo agreement "has somewhat restored 
momentum to the negotiating process," the paper warned that "this 
momentum has not yet been translated into reality."  Citing the 
"theoretical nature" of the agreement, it said that "any optimism 
regarding the future would be premature" and that experience "has 
taught the Palestinian people realism."  In a remarkably passive 
conclusion, Al-()uds said that "it is better for one to wait, be 
patient, and expect surprises." 

   PLO Seeks To Rally Support 

   In apparent recbgnition of mainstream Palestinian skepticism, PLO 
leaders directly involved in the negotiations have sought in 
recent days to justify their actions.  Most notably, Executive 
Committee member Yasir 'Abd-Rabbuh offered a detailed defense of 
the Cairo agreement and appealed for popular Palestinian support. 
In an interview with Jordan Television--probably visible in much 
of the West Bank--'Abd-Rabbuh said that the agreement "has been 
an extremely important step" that "resolved a number of major 
issues."  He promised that [Israeli] "withdrawal will take place 
and the dawn of Palestinian independence will soon arrive."  PLO 
leaders, he said, "are aware that there is a feeling of 
frustration" among many Palestinians, and he acknowledged that 
"so many issues [remain] that require extensive negotiations." 
Nonetheless, he argued, "there is no such thing as a perfect 
solution" and critics of the accord do not understand "how much 
bargaining it took" to achieve it.  "The most dangerous thing in 
this process, ' he warned, "is to lose patience," adding elsewhere 
in the interview that "quick solutions will not be sufficient and 
will be dangerous to our future."  Palestinians, he argued, will 
get "better guarantees for our future" by reaching "solutions 
achieved through determination, patience, and perseverance" (12 
February). 

   Implications 

   In the near term, 'Arafat has probably gained both time and 
maneuvering room through the Cairo agreement.  He was able to ram 
the Oslo agreement through a disgruntled Executive Committee last 
September, and there is thus far little indication that the most 
recent grumbling of committee members cut out of the 
decisionmaking process will compel him to modify the PLO 
negotiating position. 

   Nonetheless, long term implementation of any agreement with 
Israel, including the establishment of an effective Palestinian 
autonomy regime in the territories, will likely require more 
active mainstream support than is evident in the cool reception 
of the Cairo  agreement.  While concrete signs that 
implementation of the Gaza-Jericho accord is under way would 
doubtless boost support for the PLO and the peace process, 
'Arafat and his inner circle, who are effectively controlling 
Palestinian policy toward the peace process, have been less 
successful to date in bolstering confidence in their leadership 
among many mainstream Palestinians. 
   (AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 7336094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 18/0045z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24669 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   18 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-17FEB94-PALESTINIANS 
<H3> <TI>      New Paper Seeks To Boost Support for PLO </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
The     appearance in Jerusalem of a new Palestinian newspaper 
apparently intended to present the PLO leadership's viewpoint to 
educated Palestinians reflects the leadership's concern to 
maintain support in the occupied territories as the peace process 
proceeds.  According to a report by Israel Television on 13 
February, the English-language weekly The Jerusalem Times is 
edited by Hanna Sinyurah, formerly editor of the daily Al-Fajr- 
-until it closed last July--which generally supported Yasir 
'Arafat and the mainstream PLO leadership.  The report cited 
staff members of the paper as saying that the paper seeks "to 
boost grass roots support for the political process" and that it 
receives "ideological support," though not financial assistance, 
from the PLO. 

(AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 18/0056z feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24670 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   19 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-18FEB94-JAPAN U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Signals Concern Over Long-Term Impact of Failed Talks </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               While Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa has won fairly broad 
domestic support for his refusal to accept U.S. demands to 
establish objective criteria to measure Japan's import 
performance at the failed 11 February U.S.-Japan summit, comments 
by Japanese political and business leaders and by the Japanese 
media have contained a strong undercurrent of concern about the 
long-term impact of the failure of the framework negotiations. 
These concerns appear to center around the further rise of the 
yen, possible U.S. sanctions against Japan, and the potential 
danger that increased trade friction may damage the political and 
security relationship between the two countries.  To help contain 
such future developments, the Japanese Government appears to be 
planning to draw up a variety of measures to increase imports and 
relax regulations governing the Japanese market in certain areas. 
The scope of these measures, however, is still uncertain and they 
may face resistance from entrenched interests in the Japanese 
bureaucracy. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Prime Minister Hosokawa's refusal to accept U.S. demands to 
establish objective criteria to measure Japan's trade performance 
won support across a broad political spectrum in Japan.  Senior 
members of Hosokawa's increasingly fractious coalition backed the 
prime minister solidly on the issue in comments made over the 
past few days.  In  comments on a 13 February TV Asahi panel 
discussion, Chief Cabinet Secretary Masayoshi Takemura, who has 
recently reportedly clashed with the prime minister on a variety 
of issues, including tax reform, defended Hosokawa's stance and 
stated that acceptance of targets would have been "totally 
impossible."  He added that any policy under which the government 
would have agreed to set targets for the private sector would 
have "threatened the very foundation of the nation's economic 
system."  Minister of International Trade and Industry Hiroshi 
Kumagai made similar comments during a 12 February FNN Television 
round table discussion, and Ichiro Ozawa, Secretary General of one 
of the key parties in the coalition and one of the leading 
figures behind Hosokawa's government, endorsed the prime 
minister's stance in an interview in the 14 February Yomiuri 
Shimbun.  Ozawa stated that it was "proper" for Hosokawa to 
reject the targets because Japan had grown more independent of 
the United States and must now "act with responsibility as a 
mature nation." 
   Ambivalent LDP Stance 
   The opposition Liberal Democratic Party has also supported 
Hosokawa's stance on targets, confining their somewhat ambivalent 
and muted criticism of his performance at the summit to other 
issues.  For example: 
   -- In a statement on the summit, LDP President Yohei Kono 
described Japan's rejection of U.S. demands for establishing 
objective criteria as "natural," according to a 12 February Kyodo 
report.  Kono reportedly focused his criticism of Hosokawa on 
what he described as the government's overreliance on the 
bureaucracy to handle the trade negotiations.  He also rebuked 
the prime minister for criticizing the way the LDP conducted 
negotiations with the United States in the past. 
   -- Similarly, former Foreign Minister Michio Watanabe, a senior 
LDP leader, reportedly stated during a lecture on 14 February 
that he opposed the setting of numerical targets, but warned that 
the United States might take "retaliatory action" against Japan 
because of the failure of the summit (Kyodo, 14 February). 
   -- During a round table discussion on NHK Television on 13 
February, Kabun Muto, foreign minister at the time the framework 
accords were drawn up in July 1993, praised Hosokawa's for 
rejecting objective criteria in almost unequivocal terms.  Muto 
implied that the LDP, if still in power, would have done the same 
thing, stating that the party had, while in power, maintained 
that it would not "accept any measure that would lead to managed 
trade."   Muto added that "it was good that the talks broke off 
in failure" in view of the U.S. insistence on setting objective 
criteria. 
   -- During the same discussion program, another LDP member, 
Masajuro Shiokawa, criticized the government for not dealing with 
U.S. demands for the establishment of objective criteria rapidly 
enough, commenting that it had "known from the beginning" about 
the demand.  He added that the government would have been in a 
stronger position had it been able to come up with an effective 
"counterproposal" to U.S. demands. 
   Business and Media Reaction 
   The Japanese business community and the Japanese media also 
generally supported Hosokawa's stance on objective criteria. 
Many business leaders, particularly those whose industries were 
involved in the framework talks, applauded Hosokawa's stand, 
arguing, as they have in the past, that such targets would have 
represented an unwarranted interference with the private sector. 
For example,  Gaishi Hiraiwa, chairman of the Federation of 
Economic Organizations (Keidanren), Japan's leading business 
organization, described the breakdown of the trade talks as 
"unavoidable" and praised the government for sticking to "its 
policy of rejecting the U.S. managed-trade approach" (Kyodo, 11 
February).  According to the 13 February Mainichi Shimbun, 
similar statements came from the leaders of major 
telecommunications firms and from the chairman of the Marine and 
Fire Insurance Association of Japan.  In addition, editorials in 
every major Japanese daily newspaper praised the Prime Minister's 
stance on objective criteria.  A typical comment came from 
Japan's leading economic newspaper, Nihon Keizai Shimbun, which 
described rejection of objective criteria as "common sense" and 
stated that the targets demanded by Washington would have led to 
"managed trade." 
   Despite the business community's support for Hosokawa's rejection 
of objective criteria, some business leaders, particularly in 
export-oriented industries, appear to be concerned about the 
potential impact of the failure of the trade talks on Japanese 
business.  The 16 February Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted Ryuzaburo 
Kaku, the chairman of Canon, Inc., as warning that unless 
measures were taken to reduce the trade surplus, the continued 
appreciation of the yen would "deal a fatal blow to Japan's 
manufacturing industries."  Similarly, the 13 February Mainichi 
Shimbun reported that the automobile industry, while pleased that 
the government had rejected the establishment of objective 
criteria, was worried that it might come under increasing 
pressure to work out "voluntary" plans to purchase more foreign 
products as the government searched for ways to break the impasse 
with the United States. 
   Impact of Summit Failure 
   The comments of various Japanese political, government, and 
business leaders suggest that, despite their general support for 
Hosokawa's rejection of numerical targets, they have at least 
three major concerns as a result of the failure of the summit: 
that the United States might attempt to drive the yen 
significantly higher on world money markets, weakening Japanese 
competitiveness and slowing Japan's recovery from its current 
recession; that the United States might impose sanctions on Japan 
in retaliation for its refusal to accept the concept of objective 
criteria; and that tenser relations with the United States might 
weaken the security relationship between the United States and 
Japan. 
   Yen Rise 
   The sharp rise of the yen in the wake of the breakdown of the 
framework talks appears to have aroused particular concern among 
political, government, and business leaders and may be pushing 
some of them to consider measures to address Japan's large 
current account surplus.  Ichiro Ozawa warned during a 15 
February press conference that the appreciation of the yen would 
cause Japan's economy to "suffer profound damage," according to 
the 15 February Nihon Keizai Shimbun.  He added that the two 
countries should "hold talks as soon as possible to discuss ways 
to settle the framework talks."   At a 15 February news 
conference,  Akira Yamagishi, chairman of Rengo [the Japanese 
Trade Union Confederation], reportedly described the appreciation 
of the yen as a "serious" situation and a "crisis".  According to 
the 15 February Nihon Keizai Shimbun, he said he would press the 
government to draw up an "action program" of measures to 
liberalize the Japanese market, expand domestic demand, and 
reduce the trade surplus in order to "reconcile Japan and the 
United States as soon as possible."  The 16 February Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun reported that a number of Japanese business leaders are 
also worried about the rise of the yen and believe that Japan 
should attempt to defuse tensions with the United States by 
taking unilateral measures to reduce its trade surplus. 
   Possible Sanctions 
   A second area of concern is that the United States might impose 
sanctions on Japan.  While many Japanese political and government 
leaders have warned that Japan might lodge a complaint with GATT 
should this happen, their comments suggest they wish to avoid a 
confrontation in this area.  For example, in comments on NHK 
Television on 13 February, Chief Cabinet Secretary Masayoshi 
Takemura speculated that the U.S. Congress and the American 
public might press the Clinton administration to impose sanctions 
on Japan, but added that he hoped Washington would be "prudent 
and reasonable" and "stay away from unilateral measures.  When 
pressed by his interviewer, he said Japan might consider turning 
to GATT if the United States invoked sanctions.  The 13 February 
Mainichi Shimbun reported that some parts of the automobile 
industry were concerned that the U.S. Government and Congress 
might push for sanctions, which in turn would result in more 
pressure on the auto industry to import more foreign products. 
   Political, Security Relationship 
   A third area of concern has been the potential impact of 
increased trade frictions on the political and security 
relationship between Japan and the United States.  In an 
interview in the 14 February Yomiuri Shimbun, Ichiro Ozawa stated 
that he was most concerned not about the future of the framework 
talks, but about the possibility that the "relationship of trust 
between Japan and the United States" might disintegrate.  He 
added that Japan was still not in a position to adequately handle 
a range of responsibilities in the international security arena. 
This point of view has also received some play in media 
commentary on the summit.  For example, in an article in the 14 
February Nihon Keizai Shimbun, a member of the paper's editorial 
staff warned that if the "relationship of trust between the two 
countries in security matters is undermined, this would certainly 
bring chaos to the Japanese financial and capital markets and 
unsettle the Japanese economy." 
   Government Course of Action 
   For the time being, the Japanese Government appears to be hoping 
to limit the possibility and scope of U.S. retaliation and the 
damage to bilateral relations by taking a variety of steps to 
increase imports and relax regulations governing the Japanese 
market in selected areas.  Prime Minister Hosokawa has stated on 
several occasions since the end of the summit that he plans to 
encourage such efforts.  He told a news conference at the Madison 
Hotel in Washington on 12 February, for example, that Japan 
"should work voluntarily to achieve what it can" to make 
procedures on its insurance and government procurement markets 
clearer and promote "industrial cooperation" between Japanese and 
U.S. auto companies (NHK Television, 12 February).  He also told 
reporters upon his return to Tokyo that he planned to quickly 
begin to examine measures Japan could take to reduce its trade 
surplus, according to a 13 February NHK Television report. 
   Faced with the sharp rise of the yen and the threat of U.S. 
sanctions, Hosokawa has followed through on these promises 
quickly.  On 15 February, he reportedly ordered his cabinet to 
draw up "emergency plans" to cut Japan's trade surplus with the 
United States (Kyodo, 15 February). On 17 February, he reportedly 
met with senior Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI), Ministry of Finance, and Foreign Ministry officials 
involved in the framework negotiations to discuss measures to 
improve foreign access to the Japanese market (Kyodo, 17 
February).  He also reportedly announced that he had appointed 
the MITI Minister, Finance Minister, Foreign Minister, Posts and 
Telecommunications Minister and Chief Cabinet Secretary to a 
special task force to draw up market opening measures beginning 
the week of 21 February. 
   The exact nature of the measures the government will take appears 
to still be vague.  According to the 15 February Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun, among proposals under consideration are steps to further 
relax government procurement procedures and the introduction of 
an insurance brokerage system and a public hearing system which 
would allow foreign insurance companies to voice their 
grievances.  According to a 17 February Kyodo report, other 
possibilities include measures to tighten antitrust policies and 
relax government procurement procedures. 
   There appears to be fairly broad support among Japanese political 
leaders for such steps.  Chief Cabinet Secretary Masayoshi 
Takemura, head of one of the parties in the coalition government, 
stated on two different television programs on 13 February that 
Japan must take steps on its own to reduce its trade surplus.  At 
one of these, an NHK Television roundtable discussion of the 
summit, he stated that although Japan could not accept numerical 
targets, "it is still responsible for redressing its huge trade 
surplus by liberalizing and expanding its own markets."  He added 
that Japan should take such steps because of the importance of 
its bilateral relations with the United States. MITI Minister 
Hiroshi Kumagai made similar statements during a FNN Television 
round table on 12 February and Ichiro Ozawa, in an interview in 
the 14 February Yomiuri Shimbun, stated Japan should take steps 
to deregulate its economy as part of its effort to reduce trade 
friction with the United States. 
   The Japanese media also have given broad support to this 
approach.  Post-summit editorials in all of the major newspapers- 
-Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Yomiuri Shimbun, Asahi Shimbun, and 
Mainichi Shimbun--called on the government to take steps to 
reduce the trade surplus, open Japanese markets, and deregulate 
the economy. 

Outlook 
   Over the coming weeks, the Japanese Government will probably take 
a number of steps to try to convince Washington that Japan is 
attempting to reduce its trade surplus and open its markets.  In 
view of the solid consensus within Japan against targets, these 
measures will probably not include the objective criteria 
Washington is seeking, however.  Moreover, any substantial 
measures will probably meet with strong resistance from the 
Japanese bureaucracy.  With Hosokawa's coalition increasingly 
fraught by internal divisions over a variety of policy issues, it 
is unclear whether the government will be able to focus 
sufficiently on these measures or muster the strength to force 
the bureaucracy to draw up more than cosmetic measures to address 
the trade surplus.   If the yen continues to rise, however, the 
Japanese business community may prove increasingly willing to 
take steps on its own to increase imports.  Many export-oriented 
industries may come to see such steps as preferable to a 
continued appreciation of the yen, which would hurt the 
competitiveness of their exports. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
SMB 18/2156Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24671 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-22FEB94-DPRK-U.S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Ties Inspections to U.S. Action on Exercise, Talks </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                              In the clearest expression to date of its readiness to allow 
resumption of international inspection of North Korean nuclear 
facilities, Pyongyang has indicated that an "early inspection" by 
the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) will be realized 
once Washington announces cancellation of Team Spirit and the 
date for reconvening DPRK-U.S. high-level talks. 
                         END SUMMARY 
   Using an authoritative Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement on 
21 February, Pyongyang indirectly confirmed earlier Western 
reporting of an IAEA-North Korean agreement on the imminent 
resumption of nuclear inspections.  The statement referred to an 
unspecified "agreement between us and the agency" and 
acknowledged that Pyongyang is in "the action phase" of 
implementing that agreement (Pyongyang radio, 21 February). 
   The statement, made ostensibly in an answer to a question by a 
KCNA reporter, made a series of assertions: 
   + It again claimed that Washington and the IAEA have redefined 
the scope of nuclear inspections they are demanding and that the 
only remaining issue now standing in the way of carrying out the 
agreement with the IAEA is the "simultaneous" action that the 
spokesman claimed Washington had previously agreed to take. 
   + It maintained that a DPRK-U.S. agreement reached at a bilateral 
contact in New York on 29 December specifies a U.S. declaration 
of the discontinuation of the Team Spirit joint ROK-U.S. 
maneuvers and a joint DPRK-U.S. announcement of the date for the 
next round of high-level bilateral talks. 
   The statement also included a clear plea to avoid further 
complications in resolving the nuclear inspection issue, warning 
that if Washington "again" sets "unjustifiable conditions" for 
cancelling Team Spirit or otherwise "applies pressure," the DPRK- 
IAEA agreement cannot be implemented.  The present "hard-won" 
opportunity will be lost, the statement went on, and there will 
not be "another opportunity" to reach a compromise solution. 
   Inter-Korean Talks     Indicating that Pyongyang is also ready to 
fulfill the other prerequisite for the resumption of DPRK-U.S. 
talks, the 21 February statement for the first time claimed that 
Pyongyang had also agreed at the 29 December meeting to 
"affirmatively examine" any South Korean proposal for exchanging 
special envoys.  In another indication that Pyongyang is moving 
toward resumption of inter-Korean dialogue, Pyongyang on 18 
February issued a Foreign Ministry memorandum--a vehicle 
Pyongyang sometimes uses to map out its initial negotiating 
posture--that purported to document South Korea's "clandestine 
program" to develop "nuclear weapons" (18 February).  Serving 
notice that there will be hard bargaining ahead, the memorandum 
stressed that South Korea's heavy water reactors should be 
replaced by ones based on light water technology.  Earlier, the 
North had declared its intention to replace its graphite- 
moderated reactors with light-water reactors. 
   Implications     The 21 February statement is the strongest 
indication to date of North Korean readiness to take major steps 
toward resolving the nuclear issue.  However, in warning that 
there may not be "another opportunity" for reaching a compromise 
solution, the statement may be implicitly signaling that 
pragmatists in the North Korean leadership are under pressure to 
deliver tangible proof of Washington's good faith. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS/COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA 
DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/BOETZ/GSP 22/1639z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24672 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23FEB94-SLOVAKIA 
<H3> <TI>      Slovakia:  Embattled Premier Strikes Back Through Media </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Facing     increasing criticism from erstwhile allies as early 
parliamentary elections loom nearer, Prime Minister Vladimir 
Meciar appears to have started his campaign by using media that 
has come under his control to publicize himself in a favorable 
light.  For example, the daily Republika, whose chief editor, Jan 
Smolec, appeared on the 1992 election list of Meciar's Movement 
for a Democratic Slovakia (HZDS) (Narodna Obroda, 2 May 1992), 
published a highly sympathetic two-part interview in its 7 and 8 
February editions.  In the interview, Smolec declared that 
"independent Slovakia" is Meciar's "achievement as a statesman" 
and contended that the daily's readers were "very disappointed" 
in President Michal Kovac--a former top HZDS member now a rival 
of Meciar--when Kovac "stood up against you," adding that readers 
considered Kovac's advisers "obnoxious people."  Meciar, by way 
of contrast, was presented in a friendly light, discussing his 
recent vacation in the Tatra mountains "roaming the streets" of 
villages, skiing, and meeting "young people."  Highlighting his 
achievements as prime minister, Meciar contended that in December 
1992 he alone took responsibility for building a new state, since 
"responsibility frightened even some members of the HZDS" who 
"left me all alone."  Meciar added that "if an authoritative 
decision is to be made again," he "will not hesitate." 

   Meciar also used state-run Slovak Television and Bratislava 
Radio, now headed by HZDS adherents, to defend his position 
during a two-week political crisis, when his governing coalition 
effectively lost its parliamentary majority through defections 
over his continued leadership.  As opposition parties blocked key 
government initiatives and threatened to oust him from power, 
Meciar made a key 15 February appearance on a weekly television 
program "Press Club" devoted to presenting the government's point 
of view, thus enabling him to defend his control over the 
privatization of large-scale enterprises, his call for early 
elections in June, and his demand that defectors from his party 
be stripped of their parliamentary mandates.  The same evening, 
Meciar also appeared on Slovak Television's "Kroky" news program 
to further explain his position, and, during a two-part 18 
February interview with Bratislava Radio, he detailed his plans 
to hold a referendum on these issues.  Meciar had prepared the 
way for his easy access to the airwaves last year, when he 
replaced television and radio officials with his own supporters, 
after denouncing Slovak Television for providing a forum 
exclusively for the government's opponents  (See the Trends of 8 
December 1993, pages 25 to 27). 

(AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, ELAG, (703) 733-6120) 

ELAG/GILISON/CL 23/2008Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24673 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23FEB94-RUSSIA 
<H3> <TI> </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Debt        Crisis Temporarily Halts State Broadcasting 

                            S U M M A RY 

   Protesting state-owned television and radio companies' prolonged 
failure to pay for broadcasting services, Ministry of 
Communications workers struck on 10 February, disrupting 
broadcasts across much of Russia.  Although Prime Minister Viktor 
Chernomyrdin persuaded the broadcasters to end their strike the 
same day by promising to pay the debt, he hinted that the 
government may turn to privatization of some television and radio 
companies to reduce the debt problem.  The belated government 
response to the strike threat suggests that new state television 
chief Aleksandr Yakovlev, who is not a member of the cabinet, may 
not be well positioned in the government to serve as an effective 
spokesman for his sector. 

                              END SUMMARY 

   Ministry of Communications workers launched their strike on 10 
February complaining that they had not been paid in months, and 
that state television and radio companies owed them 80 billion 
rubles.  During the strike the workers refused to broadcast state 
programming except news.  According to various reports, the 
strike curtailed broadcasting in 30 to 60 regions including St. 
Petersburg but not Moscow (Interfax, 10 February; Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta, 12 February). 

   Efforts by the government to avert the strike appear to have been 
too little, too late.  According to Anatoliy Nazeykin, chairman 
of the Central Committee of the Russian Federation Trade Union of 
Communications Workers, on 21 January a conference of 
communications industry representatives sent to the government a 
package of proposals on resolving the situation along with a 
demand that the government pay the debt by I February, but the 
government did not reply (Segodnya, 10 February; Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 25 January).  The government began to react after Russian 
Television reported on 8 February that the central committee of 
the Union of Communications Workers had threatened to strike on 
10 February if the debts were not paid.  On 9 February 
Chernomyrdin convened an "emergency" meeting with Communications 
Minister Vladimir Bulgak, whom he reportedly had to call away 
from a medical examination, Aleksandr Yakovlev, Chairman of the 
Russian Federal Service for Television and Radio Broadcasting, 
and Communications Ministry officials, but without 
representatives of the communications workers trade union (Trud, 
10 February).  After the meeting Chernomyrdin ordered the Finance 
Ministry to "explore the possibilities" for a gradual repayment 
of the debt (Segodnya, 10 February) and "appealed" to 
communications workers to continue broadcasting (Radio Rossii, 10 
February). 

   Communications workers rejected Chernomyrdin's response to their 
demands and went ahead with their strike as threatened.  Nazeykin 
called Chernomyrdin's response "vague and indefinite" and 
dismissed his instructions to the Finance Ministry as 
unconvincing--" instructions are not the same as money" (Segodnya, 
10 February; Interfax, 10 February).   Nazeykin said that the 
government had issued more than 10 such instructions in 1993 but 
the problem remained unsolved and had become "extremely 
exacerbated" (ITAR-TASS, 10 February). 

   The seriousness of the television debt situation first became 
apparent in June of 1993 when broadcasters threatened blackouts 
to draw attention to their plight.  At that time the Finance 
Ministry, under pressure from Russian Television and its radio 
affiliate Radio Rossii, averted widespread blackouts, (though 
regional blackouts did occur), by agreeing to pay one quarter of 
an 8 billion ruble debt.  The situation continued to deteriorate, 
however, as the television companies fell further and further in 
arrears to communications companies, and the latters' debts to 
their energy suppliers steadily grew. 

   Strike Settled, Problem Remains 

   Making more promises to pay off the debt, Chernomyrdin persuaded 
the communications workers to end their strike quickly, but he 
hinted that the government may resort to privatizing some 
television channels to relieve the debt problem.  Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta (12 February) reported that Chernomyrdin had made a "firm 
promise" to pay off the debt by the end of the first fiscal 
quarter of 1994 and asked the communications workers to resume 
normal broadcasting.  By the evening of 10 February they did, and 
the strike ended.  Nezavisimaya Gazeta television affairs 
commentator Irina Petrovskaya pointed out the temporary nature of 
the solution warning that "everyone understands:  the situation 
may be repeated."  Commenting on the strike's end, Chernomyrdin 
suggested that the government may ultimately try to deal with the 
debt problem by privatizing some state-owned channels:  "one 
should look to see what needs to be corporatized and what should 
be privatized" (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 12 February). 

   Implications 

   The communication workers' demand for payment is only one of a 
number of large claims being pressed on the government now that 
the most influential monetarists, who were the staunchest 
opponents of such budget busting demands, have left the cabinet. 
Indeed, the workers may have been emboldened to escalate pressure 
to meet their demands by the monetarists' exit and the 
agricultural lobby's recent success in grabbing a chunk of the 
budget.  It is noteworthy that Chernomyrdin, seemingly pressed by 
claimants on all sides, hinted at privatization rather than 
administrative measures, to relieve the broadcasters' debt 
crisis. 
(AUTHOR:  CRIMMINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
RUSSIAN ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6070). 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/CL 23/2123Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24674 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000009994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
VIENNA, PLEASE PASS TO BOSNIA 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23FEB94-BOSNIA 
<H3> <TI>      Bosnia-Herzegovina:  Mladic's Political Clout May Be Fading </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Bosnian     Serb hardliner and army commander-in-chief Ratko Mladic 
appears to be taking a less active role in Bosnian Serb politics, 
suggesting that his influence on the political decisions of the 
Serbian leadership is declining.  The Belgrade daily Politika, 
taking note of his failure to appear in public "for some time," 
claimed that "well-informed" sources in Bosnia-Herzegovina "were 
even saying that Mladic had resigned."  Politika reported that 
Mladic, when asked about that claim, "laughed" it off and said 
that he "was busy with obligations at the front."  Suggesting 
that he may have been eased out of the leadership circle that 
makes political decisions, he claimed not to "want to be very 
much present in public" because there are other "individuals who 
possess more authority" who should be "in the public eye 
(Politika, 19 February).  Further suggesting that Mladic has 
involved himself in directing military operations in the field 
rather than participating in political decisionmaking in the 
Bosnian Serb "capital" of Pale, recent reports have put Mladic at 
the fronts near Bihac in the northwest and Olovo in central 
Bosnia (Paris TF-1 TV, 13 February; Danas, 15 February). 

   In contrast to his active role in opposing acceptance of the 
Vance-Owen peace proposal in May 1993, Mladic had relatively 
little to say to the media in the face of the NATO ultimatum 
demanding the withdrawal of heavy weapons from Sarajevo and has 
not been observed to comment on recent calls for the reopening of 
Tuzla airport.  According to Tanjug, on 15 February Mladic first 
announced his refusal to allow the withdrawal of his army's 
artillery from the NATO and UN-mandated exclusion zone around 
Sarajevo.  However, the next day he declared that his forces 
would at least "allow UN observers to be deployed at certain 
positions" to monitor Serbian artillery (Tanjug, 16 February). 
Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Vitaliy Churkin had earlier 
claimed that Mladic's privately expressed support for the plan 
had been the key factor in securing its implementation 
(Izvestiya, 19 February), although Mladic refrained from giving 
the withdrawal plan his public support until 23 February (Pale 
radio, 23 February).  In the interim, Bosnian Serb army chief of 
staff General Manojlo Milovanovic served as the spokesman for the 
military's views (Belgrade radio, 21 February). 
(AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
EUROPEAN AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120) 
ELAG/GILISON/CL 23/2209Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24675 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23FEB94-CHINA-INDIA 
<H3> <TI>      Border Talks Achieve Limited Progress </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Chinese     media coverage of the first meeting of Chinese and Indian 
diplomatic and military experts on Sino-Indian border issues 
suggests that while some progress was made, problems remain over 
how to proceed with the reduction of troops on the Sino-Indian 
border.  The meeting, held in New Delhi from 2-4 February, took 
place as a followup to the border accord signed by the two 
countries last September that created a team of experts to help 
the Sino-Indian Joint Working Group implement the border 
agreement.  Xinhua on 4 February reported that the two sides 
"basically reached consensus on certain issues" and that the 
border experts agreed to hold another meeting in Beijing within 
the "next few months."  Although there was no further elaboration 
on the areas of agreement, Chinese media comment suggests that 
the two sides continue to differ over the issue of troop 
reductions along the border.  The 4 February Xinhua report 
alluded to the problem when it noted that the two sides 
"exchanged views" on "solving as early as possible" the question 
of "close-range military confrontation in certain territorial 
sectors" on the border.  Similarly, Xinhua noted on 14 January 
that the Indian Army chief of staff, in an interview that day, 
had "apparently made reference to" the "large number of force 
levels that would become available" for other uses once the 
border agreement was implemented. 
   Despite remaining differences over the troop reduction issue, 
Beijing has indirectly signaled that it continues to see China- 
Indian relations as steadily improving.  An article appearing in 
the 4 February edition of the PRC-owned Hong Kong daily Wen Wei 
Po quoted PRC Ambassador to India Cheng Ruisheng as saying that 
the "tense situation" between China and India is "now history," 
that the two countries are "working hard to regain lost time," 
and that relations are "improving step by step." 
   (AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ/PF 24/0103z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24676 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-23FEB94-JAPAN-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Debating Controversial Trade Performance Targets </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                Elements within the Japanese Government appear to be engaged in a 
search for a way to defuse trade tensions with the United States 
by finding a qualified definition of trade performance targets 
that is acceptable to both Tokyo and Washington.  Speedy 
consensus on this issue is not likely, however, as recent 
comments in favor of qualified targets by a powerful political 
leader and a senior Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) bureaucrat 
involved in the Japan-U.S. trade negotiations immediately met 
with resistance from within the ruling coalition and the 
bureaucracy, suggesting that Tokyo remains divided on the issue. 
                            END SUMMARY 
   Ichiro Ozawa, Secretary General of the Shinseito, one of the key 
political parties in the ruling Japanese coalition government, 
and Koichiro Matsuura, Deputy Foreign Minister for Economic 
Affairs, recently floated what appeared to be trial balloons 
suggesting the Japan should set some sort of voluntary, non- 
binding targets to reduce its trade surplus and improve its 
import performance.   According to the 23 February Mainichi 
Shimbun and a 23 February Kyodo report, Ozawa, one of the most 
influential politicians in Japan, told foreign correspondents on 
22 February that Japan should set "endeavor targets for Japan's 
effort to promote market opening" provided that the United States 
agreed not to impose sanctions if Tokyo failed to meet the 
targets.  The Japanese press reports have so far not provided 
further details about the exact nature of the targets Ozawa has 
in mind. 
   Matsuura, one of the key figures in the U.S.-Japan framework 
negotiations, floated a proposal that may differ somewhat in 
concept from Ozawa's, focusing on macroeconomic targets rather 
than on criteria for measuring market opening in specific 
sectors.  According to a 21 February Kyodo report, Matsuura 
suggested in a 21 February speech that Tokyo should set a 
voluntary target to cut the ratio of its global current account 
surplus in fiscal 1994.  He reportedly stated that the surplus be 
cut from the current 3.1 percent of gross domestic product (GDP) 
to 2.8 percent of gross domestic target--a figure he said would 
help reduce Japan's trade surplus with the United States. 
However, according to Kyodo, Matsuura also said that Japan and 
the United States were unlikely to reach an agreement on the 
definition of "objective criteria" to measure foreign access to 
Japanese markets, as stipulated in the July, 1993 agreement 
establishing the framework talks. 
   Ozawa's and Matsuura's comments immediately provoked statements 
of support and opposition from within both the ruling coalition 
and the bureaucracy, suggesting there is as yet no consensus on 
even a compromise position on the issue of targets within the 
Japanese government.  According to a 23 February Kyodo report, an 
unidentified "government source" indicated that there was some 
support within Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa's government for 
Ozawa's proposal, stating that it was "one idea" being floated to 
defuse trade tensions with the United States.  The source 
reportedly added that it was important that the targets be 
"nonbinding."  Another unidentified source told the 22 February 
Nihon Keizai Shimbun that there was some support within the 
government for Matsuura's idea of setting a target for the 
reduction of Japan's current account surplus, and that Japanese 
delegates "may make a statement to that effect" at the conference 
of G-7 finance ministers and central bank governors on 26 
February "if asked."  Like Ozawa, the source also stressed that 
this target must not be considered binding.  He stated that Tokyo 
"cannot take full responsibility for failure to achieve the 
goal," whose success, he argued, would be affected not only by 
Tokyo's efforts but by U.S. and European economic policies. 
   While not commenting directly on Ozawa's or Matsuura's proposals, 
other senior government leaders have suggested that they might 
support strong measures to defuse tensions with the United 
States.  Minister of International Trade and Industry Hiroshi 
Kumagai, a close associate of Ozawa, reportedly told a news 
conference on 22 February that the impasse in the framework 
negotiations "requires a political decision" and "cannot be left 
to bureaucrats."  According to a 22 February Kyodo report, he 
urged the government to take both microeconomic and macroeconomic 
measures to resolve the bilateral trade dispute.  Tokyo may also 
be hearing from Japanese diplomats in the United States that 
Prime Minister Hosokawa's plan to draw up various measures to 
relax regulations governing imports and to open Japanese markets 
may not be acceptable to Washington.  A 22 February Kyodo report 
quoted an unnamed Japanese diplomat in Washington stating that he 
did not think the plan would be "sufficient." 
   Government Opposition 
   There also appears to remain considerable opposition to the 
concept of setting any sort of targets, particularly within in 
powerful Ministry of Finance (MOF), which has proven to have 
considerable leverage with the coalition government in the past 
on such issues as tax reform.  The 22 February Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun quoted an unidentified government source as stating that 
MOF is against Matsuura's idea of making a "public commitment" to 
reduce Japan's current account surplus, arguing that Japan's 
ability to follow through on such a commitment would be affected 
by circumstances beyond its control, such as policies and 
developments in other countries.  In addition, Manae Kubota, 
director general of the Economic Planning Agency and a member of 
the Social Democratic Party of Japan, the largest party in the 
ruling coalition, has spoken out against Matsuura's proposal, 
citing arguments similar to those made by MOF.  On 22 February, 
she reportedly told a press conference that Japan could not 
commit itself to reducing its current account surplus to a 
certain percentage of GDP because the current account surplus was 
affected by such factors as fluctuations in exchange rates and 
developments in other countries.  According to a 22 February 
Kyodo report, she stated that the Japanese Government would do 
better to focus its efforts on its current plans to examine 
specific measures it can take to further open its markets, such 
as deregulation, trade and investment promotion, stricter 
antitrust enforcement, and clearer procedures for government 
procurement. 
   Initial press reporting on Ozawa's comments suggests that they, 
too, have generated some opposition.  According to the 23 
February Mainichi Shimbun, officials involved in the framework 
negotiations--presumably senior bureaucrats--are opposed to 
Ozawa's suggestion that nonbinding targets be set, arguing that 
any targets will inevitably be viewed as a formal commitment. 
   Business Community Divisions 
   Like the government, the Japanese business community appears to 
be divided over the issue of setting targets.  There appears to 
be some support within the business community for Matsuura's idea 
of setting macroeconomic targets, but less for setting targets 
for imports by specific trade sectors.  On 21 February, Masaru 
Hayami, chairman of one of Japan's leading business 
organizations, the Japan Association of Corporate Executives 
(Keizai Doyukai), reportedly stated that Japan should set a 
target to reduce the ratio of Japan's current account surplus to 
its GDP (Kyodo, 21 February).  Hayami has spoken out in favor of 
such macroeconomic targets in the past.  In an article in the 17 
October 1993 Mainichi Shimbun, he wrote that Japan should set a 
"flexible goal" to reduce its current account surplus to around 2 
percent of GDP in order to prevent Japan's economic relations 
with the United States and other countries from deteriorating and 
to keep the yen from appreciating further--a development that 
would hurt Japan's export-oriented industries.  He added, 
however, that he was "absolutely opposed" to setting targets for 
specific sectors, describing this as "managed trade." 
   Other major business leaders also remain opposed to setting 
targets for specific sectors.  On 23 February, Yutaka Kume, 
chairman of the Japan Automobile Manufacturer's Association and 
chairman of Nissan Motor Corporation reportedly stated that the 
automobile industry was opposed to setting objective criteria to 
measure the openness of Japanese markets.  According to a 23 
February Kyodo report, Kume told a press conference that "some" 
Japanese automobile companies would be willing to provide figures 
for the amount of automobile parts they purchase each year, but 
that they would not project how much they would buy in the 
future, because such projections would be regarded by the United 
States as a commitment. 
   Outlook 
   While Ozawa's and Matsuura's comments indicate that there is high 
level support in Japan for finding a solution to the dispute with 
the United States over objective criteria, the continued 
opposition to the setting of targets in such influential sections 
of the government as the Ministry of Finance suggests that it may 
be some time before the Japanese Government reaches a consensus 
on the issue.  Although Ozawa has been instrumental in resolving 
some trade disputes with the United States in the past, his 
support or the support of other influential political figures for 
one side of particularly contentious issues has not necessarily 
always translated into immediate action.  For example, Ozawa, 
former Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita, and former vice president 
of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party Shin Kanemaru all came out 
in favor of the opening of Japan's rice market in November 1991. 
Even though Takeshita and Kanemaru were the most influential 
figures in the ruling party at the time, it took two more years 
for Japan to make a decision on opening its rice market. 
Pressure for a resolution of tensions with the United States will 
most likely force a more rapid decision on the target issue. 
However, in the near term, Japan will probably attempt to defuse 
tensions with an approach which is less controversial 
domestically and easier to control, by focusing on Prime Minister 
Hosokawa's current plans to draw up measures to relax regulations 
affecting imports, clarify government procurement procedures, and 
strengthen the enforcement of antitrust legislation. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/BIETZ/PF 24/0056z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24677 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-24FEB94-PALESTINIANS 
<H3> <TI>      PLO Voices Alarm Over Turmoil in the Territories </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              Recent statements by PLO leader Yasir 'Arafat and by mainstream 
PLO organs have indicated growing concern that continued turmoil 
among Palestinians in the occupied territories will threaten the 
PLO's ability to establish an effective autonomy regime under the 
Declaration of Principles (DOP) with Israel.  While PLO 
statements have characteristically charged that Israeli 
machinations lie behind any disarray among Palestinians in the 
territories, they have nonetheless also carried an implicit 
warning to Palestinians that the infighting threatens their own 
future. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   In an interview reported by the Amman daily Jordan Times, 'Arafat 
expressed alarm over rising quantities of firearms among 
Palestinians in the territories and was quoted as charging that 
"there is a very terrible trade of arms going on under the 
auspices of some Israeli officers in the West Bank and Gaza 
Strip," an effort he described as "seriously and wickedly 
planned" to create "another Afghanistan among the Palestinians." 
While noting 'Arafat's charge, the Jordan Times reported that the 
Israel-PLO DOP had prompted serious rifts among mainstream 
Palestinians in the territories, including within 'Arafat's own 
Fatah faction, and that unnamed PLO officials have privately 
expressed fear of a "civil war" if Palestinians failed to 
exercise "self-restraint" (17 February). 

   A Fatah statement reported by the East Jerusalem Palestinian 
daily Al-Quds on 15 February implicitly confirmed reports of 
rifts within Fatah.  The statement charged that Israeli security 
services are trying to "prepare the climate for a prolonged civil 
war" among Palestinians, and specifically to "create suspect 
bodies that raise the national slogan and operate under different 
names within Fatah."  It called on Fatah supporters to "act with 
alertness and high responsibility and not deal with these 
unofficial and illegitimate organizations."  It also asserted 
that Fatah statements issued in the territories "are approved 
officially by Fatah's supreme organizational committee" in the 
territories and that any other statements, including those issued 
by "Fatah's [local] organizational offices," are "unofficial." 

   Recent commentaries broadcast by the mainstream radio Voice of 
the PLO in Baghdad also implicitly appealed to Palestinians to 
temper their internal disputes.  On 16 February, the radio 
charged that Israel is seeking to "create chaos and lack of 
security" in the territories and to "maliciously sow disputes and 
provoke sensitivities" among Palestinians.  It warned that "some 
of us have fallen victim to this black propaganda."  Apparently 
reflecting fears that Palestinian residents of the territories 
will challenge the authority of returning PLO officials, the 
commentary called for "awareness of the masses" to prepare for 
"national reconciliation after a long expatriation during the 
occupation" and said that factions in the territories "should not 
now run after authority" but should rather seek to "enhance 
cooperation . . . to launch reconstruction."  Three commentaries 
on the 21st warned against internal divisions.  They charged that 
Israel is responsible for "all the forged and distorted 
statements" and even "tribal differences" among Palestinians and 
is seeking to "create seditions and sow discord" to prove that 
the proposed Palestinian autonomy regime "cannot run the affairs 
of the Palestinian people."  Palestinians, they advised, must 
maintain "enhanced national unity" under PLO leadership as well 
as "further vigilance against any malicious instigation promoting 
discord." 

(AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH  (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/jf 24/1815Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24678 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-04-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 23 FEBRUARY 1994 </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Table     of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends--FEATURE:  Tax Cuts in Stimulus Package 
Will Have Limited Impact; FEATURE:  Articles Debate Tax Cuts as 
Economic Stimulus Measures; FEATURE:  Industry Sectors Hoping Tax 
Cut Will Boost Consumption 

   Environmental Issues - U.S.-Japan Framework Agreement on 
Environmental Technology 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Bank of Japan Seeking Independence 
From MOF; Sumitomo Bank Supporting Japanese Firms in Vietnam, China; 
MOF To Relax Controls on New Stock Market Listings in FY94; SEC 
Adopts Report on Ending Ban on Firms Buying Their Own Stock 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Industry Group Visits 
China, Assesses Cutting Tool Industry; Marubeni To Build $300 
Million LPG Distribution Network; Murata Forms Beijing JV To Make 
Ceramic Capacitors 

   INDONESIA:  NSK To Build Miniature Bearings Plant Near Jakarta 

   THAILAND:  Falling Stocks of Thai Rubber Place Trading Firms in 
Tight Spot 

   UNITED STATES:  Canon Plans To Market New High-Efficiency Solar 
Battery 

   Petroleum/Energy - MITI To Begin Study of Solar Energy Generation 
in Space 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  NEC Focuses on 
Multimedia Communications; IBM Japan Wins Last Government 
Supercomputer Bid; Canon Wins Orders To Provide Cray, KSR 
Supercomputers 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  IDO To Expand Service 
Area for Motorola Cellular Network; MPT Undertakes Efforts To Assist 
Emerging Multimedia Market 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Forecast for 1994 National 
Economy; Outlook for Individual, Private Economy in 1994; Shanghai 
Striving for Industrial Breakthroughs in 1994 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Indigenous Insurance Industry Not 
Ready for Foreign Competition; CEI Database Reports 1993 Foreign 
Trade Figures; Hong Kong Firm To Build Toll Roads in Guangdong; 
Guoco Group Invests in Shanghai Real Estate Development; Lei Shing 
Invests HK$1 Billion To Redevelop Shanghai District; Jardines Said 
Unaffected by Sino-British Relations; Hong Kong Exports for Outward 
Processing Rise 10 Percent in 3d Quarter; Record Foreign Capital 
Contracts in Sichuan in 1993; Tianjin Approves Record Number of 
Foreign-Funded Enterprises in January; Guangdong Has Nearly 4,500 
Foreign-Invested Enterprises; Hebei Preferential Policies Attract 
Foreign Investment; Liaoning Foreign-Funded Enterprises Increase in 
1993; BASF Invests in Nanjing Joint-Venture Polystyrene Plant 
Taiwan Investment in Guangxi Increases in 1993; Australian Group 
Launches Joint Resort Project in Hainan; Mainland Chemical Firm 
Plans Hong Kong Listing; Trade Volume in Pudong's New District 
Accelerated in 1993; Mainland Investors Return to Surging Hong Kong 
Real Estate Market 

   Taiwan:  Enterprise Groups Establish Close Relations With 
Southeast Asian Nations; National Bank Sets Goal for Money Supply 
Growth at 10-15 Percent in 1994; Economic Planning Official Expounds 
on Creating Operational Center; Impact of U.S. Lifting Embargo on 
Vietnam Viewed 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Steel Firms Facing Changing Global 
Market; FEATURE:  New Approach To Collecting Foreign S&amp;T Information 

Noted; FEATURE:  Record Growth Reported in Private Research 
Institutes; FEATURE:  Samsung Moving Into Helicopter, Fixed-Wing Air 
Transport; Japanese Newspaper Interviews Hyundai Motors CEO; 
Sunkyong Subsidiary Acquires U.S. Microfilm Factory; Korean-Language 
Software Development To Be Subsidized; Government To Invest in 
Multimedia Industry; Taehan Wool To Build Joint-Venture Plant in 
Vietnam; Cement Companies Consider Building Plants in Pakistan, 
China; Taebong Electronics To Open Plant in China in March; Samsung 
Introduces Integrated Customer Service Plan for Europe 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Trade Possibilities With Iran 
Reported; Taiwanese Companies To Relocate in Indonesia; Government's 
Position on Funding 'Mega-Projects'; Official Comments on Natuna Gas 
Negotiations 

   LAOS: Malaysia To Invest in Agriculture, Forestry 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Government Outlines Strategies To Attract 
More Investment; Samsung To Produce Picture Tubes for Computer 
Monitors 

   PHILIPPINES:  Hong Kong Company To Build Power Station; Sale of 
Oil Shares to Saudi Aramco Reported; Joint Venture Agreements Signed 
With Malaysian Firms 

   THAILAND:  Finance Ministry Sets 1995 Budget at $28.6 Billion 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Foreign Firms Show Interest in Export Zone, 
New City; FEATURE:  Changes in State Enterprises Reported; Stock 
Exchange Opening Delayed by Slow Privatization Efforts; State Bank 
Takes Steps To Increase Capital Mobilization; Thai Companies 
Undertaking Range of Investments; Malaysian Company To Develop Da 
Nang Export Processing Zone; Singapore Firm To Build Housing Complex 
in Ho Chi Minh City; Top Foreign Investor Countries Listed; Foreign 
Investment in 1993 in Hanoi Reported; Thai Firms To Build Video 
Conference System, Industrial Park; Japan, Taiwan To Provide 
Equipment for Cement Plant; Telecommunications Agreement Signed With 
Canada; Joint Venture With Japan To Produce Paper 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Revew FBPSP 94-04) 

   JAPAN:  Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Tax Cuts in Stimulus Package 
Will Have Limited Impact--SUMMARY:  Private economists predict that 
the government's economic stimulus package announced on 8 February 
will increase Japan's FY94 real gross domestic product (GDP) growth 
rate by 1.2 to 1.3 percentage points, thanks to large tax cuts. 
According to press reports, these economists believe the stimulus 
package will raise the FY94 real GDP growth rate to 0.5-1.2 percent, 
in place of the poorer performance that would occur without the 
stimulus package.  The Economic Planning Agency (EPA), reportedly 
has a rosier view, anticipating that the package will increase the 
real GDP growth rate by 2.0 percentage points and raise FY94's real 
GDP growth rate to 2.4 percent. 

   Private Economists Predict Little Impact From Tax Cuts - To 
stimulate Japan's stagnant economy, on 8 February the government 
announced its "largest ever" comprehensive economic stimulus package 
totaling 15.25 trillion yen ($139 billion), including tax cuts of 
5.85 trillion yen ($53 billion).  Private economists predict that 
the package will have a "limited impact" on Japan's FY94 real GDP, 
according to the 9 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The 
paper notes that an economic  simulation undertaken with NIKKEI's 
macroeconomic model, the "NIKKEI Needs-Economy," projects that the 
package will add 1.2 percentage points to real GDP growth, moving 
the economy from an estimated minus 0.7 percent in real GDP to a 
positive 0.5 percent growth rate in FY94. 

   The NIKKEI model also predicts that the package will increase 
personal consumption by 1.2 percentage points thanks to the tax 
cuts.  Although the package will increase private capital investment 
by 1.6 percentage points in FY94, the absolute value of private 
capital investment "will decrease from the FY93 level."  Increased 
loan amounts by the Housing Loan Corporation, Japan Development 
Bank, and Japan Finance Corporation for Small Business worth about 3 
trillion yen ($27 billion) in the package show little impact on 
growth in the simulation; the model assumes that loans to be 
extended by government financial institutions will only displace 
private loans, and therefore will have no net stimulative effect. 

   According to the NIKKEI article, Masaru Takagi, chief economist 
at the Fuji Research Institute, forecasts that the package will do 
little to promote a self-sustaining business recovery.  Takagi 
estimates that the package will have the actual effect of raising 
Japan's real GDP growth rate by 1.3 percentage points in FY94. 
Takagi notes, however, that even with the package, Japan's real GDP 
growth rate will increase "less than 1.0 percent" in FY94 because of 
the ongoing recession.  According to NIKKEI, Asahi Bank also 
predicts that the package will increase real GDP by 1.3 percentage 
points, with a 0.6 percentage point contribution from tax cuts, 
pushing the FY94 real GDP up to 1.2 percent. 

   EPA Estimates Spending, Tax Cuts Will Increase GDP by 2 Percent - 
According to NIKKEI, Makoto Nomura, director of the Coordination 
Division in the EPA's Coordination Bureau, explains that the EPA's 
calculations show tax cuts generating new output of goods and 
services worth 2.9 trillion yen ($26 billion) and "other parts" of 
the package generating 7.3 trillion yen ($66 billion) in new demand. 
Nomura claims that "the total 10.2 trillion yen ($92 billion) will 
be equivalent to a 2.2 percentage point increase in nominal GNP, or 
a 2.0 percentage point increase in real GDP."  Nomura adds, however, 
that most of the package's impact will appear in FY94. 

   Package Will Have Limited Effect on Nonperforming Assets, Land - 
In a 9 February editorial, NIKKEI praises the inclusion in the 
package of some measures that deal with asset deflation problems, 
such as the nonperforming assets of banks and a weak land market, 
that are considered "primary obstacles" to economic recovery.  At 
the same time, NIKKEI concedes that the measures will have "limited" 
effects.  One measure is to allow the Organization for Promoting 
Urban Development (OPUD), a nonprofit organization under the 
Ministries of Construction and Transport, to purchase land from the 
private sector, hold it for up to five years, and then sell it for 
public works projects. 

   According to the 24 January NIKKEI, the OPUD will borrow funds 
from private banks at the long-term prime lending rate--currently 
3.5 percent-- to buy land worth 100 billion yen ($909 million) a 
year for five years.  The government's Fiscal Investment and Loan 
Program will guarantee repayment.  Of the 3.5 percent interest rate 
the OPUD will pay, according to NIKKEI, 1.0 percentage point will be 
subsidized by the government.  The paper notes, however, that the 
OPUD will not buy land with "complicated collateral rights," and if 
the land purchased is not sold after five years, the seller must buy 
it back at the price the OPUD paid plus interest. 

   According to NIKKEI, while government officials are aware that 
the one- year income tax cut adopted in the package--with the timing 
of a compensating increase in the consumption tax left unsettled--is 
not exactly what the U.S. Government has been demanding, a senior 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs official commented that "the Clinton 
administration will not push its demand at the cost of destroying 
the Hosokawa Government." 

   FEATURE:  Articles Debate Tax Cuts as Economic Stimulus Measures 
- SUMMARY:  Writing in NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, an Osaka University 
professor asserts that a consumption tax cut would be a "far more 
effective" stimulus for Japan's stagnant economy than an income tax 
cut.  He argues that unlike a 20 percent income tax cut, a 
consumption tax cut would benefit all households, including those 
with low incomes, whose propensity to consume is higher than that of 
high income earners.  As a result, Japan could expect greater 
increases in consumption and subsequent production.  Some economists 
anticipate that much of the income tax cuts will be saved, according 
to press reports. 

   Economist Urges Consumption Tax Cut As Economic Stimulus - 
Writing in the 10 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), Osaka 
University Professor Tatsuo Hatta asserts that suspension of the 
consumption tax (currently at 3 percent) would be a "far more 
effective" economic stimulus measure than an income tax cut. Hatta 
argues that increased personal consumption financed by a consumption 
tax cut would be the "most effective way" to give a boost to Japan's 
stagnant economy.  Since consumers tend to continue spending the 
same amount of money, Hatta notes, Japan can expect actual 
consumption and subsequent production increases of at least 3 
percent if the consumption tax were to be suspended.  Hatta proposes 
a consumption tax cut if the economy does not improve. 

   Hatta explains that a consumption tax cut would likely lead to 
more spending than saving, whereas an income tax cut would likely 
lead to more saving than spending in Japan.  This is true because a 
consumption tax cut benefits low-income households, whose propensity 
to consume is much higher than that of high-income earners. 
Consequently, tax benefits for low- income households stimulate 
consumption and thereby business activity.  In Hatta's view, the 
benefits from the 20 percent across-the-board income tax cut adopted 
by the government on 8 February "accrues disproportionately" to 
higher income households with annual incomes over 10 million yen 
($95,000). 

   Hatta argues that regardless of income levels, a consumption tax 
cut would promote more consumption by those who want to buy durable 
goods.  A household with an annual income of 8 million yen ($76,000) 
that wants to buy a house costing 50 million yen ($476,000) would 
receive a benefit worth 1.5 million yen ($14,000) from the 
suspension of the consumption tax, instead of the 158,000 yen 
($1,500) it would gain from the income tax cut.  Hatta comments that 
a consumption tax cut would strongly promote private housing 
investment, which has a multiplier effect on business activity. 

   Economists Expect Small Impact from Income Tax Cut - Some 
economists think that the tax cuts will mostly end up in savings. 
According to the 23 January NIKKEI, Mikio Wakatsuki, director of the 
Japan Research Institute and former Bank of Japan policy board 
member, states that "only half" of an income tax cut will end up 
being spent, but this "should prevent the economy from deteriorating 
further."  Keio University Professor Haruo Shimada feels that "most" 
of the tax cuts will be saved or used to repay debts in the face of 
an uncertain employment situation, according to the 22 January 
NIKKEI.  Therefore, he concludes, a "large lift effect" on the 
economy can not be expected.  Tokyo University Professor Keimei 
Kaizuka, writing in the 1 October 1993 NIKKEI, observed that tax 
cuts would be saved for the most part because of an uncertain 
employment situation and the growing numbers of people facing 
retirement.  Kaizuka noted that many households bought cars and 
other durable goods during the bubble economy period, so they will 
not need to buy such goods "for at least two or three more years." 

   Low-income households would benefit little from the income tax 
cut, but households with an annual income over 10 million yen 
($95,000) would receive the "real" benefit, the 9 February MAINICHI 
explains.  The income and local residential tax cuts worth 5.47 
trillion yen ($52 billion) included in the stimulus package will be 
implemented by cutting FY94 income and local residential taxes by 20 
percent as long as the reduction does not exceed a ceiling of 2 
million yen ($19,000) for the income tax cut and 200,000 yen 
($1,900) for the local residential tax cut.  According to a Ministry 
of Finance document cited by the paper, a standard household 
(husband, wife, and two children) with an annual income of 3 million 
yen ($29,000) will gain 1,250 yen ($12) from the cuts; a household 
with an annual income of 6 million yen ($58,000) will receive 71,400 
yen ($680); while a household with an annual income of 10 million 
yen (95,000) will receive 267,000 yen ($2,543). 

   FEATURE:  Industry Sectors Hoping Tax Cut Will Boost Consumption 
- SUMMARY:  While the automobile and electrical appliance industries 
hope the tax cuts adopted in the Japanese Government's recent 
stimulus package will boost consumption, the distribution industry 
doubts the total value of consumption will increase much, according 
to press reports. 

   Manufacturers Hope for Increase in Consumption - Japan's 
manufacturing industries hope that the tax cuts included in the 
Japanese Government's 8 February stimulus package will boost 
consumption, according to the 9 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  The automobile industry estimates that the nearly 6 
trillion yen ($57 billion) income tax cut would create demand for 
additional 150,000 cars.  Further, the special 4.5 percent 
consumption tax on cars will be eliminated in favor of the standard 
3.0 percent consumption tax.  There is a chance, the industry 
estimates, that this change will create demand for additional 50,000 
cars. 

   According to the 10 February NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN, consumers 
owning cars that are approaching their seventh-year car inspection 
(which costs about $1,000) "will surely buy new cars," and those 
owning cars that are approaching the fifth-year car inspection will 
also buy new cars this year, since "consumers believe that the 
consumption tax will surely be raised in the near future." 

   Following the auto industry in terms of expectations are the 
electrical appliance and audio visual (AV) equipment sectors, 
according to the NIKKEI RYUTSU article.  The electrical appliance 
industry expects many room air conditioners to be sold.  Although 
most households have at least one room air conditioner, on average 
only 40 percent of rooms have an air conditioner installed.  The 
industry hopes the summer of 1994 will be "hot," because the 
industry was unable to sell many room air conditioners in the summer 
of 1993 due to the unusually cool weather.  In addition, the AV 
industry hopes households will buy second and third color television 
sets and video cassette recorders. 

   Distribution, Food Industries Doubt Consumption Increases - The 
distribution industry, on the other hand, "does not have such rosy 
expectations," NIKKEI RYUTSU observes.  In the case of automobile 
dealers, increased sales of used cars are "dragging down" prices on 
the most broadly marketed new cars.  The situation is the same for 
electrical appliances and audio visual equipment, the article notes. 
The prices of most popular models have been declining since 1991. 
The industry anticipates this trend will continue for "five more 
years or so," because of an oversupply resulting from the recent 
relaxation of the Large Retail Store Law and increased imports 
stimulated by the strong yen. 

   In addition, Takuya Okada, chairman of Jusco Supermarket Chain, 
is quoted in the 21 January NIKKEI as saying that changes in the 
behavior of consumers will also "block" total consumption value from 
rising.  As an example, Okada observes that women who formerly 
bought expensive dresses made in France and Italy now do not 
hesitate to buy cheap ones made in China and Hong Kong. 

   According to the 9 February NIKKEI, the food industry expects the 
tax cuts to stimulate sales of foodstuffs "to a degree," but doubts 
whether the trend of falling prices can be stopped.  Japan's 
breweries, on the other hand, anticipate decreased sales of beer due 
to an increase in the tax on beer. 

   Environmental Issues - U.S.-Japan Framework Agreement on 
Environmental Technology -- The U.S. and Japanese Governments have 
concluded an agreement to "initiate cooperative research and 
development in environmental technology" under the common agenda of 
"global cooperation" as part of the economic framework talks.  Both 
countries will cooperate in six areas related to the prevention of 
global warming and the destruction of the ozone layer, including 
pyrolysis and catalytic decomposition of chlorofluorocarbons and the 
conversion of industrial waste into fuel.  The Government Industrial 
Research Institute (GIRl) under the Ministry of International Trade 
and Industry's Agency of Industrial Science and Technology (AIST) 
and the U.S. Environmnental Protection Agency's Air and Energy 
Engineering Research Laboratory will be the main government bodies 
spearheading this cooperative effort.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
11 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Japan and the United States have also agreed to initiate 
cooperative financial and technical aid to address environmental 
issues in the East European countries as part of an "action plan" 
under the "global cooperation" of the economic framework talks.  The 
action plan defines U.S.-Japan cooperation in five areas, including 
environmental, population, and AIDS-related issues.  Environmental 
assistance to Hungary, Poland and the Czech and Slovak Republics is 
the "prime objective" in the environment area. 

   By spring, the two countries will establish an advisory committee 
comprised of experts on economic cooperation and environmental 
issues to discuss appropriate aid measures.  In addition, the 
Japanese Government will contribute $1 billion to the countries in 
yen loans or through the Japan Export-Import Bank, and may set up a 
fund at its Central and East Europe Environment Center in Hungary 
for conducting studies of the region.  The U.S. side has also 
promised financial cooperation. 

   It seems that the Japanese side is seeking to stress the breadth 
and depth of the U.S.-Japan relationship by designing this kind of 
cooperative action plan in light of recent unsatisfactory attempts 
to reach agreement in the other framework areas.  (Tokyo NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Bank of Japan Seeking Independence 
From MOF -- SUMMARY:  Debate over revising the wartime Bank of Japan 
(BOJ) Act to give the bank greater independence from the Government 
of Japan (GOJ) continues, according to press reports.  Recent debate 
on the issue stemmed from comments the BOJ appended to a document it 
submitted to the British Government. 

   According to the 13 February SHUKAN YOMIURI, the contents of a 
document submitted by the BOJ as reference material to the British 
Parliament--which was debating the issue of the Bank of England's 
neutrality--has highlighted the "fissure" between the BOJ and the 
Ministry of Finance (MOF).  The document stated that "the BOJ wishes 
to revise the BOJ Act with the aim of establishing complete 
independence from the MOF."  The document also pointed out that for 
the BOJ to be assured of a "neutral" monetary policy, "independence 
from the GOJ is indispensable." 

   This is not the first time revision of the act has been 
considered, notes SHUKAN YOMIURI.  The late Prime Minister Kakuei 
Tanaka tried unsuccessfully to revise the act.  More specifically, 
the BOJ's independence from the GOJ became the source of contention 
in a 1960 report issued by the Financial System Research Committee 
(FSRC), an advisory council to the MOF, according to the 28 January 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Initially the proposal to give the 
GOJ broader authority over the BOJ was "predominant," but a second 
proposal gained strength later to limit government authority over 
the BOJ, which stated:  "The GOJ only has the right to request 
postponement of a BOJ decision."  Ultimately the contradictory 
proposals were published together in the report and the revision 
issue was shelved. 

   The BOJ Act, promulgated in 1942, has a "strong wartime 
legislative" flavor to it, according to the 27 January SANKEI 
SHIMBUN.  This is evidenced by the BOJ's mission as enunciated in 
Article 2, "to achieve the goals of the state."  Article 43 gives 
the finance minister "directive authority" over the BOJ, while 
Article 47 gives the MOF and cabinet the right to dismiss BOJ 
officials, reports NIKKEI.  The BOJ expressed its frustration over 
this in its document submitted to the British Government by stating 
that "under the BOJ Act, more authority is given to governmental 
organs than in other countries."  Also, many people in the BOJ, 
according to NIKKEI, hold the opinion that "the existence of such 
stipulations alone calls into doubt the BOJ's independence."  This 
"is interpreted" to mean that the BOJ seeks to establish greater 
independence from the government by revising the law. 

   The BOJ is "disturbed" by the sensation its document has 
occasioned, according to the NIKKEI article, leading BOJ Governor 
Mieno to emphasize at a 26 January press conference that he is "not 
considering immediate revision of the BOJ Act."  The BOJ policy 
planning department is said to have "doused" debate on the subject. 
However, "among 'BOJ men' there is sentiment in favor of changing 
the act so as to bring it up to date with the times," NIKKEI 
reports.  The BOJ is concerned over its independence from the GOJ 
because it thinks that "the government does not always honor its 
neutrality with respect to monetary policy."  And, according to a 
BOJ source, it is commonly believed at the BOJ that "because the MOF 
issues government bonds, it has a tendency to request low interest 
rates to lighten the burden of fiscal responsibility." 

   Financial circles are reportedly surprised that the revision 
debate has resurfaced and at the BOJ's "tenacity in the matter," 
according to the SHUKAN YOMIURI article.  It notes that Governor 
Mieno will step down at the end of the year, and that "MOF old boys" 
Mitsuhide Yamaguchi and Yoshihiko Yoshino are "hopefuls" to replace 
Mieno.  Financial industry sources are saying that the BOJ document 
is a diversionary "ball" the BOJ has tossed out to check the MOF so 
that "a strong successor will not come in and stir things up at the 
BOJ." 

   Although Governor Mieno stated that the BOJ is not considering 
immediate revision of the act, he is reported by the 27 January 
NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN as saying that "the act is not in keeping with 
the times" and acknowledges that when the time comes to revise it, 
"the GOJ's authority has to be limited."  The article quotes him as 
saying that he "wants to engage in sufficient discussion from a 
broad range of perspectives and have the Japanese people decide." 
Similarly, the SANKEI article quotes management sources at BOJ:  "If 
the debate to revise the law grows among the Japanese people, then 
naturally we will take appropriate steps." 

   Meanwhile, a BOJ policy planning department division chief has 
published a book explaining the "responsibilities and independence" 
of the central bank, among other things, according to the 4 January 
SANKEI SHIMBUN. 

   Sumitomo Bank Supporting Japanese Firms in Vietnam, China - 
Sumitomo Bank is strengthening its consulting operations in Asia to 
support Japanese companies establishing operations there, according 
to the 10 February NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  Facing prospects of a 
strong yen, Japanese companies are eager to penetrate Asian markets, 
and Sumitomo is supporting them by enhancing its consulting 
operations through a series of seminars, research publications, and 
training programs, particularly concerning Vietnam and China.  The 
company will start by- nearly doubling personnel in its Vietnam and 
China trade and investment consulting office in FY94. 

   Sumitomo intends to establish a representative office in 
Vietnam's Ho Chi Minh City in the spring of 1994, the paper notes. 
In addition, its trade and investment consulting office will hold an 
"investment in Vietnam" seminar and dispatch a "Vietnam observation" 
mission there this spring or summer.  Sumitomo has begun providing 
information to its Japanese clients on investing in Vietnam and 
changes in laws there. 

   Concerning China, NIKKEI KINYU adds, Sumitomo will offer a 
seminar on "Chinese tax laws" in April 1994 to Japanese companies 
rushing to set up operations there.  It will also publish materials 
on the investment climate in various Chinese cities.  Sumitomo will 
also upgrade a position to  permanent status in its China office in 
Osaka. 

   The 15 February NIKKEI KINYU adds that Sumitomo will offer a 
seminar to local financial institutions in Beijing in mid-March 
concerning banking practices to "enhance its ties with them" and as 
part of its attempt to upgrade its Beijing representative office to 
a branch.  Sumitomo also plans to upgrade its two other Chinese 
representative offices, in Shanghai and Dalian, to branches. 
Sumitomo currently has branch offices in Hong Kong and Guangzhou. 

   The 26 November 1993 NIKKEI KINYU reports that Sumitomo's think 
tank, the Japan Research Institute, will begin issuing a monthly 
research publication in April 1994 on the Asian economies, with the 
emphasis on medium-to-long-term macroeconomic analyses of China. 
"Topics for companies going into China" will be one of three regular 
features in the issues. 

   In addition, the 2 November 1993 NIKKEI KINYU reports that 
Sumitomo has instituted a companywide recruitment system for 
employees desiring to work in its Chinese-speaking offices. 
Sumitomo has sent employees through Chinese-language training 
before, but since it has refined its focus of "giving serious 
consideration to China," it has introduced this internal recruitment 
system to "deepen its talent pool."  Two or three employees will be 
chosen for a curriculum of language study, overseas study, and 
rotations in divisions doing business related to China, a recruiting 
program Sumitomo plans to carry out regularly in the future. 

   MOF To Relax Controls on New Stock Market Listings in FY94 - The 
Ministry of Finance (MOF) has decided to ease restrictions on the 
number of companies that can be newly listed on Japan's stock 
markets and the number of companies issuing new stock offerings. 
Sometime in April 1994 the MOF will increase the number of newly 
listed companies and offerings from the current three per week to 
five or six. 

   Beginning in December 1991, after concluding that new listings 
and offerings might pull funds out of the stock market, drive down 
stock prices, and weaken the market mechanism, the MOF exercised 
administrative guidance" to stop new company listings and new stock 
offerings in the over-the-counter (OTC) market.  Since then the MOF 
has gradually relaxed controls, first in May 1992 by permitting new 
offerings at the pace of one company per week, and since August 1993 
increasing the number to the current two or three per week.  The 
rebound in the volume of stock trading in 1994 to more than twice 
its previous low level has alleviated MOF fears that the market 
might be unable to absorb additional trading. 

   The MOF will decide on the exact number of companies to be newly 
listed  once it sees how the market absorbs additional issues in 
March.  It is considering taking this step in early April, after the 
fiscal year ends (FY93 ends on 31 March), because of concern over 
any possible impact on the level of stock prices at the end of FY93. 
More than 100 companies "are waiting their turn" for new listings or 
offerings.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 10 Feb 94 p 1) 

   SEC Adopts Report on Ending Ban on Firms Buying Their Own Stock - 
The Subcommittee on Fair Securities Trading of the Securities and 
Exchange Council (SEC) on 7 February formally adopted a report on 
the prospective lifting of the ban on companies purchasing their own 
stock.  The ban is expected to be lifted in April 1995, after 
revisions are made in Japan's Commercial Code and the Securities and 
Exchange Law.  The report "requires" that a means for companies to 
purchase their own stock be incorporated in a revision to the 
Securities and Exchange Law. 

   Citing transparency of transactions as a goal, the report 
recommended introducing means for companies to acquire their own 
stock through direct purchases on the market.  It also cited the 
need for disclosure of such acquisitions, including disclosure of 
plans to acquire stock after a proposal to do so has been approved 
at a general stockholders meeting, and reporting the status of 
purchases to the Ministry of Finance (MOF) on a quarterly basis and 
in a securities report.  The report gave examples of what might 
constitute market manipulation, including the case of a company 
placing an order to purchase stocks before the market opened at a 
price higher than the closing price the previous day, or 
commissioning several securities firms to make purchases at the same 
time.  But the report did not include recommendations specifying 
acceptable acquisitions. 
   The SEC subcommittee is studying regulatory measures to control 
insider trading once companies are allowed to acquire their own 
stock.  It believes there is a need to revise the Securities and 
Exchange Law, and that once a revision is compiled by the MOF, it 
will be submitted to the ordinary session of the Diet.  The 
subcommittee report will be formally confirmed at the SEC's general 
meeting on 21 February.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 8 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Industry Group Visits 
China, Assesses Cutting Tool Industry -- The Tool Committee of the 
Japan Machinery Exporters' Association (JMEA) sent a group of 
industry representatives to China in September 1993 to study China's 
cutting tool industry and its potential for technical cooperation, 
consigned processing, imports and exports, as well as to "contribute 
to the export of Japanese tools."  The preliminary conclusions made 
by the group are that China's demand for cutting tools--carbide 
alloy and high-speed steel tools, grindstones, and pneumatic tools- 
"has jumped dramatically" and there exists a "huge latent demand 
for Japan's tool-export industry."  However, the group also warned 
that domestic competition among Chinese manufacturers will 
intensify, leading to "extremely low export prices," which could 
affect prices in overseas markets.  Also, a few Chinese firms "may 
even pose a threat to Japanese companies."  To prevent this and to 
foster "coexistence and co-prosperity," the group recommends 
"actively promoting the exchange of information and technology with 
related associations and organizations in China." 

   Led by Yuji Oura, vice president of Yuasa Trading Co. and 
chairman of the JMEA Tool Committee, the group included 
representatives of Nachi-Fujikoshi, Nippon Pneumatic Mfg. Co., 
Noritake Co., and Mitsubishi Materials.  The group visited the 
Chengdu Measuring and Cutting Tools Co. Ltd., the Chengdu Tool 
Research Institute of the Ministry of Machine-Building and 
Electronics Industry, both located in Sichuan Province; the Zhuzhou 
Hard Alloy Factory in Hunan Province; the Shenyang Pneumatic Tool 
Factory and the Shenyang First Machine Tool Factory; the Shanghai 
Tool Factory, the Shanghai Grinding Wheel Factory, the Shanghai 
Heavy Vehicle Factory; the Liaoning Provincial Council of the China 
Council for the Promotion of International Trade, the Liaoning 
Provincial Machine-Building Industry Department, the Liaoning 
Provincial Metal Cutting-Tool Technology Association, and the Dalian 
plant of Mabuchi Motors. 

   The group's observations and assessments, broken down by sector, 
are as follows: 

   High-Speed Steel Tools Manufacturing Sector - There are about 800 
high-speed steel tool manufacturers in China which produce about 3 
billion yuan ($344.8 million) worth of tools annually.  The four 
largest firms, which account for nearly 50 percent of total 
production, are the Harbin Measuring and Cutting Tools Plant, which 
employs 7,000 workers and produces 36 million drill bits annually; 
the Chengdu Measuring and Cutting Tools Co. Ltd., 7,000 workers and 
30 million drill bits; the Harbin First Tool Factory, 6,000 workers 
and 40 million drill bits; and the Shanghai Tool Factory, 3,800 and 
40 million drill bits per year. 

   Almost all products are M2 high speed steel cutting tools.  Most 
drill-bits are produced using the rolling method, but the heavy 
grinding process is used for some export products.  Drill-bit 
surface processing is limited by regulations to nitriding.  Heat- 
treatment equipment consists mostly of salt bath furnaces, but the 
Shanghai Tool Factory does have a vacuum annealing furnace.  Most 
manufacturing equipment is obsolete domestically manufactured 
machinery, and numerically controlled (NC) machinery is very scarce. 
Twenty percent of high-speed steel tool sales are direct to users, 
while 80 percent are through machine-industry subsidiaries and 
electronics companies.  Exports are "overwhelmingly drill bits," and 
companies employ both direct sales and an "indirect route" through 
Hong Kong to the United States, Europe, Southeast Asia, and Africa, 
with a particularly high sales ratio to Southeast Asia. 

   Carbide Tool Manufacturers - The two largest companies dominate 
the market, with the Zhuzhou Hard Alloy Factory holding nearly a 70 
percent market share and the Zigong Hard Alloy Factory 30 percent. 
The 50 other small companies are not competitive because of inferior 
quality.  In 1992 China produced 5,600 tons of carbide alloy tools, 
and total 1993 production is expected to be 6,000-6,500 tons.  The 
primary products are metal powders, carbide alloys, and carbide 
tools, but the "product mix ratio is unclear." 

   The Zhuzhou Hard Alloy Factory acquired technology and equipment 
from the Swedish company Sandvik in 1987, which has enabled it "to 
manufacture products which require high-level technologies, such as 
multilayer coatings."  Among the equipment used by the company is a 
hot isostatic press and a chemical vapor deposition furnace.  In 
February 1993 it established the Hunan Diamond Hard Alloy Tool Co. 
Ltd., a joint venture (JV) with a Hong Kong company, to manufacture 
drill bits and end mills.  The JV obtained from Germany a computer 
numerically controlled (CNC) 12-shaft universal tool grinding 
machine, a CNC five-spindle grinder, and a CNC four-spindle 
universal tool grinding machine.  Hunan Diamond produces solid end 
mills, oil-hole drill bits, solid drill bits, brazed drill bits, 
three-flute drill bits, carbide reamers, and carbide taps.  When the 
company reaches full production, "it will pose a threat to Japanese 
companies." 

   Grinding Abrasives Sector - China produces about 3,000 tons of 
grinds tones per year, 50 percent of which are vitrified and 50 
percent resin bond.  The largest grinds tone manufacturer is the 
Zhengzhou No. 2 Grinding Wheel Factory, and there are about 10 
companies nearly the same size as the second largest company, the 
Shanghai Grinding Wheel Factory, which employs 1,700 workers and 
which was the only grindstone manufacturer the JMEA group visited. 
This company produces diamond grinding stones using British 
technology, abrasive cloth by using German machines and technology, 
and grindstones through a JV with the U.S. firm Norton.  The company 
sells only in Shanghai, where demand for grindstones is 7,000 to 
8,000 tons per year.  For the industry as a whole, sales are evenly 
divided between domestic sales and exports, with exports primarily 
going to Southeast Asia. 

   Pneumatic Tools - The group visited China's largest pneumatic 
tool plant, the Shenyang Pneumatic Tool Factory, which employs 
5,000, "but it was unable to obtain data for China as a whole."  The 
Shenyang company has a production capacity of 60,000 tons of 
equipment a year and manufactures tunnel drills, rock drills (bit 
and rod) for mining, and jack hammers.  It has technical cooperation 
agreements for mining tools with the Swedish company Atlas Copco and 
an unnamed Japanese company.  Most of its equipment "is of old 
Chinese manufacture."  It cannot keep up with demand from China's 
road and construction industries and "cannot satisfy the volume or 
quality demands of the Chinese market."  The firm wants to renovate 
its facilities and introduce new technology, but lacks capital and 
hopes to secure Japanese cooperation.  "This represents a big 
opening for Japanese companies." 

   Chengdu Tool Research Institute - This institute, established in 
1956 as the Chengdu Tool Research Institute of the Ministry of 
Machine-Building and Electronics, was moved to Harbin in 1957 and 
then back to Chengdu in 1965.  It employs 950 workers, of which 500 
are technicians.  The purpose of the institute is to foster domestic 
tool manufacturers and promote, through the State Plan, guidance on 
quality control measures.  Because of shrinking state budgets, it is 
"trying to establish its own economic viability" by undertaking "the 
small-lot manufacture of special tools" that are beyond the means of 
companies. 

   The institute is organized into the Precision Cutting Tools 
(Tool) Department and the Precision Measurement Equipment 
Department.  The Tool Department conducts research on the 
development of tool materials, including carbide tools, cubic boron 
nitride tools, and diamond and ceramic tools; the development of 
surface processing technology; and the development of special 
materials.  The Measurement Equipment Department researches 
equipment to measure gear measurement errors, laser measurement 
equipment, and three-dimensional measurement equipment.  (Tokyo JMEA 
JOURNAL Nov 93 pp 33-37) 

   Marubeni To Build $300 Million LPG Distribution Network - 
Marubeni Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading companies, 
plans to invest $300 million to build what will become the largest 
liquefied petroleum gas (LPG) storage and distribution network in 
China.  The two-tier system, capable of moving 2 million tons of LPG 
annually, will consist of two primary storage facilities--one in 
Shenzhen to serve South China, and one in Shanghai for East China- 
-each capable of storing 80,000 tons of LPG.  In addition, five 
secondary LPG storage facilities, each capable of storing 2,000- 
3,000 tons, will be built in the provinces surrounding each primary 
facility.  The South China network will supply Guangdong, Hainan, 
and Fujian Provinces and the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region.  The 
East China network will supply Jiangsu, Zhejiang and Shandong 
Provinces.  The Shenzhen facility is scheduled to be completed by 
1996, and the Shanghai one by 1998. 

   Marubeni has already established a joint venture (JV) company in 
Shenzhen to handle overall operations of its South China network, 
and in March it will establish a JV company, the Jiangyin Changjiang 
Liquefaction Co. Ltd., in Jiangyin City, Jiangsu Province, to 
oversee the East China network.  The JV company will be capitalized 
at $3 million, with the Chinese partners, including China 
Petrochemical International Co., investing 70 percent and Marubeni 
30 percent.  Jiangyin Changjiang Liquefaction will build a $6 
million distribution center, scheduled for completion by the end of 
1994.  Marubeni estimates annual LPG sales will be 100,000 tons and 
sales will total $50 million.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 Feb 94 
p 1) 

   Murata Forms Beijing JV To Make Ceramic Capacitors - Murata 
Manufacturing, one of the world's largest manufacturers of ceramic 
capacitors, will establish a joint venture (JV) company with the 
state-run Beijing Third Radio Equipment Factory to manufacture 
ceramic capacitors.  The JV company, Beijing Murata Electronics, 
will be capitalized at $20 million, with Murata investing 77 percent 
and Beijing Third Radio Equipment Factory the remainder. 

   Beijing Murata will be located in the Beijing Economic and 
Technology Development Zone and is scheduled to begin production in 
the second half of 1994.  In three years it will employ 200 workers 
and manufacture 2 billion capacitors annually, with most sold to 
Chinese electronics companies and the rest exported.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 3 Feb 94 p 8) 

   INDONESIA:  NSK To Build Miniature Bearings Plant Near Jakarta - 
NSK, Japan's largest manufacturer of bearings, will invest 5 billion 
yen ($47 million) to establish a wholly owned subsidiary, "PT NSK 
Bearings Manufacturing," and build a 65,000 square-meter miniature 
bearings plant in a suburb of Jakarta.  Groundbreaking for the plant 
will be in May 1994, and actual production is scheduled to begin in 
June 1995.  By the end of 1995 the subsidiary plans to be producing 
1.8 million bearings per month, increasing output to 2.5 million per 
month by the end of 1996. 

   With the increase in the number of Japanese companies throughout 
Southeast Asia, demand for miniature bearings used in electrical 
appliances and machinery has grown rapidly.  To date NSK has 
exported bearings made in Japan, but with the appreciation of the 
yen, profits have fallen and the company decided it was necessary to 
build a local production facility. 

   NSK has plants in Britain and the United States, but this will be 
its first in Southeast Asia.  The Indonesian plant will export to 
Japan and China as well as Southeast Asia.  Completion of the plant 
will place NSK in "direct competition" with Minebea, another leading 
Japanese manufacturer of miniature bearings, which has a plant in 
Thailand.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 4 Feb 94 p 9) 

   THAILAND:  Falling Stocks of Thai Rubber Place Trading Firms in 
Tight Spot -- The offer price to Japan for natural rubber produced 
in Thailand has increased suddenly, causing prices to rise sharply 
on Japan's domestic market and placing the general trading companies 
that supply the rubber to tire companies in a tight spot.  The 
delivery price of "ribbed smoked sheet (RSS) 3" for bulk purchasers 
in Tokyo rose to 121 yen per kilogram on 10 February 1994, an 
increase of 11 yen (10 percent) since the beginning of the month and 
representing a 7-month high. 

   There are several factors behind the price increases.  One is 
declining rubber production in Thailand, the world's major producer 
of sheet-form rubber, and the corresponding drop in its stocks. 
Another is that from December 1993 to January 1994, in what would 
normally be the peak period for rubber production, output actually 
decreased due to weather conditions.  In addition, the Thai 
Government is continuing its policy of buying intervention in the 
market.  For these reasons, the offer price to Japan has increased 
substantially. 

   Japan's domestic demand for rubber used to manufacture tires had 
been sluggish for a prolonged period, so that Japanese trading 
companies have concentrated on buying for "immediate use."  But now 
the current stocks held by the trading companies have already fallen 
to "half the level of a typical year" and are estimated to stand at 
only 30,000 tons.  Since Thailand and other Southeast Asian 
producing areas now are entering their seasonal low-production 
period, the trading companies state that "there is a chance we will 
not be able to supply the amount specified in our contracts with 
tire manufacturers due to insufficient supplies."  Therefore, the 
trading companies are accelerating their search for supplies in 
other world rubber-producing areas.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 11 
Feb 94 p 16) 

   UNITED STATES:  Canon Plans To Market New High-Efficiency Solar 
Battery -- Canon and its U.S. venture partner, Energy Conversion 
Devices, have developed a solar battery which performs more 
efficiently than current models.  The battery maintains an energy 
conversion rate of 10.2 percent after about 1,000 hours of 
irradiation testing--equivalent to a three-year operating period on 
a rooftop--a rate considerably higher than the current record of 6 
percent.  United Solar Systems Co. (USSC), a Michigan-based joint 
venture company established by Canon and Energy Conversion Devices, 
will build a $30 million facility in Newport News, Virginia to mass 
produce the solar battery and will oversee production-related 
activities.  USSC forecasts a large demand for the solar battery in 
residential rooftop solar systems and for windows of business 
offices.  Canon hopes to begin shipments of the battery in 1995. 

   Made from an amorphous silicon compound, the battery is 100 
square centimeters in size.  It is designed so that each layer in 
its three-layer configuration changes the wavelengths of the 
incoming solar rays so that the battery absorbs the same amount of 
light as current models, but also effectively reduces any 
deterioration in battery performance.  The battery requires $.16 per 
kilowatt hour in generating costs, which is half of the $.25 to $.50 
per kilowatt hour required by current commercial batteries.  Canon 
anticipates that generating costs will drop to about $.12 per 
kilowatt hour once the battery enters mass production.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 11 Feb 94 p 1) 

   Petroleum/Energy - MITI To Begin Study of Solar Energy Generation 
in Space -- The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
will conduct a two-year feasibility study beginning next year on a 
project to generate solar energy in space.  The project involves 
using a satellite equipped with solar batteries in a geostationary 
orbit 36,000 km above the equator to generate energy from the sun, 
convert it into microwaves, and beam this energy back to earth. 
Japan is the first country to actually begin experimental work on 
such a system as a national project. 

   MITI also plans to build a test facility for microwave 
transmission next year for about 100 million yen ($970,000).  The 
facility will include a high-energy microwave transmission system, 
which includes amplifiers, transmitting and receiving antennas, and 
rectifiers.  MITI will use this facility to study which systems lose 
the least energy in the conversion and transmission process, assess 
microwave transmission and reception technologies, and to study the 
impact of these systems on the environment.  MITI will use the data 
gathered in its 1991-1993 program to study international efforts 
concerning space energy generation systems.  MITI hopes to achieve 
commercial applications for this project by 2040.  (Tokyo SANKEI 
SHIMBUN 1 Feb 94 p 3 Evening) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  NEC Focuses on 
Multimedia Communications -- SUMMARY:  According to Japanese press 
reports, NEC Corp. is focusing on the multimedia sector, the next- 
generation area of communications. It has developed an integrated- 
circuit (IC) set to be used in building asynchronous transfer mode 
(ATM) local area networks (LANs) and a high-speed semiconductor 
optical switch for large-capacity optical communications.  The 
company is expanding the number of employees at its U.S. subsidiary 
to develop chip sets for multimedia applications. 

   The 25 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reports that NEC has 
developed an IC set for building LANs connected by an ATM 
communications network, and will begin sending out samples in April. 
Apparently ATM will become the leader among next-generation 
information communication networks, such as the "information 
superhighway."  Currently the "ethernet" method leads the LAN 
market; however, it is estimated that in five to six years the ATM 
method will have about 30 percent of the market.  Fujitsu also has 
plans to make IC sets for LANs by mid-1994.  Competition among 
semiconductor manufacturers to enter the huge market for multimedia 
communication networks is becoming more intense. 

   According to NIKKEI, the ICs developed by NEC will be installed 
in work stations and personal computers.  Sets will consist of two 
ICs--one will divide the communicated data in conformity with the 
ATM method and then reconstruct it, while the second IC will control 
the establishment of various conditions, such as speed at the time 
of data transfer.  The sample price will be 30,000 yen (US$286) per 
set.  Starting in October, NEC will mass-produce sets at a level of 
100,000 per month. 

   The 13 January NIKKEI notes that NEC has also developed a high- 
speed optical switch essential for the large-capacity optical 
communications that will make multimedia a reality.  It has the 
capability of processing one terabit of optical information every 
second and can even control low intensity light.  This is the first 
time a semiconductor optical switch has achieved the terabit level 
of optical information processing.  NEC plans to make the switch on 
one chip within two years. 

   The optical switch controls optical signals through a separate 
light, according to NIKKEI.  Until now, the controlling light could 
only operate when in the "on" mode; however, now it only takes 1 
nanosecond to go from "on" to "off."  The "on" control light is 
followed immediately by the "off" control light, and the on-off 
action can be completed in a picosecond, thus making the terabit 
level of optical information processing possible. 

   U.S. Subsidiary Focus of Development Efforts - The 4 January 
NIKKEI SANGYO reports that Japanese semiconductor manufacturers want 
to strengthen their development systems in the United States to 
become "competitive" in the multimedia market.  Currently the United 
States has a big lead in the development of multimedia equipment and 
services, and thus U.S. semiconductor manufacturers have the lead in 
the development of ICs for that field.  In response, NEC is 
implementing its "system IC project" in the United States focused on 
the multimedia and advanced communication fields. 

   NEC's U.S. subsidiary within the semiconductor market is NEC 
Electronics, according to the NIKKEI SANGYO.  This company has 
already established a team called the "Systems Application 
Engineering (SAE) Group," which develops special application ICs. 
At present there are less than 20 members, but during 1994 the 
number will be increased to 30 or 40.  To date the SAE Group has 
taken on the development of chip sets for hard disk drives and 
portable telephones.  However, with more team members, the group 
will be able to focus on developing chip sets for wireless data 
communication terminals and picture compression used in the 
multimedia industry. 

   IBM Japan Wins Last Government Supercomputer Bid - On 14 
February, IBM Japan won the eleventh and last supercomputer bid-- 
from the National Cancer Center (NCC)--funded under the first FY93 
supplemental budget.  IBM's winning bid of 3.5 billion yen ($33 
million) is the company's first order from a Japanese governmental 
organization.  The bid includes a "complete medical research system" 
for one of two NCC hospitals, its central hospital in Tokyo.  Some 
in the supercomputer industry view IBM's bid as "extremely low." 
The NCC had a total budget of about 7 billion yen ($66 million) 
to procure a supercomputer and research systems for both its central 
and eastern hospitals.  NEC won the bid to install a research system 
in NCC's eastern hospital, in Chiba Prefecture, at a price of 580 
million yen ($5.5 million). 

   IBM will provide a server unit called "SPN" constructed from two 
specially modified IBM "SP1" parallel processing UNIX-based 
supercomputers, which will be combined with one "DECmpp" 
supercomputer unit made by Digital Equipment Co.  One SPN can be 
conf igured with up to 640 RISC-based (reduced instruction set 
computer) processors.  For client units, the system will use "IBM 
RS6O0O" workstations tied to Apple personal computers.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Canon Wins Orders To Provide Cray, KSR Supercomputers - On 9 
February, Canon Supercomputing 5.1. and Cray Japan received an order 
to provide a "research, education, and library" information 
processing system from the Information Processing Center of the 
University of Electro-Communications.  The system centers on a Cray 
"EL98" supercomputer and two "SPARC Server 1000" servers made by Sun 
Microsystems.  This will be the first UNIX-based information 
processing center in a state-supported university.  The system 
should be installed by the end of February and in operation during 
March.  No price information is given. 

   Included in the order are workstations and personal computers 
that will be provided in cooperation with Canon Sales Co.  The EL98 
will be fitted with two processors having the capacity to perform 
133 million floating point operations per second (megaflops). 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 10 Feb 94 p 8) 

   Canon Supercomputing also received a supercomputer order from the 
ATR Interpreting Telephony Research Laboratories in Kyoto.  Canon 
will provide a "KSR1-96" massively parallel processing supercomputer 
made by the U.S. firm Kendall Square Research (KSR).  At a price of 
about 400 million yen ($3.75 million), this is KSR's first MPP 
supercomputer order in Japan.  Reportedly the firm has already 
installed more than 40 units in Europe and the United States.  The 
KSR1 can be configured with up to 96 central processors with a 
maximum calculation speed of 3.84 billion floating point operations 
per second (gigaflops).  ATR will use the supercomputer for research 
on voice translation systems. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 16 Feb 94 
p 6) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  IDO To Expand Service 
Area for Motorola Cellular Network -- SUMMARY:  The Japanese press 
is reporting that IDO, the Japanese mobile communications company 
that is the focus of the current U.S.-Japan market access dispute 
involving Motorola, has decided to halt all work on expanding the 
Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) cellular telephone network it 
controls and expand its Motorola cellular telephone network. 
Because of competition from a NTT subsidiary, IDO may link up with 
new common carrier (NCC) telephone companies with cellular 
operations to compete against NTT, which could also allow IDO to 
expand into new areas.  IDO's investment plans concerning the 
Motorola system were to have been used as a Japanese "trump card" in 
trade negotiations with the United States, but new U.S. demands 
reportedly precluded this. 

   Nippon Idou Tsushin Corp. (IDO), the mobile communications 
company affiliated with Toyota Motor, reportedly plans to invest 30 
billion yen ($291 million) over a two-year period beginning in 1995 
to expand the service area for its Motorola cellular telephone 
network, according to one of three articles published on page 11 of 
the 10 February NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  At the same time, 
IDO will "stop all work on expanding the service area for the Nippon 
Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) network."  IDO currently provides 
cellular phone service using both systems, but decided to focus on 
Motorola's system because "it has become difficult to close the gap" 
with rival company NTT Docomo--a NTT subsidiary--by using the NTT 
system.  IDO's decision to expand its Motorola cellular network and 
services represents an effort to "ease trade friction" between Japan 
and the United States, "but can also be said to have been influenced 
by Toyota Motor," IDO's major shareholder. 

   IDO, established in March 1987 with investment from Toyota and 
Teleway Japan, serves the Tokyo metropolitan and Chubu (Nagoya area) 
regions.  IDO reportedly decided to use the Motorola-based cellular 
system in addition to the NTT system to avoid possible U.S. 
sanctions in 1989 stemming from friction in the U.S.-Japan 
negotiations regarding Japan's telecommunications industry.  As of 
December 1993, IDO had 310,000 subscribers on the NTT system and 
about 10,000 on the Motorola system.  The NTT network is supported 
by about 400 base stations, compared to 100 stations for the 
Motorola network. 

   Henceforth, according to NIKKEI, IDO will limit the construction 
of new base stations for the NTT network "to areas where base 
stations already exist," and will use these stations for the sole 
purpose of "extending services to remote areas."  IDO will build 80 
new base stations for the Motorola network by April 1994 and 130 
more base stations over the next two years. 

   NIKKEI also observes that IDO is hoping to strengthen ties with 
the eight cellular telephone companies affiliated with its 
competitor, Dainidenden (DDI), which also provide services via the 
Motorola network in non-IDO service areas, "to counter NTT Docomo's 
nationwide expansion efforts." 

   The costs of building base stations for the Motorola system are 
comparatively cheaper than for the NTT system, NIKKEI notes, and IDO 
can pass on the savings to subscribers by lowering basic monthly 
rates by 10 percent.  It is "inevitable" that the cellular telephone 
market will become fiercely competitive after regulations are lifted 
on selling terminal units and companies are able to freely market 
cellular telephones, as opposed to the current system of leasing 
them under license.  IDO is hoping to increase its customer base by 
promoting the "uniqueness of its Motorola network-based products." 

   IDO, NCCs May Strengthen Ties To Compete Against NTT - A second 
article on the same page of the 10 February NIKKEI notes the 
possibility that the distribution of the cellular telephone service 
market share could change considerably if the NCC telephone 
companies, such as DDI, which individually serve disparate areas in 
Japan, strengthen their ties. 

   As of December 1993, NTT Docomo had 1.24 million subscribers, 
compared to a combined total of 766,000 subscribers served by IDO 
and other cellular phone companies.  Although the NCCs are 
increasing their market share, "the truth of the matter is that the 
gap between IDO's 230,000 subscribers and NTT Docomo's 600,000 
subscribers in the Tokyo metropolitan area is not shrinking."  By 
strengthening its ties with the cellular companies on the Motorola 
network, IDO will be able to lower rates on its NTT system and 
clearly position itself against NTT in "charting its survival 
strategy" by establishing itself as the key element of the cellular 
companies in Japan's metropolitan areas. 

   Expanding Motorola System Will Permit Extention of Service Area - 
A third article in the 10 February NIKKEI reports that if IDO 
expands its Motorola network services, it will be able to extend 
services to areas like Tochigi, Nagano, and Yamagata Prefectures, 
where to date service has not been feasible.  In addition, if the 
eight DDI cellular companies introduce services on their "Roaming" 
network, the combined service area will equal that of NTT Docomo. 
Potential subscribers will no longer have to debate which service to 
use because of service area restrictions, but will instead select 
services "based on cost."  By expanding services on the Motorola 
system, the NIKKEI article notes, IDO and the NCC cellular companies 
"can stage a comeback" against NTT Docomo by offering lower prices. 
Japan Planned To Use IDO Decision as 'Trump Card' in Talks - 
According to the 17 February NIKKEI, IDO's 30 billion yen investment 
plan in the Motorola system was supposed to have been used as a 
"trump card" in last week's trade negotiations with the United 
States.  But the U.S. negotiators came up with "new demands," 
including an expansion of the number of Motorola base stations, so 
that the IDO decision was all but ignored.  This "infuriated" IDO's 
president, who reportedly stated: "Motorola is entering and exiting 
the arena of government-to-government negotiations as it pleases. 
This is something Japanese manufacturers would not even 
contemplate."  IDO anticipated that when its investment in the 
Motorola system is completed, the coverage areas of its NTT and 
Motorola systems "would be about equal," and the U.S. "would not 
complain." 

   MPT Undertakes Efforts To Assist Emerging Multimedia Market - The 
Communications Policy Bureau of the Ministry of Posts and 
Telecommunications (MPT) has established a private forum to discuss 
policies to promote new businesses in the information communications 
industry.  Members of the forum, including executives of venture 
companies, will meet to discuss new business enterprises involving 
the next-generation fiber optic network, discuss policies addressing 
the financial aspects and tax-related assistance for these new 
businesses, and submit their recommendations in May.  The MPT will 
incorporate the recommendations in its new policy measures for 1995 
and beyond so as to nurture the emerging market involving the future 
fiber optics network.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Feb 94 p 4) 

   The MPT will also establish a tax structure for FY94 to support 
businesses involved in building the fiber optic communications 
network.  The MPT has received apprqval from the Ministry of Finance 
to offer tax incentives of an extra 20 percent in depreciation to 
companies involved in laying the optical fiber for trunklines. 
According to MPT estimates, companies investing in the fiber optic 
work on the trunkline portion of the network in FY94 will spend 
about 81 billion yen ($786 million).  In cases where a claim for 20 
percent in depreciation is approved, the company would benefit by 
receiving an annual tax reduction of 5 billion yen ($48.5 million). 
The MPT will offer the incentive over a two-year period. 

   The MPT has defined a "two-stage strategy" to first establish a 
trunkline fiber optic network by upgrading the current copper-wire 
network with optical fiber, and secondly carry out subscriber 
hookups by extending fiber optic links to households and businesses. 
Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) has completed more than 40 
percent of the optical fiber conversion work but only 3 percent of 
the subscriber hookups.  The MPT hopes its aid measures will help 
bring about a complete conversion to optical fiber as soon as 
possible, and also is seeking to create "other rigorous financial 
aid measures" to expedite the program.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
7 Feb 94 p 3) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Forecast for 1994 National 
Economy -- The decision on the socialist market economy made at the 
third plenary session of the 14th CPC Central Committee in November 
1993 is expected to provide a strong impetus to China's economy and 
be conducive to sustained, rapid, and healthy economic development. 
Based on the central government's design, economic reform in 1994 is 
to effect "all-around advancement with key breakthroughs."  The 
first major goal is enterprise reform, searching for and 
establishing effective means of achieving a modern enterprise 
system.  The second is to reform the financial, tax, and investment 
systems, thus accelerating macroeconomic regulation and transforming 
government management functions.  The third is to institute capital 
goods markets, continue with price reform and develop a unified and 
open market system.  The fourth is to accelerate social security and 
housing reform. 

   In terms of actual effects, enterprise reform will gradually 
enable enterprises to become self-governing, self-reliant, self- 
regulated entities, which will enhance their competitiveness and 
economic efficiency.  Reform of the investment system will make 
localities and enterprises more responsible for their own actions 
and reduce unwarranted investments.  Meanwhile, reform in this 
sector will also facilitate infrastructure construction and ease 
restrictions imposed by related "bottlenecks." 

   Reform in the financial sector, especially the tax sharing 
system, will help curb the "economic fiefdoms" and form a unified 
national market.  It will also help reduce the unrestrained 
expansion made by local officials and thereby reduce potential 
economic swings. 

   Reform of the financial sector will also help control excessive 
money supply and reduce the potential for inflation.  When 
specialized banks become commercial banks, funds will flow to the 
more efficient enterprises and the inefficient ones will be forced 
to go bankrupt.  This will be conducive to both the rational flow of 
capital and an increase in economic efficiency in the entire 
society. 

   Another propelling force in the economy this year is the 
considerable productive force that will be unleashed by the 
unprecedented number of large-scale capital construction projects 
completed in the last two years.  For example, fixed asset 
investments were estimated to increase by 47 percent in 1993.  These 
projects will have a significant impact on the economy in the 
following years. 

   On the other hand, there are also a number of constraints on this 
year's economy.  One of these, inflation, is a major concern.  In 
the current economic system, it is impossible to eliminate 
inflation, nor is it necessary.  The most important thing is to make 
it bearable for all parties concerned.  Recently the central 
government instituted a number of measures to combat inflation in 
order to maintain social stability. 

   In addition, "bottlenecks" will also be a hindrance.  The 
economic development in the past 15 years shows that bottlenecks 
would inevitably stop or reduce the speed of high economic growth. 
Judging from the current situation, transportation and energy 
supplies can probably accommodate a 10-percent rate of economic 
growth. 

   At the end of 1993, the Chinese Academy of Sciences and the State 
Statistics Bureau jointly produced a forecast for China's economic 
development in 1994:  GNP to grow by 10 percent, heavy industries by 
16 percent, light industries by 15.5 percent, fixed assets 
investments by 20 percent, retail commodities by 18.5 percent, and 
retail price index by 9.5 percent.  (Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO 1 Feb 
94 p 1) 

   Outlook for Individual, Private Economy in 1994 - In 1994 
individual businesses will total 19 million, about a 12 percent 
increase over 1993; employ 32 million people, a 15 percent increase; 
and have registered capital of 79 billion yuan, a 35 percent 
increase.  The retail value of commodities will be about 200 billion 
yuan, a 40 percent increase.  Because the number of businesses and 
employees will rapidly increase, competition among individual 
enterprises will intensify. Individual businesses will also face 
tougher competition from state-owned and collective enterprises.  In 
1994 more individual businesses will engage in scientific and 
technical services.  In 1994 individual businesses in urban areas 
will total 6.3 million and employ 10 million.  Individual businesses 
in rural areas will reach 11.4 million and employ 19 million.  In 
1994 individual businesses in the east will account for over 50 
percent of all individual businesses. 

   In 1994 private enterprises will total 370,000, employ 5,350,000, 
and have a registered capital of 200 billion yuan.  Most private 
enterprises will engage in the scientific and technical fields.  In 
1994 capital per private enterprise will be 370,000 yuan, output 
value per enterprise will be 100,000 yuan, and the volume of 
business per enterprise will be 70,000 yuan. Private enterprises in 
urban areas will total 270,000, a 120 percent increase over 1993. 
Private enterprises in rural areas will total 100,000, a 20 percent 
increase.  (Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO 5 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Shanghai Striving for Industrial Breakthroughs in 1994 - 
Shanghai's total industrial production increased by 19.1 percent 
between January and November of 1993 and sales of industrial goods 
increased by 31.8 percent.  Estimates show that Shanghai's total 
industrial production for 1993 will probably reach 280 billion yuan 
and that industrial exports will increase by 15 percent.  Exports of 
machinery and electrical products are estimated to increase by 20 
percent and exports by the private sector to increase by 32 percent, 
to a total of $820 million. 

   Meanwhile, Shanghai's industrial efficiency and structure have 
also improved.  Three out of 14 major industrial projects have been 
completed and gone into production.  Fifty key technology 
innovations are near completion.  Foreign investment between January 
and November of 1993 has already exceeded the 1992 total, and the 
foreign investment projects under contract are estimated to number 
2,500, with a gross value of $2.3 billion. 

   Nonetheless, Shanghai industries also foresee some serious 
problems ahead, namely insufficient social demand for industrial 
goods, higher costs of production, difficulties in large and medium- 
sized enterprises, and severe shortages of operating funds. 

   In seeking major breakthroughs in 1994, Shanghai municipality has 
decided to adopt some new industrial strategies with respect to 
thinking, methods, marketing, adjustments, reform, and management. 
At a recent meeting held for bureau chiefs, Party secretaries, and 
managers,  Municipal Economic Commission Chief Xu Zhiyi stressed 
that in 1994 Shanghai's industrial sector will accelerate reform by 
promoting sales and expanding domestic and international market 
share, by developing automobile, communications, power, computer, 
and household electric industries, by concentrating on large-scale 
investment projects, by attracting more foreign investment, by 
establishing large enterprise groups which are competitive 
domestically and internationally, by experimenting with new reform 
measures in selected enterprises, by improving management in the 
areas of quality control, finance, accounting system, cost, 
competitiveness, and by moving closer to international business 
practices.  (Shanghai SHANGHAI GONGYE JINGJI BAO 28 Dec 93 p 1) 
Foreign Trade and Investment - Indigenous Insurance Industry Not 
Ready for Foreign Competition -- China's insurance industry, which 
insures only 4 percent of domestic enterprises and 70 percent of 
motor vehicles, is characterized by a high level of government 
intervention and regulation coupled with little transparency and an 
incomplete legal framework, according to an article appearing in the 
January issue of a MOFTEC trade journal.  Authors Shi Ligong and 
Jiang Jiangang of the China Pacific Insurance Company propose a 
strategy for protecting China's insurance industry against the 
"blow" of foreign competition that would result from joining GATT 
and the General Agreement on Trade in Services (GATS). 

   High premiums and the resultant high profits fostered by lack of 
competition in China's insurance industry have induced local 
government financial departments to "get into the insurance 
business" by buying newly established insurance company stock.  This 
conflict of interest is compounded by the fact that the state 
heavily regulates and subsidizes the insurance industry.  There is a 
30 percent "accounting maximum compensation rate" for insurance 
companies, and the actual "rate of compensation" is between 20 and 
30 percent compared to from 80 to over 100 percent in developed 
countries.  Moreover, the state requires that insurance capital be 
deposited in banks, and the People's Bank of China in turn strictly 
regulates the investment of this capital.  In 1991 China's level of 
"insurance working capital" was 8 percent, compared to an 85-percent 
rate in developed countries.  Insurance companies are also required 
to take on "policy-oriented," high-risk insurance ventures, such as 
agricultural insurance and export credit guarantees.  Shortfalls are 
made up by government subsidies, but "monopolistic" profits from 
very high insurance premiums are also heavily taxed by the 
government. 

   China's insurance industry is not transparent and lacks a 
complete legal framework.  Currently only portions of one law, the 
"Contract Law," and two administrative regulations, "Temporary 
Regulations on Insurance Company Management" and "Regulations on 
Property Insurance Contracts," regulate the insurance industry. 
Moreover, the regulations were promulgated when China People's 
Insurance Company was a monopoly and are therefore out-of-date.  The 
authors state that it is imperative for China to promulgate the 
"Insurance Law," "Detailed Regulations for Implementing the 
Insurance Law," "Measures for Managing Insurance Brokers," and 
"Measures for Managing Foreign and Sino-foreign Joint Venture 
Insurance Companies" as quickly as possible in order to take 
advantage of a GATS grandfather clause which gives precedence to 
existing domestic legislation when the GATS agreement goes into 
effect. 

   The authors also believe China can take advantage of GATS special 
policies on developing countries and infant industries to protect 
China's insurance industry from the onslaught of foreign 
competition.  They also mention GATT restrictions and exceptions for 
developing countries, in particular those regarding helping 
developing countries develop service industries.  The authors 
believe that developed countries will be willing to give China 
monetary and technical assistance in opening up its insurance 
market.  (Beijing GUOJI MAOYI 15 Jan 94 pp 36-39, 25 and Beijing 
GUOJI JINGMAO XIAOXI 14, 21, 28 December 93) 

   CEI Database Reports 1993 Foreign Trade Figures 

BOT 

                          Imports             Exports 
                          1993     1992       1993       1992 

TOTAL ($million)         103,950   80,610    91,763     84,998 

North America            12,196    10,941    18,318     20,232 
(including Mexico) 
   United States         10,688    8,900     16,964     17,494 

Europe                   23,795    16,096    16,426     11,364 
   EC                    14,232    9,813     11,693     7,601 
   France                1,465     1,496     1,291      764 
   Germany               6,040     4,023     3,968      2,448 
   U.K.                  1,664     1,014     1,929      923 

   Other West Europe     2,538     1,811     977        718 
   E. Europe and Eurasia 7,026     4,472     3,756      3,045 
   Russia                4,987     3,526     2,692      2,336 

East Asia/Pacific        58,663    47,373    48,190     57,962 
   ASEAN                 5,996     4,204     4,683      4,262 
   Hong Kong             10,473    20,538    22,064     37,512 
   Japan                 23,253    13,681    15,579     11,699 
   North Korea           297       155       602        541 
   South Korea           5,360     2,623     2,860      2,437 
   Taiwan                12,933    5,881     1,462      698 

South Asia*              697       418       1,742      1,350 

Mid-East/North Africa**  2,245     1,081     2,895      2,236 
   Iran                  310       101       403        336 
   Saudi Arabia          119       127       579        444 

Sub-Saharan Africa       789       95        1,121      881 

Latin America/Caribbean   1,806     1,786     1,620      1,438 
   Brazil                 863       519       192        584 
   Chile                  282       410       204        128 
   Cuba                   74        183       177        200 

Oceania                   2,359     2,059     1,231      2,754 
  Australia               1,949     1,671     1,061      2,332 

*South Asia: Afghanistan, Bangladesh, Bhutan, Burma, India, Nepal, 
Pakistan, Sri Lanka. 

**Mid East/North Africa: Algeria, Bahrain, Cyprus, Egypt, Iran, 
Iraq, Israel, Jordan, Kuwait, Lebanon, Libya, Morocco, Oman, 
Palestine, Qatar, Saudi Arabia, Syria, Tunisia, Turkey, UAE, Yemen. 

EOT 

   Hong Kong Firm To Build Toll Roads in Guangdong - Hoi Sing 
Holdings Limited has signed a letter of intent to build two toll 
roads in Guangdong's Xinhui City with a total investment of HK$400 
million.  Hoi Sing will hold 65 percent of the equity, while its 
partner, Xinhui City Highway Construction Company, will have 35 
percent.  Completion is estimated to take two years.  In addition to 
the highway construction project, Hoi Sing is also building a coke 
plant in Guizhou Province.  Hoi Sing hopes to promote its 
construction business in mainland China through its links with one 
of its major shareholders, the PRC-owned Shougang Concord Grand 
(Group) Limited.  (Hong Kong HSIN PAO 7 Feb 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Guoco Group Invests in Shanghai Real Estate Development - Despite 
Beijing's attempts to slow fixed-asset investment on the mainland, 
Hong Kong-based Guoco Group has announced its involvement in a $25 
million investment in a residential and office development in 
Shanghai.  Guoco, whose banking activities in Hong Kong include Dao 
Heng Bank and the Overseas Trust Bank, will invest in the project 
through its Guoco Properties subsidiary, which will have a 90 
percent stake in the project in conjunction with Shanghai Hai Tong 
Construction, which holds the remaining 10 percent.  Guoco 
properties is 40 percent owned by the Guoco group, with the 
remaining equity held by the Singapore-listed First Capital 
Corporation with 30 percent and Malaysia's Hong Leong Properties, 
which also has 30 percent.  (Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL 
REVIEW) 9 Feb 94 p 3)  Hong Kong Bureau 

   Lei Shing Invests HK$1 Billion To Redevelop Shanghai District - 
Wu Sung, chairman and director of Lei Shing International Company 
Limited, has announced that the company's plan to develop Shanghai's 
Town God Temple area will involve a total investment of HK$1 
billion.  The company plans to build hotels and shopping arcades. 
Construction of the shopping arcades, which will cover an area of 
100,000 square meters, is scheduled to begin in April. (Hong Kong 
HSIN PAO 16 Feb 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jardines Said Unaffected by Sino-British Relations - A recent 
report from Standard Chartered Securities has encouraged investors 
to buy Jardine Matheson stock and not to be influenced by the 
present political climate.  The report says that China's 
relationship with Jardine Matheson is mutually beneficial.  For this 
reason, Jardine has been expanding its business in mainland China 
despite the deterioration in Sino-British relations.  Jardine now 
has over 40 joint ventures in China and 6-10 percent of its profits 
come from businesses in the mainland.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 16 Feb 94 
p B2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Hong Kong Exports for Outward Processing Rise 10 Percent in 3d 
Quarter - Hong Kong's exports to China intended for outward 
processing there rose 10 percent on a year-on-year basis to HK$41.1 
billion in the third quarter of last year, representing 47.2 percent 
of the territory's total exports in that period.  Statistics 
released by the Census and Statistics Department revealed that this 
was 6.9 percent lower than in the same period of 1992.  A spokesman 
for the statistics department said this was due to increased 
domestic demand in China for imported goods.  During the third 
quarter, imports from China involving outward processing there were 
valued at HK$81.1 billion, or 73 percent of Hong Kong's total 
imports from the mainland.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST 
(BUSINESS POST) 18 Feb 94 p 2) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Record Foreign Capital Contracts in Sichuan in 1993 - Some 1,910 
foreign-funded enterprises with contracted capital of $2.4 billion 
were approved in Sichuan Province last year, surpassing the total 
foreign capital introduced in the previous 13 years.  The funds came 
primarily from Hong Kong, Macao, South Korea, and Thailand and were 
concentrated in capital- and technology- intensive industries, 
including energy, transport, and communications and in renovation of 
major productive enterprises. 

   The province also saw an expansion of international cooperation 
and exchanges, with friendly city relations established with 33 
cities from 14 countries and economic and trade relations with 120 
countries and regions set up.  Labor and foreign contracted projects 
expanded to include transport, geological prospecting, mining, 
machinery, construction, and medicine.  Imports and exports for the 
province totaled $2.9 billion in 1993, a 32 percent increase over 
1992.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1110 GMT 2 Feb 94) Hong Kong 
Bureau 

   Tianjin Approves Record Number of Foreign-Funded Enterprises in 
January - In January, Tianjin approved 223 foreign-funded 
enterprises, with a contracted amount of investment exceeding $500 
million, of which over $300 million will be from foreign investors. 
Both the total investment and the foreign investment were new 
records for the month.  It approved 16 large projects each involving 
more than $5 million and with a total investment of $290 million, 
accounting for 58 percent of Tianjin's total.  The volume of exports 
was $150 million, up 23 percent from the same period in 1993. 
Tianjin has six units with the authority to undertake contracted 
projects and labor service abroad.  In January, they signed 51 
contracts worth $29.4 million for construction projects and labor 
service abroad.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 1 Feb 94 p 1)  Seoul Bureau 

   Guangdong Has Nearly 4,500 Foreign-Invested Enterprises - At the 
end of 1993, Guangdong had 4,475 foreign-invested enterprises, with 
investment totaling $131.49 billion and registered capital amounting 
to $84.2 billion.  Of the foreign-invested enterprises, 1,200 had 
1993 registered capital of over $10 million each and 49 had capital 
of over $100 million each.  Fourteen foreign enterprise were engaged 
in expressway construction in Foshan, Huizhou, and Chaozhou cities. 
Total output value of Guangdong's foreign-invested enterprises 
constitutes 33.8 percent of the province's total industrial output 
value.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0952 GMT 15 Feb 94) Hong 
Kong Bureau 

   Hebei Preferential Policies Attract Foreign Investment - Hebei 
formulated preferential policies and simplified procedures to 
provide a better environment for foreign firms to invest in the 
province.  In 1993, the province developed 1,879 new foreign-funded 
enterprises, equivalent to the total of the previous four years, for 
a total of 3,798 registered foreign-funded enterprises.  Investment 
totaled $7.7 billion, and registered capital $5.1 billion, of which, 
$2.4 billion is to be supplied by foreigners.  The number of large 
foreign-funded projects increased in the newly-founded enterprises. 
A total of 63 individual projects have investment levels exceeding 
$10.  Foreign investment in the primary and tertiary industries 
increased from 10 percent of the total to 14.8 percent.  Foreign 
investment in Hebei came from 58 countries and regions. 
(Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO 26 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul Bureau 
Liaoning Foreign-Funded Enterprises Increase in 1993 - By the end 
of 1993, Liaoning had approved 7,895 foreign-funded enterprises, 
with the contracted amount of investment totaling $16.85 billion. 
Of these enterprises, 2,506 were already put into operation to 
create 18.4 billion yuan in output value, up 58.9 percent from 1992; 
to create 909 million yuan in profits; to pay 801 million yuan in 
taxes; and to earn $1.134 billion from exports, amounting to 26.62 
percent of the province's total and increasing by 41.1 percent from 
1992.  In 1993, Dalian city approved 1,722 projects using foreign 
capital, and the contracted amount of foreign funds totaled $1.91 
billion, up 100 percent and 60.5 percent, respectively, over 1992. 
Of these projects, 1,655 were directly invested by foreign firms, 
and the contracted amount of foreign capital was $1.78 billion, up 
110 percent and 79.2 percent, respectively.  (Shenyang LIAONING 
RIBAO 18 Jan 94 p 1) 

   BASF Invests in Nanjing Joint-Venture Polystyrene Plant - German 
chemical giant BASF on 3 February announced plans to invest 250 
million deutschemarks in a joint venture in Nanjing to produce 
polystyrene primarily for the Chinese domestic market.  The joint 
venture with the Nanjing-based Yangzi Petrochemical Corporation is 
BASF's fifth large project in China and brings its total investment 
there to more than 600 million marks, making BASF the second largest 
German investor in China after Volkswagen.  BASF chairman Jurgen 
Strube said that China's recent economic growth and its expected 
entry into GATT made it mandatory for a company of BASF's size to 
have production facilities on the mainland.  High production costs 
in North America and Europe, he said, make it virtually impossible 
for chemical companies to rely on exports alone to supply the China 
market.  Even with removal of high import duties on styrene, which 
would be required by entry into GATT, it would still be cheaper to 
produce inside China. 

   Strube noted that because all raw materials for the project would 
be supplied locally, BASF would not have to worry too much about 
major exchange rate fluctuations.  He did concede, however, that 
inflation might be a problem.  Production at the plant was expected 
to begin in mid-1996, with a scheduled capacity of 100,000 tonnes. 
In 1992, China's consumption of polystyrene was 350,000 tonnes, 
nearly 70 percent of which was imported.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA 
MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 4 Feb 94 p 6) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan Investment in Guangxi Increases in 1993 - Guangxi has 
rapidly increased use of Taiwan funds.  Last year, 219 new Taiwan- 
funded enterprises were set up in the autonomous region, and Taiwan 
investors planned to make a total investment of over $250 million. 
Lei Yu, vice chairman of the autonomous regional government, said 
yesterday that in 1993, Guangxi also received over 120,000 Taiwan 
visitors last year.  The scope of Taiwan investment extended from 
elementary processing and farming to electronics, chemical, medical, 
tourist, and real estate industries, and the locations of investment 
also extended from coastal and major cities to such remote areas as 
Hechi and Baise.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0800 GMT 5 Feb 94) 
Hong Kong Bureau 

   Australian Group Launches Joint Resort Project in Hainan - An 
Australian enterprise group responsible for designing a Gold Coast 
project in Australia joined with a real estate development company 
in Hainan in launching a holiday resort construction project in 
Guilinyang on the east coast of Hainan Island.  The project will 
require a total investment of 500 million yuan, and some Taiwan and 
Australian financial institutions and yacht clubs will finance the 
project, which is expected to be completed in five years.  After 
completion, a holiday resort similar to ones on Australia's Gold 
Coast will be the sole large-scale comprehensive holiday 
recreational community of international standards in South China. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0929 GMT 7 Feb 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Mainland Chemical Firm Plans Hong Kong Listing - Yizheng Chemical 
Fibre Company, the world's fourth largest manufacturer of polyester 
and one of the biggest chemical companies in China, plans to issue H 
shares on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange in March.  According to the 
Jiangsu-based company's agenda, H shares, which are shares of 
Chinese companies listed in Hong Kong and thus traded outside China, 
will be issued in mid-March.  Shares for domestic investors, A 
shares, which are traded inside China, will be listed on the 
Shanghai Stock Exchange in May.  The company is presently engaged in 
a $421 million investment program which will raise the company's 
annual production capacity to 1 million tonnes by 1995.  Last year, 
the firm produced 545,000 tonnes of polyester with total sales of 
4.94 billion yuan, profits of 1.05 billion yuan, and export earnings 
of $37.2 million. (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 30 Jan 94 p 
1) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Trade Volume in Pudong's New District Accelerated in 1993 - 
Recent statistics show that in 1993 foreign trade conducted in 
Pudong's New District totaled $2.592 billion, which is equivalent to 
18.5 percent of Shanghai's total trade.  Imports and exports by 
joint venture companies in the amount of $1.062 billion constituted 
41 percent of the total trade in the new district.  With export 
earnings of $190 million in 1993, these joint venture companies have 
already become a principal player in Pudong's export trade. (Beijing 
JINGJI RIBAO 30 Jan p 1) 

   Mainland Investors Return to Surging Hong Kong Real Estate Market 
- Both the commercial and residential property markets continued 
their upward surge in January, and the reappearance of large-scale 
purchases by PRC-funded firms emerged as a major factor driving the 
real estate market to new heights.  In an article on page 7 of the 
SUNDAY MORNING POST (SUNDAY MONEY)on 30 January, Kennis Chu examined 
the renewed influence of investors from mainland China in the Hong 
Kong property market.  According to Chu, Chinese investment has 
risen noticeably since November 1993, when credit controls imposed 
in July of last year by Vice Premier Zhu Rongji to cool inflation 
were relaxed.  Property prices have reached record highs, 
particularly for Grade-A office space and luxury apartments.  The 
article states that Chinese participation in the real estate market 
can be divided into three types: central government enterprises, 
such as CITIC and China Merchants Holdings; companies owned by 
provincial governments like Guangdong Investment and Sichuan's 
Jianling (HK); and city and village-owned companies, such as 
Foshan's China Weal, Huiyang, and Pripenic. 

   In a front-page article in the 2 February issue of the SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST), Barry Porter cites a report by 
real estate consultant First Pacific Davies which puts the volume of 
recorded transactions in January at HK$17.32 billion and estimates 
an additional $5 billion in private transactions.  The article 
points out that this exceeds the previous monthly record of HK$12 
billion set in May 1993, a month in which there was an 
"unprecedented surge in buying by mainland corporations," a spree 
which Porter asserts was "partly responsible" for Zhu Rongji's July 
austerity program.  The article goes on to state that mainland 
corporations are buying Hong Kong property as a hedge against a 
further devaluation of the yuan.  However, most of the major 
publicly recorded purchases have been by completed by listed Hong 
Kong-based firms, such as Hong Kong China, controlled by the Lippo 
group, which paid HK$2.2 billion for an apartment block in the Mid 
Levels area; Lai Sun Group, which bought a Tsimshatsui office 
building for HK$1.4 billion; and Great Eagle, which paid HK$2 
billion for the Ramada Renaissance Hotel, also in Tsimshatsui. 
The SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) on 29 January 
reports on page one that, in an effort to reduce its exposure to the 
residential property market, the territory's leading lender has 
further tightened its policies on the provision of mortgages for 
"luxury" apartments costing more than HK$5 million.  Hongkong Bank 
announced that from 29 January, the mortgage lending ratio for 
properties worth $5 million or above would be reduced to 50 percent 
from 60 percent.  The ratio for those priced below $5 million 
remains at 70 percent.  However, a report carried by the Hong Kong- 
based PRC-affiliated news agency ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese at 
0912 GMT on 30 January states that the Bank of China (BOC) Group had 
no intention of following Hongkong Bank for the moment.  The report 
said that the BOC would closely watch the market's reaction and 
developments in the field.  An official with the BOC Group said that 
they would not require their 13 subsidiary banks to follow the same 
rules in arranging mortgages; instead, the banks would be allowed to 
decide their own policy according to their particular financial 
resources.  Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan:  Enterprise Groups Establish Close Relations With 
Southeast Asian Nations -- Cooperative relations between Taiwan- 
based enterprises and PRC businessmen in Southeast Asia have become 
increasingly close.  This is expected to benefit the Taiwanese 
Government's current pursuit of its southern strategy.  Leading 
Taiwan enterprise groups that have close ties with commercial and 
political circles in Southeast Asian nations include the China Trust 
Group, the President Group, and the Foong Chun Group in Thailand; 
the Tuntex Group in Thailand and the Philippines; the Far East 
Textile Group and the Chun Yuan Iron and Steel Group in Malaysia; 
the Evergreen Shipping Group and the Walsin Linhwa Wireless Cable 
Group in Indonesia; and the Pacific Wire and Cable Group in Hong 
Kong.  These business groups are said to have played an active role 
as go-betweens in arranging visits by Taiwan Government leaders to 
Southeast Asia, including the recent trip by Premier Lien Chan and 
the current tour by President Li Teng-hui.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
PAO 7 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   National Bank Sets Goal for Money Supply Growth at 10-15 Percent 
in 1994 - The Central Bank of China (CBC) has decided to maintain 
its current moderately flexible money policy and set its goal for 
money supply growth at 10-15 percent in 1994.  Once growth exceeds 
the 15 percent ceiling, the CBC will take measures to tighten credit 
so as to ensure local commodity prices remain stable.  A CBC 
official said prices are projected to grow at an annual rate of 3.62 
percent this year, slightly higher than the 2.94 percent registered 
in 1993.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 4 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Economic Planning Official Expounds on Creating Operational 
Center - At a monthly Kuomintang meeting on 7 February, Vincent 
Siew, chairman of the Council for Economic Planning and Development, 
presented a report on the proposition of developing Taiwan into an 
operational center in the Asia-Pacific region.  Siew pointed out 
that efforts to develop Taiwan as the Asia-Pacific region's 
operational center would be adversely affected if economic ties with 
the PRC are not further enhanced.  Therefore, he called for a timely 
adjustment of cross-Strait economic and trade policies, as well as 
removal of undue restrictions.  He disclosed that his council has 
studied a set of ideas on how to achieve the goal of establishing 
the Asia-Pacific operational center and its attendant problems in 
connection with cross-Strait relations, as well as efforts to 
establish direct links with the PRC and how to resolve the relevant 
interlocking problems.  To achieve the goal of establishing the 
operational center, Siew put forward detailed measures that should 
be taken, calling for all-out efforts to gain accession to the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT).  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 8 Feb 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Impact of U.S. Lifting Embargo on Vietnam Viewed - With President 
Clinton's lifting of the 19-year old trade embargo against Vietnam, 
Taiwan is prepared to take advantage of its superior position as the 
largest foreign investor in Vietnam to increase efforts to develop 
the Vietnamese market.  Vincent Siew, chairman of the Council for 
Economic Planning and Development, said the U.S. move is bound to 
enhance cooperation and joint ventures between Taiwan and U.S. 
businessmen in Vietnam, thereby further strengthening economic and 
trade relations between the Republic of China (ROC) and the United 
States. 

   So far, the Vietnamese Government has approved more than 800 
projects funded by foreign investors with investments totaling $7 
billion, out of which $1.3 billion come from Taiwan.  Of the 10 
major foreign-invested projects in Vietnam, six are invested in by 
Taiwan-based enterprises, making Taiwan the number one foreign 
investor there, with interests concentrated mainly in tourism, 
imports and exports, and production.  According to the Board of 
Foreign Trade, bilateral trade leaped from approximately $1 million 
six years ago to $600 million last year, showing a growth of 654 
percent (as published) within six years.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 
5 Feb 94 p 1, 10) Okinawa Bureau 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Steel Firms Facing Changing Global Market 
- SUMMARY:  South Korea's price competitive edge in steel production 
is gradually shrinking, and ROK steel manufacturers lag behind 
advanced countries with regard to technology development, according 
to several reports from a Seoul daily.  Changes in the global market 
in the next 10 years will create new competitors and challenges for 
the industry.  ROK firms must prepare themselves in order to 
maintain their current position in the market, the paper says. 

   Three related articles in the 22 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 
(HKS) explore the status of ROK steel producers and the challenges 
they will face as the global market changes over the next 10 years. 
HKS notes that domestic steel firms are still competitive globally 
because of lower labor and manufacturing costs.  In 1991, the ROK's 
daily steel production per square meter of blast furnace volume was 
2.09 tons, compared with Japan's 2.03 tons.  That year ROK producers 
used 489 kg of bituminous coal per ton of melted iron, compared with 
515 kg for Japan.  Current ROK labor costs for ROK cold-rolled steel 
are only 60 percent of U.S. costs.  Thus even when raw materials 
costs are about equal, ROK production costs are about 18.7 percent 
lower than U.S. costs.  However, HKS points out that the rising cost 
of ROK labor is narrowing the ROK's price competitive edge.  From 
1988 through 1992, ROK steel firms saw an average annual wage 
increase of 16.6 percent, while production rose on average by only 
8.9 percent. 
   Although firms raised the level of their process technologies, 
they still lag behind producers in advanced countries with regard to 
technology development.  According to an industrial S and T research 
institute affiliated with POSCO (Pohang Iron and Steel Co.), South 
Korea trails Japan in automated and special steel production, and 
ROK steel technology is currently five to six years behind Japanese 
technology.  HKS reports that in 1992 the average rate of automation 
of ROK steel production was 53.1 percent, which was lower than 
Japan's 1990 rate.  In 1992, only 8.2 percent of ROK-produced steel 
was special steels. 

   ROK steel firms will be further challenged in the next 10 years, 
as producers develop and utilize innovative production technologies, 
and as steel firms in advanced countries undergo structural 
adjustments, HKS reports.  One new technology being developed is the 
melting reduction process, in which iron ore and coal are fed 
directly into the blast furnace to produce melted ore.  If 
commercialized, the process will greatly reduce plant investment and 
production costs.  Other new technologies include strip and thick- 
slab casting, which also can reduce production costs.  According to 
HKS, cold-rolled steel made with thick-slab technology is 28 percent 
less expensive than that made using the blast furnace method.  The 
paper points out that the rapid expansion of steel-producing 
facilities in developing countries will become another variable in 
the market,  To cut costs, strengthen their competitiveness, and 
maintain their current market position, ROK steel producers must 
adjust their structures and develop innovative technologies, HKS 
concludes. 

   POSCO, whose annual production can satisfy domestic demand, plans 
to raise its steel quality to world-class levels, according to HKS. 
It will focus on developing production technologies, investing 28 
billion won ($35 million) in melting reduction technology and 52.2 
billion won ($65.25 million) in strip casting technology.  POSCO 
hopes to use the latter in its production process by 1998.  By 1996, 
POSCO will build a thick slab plant (annual capacity, 1 million 
tons) at its Kwangyang facility.  HKS reports that in 1993 P0SCO 
invested an amount equal to 1.5 percent of sales to develop high 
value-added products, and intends td raise this investment to equal 
2.1 percent of sales by 1996.  The company will also change its 
distribution structure, raising the percentage of materials and 
products transported by ship to 38 percent, compared to 28 percent 
in 1993.  It will reduce distribution costs to 9.7 percent of sales 
(compared to 11.5 percent in 1993), according to HKS.  Finally, 
POSCO is developing overseas resources in order to expand its 
supplies of iron ore and bituminous coal, and will increase its 
local investment in China, Vietnam, and Southeast Asia. 

   POSCO is not alone in increasing its direct investment in these 
areas.  The 5 January HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reports that ROK steel 
firms are expected to increase their direct investment overseas, as 
they face rising labor costs at home and observe the growing demand 
for steel in China and Southeast Asia.  POSCO's efforts include 
negotiating for a 50:50 joint-venture tin plate plant (annual 
capacity: 20,000 tons; cost: $102 million) in Shanghai and a 50:50 
joint-venture cold-rolled steel plant (annual capacity: 150-200,000 
tons; cost: $100 million) near Tianjin.  POSCO is currently building 
a steel pipe factory (annual capacity: 30,000 tons) and a 
reinforcing bar factory (annual capacity: 20,000 tons) in Hanoi. 
Koyang and Pusan Pipe are working with POSCO on these projects.  HKS 
notes that Dongyang Tin Plate Industrial Company plans to conclude a 
70:30 joint venture agreement with Benxi Steel.  The company will 
build a tin plate plant (annual capacity: 150,000 tons; cost: $60 
million) in Benxi, Liaoning.  Hanbo Steel is constructing thick slab 
and reinforcing bar plants in Asan, ROK, and plans to transfer its 
Pusan plant facilities to Tianjin.  It is currently negotiating with 
Tianjin City on construction of a reinforcing bar plant (annual 
capacity: 1 million tons).  Korea Steel Pipe, Vietnam Steel, and 
Daewoo are negotiating the construction of a steel pipe plant 
(annual capacity: 50,000 tons) in Ho Chi Minh City. 

   Yet even if ROK steel firms alter their production structures and 
work to develop new technologies, they will still face problems. 
The 30 December HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reports that many of the new 
technologies being developed require scrap iron as an input, and 
that currently the domestic supply of scrap iron is insufficient to 
meet demand.  In the first nine months of 1993, ROK steel producers 
consumed 10.639 million tons of scrap iron, and had to procure 4.37 
million tons of it abroad.  While the amount supplied domestically 
rose by 14.5 percent, scrap iron imports rose by 55.8 percent. 
According to HKS, ROK dependence on imported scrap iron climbed from 
33.4 percent in 1992 to 41.1 percent in the first three quarters of 
1993.  At the same time, demand for scrap iron rose in the United 
States--the world's largest producer of the material; thus, it is 
now difficult to obtain quality scrap iron, and there are even 
rumors of a possible "embargo" on scrap iron exports. 

   HKS predicts that problems with scrap iron supplies will probably 
continue, as the number of thick slab casters, who use scrap iron as 
an input, grows from two at present to an estimated 44 worldwide by 
1996.  The expected supply-demand imbalance for scrap iron has kept 
all ROK electric furnace steel producers--except Hanbo--f rom 
bringing in thick-slab casting technology, according to HKS.  Even 
so, steel producers expect scrap iron supplies to continue to be a 
problem for some time, as growth in production capacity (39.4 
percent in 1992) continues over the next two to three years and the 
growth in stockpiled steel (9.9 percent in 1992) is unable to keep 
up.  To address the problem, experts suggest that South Korea 
systematize scrap iron recycling, expand its scrap iron collection 
and processing sites, revamp the distribution process, and work to 
increase the use of alternatives to scrap iron. 

   FEATURE:  New Approach To Collecting Foreign S and T Information 
Noted - SUMMARY:  Cooperative research agreements with foreign 
institutes, although numerous, have failed to provide the commercial 
technology South Korea needs to stay competitive, according to the 
head of a leading ROK research institute whose remarks are reported 
in the Seoul press.  The broad, general approach characteristic of 
ROK collection efforts to date will be replaced, in part, by a new 
program in which methods and goals are tailored to the realities of 
the target country. 

   South Korea's "cooperative" links with foreign research 
institutes will be expanded this year, while a concurrent effort is 
made to exploit these connections in ways commensurate with the 
ROK's real needs, according to reports in the 29 December and 24 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  Addressing a symposium held 28 
December and titled "Building the New Economy, and a Strategy for 
Internationalizing R and D," the director of the Korea Institute of 
Science and Technology (KIST) complained that "cooperative research" 
with other countries gives the appearance of being vigorous, but in 
fact is "much too weak."  In his view, the practical consequences of 
agreements made between ROK state-funded research institutes and 
foreign S and T establishments in particular have been 
unsatisfactory. 

   For example, a total of 48.3 billion won ($60 million) was 
"invested" by South Korea between 1985-92 in 260 international 
projects.  However, the nature of these projects or the manner of 
their execution differed, in the director's opinion, from what 
"joint international research" should be. The KIST official was 
especially concerned about the difficulty South Korean research 
institutes have keeping leading foreign scientists on the job.  Some 
94 percent reportedly leave their projects before one month, because 
South Korea lacks "ways to retain them," the 29 December MKS 
reports. 

   On 24 January, the same newspaper reported a "concrete plan"--to 
rectify these problems through "strategic technical cooperation" 
with the United States, Japan, and other advanced countries--laid 
out in such a way as to increase the international competitiveness 
of ROK products.  According to this "Plan To Strengthen Strategic 
Cooperation With Technically Advanced Foreign Countries," devised by 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), the following 
projects and technologies are to be sought: 

   United States - "Cooperation" will be pursued in selected areas 
of advanced technology.  A "ROK-U.S. Commercial Technology 
Cooperation Foundation" will be established early this year within 
the Federation of Korean Industries, through which South Korea will 
try to form "cooperative systems" with U.S. companies in 
semiconductors, computers, machine tools, aviation, communications 
gear, medical machinery and instruments, and environmental 
equipment. 

   Japan - South Korea will discontinue its former pattern of 
importing Japanese technology for machinery, shipbuilding, and other 
heavy industries, and pursue technical training for employees of 
small and medium business in high-tech areas, such as multimedia and 
databases, through the Information Technology Research Institute. 

   China - An industrial cooperation committee will be formed to 
discuss technical cooperation in automobiles, time-division exchange 
(TDX) switching systems, and aviation.  Talks will also be held on 
commercializing PRC technology through use of ROK capital and 
production technology. 

   Russia - Support for "joint research" aimed at transferring 
Russian high-tech to the ROK will be increased from 500 million won 
($625,000) to 2.7 billion won ($3.4 million) in 1994.  Investment 
will focus on commercialization of advanced technology. 

   France - A "technical cooperation roundtable conference" between 
South Korea and France will be held in Paris early in 1994, the 
first of its kind between the two countries.  Also, an industrial 
cooperation committee will be set up with a focus on aviation, 
space, and nuclear power. 

   Australia - The first "technical cooperation workshop" between 
South Korea and Australia will be held this year in Canberra.  A 
"joint research committee" will be formed to promote cooperation in 
electronics and communications. 

   FEATURE:  Record Growth Reported in Private Research Institutes - 
SUMMARY:  The year 1993 saw a record increase in the number of 
private ROK company-affiliated research institutes, according to a 
survey cited in the Seoul press.  Some 84 percent of the growth was 
recorded in the fields of electronics, machinery and metals, and 
chemicals.  Continuation of the present "boom" in construction of 
new laboratories, and the ability of South Korean companies to 
create new, competitive products will depend on increased government 
subsidies and the timely transfer of foreign technology. 

   According to a survey by the Korea Industrial Technology 
Promotion Association, reported in the 14 January MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN (MKS) and the 2 February CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the number of 
private research laboratories established by South Korean companies 
is rising, in response to government incentives, and as the 
companies recognize the importance of R and D to their businesses. 
The survey found that 297 private R and D institutes were set up in 
1993 and 42 closed, for a net gain of 255.  Broken down by field, 
123 (41.4 percent) of the new facilities were for electricity and 
electronics, 70 (23.6 percent) were for machinery and metals, and 56 
(18.8 percent) were for chemicals. 

   The survey further noted that 1993's increase in private R and D 
institutes was the largest on record, continuing a "boom" that began 
in the 1990's with more than 250 new facilities established both in 
1991 and 1992.  The past year's growth brings the total number of 
company-owned research labs now operating in South Korea to 1,690. 
Some 300 more are expected by the end of this year.  The following 
data published in MKS pertain: 

   Growth of ROK Company-Affiliated R and D Institutes 


                 Year           Institutes        Personnel 

                 1984               163             6,917 
                 1985               204             9,226 
                 1986               317            12,576 
                 1987               503            16,174 
                 1988               674            18,038 
                 1989               824            22,506 
                 1990               966            26,851 
                 1991             1,201            33,768 
                 1992             1,435            38,643 
                 1993             1,690            43,872 



   CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports that of the 1,690 private labs, 655 (39.3 
percent) are involved in electrical and electronics research, 402 
(23.8 percent) in machinery and metals, 381 (22.5 percent) in 
chemical research, 58 (3.4 percent) in foods, and 34 (2.0 percent) 
in textiles.  By the end of 1993, the 43,872 people working at these 
institutes represented more than half of the 76,000 researchers 
estimated to be employed in South Korea totally.  Some 3.8 percent 
of the company-affiliated researchers have PhD's, the magazine 
notes. 

   Many large ROK corporations operate more than one research 
facility, such as Goldstar which has nine separate labs and Samsung 
Electronics which runs more than 10.  Several conglomerates have 
consolidated, group-level R and D facilities besides the ones run by 
subsidiary companies.  Smaller firms are also "rushing" to set up 
labs, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports: 247 of last year's 297 new facilities 
belong to small and medium businesses, which now operate 1,113 or 66 
percent of the nation's total.  The shifting balance is also 
reflected in the ratio of annual R and D expenditures made by large 
versus smaller ROK corporations, from 88-12 in 1985, to 60-40 in 
1987, and over 50 percent in 1989. 

   According to the magazine, annual R and D outlays by company- 
affiliated institutes rose between 1981 and 1993 from 140 billion 
won ($175 million) to 3.7 trillion won ($4.625 billion), stimulated 
by government incentives such as tax deductions, employee exemptions 
from military conscription, import tax immunities on research 
equipment, and "similar types of support policies."  Nevertheless, 
last year's total private research expenditures are said by CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG to be less than that spent by a single major corporation in 
an "advanced country."  Accordingly, the magazine observes that it 
is not enough for South Korean companies to increase the amount of 
private capital allotted to research.  ROK "Government R and D 
subsidies" to private institutes, currently amounting to about 20 
percent of their total research expenditures, will also have to be 
raised. 

   Larger R and D budgets are only part of the solution.  The 
magazine reports that South Korean firms are also setting up R and D 
facilities overseas in greater numbers to obtain "information on 
advanced technologies, to get the technology at an early date, and 
for timely development of new products."  Such overseas labs are 
established through legal corporations owned by parent ROK firms, 
and by acquisitions of local research institutes.  "More than 20" of 
these South Korean facilities are currently being operated in the 
United States alone, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reports. 

   FEATURE:  Samsung Moving Into Helicopter, Fixed-Wing Air 
Transport - SUMMARY:  Government attempts at promoting commercial 
helicopter transport to solve South Korea's traffic problems, while 
largely ineffective to date, may get a boost from Samsung, a Seoul 
business magazine suggests.  The company reportedly is willing to 
take losses providing domestic helicopter service to achieve its 
larger goal of breaking into the commercial air industry and 
becoming the country's third major carrier. 

   An ROK Government initiative in 1993 to expand commercial 
helicopter transport in South Korea has not generated a significant 
increase in demand, although this may soon change for reasons that 
have little to do with helicopters, according to the 29 December 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

   The Seoul business magazine reports that toward the end of the 
1980's, the number of ROK firms involved in helicopter transport 
began increasing.  Air Korea, a subsidiary of Korea Air, started 
domestic service with a fleet of nine helicopters in 1986.  Two 
years later, several other companies began commercial helicopter 
flights over limited routes which, for national security reasons, do 
not include Seoul.  At present, nine ROK companies are licensed to 
make unscheduled domestic flights, but only two are actually 
providing services.  The remainder either lack the capital to get 
started or have been delayed for other reasons, CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
states. 

   Enter Samsung Aerospace.  According to the magazine's analysis 
based on "industry sources," Samsung plans to move "full-scale" into 
helicopter transport this year, despite probable losses, in order to 
fulfill its long-standing "dream" of becoming South Korea's "third 
commercial carrier."  In early 1994, Samsung reportedly will begin 
shuttle services with one 20-seat Super Puma helicopter.  By the end 
of the year, the fleet will have grown to five helicopters of 
various types, which will operate on routes between areas where the 
group's businesses are concentrated.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG states that by 
1997, Samsung will have more than 30 helicopters and 90 some pilots, 
along with 19- and 50-passenger fixed-wing aircraft (possibly from 
Canada Air and England's Jetstream Co.) for use on commercial 
routes.  The planned transition into regular, fixed-wing air 
transport helps explain, in the magazine's estimate, Samsung's early 
support for the ROK Government's program to manufacture indigenous 
small-to-medium size commercial aircraft, and the company's 
willingness to absorb losses in helicopter transport. 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG notes that the Ministry of Transportation is 
promoting helicopter and fixed-wing aircraft as a way to alleviate 
transportation bottlenecks, and to facilitate north-south 
communication when this becomes possible.  The ministry reportedly 
is discussing civilian use of military airports with the Defense 
Ministry, and may extend the age limit of used helicopters licensed 
for cargo transport from 10 years to 20 years. 
   The magazine provides the following information on present South 
Korean commercial air assets. 
                                Capital          Light          Air 
Company              Licensed   (mil $)  Planes  Planes  Helos 
Ships 
Total 


Korea Air          Dec  62  $267.5      94   10      2     1    107 
Asiana Air         Feb  88   250.0      26                      26 
Air Korea          Dec  86    10.0            2      9          11 
United Air Repair  May  88     2.5                   1           1 
Samsung Aerospace  Jun  88    52.4                   2            2 
Seoul Air          Nov  90     2.5                   5            5 
Hyundai Air        Nov  91   100.0                   2            2 
Daemyung Leisure   Feb  92     2.5                  (2)          (2) 
Pusan Air          Feb  93     2.5                  (2)          (2) 

Total                                   120  12     25     1    158 



   Japanese Newspaper Interviews Hyundai Motors CEO - Hyundai Motors 
President Chon Song-won made the following remarks during an 
interview with a reporter from Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   Hyundai exported 340,000 automobiles last year from a total 
production of 960,000 units, representing an increase of 25 percent 
in exports over 1992.  Export volume was divided about equally 
between the United States, Europe, and other areas, consistent with 
the company's goal of broadening its sales base.  Prior to 1993, 
Hyundai had to price its cars cheaper than Japanese exports to 
compete, but in Europe today, comparable models are selling for the 
same price.  Hyundai's 1994 production will reach 1.15 million 
units, which is full capacity.  By 2000, the company will be 
building 2 million cars annually. 

   U.S. sales, which reached 110,000 last year, will increase by 
10,000 to 20,000 units in 1994 because of the high yen value, 
improved quality, new models, and a larger dealer network.  China, 
too, "will become an extremely important market" which Hyundai will 
access through local production. 

   Hyundai sees its major task as improving technology.  The company 
is currently operating three research centers, and will build two 
more by 2000.  Hyundai's strategy is to develop some technology of 
its own, which it can trade for technology from foreign automobile 
manufacturers.  In the reporter's estimate, Hyundai's success will 
depend less on its ability to compete technologically than on 
keeping costs down.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 17 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Sunkyong Subsidiary Acquires U.S. Microfilm Factory - SKC, 
Limited, Sunkyong's main subsidiary and a major manufacturer of 
videotape, disks, and film products, has acquired the U.S. firm 
Anacom's Sunnyvale, California plant for $12.5 million.  SKC has 
been supplying Anacom, the world's largest producer of microfilm, 
with polyester film for its products since 1988, and had been 
negotiating with Anacom for two years in its effort to secure a 
U.S.-based production facility.  With an annual capacity of 6,000 
tons, the buyout gives SKC a potential sales increase of $50 
million, while serving as an "effective response to NAFTA."  SKC 
also owns a factory in New Jersey producing 2,400 tons of aluminum- 
coated film annually, and operates a videotape factory in China's 
Fujian Province.  The Anacom deal thus gives SKC its third "large- 
scale overseas production base" for magnetic recording media and 
high-density new materials.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 10 Dec 94 p 
8) 

   Korean-Language Software Development To Be Subsidized - South 
Korea's Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST) will step up plans 
to promote the domestic software industry, in order to head off an 
influx of foreign software products into South Korea, anticipated as 
a result of the Uruguay Round.  In March, a "Hangul Engineering 
Research Center" will be established to expedite development of core 
software, and direct research related to developing hangul (Korean 
script) information processing technology.  MOST is considering tax 
incentives, financial subsidies, and other measures aimed at 
concentrated support for developing the industry as quickly as 
possible.  The plan calls for "large-scale" public investment, 
measures to increase demand, and coordination between different 
government agencies, for example, by linking software development 
with the Ministry of Communications' high speed, mid-size computer 
project.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Dec 94 p 12) 

   Government To Invest in Multimedia Industry - Between now and 
1998, the ROK Government will invest some 100 billion won ($125 
million) to bring the country's multimedia industry up to world 
standards.  Concentrated efforts will be made to develop information 
processing systems, portable information terminals, and multimedia 
titles and standard protocols.  The government will also revise 
regulations to encourage private development of the multimedia 
industry and permit broader participation by broadcasting and cable 
companies, and by news agencies.  According to a "Comprehensive Plan 
To Develop the Multimedia Industry" devised by the Ministry of 
Trade, Industry, and Energy, major emphasis will be placed on 
securing strategic technologies, developing and disseminating 
titles, improving laws and regulations, and stimulating demand. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 31 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Taehan Wool To Build Joint-Venture Plant in Vietnam - Taehan Wool 
has invested $4 million to build a joint-venture wool plant in 
Vietnam.  The company will soon conclude a 70:30 joint venture 
contract with the Vietnam National Silk Corporation.  Taehan plans 
to transfer its old weaving machines from South Korea to Vietnam. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 2 Feb 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Cement Companies Consider Building Plants in Pakistan, China - 
Ssangyong Cement Company has begun a feasibility study on building a 
1-million ton cement plant in Pakistan and is discussing the 
construction of a cement plant capable of producing 600,000 tons a 
year with Baoshan Steel Mill in Shanghai, China.  Tongyang Cement 
Company is also reportedly planning to build cement plants in 
Vietnam and in a Chinese special economic zone, and Asia Cement 
Company is studying the feasibility of building a 300,000-ton cement 
plant in Dalian, China.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Feb 94 p 11) 
Seoul Bureau 

   Taebong Electronics To Open Plant in China in March - Taebong 
Electronics, a manufacturer of car radio tuners, will begin 
operating its tuner plant in Tianjin, China in March.  The plant can 
produce $1.5 million worth of tuners each month.  Taebong began 
construction of the 1,500-pyong plant in November 1993.  Another 
plant under construction in Indonesia is due to be completed this 
June.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Feb 94 p 13) Seoul Bureau 

   Samsung Introduces Integrated Customer Service Plan for Europe - 
Samsung Electronics has begun full operation of its integrated 
after-sales service system in the European Union (EU) in a bid to 
make further inroads into the unified European market.  The "Samsung 
EU integrated service guarantee system" allows EU customers to 
receive the same after-sales services regardless of their 
nationality or location.  The company is issuing quality guarantee 
letters, containing translations in seven languages, which specify 
unified terms for warrantees and after-sales service.  Samsung now 
has a Euro-service headquarters in London that provides integrated 
services for EU consumers by coordinating its six sales 
subsidiaries.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 9 Feb 94 p 8) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Trade Possibilities With Iran 
Reported - Iran's Heavy Industries Minister Nezhad Hosseinian 
recently announced that Iran and Indonesia plan to establish an 
aircraft assembly and shipbuilding venture.  While other details of 
the project are still to be worked out, the two sides agreed that 
the aircraft assembly plant which is being planned will use IPTN 
(Indonesian Aircraft Industry) components.  In exchange, Iran has 
offered Indonesia the use of its dockyards. 

   Indonesian Research and Technology Minister Habibie has announced 
that sometime between February and April, Indonesia will send a 10- 
member delegation to promote its own N-250 medium-range plane and to 
further discuss the aircraft assembly and shipbuilding venture. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 12 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Taiwanese Companies To Relocate in Indonesia - Because of 
increasing labor costs, limited land area, and the "government's 
push to look south," a number of Taiwanese businessmen have decided 
to move their companies to Indonesia, according to Minister of State 
for Investment Sanyoto Sastrowardoyo.  Top Taiwainese entrepreneurs 
are interested in investing in large projects in steel, oil 
refinery, electric power, chemicals, and cement, the minister said. 
A memorandum of understanding between the two countries was signed 
during Sanyoto's recent visit, covering Taiwan's plan to invest in 
industrial components on Batam Island.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 14 
Jan 94 p 6) 

   Government's Position on Funding 'Mega-Projects' - Finance 
Minister Mar'ie Muhammad recently reaffirmed that the government 
will discontinue the practice of giving protection to domes tic- 
funded "mega-projects."  He added that the practice has undermined 
competitiveness and increased national expenditure.  (Jakarta BISNIS 
INDONESIA 13 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Official Comments on Natuna Gas Negotiations - Faisal Abda'oe, 
chairman of the Indonesian Government's negotiating team, said that 
current negotiations between Indonesia and Esso Oil Co., a 
subsidiary of EXXON, still center on the production-sharing split, 
and fiscal and legal matters.  Since Esso remains the "Natuna gas 
field operator" until 1996 when its earlier contract expires, 
Indonesia cannot look for other prospective contractors, Abda'oe 
said.  He noted that the Natuna gas exploitation project would 
involve a "very large amount" of investment because of the need to 
construct a refinery of "high technological capacity" to separate 
the various gases.  Natuna gas is 71 percent carbondioxide, 28 
percent hydrocarbon, 0.5 percent hydrogen, and 0.5 percent nitrogen. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 26 Jan 94 p 7) 

   LAOS:  Malaysia To Invest in Agriculture, Forestry - Malaysia's 
Lao Timber Corporation plans to invest in a $45-million agriculture 
and forestry development project in southern Laos.  The company has 
reportedly completed aerial and ground surveys.  (Vientiane KPL 0806 
GMT 8 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   MALAYSIA:  FEATURE:  Government Outlines Strategies To Attract 
More Investment - SUMMARY:  Two Kuala Lumpur dailies recently 
reported that Malaysia has a "plan of action" to attract more 
investment in order to sustain its "impressive growth rate." 
"Specific strategies" have been outlined, and two additional areas 
for development have been identified, according to the papers. 

   The 16 January BERITA HARlAN and 18 January UTUSAN MALAYSIA 
report that despite a drop in foreign investment, tight labor 
supply, and infrastructure problems, Malaysia is determined to 
sustain its "impressive growth rate."  In order to do so, the 
government has drawn up "strategies" to create a more conducive 
investment climate. 

   Recognizing the growing competition for foreign investment from 
neighboring ASEAN countries, China, and Vietnam, the Malaysian 
Government  has decided to focus on getting local investors to 
participate in developing indigenous industrial and consumer goods, 
the papers say.  The government wants domestic corporations to 
innovate, design, produce, and market Malaysian products, processes, 
and services that will be competitive overseas.  To assist in this 
endeavor, the government has recently opened up two areas for 
development, where investments are being sought--the East Coast 
corridor and the East-West corridor. 

   The papers also report that the Malaysian Government intends to 
review the present overall incentive system for the manufacturing 
sector, to make it more "balanced" by providing incentives 
"selectively."  In addition, the government wants to provide an 
environment that will "enhance research capabilities" and "nurture 
innovations," according to the 17 January BERITA HARlAN.  Other 
strategies mentioned by the paper include: 

   --Developing industrial cooperation between multinational 
corporations and Malaysian companies 

   --Establishing a single agency to spearhead the development of 
small- and medium-sized industries to further strengthen the 
industrial sector 

   --Encouraging heavy and strategic industries to expand and 
diversify 

   --Promoting the aerospace industry as a new strategic subsector 

   --Encouraging technology acquisition, research, and development 

   --Upgrading infrastructure facilities 

   --Putting a priority on human resource development 

   Samsung To Produce Picture Tubes for Computer Monitors - Korea's 
Samsung Electron Devices (Malaysia) Sdn. Bhd. will invest $160 
million to establish two manufacturing lines to produce color 
picture tubes for computer monitors.  Production will start next 
year, in March and September, respectively.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW 
STRAITS TIMES 8 Feb 94 p 12) Bangkok Bureau 

   PHILIPPINES:  Hong Kong Company To Build Power Station - Gordon 
Y.S. Yu, managing director of Hong Kong-based Hopewell Holdings 
Ltd., stated that the company plans to build a power station in 
Pangasinan under a build-operate-transfer arrangement.  The power 
station's annual  capacity will be 1,000 mw initially and will reach 
2,000 mw eventually.  The station is part of an integrated 
development project that will include an international seaport 
terminal, an industrial park, a modern international airport, a 
superhighway (between Pangasinan, Metro Manila, and Quezon 
Province), and other support facilities.  Yu estimates that the 
entire project will cost approximately $5 billion.  (Manila BALITA 
14 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Sale of Oil Shares to Saudi Aramco Reported - The Philippine 
National Oil Company (PNOC) is selling 40 percent of its stake in 
Petron Corporation to Saudi Aramco for $502 million.  Petron will be 
guaranteed priority access to crude oil supplies.  (Quezon City 
MALAYA 4 Feb 94 p 11) Bangkok Bureau 

   Joint Venture Agreements Signed With Malaysian Firms - Nine joint 
venture agreements were signed during Malaysian Prime Minister 
Mahathir's recent visit to the Philippines.  Among them were a $200- 
million Cebu waterworks project, a 4O0-mw power plant worth $72 
million, and a $20-million water treatment project for Clark Air 
Base.  (Quezon City MALAYA 4 Feb 94 p 6) Bangkok Bureau 

   THAILAND:  Finance Ministry Sets 1995 Budget at $28.6 Billion - 
The Finance Ministry has budgeted $3.6 billion for fiscal year 1995, 
a 14.4-percent increase over the current fiscal year.  The 
government plans to spend at least 34.4 percent of the budget on 
public investment, the same as this fiscal year.  (Bangkok BANGKOK 
POST 12 Feb 94 p 24) Bangkok Bureau 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Foreign Firms Show Interest in Export Zone, 
New City - SUMMARY:  A company owned by Taiwan's ruling party is 
developing an export promotion zone and a "new city" project in Ho 
Chi Minh City jointly with the city's government, according to 
Japanese and Vietnamese press reports. Several dozen Taiwanese 
companies have signed leases to build in the zone, and the zone's 
management is currently negotiating with Hong Kong, Singapore, South 
Korean, and Japanese firms.  Japanese real estate and construction 
companies are said to be very interested in participating in 
developing the zone and new city. 

   The Tan Thuan Export Processing Zone (EPZ), the first of three 
such zones to be built in Vietnam, is being jointly developed by Ho 
Chi Minh City and the Taiwanese firm Central Trading and Development 
Corp. (CT and D), according to the 24 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  The EPZ, 300 hectares (740 acres) in size and located in 
the Tan Thuan area of Nha Be District, Ho Chi Minh City, is being 
developed at a total cost of $90 million.  However, some of the 
infrastructure, such as a thermal power plant, will also be built to 
serve the adjacent "new town," which will be located on a 750- 
hectare (1,850-acre) tract.  (The 23 July 1993 NIKKEI states that 
the EPZ's size is 450 hectares (1,110 acres), and that the total 
area of the EPZ and new town is 2,600 hectares, or 6,420 acres). 
The combined EPZ-new town project is "one of the two largest 
development projects" currently under way in Vietnam, the 8 November 
1993 NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN notes, along with the $1.2-billion oil 
refinery being built by Taiwan's state-owned China Petroleum Co. and 
France's Total. 

   According to the Hanoi bimonthly VIETNAMESE TRADE UNIONS (VTU), 
issues 5-6 for 1992, the EPZ is located on the south bank of the 
Saigon River 4 km downriver from the city center.  Its location is 
"ideal" because it permits convenient transportation by sea, land, 
or air--it is located only 10 km from Tan Son Nhat international 
airport--and the EPZ is close to Vietnam's North-South highway, 
connects with Route 15, a major artery, into Ho Chi Minh City, and 
has convenient access to other major roads in southern Vietnam.  The 
VTU article reports that infrastructural construction work began in 
September 1991, and overall construction of the zone is expected to 
take six years.  Total construction costs for the zone will come to 
$89.9 million, the 24 January NIKKEI article reports.  The VTU 
article also states that $55 million will be invested in a highway, 
which it does not identify.  The 24 January NIKKEI reports that CT 
and D's "total investment in Vietnamese development projects" is 
$600 million.  Also participating in development of the EPZ is the 
Taiwanese firm Pan-Viet Co., according to the VTU article. 
   The 28 September 1993 Hanoi NHAN DAN reports that CT and D and 
the Tan Thuan Industrial Development Co. established a 50-year joint 
venture company to build an 18-km highway from Nha Be District to 
Binh Chanh District in Ho Chi Minh City, and the infrastucture for 
the area along this highway.  CT and D will contribute 70 percent of 
the joint venture's $60 million in upfront capital, the paper 
reports, and total investment in the project will come to $242 
million. 

   According to the 13-19 January Hanoi THOI BAO KINH VIET NAM, the 
Japanese corporations Mitsui, Nomura, and Mitsubishi have set up 
investment projects at the Tan Thuan EPZ.  Juki, another Japanese 
corporation, plans to build a factory to produce sewing machine 
parts, with a preliminary investment capital of $16 million.  Juki 
is renting 13,000 square meters at the EPZ.  To date, some 26 
companies have invested $310 million in Tan Thuan. 

   Taiwan's KMT Owns 75 Percent of Development Company - The 24 
January NIKKEI article reports that CT and D was established in 1988 
by Taiwan's ruling party, the Kuomintang (KMT), to support the 
development of civilian projects in Southeast Asia and China.  The 
KMT owns 75 percent of the company's shares, while company officers, 
including President Ting Shan-li, own the remaining 25 percent. 
With KMT backing, NIKKEI asserts, CT and D has "strong political and 
financial clout."  Through monthly visits to Vietnam, President Ting 
has developed a "large pipeline" to government officials, NIKKEI 
adds, and last August he was made an "honorary citizen" of Ho Chi 
Minh City. 

   CT and D plans to lease tracts in the EPZ to Taiwanese, Hong 
Kong, South Korean, Singapore, Japanese, and other foreign firms, 
according to the 24 (5 uary NIKKEI article.  Already 31 companies, 
nearly all Taiwanese, have decided to set up operations in the zone, 
particularly spinning, textile, and apparel companies.  In addition, 
as of the end of December 1993, CT and D planned to attract 100 new 
foreign companies.  One Taiwanese textile company has already begun 
operations in the EPZ and four other firms currently are building 
plants. 

   In addition, NIKKEI reports, observer groups from major U.S. 
corporations, "including IBM and General Electric," have visited the 
zone and have given "very positive responses" concerning future 
participation. 

   Investing Companies To Receive Favorable Terms - To create a 
favorable climate for foreign investors, the VTU article states, 
companies locating in the EPZ will be exempt from import duties on 
equipment, materials, and some specific goods, and from export taxes 
on goods shipped abroad.  Production factories will be exempt from 
the income tax (10 percent of profits) during the first four years, 
while service companies will be exempt from taxes (15 percent of 
profits) in the two years from the year they begin to make profits. 
If an investor reinvests profits in production or invests elsewhere 
in Vietnam, "revenue taxes he had paid on the profits in 
reinvestment" will be returned.  Companies remitting profits abroad 
will pay a 5-percent profit tax. 

   The VTU article states that priority will be given to companies 
in a wide range of light industrial firms--including those producing 
food and drinks, household utensils, textiles, leather goods, paper, 
plastic goods, and packaging materials; electronics and mechanical 
engineering firms; and service industry companies that are engaged 
in "banking, insurance, construction and auditing."  A separate 
thermal power plant complex with a capacity of 675 megawatts (mw) 
(see below) and a "safe water" plant will be built for the zone, the 
article notes, and in collaboration with the Ho Chi Minh City Post 
Office, a telecommunications network will be established.  The EPZ 
will also have a "specialized organization" to quickly solve 
investor claims.  The EPZ's managing board is authorized to "grant 
investment licences within three months" and issue trading licences, 
import-export licences, and construction permits and will settle 
"labor and economic contract disputes."  The EPZ will develop into 
"a big center for production, export and import of the whole 
country" and will provide "hundreds of thousands of jobs" for Ho Chi 
Minh City residents, the article concludes. 

   'New City' To Be Built Adjacent to EPZ - According to the 24 
January NIKKEI, the EPZ project includes development of an adjacent 
new city," comprising 750 hectares (1,852 acres).  The 21 January 
NIKKEI adds that in addition to serving as a "bedroom community" for 
foreigners working in the EPZ, the new city will have office 
buildings, hotels, government offices, a stock exchange, residential 
housing, and schools.  The 17 November NIKKEI SANGYO reports that 
investment in the new city--presumably for its basic development and 
infrastructure--will be $240 million. 

   CT and D, Hong Kong Company To Build Thermal Generating Plant - 
CT and D and the New World Development Group, a major Hong Kong 
property developer, have established a joint venture company to 
build a thermal power plant to supply electricity to the EPZ and the 
new city, according to the 17 November NIKKEI SANGYO.  This will be 
"the first power-generating project in Vietnam financed with foreign 
capital."  The plant, to be managed by a new company, Hip Fok Power 
Co., will cost $205 million and will be built in two stages on a 
27.5-hectare (68-acre) site.  First, a 425-mw plant will be 
completed by mid-1977, and "later" a 250-mw generating facility will 
be added. 

   As a short-term measure to provide electricity, by the end of 
1993 CT and D planned to install 6 mw of generating capacity, which 
will be expanded to 50 mw by the end of this year.  The Vietnamese 
Government has approved the project and "site development has 
begun." 

   Japanese Firms Eager To Participate in Development Work - The 21 
January NIKKEI reports that henceforth CT and D intends to expand 
participation in the EPZ to other foreign investors to speed up 
development of the zone.  A number of Japanese firms are eager to 
participate, particularly exporting companies and real estate and 
construction firms.  In February, a meeting of Japanese companies 
interested in participating in the EPZ's development will be held. 
Raizu, a Tokyo-based planning and design company, has been selected 
to serve as the focal point for gathering information concerning 
consulting work for the EPZ and information for Japanese firms 
planning to invest in the new town. 

   FEATURE:  Changes in State Enterprises Reported - SUMMARY: 
Recent press articles report that Vietnamese state enterprises are 
currently undergoing "major" changes, either merging to become 
"state economic groups" or being privatized.  Under the auspices of 
the prime minister or the Ministry of Finance, "managing councils" 
will be appointed to run the newly formed enterprises.  The 
government has announced that it will be "very strict" in dealing 
with money-losing enterprises and will not subsidize them "in any 
way." 

   According to the 23-29 December 1;993 Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIET 
NAM, there are nearly 6,000 state enterprises in Vietnam and most of 
them are "small, outdated, and backward."  THOI BAO notes that these 
enterprises are currently going through "major" changes, either 
merging to become "state economic groups" or being privatized. 

   The 2 January Ho Chi Minh City THANH NIEN quotes Tran Du Lich, a 
member of the National Assembly and the government's Advisory Board, 
as saying that state enterprises will eventually be "capitalized" 
and become "independent legal entities."  According to Minister Le 
Xuan Trinh of the prime minister's office, a department under the 
prime minister or the Ministry of Finance will be created to oversee 
"managing councils" that will control the newly formed enterprises. 
During the current "transition period," municipal or provincial 
People's Committee chairmen may be given the responsibility of 
appointing the managing councils. 

   In its November 1993 issue, the Party journal TAP CHI CONG SAN 
states that over 30 percent of state enterprises are suffering 
losses and over 20 percent are nearly bankrupt.  The 12 December 
1993 THUONG MAI reports that 20 percent of the 6,000 state 
enterprises nationwide "never earn a profit."  Some 15 percent are 
operating in the red while others are on the verge of bankruptcy, 
the paper says.  Some 20 percent of the enterprises under the 
Ministry of Marine Products, 26 percent of those under the Ministry 
of Agriculture and Food Industry, and 12 percent of those under the 
Ministry of Trade are operating at a loss.  Of the money-losing 
enterprises, 25 percent are in Quang Nam-Da Nang, 23 percent in 
Haiphong, 7.5 percent in Ho Chi Minh City, and 7 percent in Hanoi. 

   The 12 December 1993 Ho Chi Minh City TUOI TRE CHU NHAT mentions 
a report made by Minister of Finance Ho Te at a recent National 
Assembly meeting, stating that the government will be "very strict" 
and "will not  subsidize money-losing firms in any way." 

   Stock Exchange Opening Delayed by Slow Privatization Efforts - 
Plans by the Vietnamese Government to open the country's first stock 
exchange in Ho Chi Minh City may be delayed because of its tardiness 
in privatizing state-owned companies and enacting the required 
legislation.  The government is planning to open the exchange in 
mid-1994 "at the earliest."  Foreign investors are eager to buy 
shares in Vietnamese companies, but activity will remain at a low 
level even if foreigners are allowed to invest, because of the poor 
financial condition of many state-run companies. 

   Of the 17 firms that have been publicly named to be privatized 
and issue stock, only four have actually taken steps in this 
direction.  To date the only firm that has issued stock is the Union 
of Transport Agents.  Two other companies, Legamex and Hiep Phu An 
Shoe Co., cannot find purchasers for their shares. 

   The number of state-owned companies has rapidly decreased the 
past few years.  In 1990, there were about 12,000 firms, but this 
total had fallen to around 7,000 by 1993.  However, of the 7,000, 
only 6,500 firms are actually operating, "most" are experiencing 
financial difficulties, and 400 firms are incurring "serious 
losses."  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 4 Feb 94 p 5) 

   State Bank Takes Steps To Increase Capital Mobilization - The 
Vietnam State Bank aims to mobilize capital by introducing and/or 
promoting the following: 

   --Individual bank accounts allowing private citizens to make 
deposits as well as other kinds of transactions 

   --Long-term government bonds to mobilize capital for capital 
construction 

   --Long-term securities, issued by commercial banks 

   --Additional long-term savings accounts to borrow against 

   --Stocks in businesses, made available for purchase 

   --Investment funds 

   --Increasing relations with international financial organizations 
to attract foreign capital. 

   According to the State Bank, in 1993 Vietnam's money supply rose 
by over 5 trillion dong (about $500 million) while the capital 
mobilized by commercial banks increased by 1.36 trillion dong (about 
$136 million).  Overall, commercial banks were only able to attract 
capital that allowed them to make short-term loans (for one year or 
less).  (Hanoi LAO DONG 28 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Thai Companies Undertaking Range of Investments - Several of 
Thailand's largest conglomerates are laying the groundwork for 
making large investments in Vietnam.  Several conglomerates, such as 
the Chareun Phokphan Group and the Siam Cement Group, which have 
already formulated their Vietnam investment plans, have accelerated 
them because of  the entry of American and European multinational 
companies into Vietnam.  The main focus of Thai investment is 
Vietnam's infrastructure. 

   The Chareun Phokphan Group has reached basic agreement with Ho 
Chi Minh City to install 100,000 communications circuits at a cost 
of $150 million.  Also, the Chinnawat Group is in the process of 
applying for permission from the Vietnamese Government to invest in 
the communications and broadcasting sectors. 

   The Siam Cement Group, Thailand's largest manufacturing 
conglomerate, is setting up a joint-venture cement sales company in 
the suburbs of Ho Chi Minh City.  In the future, Siam Cement is 
planning construction of a cement plant with an annual capacity of 
30,000 tons, and is also studying local production of ceramic 
products and tiles. 

   The Sahawiriya Group, a leading Thai office automation and 
information equipment company, is in the process of opening a 
"software development center" in Hanoi through the group's software 
subsidiary.  Its goal is to develop "international-use software," 
such as English-language products, for export to Europe and the 
United States.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 5 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Malaysian Company To Develop Da Nang Export Processing Zone - The 
firm Malaysia South-South Cooperation (MASSCORP) will develop the Da 
Nang Export Processing Zone (EPZ) in cooperation with the city's 
development corporation.  MASSCORP is a company organized through 
the good offices of Prime Minister Mahathir by Malaysian companies 
desiring to promote joint projects with developing countries. 
Agreement regarding the Da Nang EPZ was reached during Mahathir's 
visit to Vietnam in April 1992. 

   The 300-hectare (740-acre) EPZ, to be developed at a cost of $150 
million, will be used by "the many" Malaysian companies eager to set 
up operations in Vietnam to take advantage of low wages and exploit 
Da Nang's proximity to China and Hong Kong.  Japanese trading 
companies "are also interested" in the zone.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 14 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Singapore Firm To Build Housing Complex in Ho Chi Minh City - DSB 
Land, a large Singapore real estate development company, has 
received permission to build Ho Chi Minh City's first joint-venture 
luxury apartment complex for foreigners.  The State Committee for 
Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) has already approved the $7.2 
million project. 

   A DSB subsidiary, Mekong Holdings, will contribute 75 percent of 
the capital, while the Vietnamese firm, Mikiko Construction, will 
invest 25 percent.  Construction of the project's first phase will 
begin by yearend, and the entire project will be completed in two 
years, including the swimming pool, tennis courts, and other 
facilities.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Top Foreign Investor Countries Listed 

   As of 25 December 1993, 41 countries have invested in Vietnam. 

BOT 

Country                            Investment 
                                   (in million $) 

Taiwan                             1,529 
Hong Kong                          1,273 
France                             638 
Australia                          544 
ROK                                527 
Japan                              475 
Malaysia                           434 
Singapore                          381 
Great Britain                      308 
Holland                            283 


   The actual amount of capital invested in Vietnam is as follows: 

Year                               Investment 
                                   (in million $) 

1988-1989                          160 
1990                               200 
1991                               260 
1992                               463 
1993                               1,001 

   Foreign investment (in percent) went to the following sectors: 

Sector                   1991      1992      1993 

Industries               27        40        38 
Oil, Gas                 22        27        18 
Tourism, Services        26        21        26 
Agriculture, Forestry    15        4         8 
Others                   10        8         10 

EOT 

   (Hanoi TUAN BAO QUOC TE 6-12 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Foreign Investment in 1993 in Hanoi Reported - In 1993, 44 
projects were licensed in Hanoi, accounting for 39.2 percent of the 
investment projects in the last five years while investment capital 
amounted to $678 million, accounting for 59.6 percent the total for 
the last five years.  To date, 112 investment projects in Hanoi, 
capitalized at $1.137 billion have been licensed. 

   Foreign investment in Hanoi is mainly concentrated in industrial 
production (39 percent) and hotels and services (35 percent). 
Average investment capital increased from $6.75 million in 1989 to 
$15.4 million in 1993.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 23-29 Dec 93 
p 13) 

   Thai Firms To Build Video Conference System, Industrial Park - 
The Loxley Public Company is scheduled to sign a $32-million 
contract with the Ho Chi Minh City Post and Telecommunications 
Service to develop Vietnam's video conference system.  The three- 
phase project will link Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City, and expand 
service to other Vietnamese cities as well as to overseas markets. 
The project is expected to become operational in mid-1994.  (Bangkok 
Voice of Free Asia 1030 GMT 3 Feb 94) 

   The Bang Pakong Industrial Park Company plans to build a $400- 
million industrial park in Vietnam.  Two Thai companies have already 
expressed interest in establishing a glass factory and a pickup 
truck assembly plant at the industrial park.  (Bangkok NAEO NA 10 
Feb 94 p 5) Bangkok Bureau 

   Japan, Taiwan To Provide Equipment for Cement Plant - The 
Haiphong Cement Corporation has signed a $90.2-million contract with 
three Japanese and Taiwanese companies to obtain 25,000 tons of 
equipment.  When the equipment is completely installed in 1997, the 
corporation will have an annual production capacity of 1.4 million 
tons of cement.  (Hanoi Television Network 1215 GMT 5 Feb 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Telecommunications Agreement Signed With Canada - The Asia 
regional managing director of Canada's Nordon Telecom Company has 
recently signed an agreement with the director general of the 
Vietnam Post and Telegraph General Corporation to supply Vietnam 
with a digital modulation system codenamed DMS-100.  Nordon Telecom, 
with financial support from Japan's Mitsui Co., will assemble the 
$6.1-million system in Haiphong City.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 0500 
GMT 11 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Joint Venture With Japan To Produce Paper - The $2.968-million 
Viet Nhat (Vietnam-Japan) paper factory in Da Nang has been 
officially commissioned.  Its production capacity will be 50,000 
tons of paper for this year, and 100,000 tons annually thereafter. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 2300 GMT 2 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 
EAG/24FEBRUARY1994/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/jf 24/2153Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24679 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-007--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Europe     Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 07, 24 
February 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most 
recent sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Lat in America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. The EER is published in two 
editions, one for Western Europe (also including media coverage of 
Canada and Turkey), and the other for Eastern Europe.  Drawing 
primarily from domestic media sources of these countries but also 
using other foreign media where appropriate, the EER focuses on 
national and regional economic issues, such as economic 
competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic reforms and 
other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade and 
investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   INTRODUCTION 

   EU 

   EU 'Employment Subsidies' Compared 

   DENMARK 

   Proposed Law To Ease Impact of Mass Layoffs; Labor Leader Urges 
Making Sabbatical Leave Law Permanent 

   FINLAND 

   Ministry Warns of High Unemployment to Year 2000; Government 
Presents Job Stimulus Program; Labor Ministry Runs Small Business 
Start-Up Fund 

   FRANCE 

   Debate on Lowering Minimum Wage; Government To Lift State Company 
Layoff Freeze; Government Initiates 'Time Savings Accounts'; 
Balladur Takes 'Sharp Turn' on Policy; Balladur 'Softens' VAT, 
Hiring Linkage; Balladur Criticized as 'Interventionist'; CNPF 
'Hostile' to Balladur Proposal on VAT; CNPF Strategy for 
Unemployment Detailed; Balladur May Stimulate Service Industry 
Hiring; Response to Balladur's Push To Increase Service Jobs; PS 
Announces Program for Unemployment; Unions, CNPF Agree on Long-Term 
Short Working Hours; Courts Take Hard Line Against Employers; 
Commentary Declares Breakdown in Labor Laws; Companies Offer More 
Benefits Than Necessary; Unemployment Projected at 14 Percent by 
2000 

   GERMANY 

   Report Says Consolidation Key to Growth, Jobs;Government Issues 
Program for Reducing Unemployment; Opposition Social Democrats 
Criticize Program;Labor Leaders, Employment Boards Also Critical; 
Lack of Funds To Stimulate Economy Seen as 'Good'; Employment Office 
Urges More Flexibility; Blum Also Urges New Work Methods; Commentary 
Hits Apprentices Who Take 'Buy Outs' 

   ITALY 

   Poor State of Public Finances Limits Jobs Programs; Government 
'Withdrawal' Increases Unemployment in South; Leftist Proposes 
Measures To Curb Unemployment 

   SPAIN 

   Labor Unions React Differently to Strike Turnout; Youth 
Unemployment Pegged at Almost 50 Percent; Government Completes Labor 
Reform Legislation; Labor Reform Underscores Trade Union Defeat; 
'Experts' Say Labor Bill Benefits Business Most 

   SWEDEN 

   Liberals: Deficit, Small Business, Research Key to Jobs; 
Government To Encourage Household Service Jobs; Social Democrats 
Call For More Investment; Study Warns of Permanently High 
Unemployment 

   INTRODUCTION 

   West Europe:  Status of Unemployment, Labor Reform 

   This special issue of the Europe Economic Review concentrates 
entirely on West European press articles and commentaries which deal 
with the related subjects of unemployment and labor reform.  In a 
region currently enduring a severe recession, the problem of growing 
unemployment and official responses to it have received prominent 
coverage in the press.  Some of this reporting has focused on the 
debate about how much of the region's joblessness is due to cyclical 
causes--that is, related to the current recession--and how much to 
structural causes, such as the high cost of West European labor.  In 
addition, press reporting makes it clear that traditional West 
European ideas of social welfare obligations have been brought into 
question by the,need to lower unemployment rates. 

   Monitored West European media has reported a variety of 
government efforts to reduce unemployment.  Germany, while 
consciously rejecting expansionary fiscal and monetary policies, is 
trying to improve the supply side of the economy through tightened 
government budgets, lower taxes, fewer regulations, and subsidizing 
lower labor costs.  The German press has reported the government's 
30-point program to implement such policies and to encourage 
privatization.  The press has also reported strong criticism of 
these initiatives from the opposition Social Democratic Party, whose 
economic spokesman, Uwe Jens, called the government's plan a "purely 
diversionary tactic."  Some press commentary has emphasized the need 
to fundamentally change public and government attitudes toward work 
and productivity. 

   In France, government efforts revolve around extending 
unemployment benefits, arranging for early retirements, shorter work 
hours, shifting workers from full-time to part-time work, and 
increasing low-level service jobs.  Some French commentary has 
pointed out that more fundamental labor reform, such as sharply 
reducing employer labor costs or strongly stimulating economic 
growth, is needed. 

   The Italian press reported that the government, distracted by its 
political and constitutional crisis, is hampered in pursuing labor 
reform by its poor financial condition.  It has therefore 
concentrated on extending unemployment benefits and establishing 
work share programs.  In Spain, the press focused on reactions to 
the 27 January labor union strike, which was viewed as a bellwether 
for gauging the extent of popular opposition to labor reform. 
Denmark and Finland's media have reported a plethora of initiatives 
to regulate layoffs and to increase service jobs, public works 
funding, and subsidies for investment and research, while Sweden's 
center-right government is following policies similar to those in 
Germany. 

   EU 

   EU 'EMPLOYMENT SUBSIDIES' COMPARED--According to an article in 
the Paris financial daily LES ECHOS, since the 1970's France has 
been the largest exploiter of direct subsidies to employment in the 
European  Community.  Labor Minister Michel Giraud has recently 
published a study which claims the recourse to different forms of 
direct financial aid to maintain and to create jobs constitutes one 
of France's main instruments of employment policy and notes that 
most countries follow such a policy.  Below is the study's summary 
of subsidy policies in: 

   * France--Subsidies have traditionally concentrated on the young. 
Subsidies for the long-term unemployed, however, became an equal 
priority after the second half of the 1980's.  During recessions, 
the French Government has used subsidies for hiring, such as 
reducing employer social security costs.  Such subsidies helped 
create more than 550,000 jobs in the retail sector in 1990. 

   * Germany--The number and types of subsidy policies used by the 
German Government are relatively limited.  More situational and less 
targeted, they have reduced wage costs significantly, up to 80 
percent in some cases, according to the article.  Special programs 
have been established for economically depressed regions or for the 
long-term unemployed.  Under Chancellor Helmut Kohl's 
administration, subsidies have increased but jobs created have not 
surpassed 150,000. 

   * United Kingdom--Subsidies have been targeted to solve 
structural problems in the labor market.  After 1980, such subsidies 
were directed toward disconnecting youth from adult wage structures 
to stimulate youth employment.  Other subsidies provide direct aid 
to the unemployed to encourage acceptance of lower salaries. 
Apprenticeship is encouraged under these programs, with some 400,000 
workers taking advantage of them each year.  (DiI) (Paris LES ECHOS 
in French 3 Feb 94 p 2) 

   DENMARK 

   PROPOSED LAW TO EASE IMPACT OF MASS LAYOFFS--Resolving an issue 
which has divided the Social Democratic-centrist coalition since it 
came to power a year ago, the Danish Government has introduced a 
bill to ease the economic and social impact of mass layoffs. 
According to the proposal, employers planning to dismiss more than 
12 percent of their work force will first have to hold talks with 
their employees for 21 days.  Only then will the company be 
permitted to issue layoff notices, which cannot take effect for an 
additional eight weeks.  Current legislation does not stipulate 
negotiations and provides for only 30-days' notice.  If the employer 
is found guilty of violating provisions of the new legislation, 
workers will be entitled to compensation equalling eight weeks of 
pay, twice the amount under present law. 

   Labor Minister Jytte Andersen said the purpose of the proposed 
law will be to help localities better adjust to sudden jumps in 
unemployment: "The goal of the bill is to allow the surrounding 
community, for example the training institutions, to have more time 
to adapt to the situation.  One should have a chance to get training 
ready.  And the workers will have a better possibility of 
adjusting." 

   The bill also brings Danish law into line with a recent EU 
directive by, for example, prohibiting employers from attempting to 
divide worker opposition to firings by bargaining in advance with 
only part of the work force.  Also, following an EU directive, 
workers laid off because of company bankruptcy will be entitled to 
compensation from the Workmen's Guarantee Fund for a longer period 
than heretofore.  (RB)  (Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE in Danish 26 
Jan 94 p 1, II 1) 

   LABOR LEADER URGES MAKING SABBATICAL LEAVE LAW PERMANENT--Hans 
Jensen, the deputy chairman of Denmark's umbrella labor union 
confederation, has joined the ranks of those proposing that the 
recently passed leave law, scheduled to expire in 1996, be made 
permanent, according to an article in BERLINGSKE TIDENDE.  This 
legislation, part of the Social Democratic-led coalition's program 
to combat stubbornly high unemployment, provides for leave of up to 
one year for such things as participating in full-time training or 
taking care of an infant.  Even those who have never been employed 
and are thus not "insured" under the unemployment compensation 
scheme, are entitled to such leave.  Jensen also suggested that the 
extension of the program could be funded from worker and employer 
contributions.  The program as it is now, is paid for by the 
government, which has already begun to pay participant stipends. 
Workers are enthusiastic about the the proposal, according to the 
article, and are willing to have the additional cost deducted from 
their paychecks up to l or 2 percent, but would be unwilling to cut 
their wages further. 

   National Economy Minister Marianne Jelved did not respond 
directly to Jensen's funding idea but welcomed discussion on future 
financing, while warning that no one should look to government 
funding for this purpose.  Reaction from the Danish Employers' 
Association was cool.  Jensen's pledge to find a payment scheme 
which would "preserve the competitiveness" of Danish business was 
greeted skeptically by association Deputy Director Henning Gade: "If 
one is in an evil frame of mind, it might be said that (some) people 
would get rich by taking a leave every fifth year, for example."  He 
refused to comment further on the prospect of labor and employers' 
organizations reaching an agreement on contribution levels.  (RB) 
(Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE in Danish 20 Jan 94 p l, II; 20, 23 
Jan 94 p 1, II 12) 

   FINLAND 

   MINISTRY WARNS OF HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT TO YEAR 2000--According to a 
Finnish News Service report appearing in the Helsinki daily 
HELSINGIN SANOMAT on 1 February, the Labor Ministry has warned that 
there is no end in sight for Finland's high unemployment.  At last 
report, unemployment in Finland stood at just under 22 percent, or 
over half a million persons.  The ministry report predicted that 
economic growth, accompanied by an upturn in consumer spending and 
additional public sector budget cuts, would cut this number by 
150,000 in 1997, leaving a still record high jobless rate of 16-17 
percent.  Especially intractable in the ministry's view are the 
problems of youth unemployment and long-term (over one year) 
joblessness.  The report urges the government to implement new job- 
stimulation measures and to appropriate additional funds for job 
training and other programs. 

   One reason for the expected stubbornly slow drop in unemployment 
is suggested in a separate Statistics Office report describing a 
spurt in overtime work.  As summarized by HELSINGIN SANOMAT business 
section reporter Esko Nurmi on 26 January, the study showed that 
overtime hours had increased by over 30 percent from October- 
November 1992 to the same period in 1993.  As in many countries at 
the incipient stage of recovery, Finnish employers were finding it 
less costly to increase working hours than hire new (or rehire 
former) workers.  This was discovered to be especially true in the 
booming export sectors--mining/metals and forestry.  (RB)  (Helsinki 
HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 26 Jan 94 p B1; 1 Feb 94 p B1) 

   GOVERNMENT PRESENTS JOB STIMULUS PROGRAM--Stung by charges of 
insensitivity regarding what the press increasingly terms "mass 
unemployment," Prime Minister Esko Aho's government announced new 
measures to reduce the jobless rate, while claiming recent job 
growth figures in the "normal labor market" vindicated its cautious 
policy on intervention.  As reported by Patricia Winckelmann- 
Zillacus in the Helsinki HUFVUDSTADBLADET on 28 January, Labor 
Minister Ilkka Kanerva outlined two new programs which, combined 
with those already in place, aim to put 300,000 persons back to 
work.  The first proposal involves 4-5 billion markkas in new 
spending on public projects in 1994.  A second program, to be 
launched in the fall, would target youth unemployment. 

   According to a Finnish News Service report in the same paper on 5 
February, Kanerva and Aho made public additional details of the 
first program.  The government is asking Parliament for 1.7 billion 
markkas in a supplemental budget for job creation, which will be 
added to the 1.2 billion markkas approved earlier but not yet spent. 
Most of the total is planned for infrastructure investments. 
Highway and railroad construction would receive the bulk of these 
funds, with some funds for improving sea channels.  Other projects 
include energy subsidies, building renovation, scientific research 
and help for cities, many of which have been hard hit by industry 
layoffs and shut-downs.  To help alleviate the combined effects of 
higher social security costs and reduced taxes, the government wants 
to provide 20 million markkas for welfare and health services.  Aho 
expressed hope that the new round of government spending would also 
stimulate private investment, pointing out that the recent 
legislation provides a 7 percent rebate for "productive investments" 
and that investment in construction will be exempted from value- 
added taxes this year.  (RB)  (Helsinki HUFVUDSTADBLADET in Swedish 
28 Jan 94 p 7; 5 Feb 94 p 5) 

   LABOR MINISTRY RUNS SMALL BUSINESS START-UP FUND--One job- 
creation program begun long before the current recession is the 
small business start-up fund administered by the Labor Ministry.  In 
a report by Aila Kayhty and Jussi Otalahti in HELSINGIN SANOMAT, 
this program is credited with having helped establish some 11,500 
small businesses in 1993.  This represents a 100-percent increase 
over the previous year, and a 500-percent increase over the figure 
for 1990, the year before the start of Finland's recession.  The 
authors describe how the centers of many villages and small towns- 
-where rents are substantially cheaper than in cities--have been 
transformed over the past few years by appearance of of these new 
businesses. 

   A ministry official indicated that the number of business start- 
ups assisted by this program has probably peaked and may decline in 
1994. This is because the government plans a more rigorous study of 
applications before granting funds in an effort to ensure that 
proposals are viable.  A still-unpublished ministry report has 
found, for instance, that the "life expectancy" of firms financed by 
the program has dropped from an average of five years in the 1980's 
to around half that time since the beginning of this decade.  (RB) 
(Helsinki HELSINGIN SANOMAT in Finnish 3 Feb 94 p 16) 

   FRANCE 

   DEBATE ON LOWERING MINIMUM WAGE--Editor-in-chief of the Paris 
financial biweekly publication L'EXPANSION, Gerard Moatti, states 
that public debate on labor costs in France is only beginning, 
marking the end of a period of "hypocrisy" during which both past 
Socialist administrations and their conservative opposition ignored 
the impact of such costs on employment.  Moatti argues the 
government has not gone far enough in lowering labor costs for 
employers.  He also concludes that lower labor costs are not enough 
and that economic growth is a key requirement to produce more jobs. 
However, since Prime Minister Edouard Balladur has stated that he 
will not further change economic policy to stimulate such growth for 
now, Moatti contends that the creation of jobs in the short term 
revolves around lowering labor costs.  He believes there are two 
theoretically viable measures which can lower them: lower the 
minimum wage for youth or reduce the employer's social benefit 
costs.  Below is Moatti's view of the debate for and against each of 
these solutions: 

   1. Lower the Minimum Wage for Youth 

   * The current minimum wage in France, the SMIG, is too high. 
When employer charges for social security benefits are added, the 
SMIC reaches Fr8,000 a month. 

   * The exceptions to the SMIC have multiplied.  One can now 
legally pay below the minimum wage those who are 16 to 18 years old 
or those who hold training or apprenticeship contracts.  The new 
"professional hiring contract" created by the five-year employment 
law allows hiring a youth at 80 percent of the SMIC without having 
to offer training or between 30 to 65 percent with company training. 
Even with these exceptions, unemployment among the 16-25 year olds 
was greater (693,000) in 1992 than for those who held subsidized 
jobs (6ll,000). 

   * An indexed "youth SMIC" would reduce youth labor costs 20 
percent.  Both the Matteoli Commission study on "Structural 
Obstacles to Employment" and studies ordered by the Senate from 
INSEE and the Bureau of Information and Economic Forecasting (BIPE) 
recommended an indexed lowering of youth labor costs, by which the 
youngest workers would receive the lowest wage and those closer to 
25 years old a wage closer to the regular SMIC.  INSEE and BIPE 
concluded that an indexed youth SMIC would cost the government Fr5 
billion per year in lost income revenue compared to Fr50 billion in 
revenues which would be lost by reducing employer social security 
contributions.  However, youth would bear the burden of such a 
solution by losing income. 

   * A "substantial" and general lowering of the SMIC is impossible. 
According to Moatti, SMIC levels must be compared to other benefits, 
such as unemployment, minimum hiring revenue (RMI), and other 
housing and social benefits.  If SMIC levels are below the level of 
other benefits, then the incentive to work weakens.  For the Youth 
SMIC, however, this is not the case since it applies to those 16 to 
25, while such benefits as the RMI apply to those over the age of 
26. 

   2. Reduce Labor Costs on Low-Wage Workers 

   * Reducing employer social security costs does not affect the 
workers' income.  However, this solution costs the government Fr50 
billion in lost revenues. 

   *  Reducing employer social security charges for lower income 
workers would be particularly expensive for France.  Moatti, who 
claims such a reduction would not be significant below a level of 1 
percent of GDP, cites former INSEE Director General Edmond Malinvaud 
as advocating in a recently published paper that European countries 
should establish a sliding scale for exempting employer social 
security charges for those earning between one and two times the 
SMIC.  However, such an exemption would be particularly expensive 
for France where the majority of salaries are clustered at the lower 
end of the scale.  The French Observatory of Economic Conditions 
(OFCE) has calculated that the Malinvaud solution would cost 2.7 
percent of GDP or around Fr190 billion.  The increase in jobs would 
in theory reach around 400,000 after some years.  In fact, probably 
much less. 

   * The question of who pays for the shortfall in social security 
revenues is key to the debate.  Suggestions for how they can be 
shared include: 

   --Increase VAT taxes.  Moatti points out, however,  that is 
regulated by single market regulations. 
   --Increase company taxes.  This would "would be taking with one 
hand while giving with the other." 
   --Increase social security deductions from medium- and high- 
income earners. The OFCE study concludes this would be the most 
efficient way to promote employment of the unskilled because of the 
"substitution effect" which would replace skilled worker with 
unskilled.  However, this would penalize those most skilled in the 
work force who are already the targets of direct taxation. 
   --Increase income taxes.  Again burdening the already burdened 
and dampening economic recovery. 
   --Establish a pollution tax.  Proposed by the EU Commission, but 
energy taxes are already very high in France. 
   --Increase the General Social Tax (CSG).  This has the same 
effect as increasing income taxes. 
   --Lower corresponding social spending, such as on health.  Moatti 
suggests that France may one day be presented with the choice of 
health care or employment. 

   Included in the commentary is a chart detailing the results of a 
study by four economists at INSEE and the Bureau of Information and 
Economic Forecasting (BIPE) comparing the results of the two 
solutions to unemployment in France envisioned by Moatti.  The model 
worked out by INSEE and BIPE calculates that the responsiveness 
(elasticity) of hiring to labor cost reductions is probably less 
than 0.5 percent (employment increases less than 0.5 percent when 
labor costs decline by l percent).  The effect is not immediate but 
will have a three- to five-year delay, at which time the gain is 
greater for lower-skilled jobs and decreases markedly for higher- 
skilled jobs. 


   Supplemental Jobs Gained through ... 
(in thousands of people assuming current trends) 

--               ... Youth SMIC        ... Lower Employer Costs 
--                    1997       2000          1997        2000 

Total Employment        33        105            88        212 

Youth Employment       136        145           274        289 

(DiI)  (Paris L'EXPANSION in French 3/16 Feb 94 p 47) 



   GOVERNMENT TO END STATE COMPANY LAYOFF FREEZE--David Ausseil, 
writing in LIBERATION, reports that the government has devised a 
plan to soften the consequences of the 13,300 layoffs announced on 
15 September 1993 by state-owned companies, which were then 
prohibited from proceeding for six months by Prime Minister Edouard 
Balladur.  The plan, to be implemented in lieu of the layoffs, calls 
for more than 3,200 progressive early retirements, 4,900 retirements 
funded by the Special Allocation of National Funds for Employment 
(ASFNE), 1,000 employees put on Indemnified Long Term Reduced Work 
Hours (TRILD), and 4,000 workers put on part-time hours. 

   The plan's cost has not yet been determined.  According to 
Ausseil, the government may be prepared to spend between Fr2.5-3.0 
billion, or nearly a third of the annual funding allocated for state 
companies from the National Fund for Employment.  Furthermore, the 
plan's application could presage a change in the rules of the game 
for failing companies, Ausseil claims.  If so, company managers will 
have in the future a very complete set of measures at their disposal 
to optimize the management of their labor force and their labor 
costs.  However, the employees of these companies remain fearful of 
these formulas which tend to reduce their pay, their working hours, 
and consequently weaken their position, according to information 
from labor union sources cited by Ausseil.  He concludes that such 
doubts do not augur well for the reception this plan will have by 
employees.  (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION 17 Feb 94 p 9) 

   GOVERNMENT INITIATES 'TIME SAVINGS ACCOUNTS'--The Council of 
Ministers is examining a bill by Labor Minister Michel Giraud on 
employee stock purchases and profit sharing. Included in the bill is 
a new initiative, which, according to Marielle Court writing in LE 
FIGARO, is "incontestably the great innovation of the bill."  Giraud 
explains the provision: "Instead of distributing the gains of 
productivity under forms of bonuses--whether they result from profit 
sharing or salary contracts--those gains could be offered to the 
worker in a form of paid time off."  This "time savings account" 
could then also be augmented by deferred regular vacation time.  The 
law declares that it should be a minimum duration of six months "in 
order to have an effect on employment." (DiI) 

   BALLADUR TAKES 'SHARP TURN' ON POLICY--Prime Minister Edouard 
Balladur's decision to link accelerated VAT reimbursements to 
medium- and large-sized businesses to the creation of jobs is a 
"sharp turn" in the economic policy of the current French 
Government, which has long advocated limiting government regulatory 
control over labor, according to the chief economic editor of 
LIBERATION, Laurent Mauduit.  This reversal may be a reaction to 
President Francois Mitterrand's 5 January criticism that companies 
have done little with the Fr80 billion in government support they 
received in 1993 to create jobs.  The government, however, claims 
the idea to link VAT reimbursements to how many jobs a company 
creates is not new but an extension of last year's decision to do 
away with the one-month waiting period required of the companies 
before they could receive their VAT refunds.  The decision carried a 
considerable price for the government of nearly Fr95 billion. 
Consequently, the government intends to implement the plan in a 
progressive manner, first reimbursing small companies, then medium 
and large companies.  In total, the government will pay by the end 
of the year nearly Fr45 billion in all.  Additionally, the 
government had intended to pay the remaining amount to be reimbursed 
over 20 years, according to Mauduit.  Now, however, the government 
wants to step up the pace. 

   Balladur proposes to disburse these sums faster than expected but 
under the condition that they have a concrete effect on employment. 
The government expects one of two conditions to be met: either the 
commitment of the companies to increase its work force or the 
promise to make use of some of the job programs established in the 
five-year law on employment.  Mauduit, who questions how this form 
of reimbursement will be policed, notes that companies will have to 
comply if they want the state to write them a check.  Furthermore, 
Balladur has killed two birds with one stone since he has countered 
Mitterrand's criticisms and has partially disarmed labor union 
complaints. (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 13 Jan 94 p 13) 

   BALLADUR 'SOFTENS' VAT, HIRING LINKAGE--Prime Minister Balladur 
appears to have backed off his proposal to link company VAT refunds 
to their success at creating jobs, a proposal which placed Balladur 
at odds with the National Federation of French Employers (CNPF). 
Contrary to what he had previously announced, Balladur confirmed in 
an interview for the newspaper L'ALSACE on 21 January that it did 
not seem possible to him to establish "a mechanical link" between 
"state aid" to companies and the hiring realized by them.  He said, 
"This would be an immense source of administrative complexity." 
However, this was exactly what his proposal had envisaged and the 
final implementation may only have been softened.  Instead of 
demanding that companies create jobs to obtain their VAT 
reimbursements, the government could more "modestly" ask them to 
take advantage of certain subsidized hiring programs, which would be 
less constraining for the companies. (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in 
French 21 Jan 94 p 13) 

   BALLADUR CRITICIZED AS 'INTERVENTIONIST'--While it was known that 
Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's government was less a free market 
advocate than it claimed, the announcement that the repayment of VAT 
taxes would be linked to the number of jobs companies would create 
reveals that Balladur's government is one of the most 
"interventionist" in the last decade, writes economic journalist 
Philippe Maniere in LE POINT.  It is "absurd" to count the number of 
jobs created during any single period, he contends, for expanding 
companies need to hire and failing firms must lay off workers to 
survive, regardless of VAT refunds.  While a company is obviously 
better off with a VAT reimbursement, the difficulty of correctly 
accounting for jobs is Balladur's first error, Maniere contends.  In 
addition, he continues, Balladur's demand that companies use the 
funds as he would like betrays his professed free market ideals. 

   Maniere additionally contends that French firms currently receive 
"too much" from the state.  While the "expensive and useless" 
subsidies assigned to, for example, "innovation" and investing in 
mountainous and underdeveloped regions would be immediately 
abolished by a true free market advocate, the Balladur government 
instead is increasing them, Maniere concludes.  (RM)  (Paris LE 
POINT in French 22 Jan 94 p 57) 

   CNPF 'HOSTILE' TO BALLADUR PROPOSAL ON VAT--The president of the 
National Federation of French Employers (CNPF) indicated yesterday 
that he "did not appreciate" the announcement made Il January by 
Prime Minister Edouard Balladur linking reimbursement for Value- 
Added Tax (VAT) for large companies to job creation, where each hire 
would give the company a VAT credit.  Balladur's message, which 
announced the "beginning of a study" of strategies to link VAT 
reimbursement to "creation of employment," is clear, according to an 
article in LES ECHOS.  The government wants to transform the 
automatic reimbursements of some Fr50 billion that they owe to 
companies into a "bonus" for hiring.  According to an article in LES 
ECHOS, this decision shows the government's disarray in dealing with 
mounting unemployment. 

   While labor unions have expressed their satisfaction with 
Balladur's strategy, the CNPF has been "squarely hostile."  "The 
reimbursements of the VAT to companies is not a gift but an 
obligation," protested CNPF head Francois Perigot.  He added that 
there is "no relationship between the companies' treasuries and 
their hiring.  Everyone knows that hiring comes from growth.  The 
plan is contrary to the goal of hiring since it will favor those 
companies who are hiring and are in good shape and penalizes those 
which have problems."  PSA Peugeot-Citroen pointed out that "in an 
industry such as the automotive industry, where one perfectly well 
knows that survival unfortunately depends on reducing the work 
force, linking VAT reimbursement to creating employment would be 
criminally against the spirit (of survival)." (DiI)  (Paris LES 
ECHOS in French 13 Jan 94 p 4) 

   CNPF STRATEGY FOR UNEMPLOYMENT DETAILED--In an article in 
LIBERATION, CNPF Vice President Jean Domange outlines his 
organization's priorities to save France's system of social 
protection.  Remarking that it is "amazing" that France is the only 
country in the world where politicians think companies can create 
jobs during a recession, Domange refutes the prevailing notion that 
companies should be required to hire to receive their VAT refunds. 
He points out that during a recession, these refunds are used to 
shore up a company's finances rather than to expand production and 
create jobs.  Domange argues that the problem is the cost of labor, 
which has become a brake on hiring.  He adds that the CNPF is 
"correct" in wanting to lower this cost and notes that the CNPF has 
long wanted the social protection system in France changed in three 
fundamental ways: 

   * Lower costs for social benefits. 
   * Shift responsibility for some of these costs from the employer 
to the government. 
   * Alleviate social security costs in the "commercial productive 
sector" which bears a disproportionate burden that affects hiring. 

   Despite the organization's desire to reduce labor costs, Domange 
acknowledged that the CNPF recently accepted higher employer 
contributions for social benefits.  He explained that the CNPF did 
so not only "out of a sense of duty" but because it was caught in a 
political system based on negotiation and burden sharing which 
repeatedly required compromise. (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 
24 Jan 94 p 14 

   BALLADUR MAY STIMULATE SERVICE INDUSTRY HIRING--Prime Minister 
Edouard Balladur announced in an interview in an 11 January 
broadcast of TF1 that the government may take new "stimulative 
measures" to create employment in service industries, such as 
banking, gasoline distribution, and food market companies.  Balladur 
is focusing all his attention on the services not exposed to 
international competition, which employ some 300,000 to 400,000 
persons.  According to unnamed members of Balladur's staff, these 
stimulative measures will include, for example, mandating a set 
number of supermarket parking lot attendants, bank security 
officers, or pump attendants at gas stations.  To avoid distorting 
competition, the regulations would cover all the businesses in an 
industry.  (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 13 Jan 94 p 
2) 

   RESPONSE TO BALLADUR'S PUSH TO INCREASE SERVICE JOBS--To say that 
there exists a "well" of service jobs to be tapped through 
government regulation and incentives is "risky," according to 
Perrine Chercheve writing in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES.  Chercheve points 
out that when former Labor Minister Martine Aubry tried tax 
incentives in January 1992 to stimulate employment of household 
workers (reducing taxes up to 50 percent for wages up to Fr25,0O0 
per year), only 30,000 net new jobs were created in one year. 
Chercheve questions whether the government's program to increase 
service industry employment is enough to persuade the private 
sector.  Some companies appear ready to try.  The oil company Total, 
for example, just recruited 200 young people under the aegis of one 
of the government's "qualification contracts" to train as mechanics 
and heating technicians.  Commenting on the ability to create jobs 
in services, Independent Parisian Transportation Board (RATP) head 
Francis Lorentz states that a demand exists for additional travel 
services.  "But not at current costs," he explained.  He proposes 
that labor costs for minimum wage earners--SMIC employees--be 
reduced to lessen the cost of unskilled labor. (DiI)  (Paris LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 7 Jan 94 p 4) 

   PS ANNOUNCES PROGRAM FOR UNEMPLOYMENT--To create 2.5 million jobs 
from now until 2000, the opposition Socialist Party (PS) will 
propose establishing a 36 or 37 hour work week, according to an 
article by Jean-Michel Themand in LIBERATION.  The PS program, 
introduced in a report to the National Convention on Employment 
which will be held the end of February, is largely the work of 
former Industry Minister Dominique Strauss-Kahn, now president of 
the PS's expert group, and Dominique Taddei, vice president of the 
PS's economic commission.  Their report, which did not specify 
whether the proposed 36-37 hour work week included a salary 
reduction, is intended to end the internal PS debate over a 32-hour 
work week.  However, the proposal will still be criticized within PS 
ranks.  Henri Emmanuelli has already warned that he would not find 
the proposal "political" enough, and the left wing of the PS remains 
in favor of a 35-hour work week without reduction of salary. 
Strauss-Kahn and Taddei believe their plan will attain more than a 
third of the PS's job creation goals if the PS can avoid being 
"hemmed in by a statistical debate" over workers' salaries. 

   The report also suggests that to attain the economic growth 
needed to increase employment sufficiently, the international 
monetary system must be "stabilized."  The report proposes that 
currency speculation be penalized in order to regulate capital 
movements.  Furthermore, the EU must be provided with a "real 
foreign trade policy using legal means and instruments" such as the 
United States has.  The report also favors a "public program of 
investment at a European level" more ambitious than the program 
agreed to at the last EU summit.  It suggests organizing "a 
coordinated reduction in short-term interest rates," presumably to 
stimulate growth throughout the EU but also to more quickly advance 
toward monetary union. 

   Domestically, the program proposes establishing "a stable 
partnership" with industry entailing "minority--but significant- 
-public ownership rather than Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's 
privatization plan which finances current expenses while selling 
national assets at a discount." (DiI)  (Paris LIBERATION in French 
18 Jan 94 p 9) 

   UNIONS, CNPF AGREE ON LONG-TERM SHORT WORKING HOURS--Beatrice 
Taupin reports in LE FIGARO that three labor unions will sign an 
agreement with the French Employers Confederation (CNPF) to finance 
increases in the Indemnified Long-Term Reduced Work Hours (TRILD) 
program through UNEDIC, the unemployment insurance system.  The 
three labor unions are the CFDT, CFTC, and the CGC.  The Workers 
Force (FO) has not yet decided and the General Workers Confederation 
(CGT) has refused to sign, claiming it is an "agreement of 
complacency" and "totally inadequate to fight unemployment." 

   The agreement will extend the financial support to workers put on 
"short working hours" by paying for an additional 500 hours, or a 
total of 1,200 hours of labor during an 18-month period.  The 
current program, which UNEDIC does not participate in financing, 
pays workers 50 percent of their salary up to 700 hours with a 
minimum of Fr29 francs an hour, Fr22 of which  are paid for by the 
government.  The agreement, worked out to show good faith in meeting 
target figures "imposed" by the government's five-year employment 
law, is intended to avoid layoffs.  For the supplemental hours, 
UNEDIC will pay Fr10 per hour and guarantee workers 50 percent of 
their former salary.  Taupin questions where the remaining funding 
for this program will come from, pointing out that either it must 
come from the government or the company. (DiI)  (Paris LE FIGARO Le 
Fig-Eco supplement in French 16 Feb 94 p 4) 

   COURTS TAKE HARD LINE AGAINST EMPLOYERS--Having believed that 
they won the battle in 1986 to free themselves of government 
bureaucratic approval for layoffs, companies are now realizing that 
the courts have progressively taken over this function, according to 
a commentary by Delphine Girard in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES.  An unnamed 
top official in the Labor Ministry recalls that under bureaucratic 
control of company layoffs, 90 percent of such cases received 
approval.  Now, the official points out that judicial approval is 
required and is harder to come by.  Furthermore, the courts examine 
company accounts to find financial justification for layoffs whereas 
the government hesitated to interfere in the management of 
companies. 

   With the increase in unemployment, the idea has developed in 
public opinion and in judicial and political circles that companies 
have a social responsibility.  From the beginning of his 
administration, Prime Minister Balladur has asked employers to use 
layoffs as a last resort, after all other alternatives have been 
exhausted.  Balladur's request has not been heeded, according to 
Girard.  The number of layoffs for "economic reasons" reached a 
record level in 1993 of 600,000. 

   Under the pressure of unemployment, parliament and the courts 
have reinforced controls over company employment plans.  The law of 
29 January 1993, the last of the Socialist government sponsored by 
then Labor Minister Martine Aubry, profoundly changed the rules of 
the game, imposing on the employer the obligation to try to find 
other jobs or "placements" for workers or face having their layoff 
plans prohibited.  The opposition at the time was violently opposed 
to this measure.  In power, Balladur has decided to maintain the 
law. 

   The new regulation states that all companies laying off more than 
10 employees for economic reasons must produce a "social plan" 
detailing company efforts to place workers in other jobs.  Early 
retirement formulas or financial aid to encourage voluntary 
departures cannot be considered as part of these plans.  According 
to Aubry's law, for the social plan to be considered worthy, a 
company must: 

   * Try to place workers elsewhere in or outside the company and 
facilitate hiring by another employer by offering such benefits as 
job search support and stipends for moving. 

   * Take "actions to create new business," either in the company or 
the group, or "support for the creation of a business." 

   * Provide training or retraining for workers. 

   * Reduce or "manage" work hours through part time, early 
retirement, or other forms of management. 

   If these obligations are not met, the departmental Directorate of 
Labor will deny permission for the layoff. 

   The interpretation of the new regulation by judicial authorities 
has revolutionized the management of companies and has nourished the 
fears of employers, according to Girard.  Several court cases have 
added to these fears.  The 24 November 1993 decision by the court of 
appeals in Rheims to deny permission for layoffs at Moet et Chandon 
had "the effect of a bomb."  The court denied permission to the 
champagne producer because it had not taken "concrete" steps to 
place workers within the company or the parent group LVMH, as the 
law demanded.  The court considered the company's external placement 
efforts to be "of little use."  The court also examined the 
financial situation of the group and decided, "The social plan in 
its entirety appears unbalanced. .. considering it is a group whose 
financial health does not seem compromised..."  Additionally, the 
court in Lyons denied permission to the Sabla company to fire 122 
employees because Sabla had an "inadequate social plan."  The 
tribunal concluded that because Sabla belonged to a group 
representing 199,000 employees, it must have job opportunities 
within the company or group. 

   Companies particularly fear that court control of employment 
plans further encourages the examination of company accounts to 
verify the financial reasons for layoffs.  Girard maintains that 
this process has increased in severity.  For example, on 11 May 1993 
the Court of Appeals in Lyon refused to consider as a "real or 
serious" economic reason for layoffs the decision by Thomson-Video- 
Color to close a business in France to move production abroad to 
reduce prices.  Additionally, on 29 December the departmental 
director of labor for Loire-Atlantique forbade the Chantelle company 
to lay off 200 workers after closing a site at Saint-Herblain.  The 
court ruled that the layoffs were not justified by any "urgency" to 
move production elsewhere. (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in 
French 13 Jan 94 p 17) 

   COMMENTARY DECLARES BREAKDOWN IN LABOR LAWS--During the last two 
years, "one can no longer count" how many times companies have 
ignored the nation's labor laws, according to economic 
correspondents Delphine Girard and Perrine Chercheve writing in LA 
TRIBUNE DESFOSSES.  Not only has the Labor Ministry "judged it 
useful" to publicize the legal framework within which companies can 
lower salaries but for the last few months it has tolerated the 
outright breaking, or the circumvention, of labor laws, often with 
the tacit approval of workers who fear losing their jobs.  "Periods 
of economic expansion over the years have allowed workers to improve 
their legal and financial status," explained Jacques Gounon, labor 
law adviser to Labor Minister Michel Giraud.  Gounon states that the 
real question today is whether the recession and growing 
unemployment will allow workers to keep their acquired benefits.  He 
concludes, "For me, the answer is no."  Worker's Force (FO) union 
official Jean-Marie Bousquet claims state authorities do not 
intervene or do little to stop illegal practices because "they know 
that doing so would just force new layoffs."  Examples of subverting 
labor laws are rife and include paying workers "off the books" and 
working employees fulltime while collecting government subsidies for 
part time employees.  Additionally, slow court reviews of labor law 
cases further subverts compliance. 

   State complicity in these illegal practices acknowledges the fact 
that workers who are faced with such labor practices usually accept 
them as "done deals" and remain complacent as long as their jobs are 
secure.  However, if faced with unemployment and nothing to lose, 
they would cause social, according to Dominique Denobili-Barlier, 
labor law specialist in Paris. 

   The excess of labor regulations which have been denounced for 
years by the current government as the main cause of unemployment in 
France has finally been understood and accepted in the ranks of the 
opposition, the authors contend.  Under the pressure of 
unemployment, labor laws are being broken and the process seems 
inescapable.  "Deregulation, I believe is inevitable," confided a 
labor law professor and former government adviser.  "For years, we 
tried to nail down work contracts.  to protect workers.  Result? 
The explosion of underground (black market) labor and the constant 
diversion of the law.  When a country has 20-percent unemployment, 
and not 12 percent as the official statistics say, you can not avoid 
questioning past regulations.  There is not enough work for everyone 
and 3 to 5 million unemployed people are ready to step in and 
replace workers under more precarious conditions with less pay. ... 
Today unemployment has changed the rules of the game." 

   Prime Minister Edouard Balladur's five-year law to fight 
unemployment subscribes to the logic of labor flexibility and 
deregulation.  Giraud expects the law will create 400,000 jobs in 
five years.  However, in the ranks of the governing coalition, the 
law is judged too timid and especially too complex to implement.  On 
a 28 November television interview, former Prime Minster Raymond 
Barre said, "I want a single solution.  A 10-year law on employment, 
with a single article authorizing, with the agreement of the 
companies, total exemptions to legal and conventional regulations 
which govern the functioning of the labor market and the social 
relations within the company."  (DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES 
in French 12 Jan 94 p 19) 

   COMPANIES OFFER MORE BENEFITS THAN NECESSARY--According to an 
investigation into unemployment benefits by the consulting firm 
Right Associates done for the National Agency of Personnel Directors 
and Staff (ANCDP), 80 percent of French companies are offering their 
employees unemployment benefits greater than mandated by regulation 
or law in all categories of personnel and types of unemployment. 
Additionally, 68 percent of the employees questioned think that 
their company's benefit plans will do the same, particularly for 
professional personnel.  Some 46 percent of the respondents believe 
there are no predetermined formulas to calculate these benefits. 
(DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 4 Feb 94 p 5) 

   UNEMPLOYMENT PROJECTED AT 14 PERCENT BY 2000--According to 
reports from the Center for Forecasting and International 
Information (CEPII), France has little chance of attaining a 5- 
percent unemployment rate by the year 2000 and may well suffer 14 
percent unemployment instead.  Researchers at CEPII and at the 
French Observatory for Economic Conditions (OFCE) have concluded 
that a 5-percent unemployment rate by that time could only be 
obtained if the economy grew by 5.9 percent per year from now until 
2000.  With an average annual growth rate of 1.8 percent expected 
for the 1990's, unemployment would grow to 14 percent by the end of 
the century. (DiI) 

   The hard copy version of this Foreign Press Survey contained two 
graphs; one showing the Layoffs Expected for 1994; the other was 
Forecast:  Growth Necessary for 5-Percent Unemployment by 2000 

   GERMANY 

   REPORT SAYS CONSOLIDATION KEY TO GROWTH, JOBS--The government's 
annual economic report rejects proposals for activist monetary and 
financial policies as self-defeating, arguing that budgetary 
consolidation and structural reforms will allow the country to 
escape rising unemployment.  According to an article in the Munich 
SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG, a draft version of the report argues that 
"past experience" indicates expansionary fiscal and monetary 
policies produce only a "short-term upswing" and ultimately 
exacerbate existing structural problems."  The recent pattern of a 
residual unemployment level which rises with each succeeding 
economic cycle was not a "natural law," however, and could be broken 
by returning to "the basics of social market economy."  This means 
adopting fiscal and monetary policies which would improve the supply 
side of the economy and a wage policy characterized by restraint. 
Such an approach implies consolidating the government's finances, 
limiting taxes and fees, lowering labor costs, and encouraging both 
investments and the creation of lasting, competitive jobs through a 
process of deregulation and privatization.  The government also 
needs to educate the public to be more open to technology, to 
increase the willingness of companies to take risks, and to forge 
closer cooperation among the state, business, and science sectors. 
(RoH)  (Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 22/23 Jan 94 p 31) 

   GOVERNMENT ISSUES PROGRAM FOR REDUCING UNEMPLOYMENT--On 18 
January the Kohl government presented a 30-point program, to be 
implemented during the remainder of the year, for reducing the 
country's record high unemployment.  "The Action Program for More 
Growth and Employment" includes budget cuts, investment incentives, 
and several new labor market policies.  The government also intends 
to argue against any pay increases in the 1994 wage negotiations for 
public sector workers.  The program foresees a reduction of the tax 
burden and provides for a series of measures to simplify the tax 
system.  Bonn also wants to encourage the establishment of new 
businesses by extending financial aid already available in the 
eastern states to the west.  Under this plan, interest-free and low- 
interest loans will be available to establish innovative firms and 
for training.  The unemployment program further calls for increasing 
the ability of the laender and communities to privatize some 
functions.  The government has promised to complete its 
privatization plan and to complete financing for public works such 
as the planned high-speed train between Berlin and Hamburg by the 
end of March.  By the fall it wants to have a plan for the expansion 
of the highway network, which is to be carried out by private 
corporations. 

   The government also proposed a variety of labor market measures, 
including making particularly depressed areas of western Germany 
eligible for a program that shifts subsidies from employees to 
employers by exchanging government compensation to workers for lower 
wages for reduced employer social security payments.  This measure, 
which will end in 1996, will also be used to promote environmental 
protection, social services, and youth service projects.  There will 
be stronger incentives for workers receiving unemployment 
compensation to do seasonal work and underemployed workers will 
receive supplementary pay.  In addition, unemployed workers starting 
their own business will be given "transition money" for a six-month 
period.  Workers switching from full- to part-time work will 
continue to be entitled to the same unemployment compensation as 
full-time workers.  Instead of instituting a planned trial period 
for private employment agencies, these agencies will be allowed to 
begin operations immediately.  The government also plans stricter 
measures against illegal and black-market jobs.  (WS)   (Munich 
SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 18 Jan 94 p 21) 

   OPPOSITION SOCIAL DEMOCRATS CRITICIZE PROGRAM--The opposition 
Social Democratic Party (SPD) was critical of some of the budget 
cutbacks as well as the labor market measures included in the 
government's program.  According to an article in the 18 January 
FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU, SPD economic spokesman Uwe Jens called the 
program a "purely diversionary tactic" that would not create any new 
jobs.  Many other SPD members said the planned reduction in the 
budget for research would endanger 2,500 jobs in the research and 
development sector.  An article in the 4 February edition of the 
same paper reported that the Social Democrats, like the unions, 
particularly opposed allowing private employment agencies and 
encouraging the unemployed to take seasonal work.  (WS) 
(Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU in German 18 Jan 94 p 21; 
4 Feb 94 p 1) 

   LABOR LEADERS, EMPLOYMENT BOARDS ALSO CRITICAL--Union leaders and 
employment officials have strongly criticized the government's 
proposals for private employment agencies and stronger incentives 
for the unemployed to take seasonal jobs.  According to an article 
in the 20 January FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU, the state employment boards 
are worried that private agencies will not only recruit their best 
employees but will inhibit their ability to analyze the labor 
market.  The president of the German Handicrafts and Trades 
Association, Heribert Spaeth, called for a limited trial period, 
confined to three regions, for the private agencies.  The German 
Employees' Union said that "nothing shows the helpless action of the 
German Government better than the decision to help about 5 million 
unemployed find about 200,000 available jobs through private 
employment agencies."  Commenting on the proposals to encourage the 
establishment of new businesses, Spaeth pointed out that many of the 
unemployed do not have the qualifications to start their own 
businesses and would soon fail.  An article in the 3 February 
edition of DIE WELT notes that the public services, transportation, 
and traffic union called the incentives for the unemployed to take 
seasonal jobs, such as harvesting, a "climatic disaster."  Farmers' 
unions have also opposed such plans.  (WS)  (Frankfurt/Main 
FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU in German 20 Jan 94 pp 1, 11)  (Berlin DIE 
WELT in German 3 Feb 94 p 11) 

   LACK OF FUNDS TO STIMULATE ECONOMY SEEN AS 'GOOD'--A commentary 
in the 21 January edition of the FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE perceives a 
"good" side to the German Government's shortage of funds for use in 
stimulating the weak economy.  The commentary, which bears the 
abbreviated byline "bar," maintains that public works projects and 
other spending programs are "useless anyway" in the effort to return 
the "tired, overburdened" German economy to a path of strong 
economic growth.  Such an effort, the commentator continues, is 
properly the province of regulatory policy.  Deregulation is one of 
the best things the government can do to help the economy and, in 
this regard, Bonn's plan to legalize private employment agencies is 
a 'remarkable contribution."  The commentator does note one 
disadvantage to the shortage of funds, pointing out that there is 
no maneuvering room" for "a tax reform which would promote 
investment and efficiency."  (RoH)  (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER 
ALLGEMEINE in German 21 Jan 94 p 1) 

   EMPLOYMENT OFFICE URGES MORE FLEXIBILITY--The head of the Federal 
Employment Office, Christian Democrat Bernhard Jagoda, favors more 
creative solutions to the unemployment problem.  He notes that the 
trend toward restructuring the economy may be a good thing despite 
current layoffs since a more efficient economy will in the long term 
create job opportunities in new technologies.  Employees must be 
more flexible and willing to "learn by doing."  Jagoda rejects the 
argument that workers can be motivated by a greater differential 
between wages and unemployment compensation.  He also stresses the 
importance of more part-time work.  If the percentage of part-time 
workers in Germany was as high as in the Netherlands--30 percent- 
-there would be 2 million fewer unemployed.  He cites the health 
care industry, where there is a high turnover rate and workers' 
skills are quickly outdated, as an area with great potential for 
more part-time workers.  He also notes that the increasing number of 
women in the work force creates a need for more child-care providers 
and housekeepers. 

   Jagoda also calls for more creativity in industry.  Because wages 
are high in Germany, firms must use other cost-lowering measures 
such as increased quality and innovation.  He is concerned about 
patent statistics and the Employment Office's conclusion that 40 
percent of German firms have not improved their products in the last 
three years.  (WS)  (Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 11 Jan 94 
p 19) 

   BLUM ALSO URGES NEW WORK METHODS--Labor Minister Norbert Blum, 
who has opposed some of the government's job creation proposals, 
also calls for a change in thinking, particularly regarding part- 
time employment.  In an article in the 14 January DIE ZEIT, Blum 
writes that Germany has developed into a nation of inventors who do 
not produce their products.  "To only develop products but not 
produce them is job denial."  German workers on the average work 38 
hours per week and machine operating time in Germany is 12 hours 
less per week than the rest of Western Europe.  Productivity is 
wasted, according to Blum, by allowing the machines to stand idle 
the rest of the time.  What is needed is a break from old patterns, 
according to Blum.  Work hours need not be as they have been for 100 
years.  To illustrate the distortion in the labor market, Blum cites 
the statistics that 250,000 unemployed persons are seeking only 
part-time work, while over 2 million full-time workers would like to 
become part-time.  Part-time work, Blum points out, does not have to 
be measured in hours, it can be calculated in terms of weeks, 
months, or years.  Like Jagoda, Blum mentions housekeeping and 
child-care, which he says have been stigmatized in German society, 
as potential growth industries where a new way of thinking is 
necessary.  (WS)  (Hamburg DIE ZEIT in German 14 Jan 94 pp 24-25) 

   COMMENTARY HITS APPRENTICES WHO TAKE 'BUY-OUTS'--A commentary in 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE criticizes some apprentices for accepting job 
offers and then immediately quitting for "buy-out" benefits. 
According to the commentary, which appears under the abbreviated 
byline "ank," a few companies, despite large-scale downsizing, have 
offered permanent jobs to their apprentices "out of a sense of 
social responsibility."  Some of these apprentices have accepted the 
jobs and immediately quit, hoping to reap generous severance 
benefits intended to encourage long-time employees to leave 
voluntarily.  Whether or not these benefits are ultimately granted, 
the commentator maintains, no employer who has experienced this 
behavior is likely to go to bat for its apprentices again.  "When 
the severance benefits have been used up," the commentary concludes, 
"there will be a great deal of wailing."  (RoH)  (Frankfurt/Main 
FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 22 Jan 94 p 11) 

   ITALY 

   POOR STATE OF PUBLIC FINANCES LIMITS JOBS PROGRAMS--In an article 
comparing unemployment in the more industrialized countries, 
L'ESPRESSO correspondent Maurizio Valentini wrote that because of 
the "desperate situation" of its public finances, Italy cannot 
expend large sums to stimulate the economy.  Instead, it is slowly 
complementing current unemployment insurance benefits with extended 
benefits, early retirements, and subsidizing work share programs so 
that workers receive at least 50 percent of their original wages. 
Although these programs are expensive, Valentini notes, they will 
limit the number of layoffs, and "it is better to spend more than to 
perish." (AB)  (Rome L'ESPRESSO in Italian 18 Feb 94 p 138) 

   GOVERNMENT 'WITHDRAWAL' INCREASES UNEMPLOYMENT IN SOUTH--A 
January report by the Association for the Development of Southern 
Italy (SVIMEZ) shows that unemployment in this region grew by 4.8 
percent and has now reached 18.9 percent compared to 7.7 percent in 
the center-north of the country.  These figures place the eight 
southern regions as the worst in West Europe and agree with the 
latest government report on poverty which shows almost 4.4 million 
poor in the south compared to 2.4 million in the rest of Italy. 

   Commenting on the report, Mariano D'Antonio, an economist who 
specializes in the south's economy, said that while high 
unemployment in the south is nothing new, it is rapidly getting 
worse.  D'Antonio claims the main reasons for the rise in 
unemployment is the collapse of government spending and the 
"withdrawal" of the government from the south.  The government's 
"southern policy," which subsidized southern Italian industries, has 
stopped, D'Antonio said, resulting in massive cutbacks in incentives 
to companies and investments in public works.  To get out of the 
current situation, D'Antonio suggests restarting the government 
development programs and increasing investment, without giving in to 
excessive spending.  For emergency relief, D'Antonio suggests that 
agencies for education and employment be established.  According to 
D'Antonio, it is preferable to spend public funds to promote the 
growth of new companies rather than to keep the young and the 
unemployed at home. (AB)  (Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 28 
Jan 94 p 19) 

   LEFTIST PROPOSES MEASURES TO CURB UNEMPLOYMENT--Pierre Carniti, 
former leader of the Italian Confederation of Trade Unions (CISL) 
and currently Social Christian leader within the leftist Progressive 
Alliance, proposed several measures to curb unemployment which my be 
implemented by the next government should the Progressive Alliance 
win in the upcoming national elections.  His suggestions include: 

   --Extend the compulsory school age to 18 by the year 2000 and 
reform the high school curriculum to increase professional skills 
for the labor market. 

   --Reduce work hours.  A 32-hour work week can be achieved in 
Italy through a trilateral agreement among the unions, industry, and 
government.  This would create 1.4 million new jobs, Carniti 
maintains.  Companies that would function on four days instead of 
five could save 20 percent on general expenses.  The government 
would save on unemployment benefits and would receive greater 
revenues because the employed pay taxes. 

   --Establish a "labor draft" to draw on 500,000 youths to dedicate 
one year to community service.  The cost would be 700,000 to 800,000 
lire per month for each youth. 

   --Reconsider employment classifications, dropping the 
philosophical distinction between manual and intellectual labor, 
because manual labor in Italy is undervalued both in remuneration as 
well as social prestige. (AB)  (Milan L'EUROPEO in Italian 9 Feb 94 
p 39) 

   SPAIN 
   LABOR UNIONS REACT DIFFERENTLY TO STRIKE TURNOUT--An article in 
EL PAIS by correspondent Carmen Parra claims labor views the 27 
January strike against labor reform legislation as a "resounding 
success."  Some of the trade unions who shared this view included 
Workers Commissions (CCOO), General Workers Union (UGT), and Workers 
Trade Union (USO).  According to the trade unions, the strike was 
endorsed by nearly 90 percent of Spain's 9 million salaried workers, 
a vast majority of the students, retirees, a large number of small 
business workers, and other citizens.  UGT leader Nicolas Redondo 
asserted that the trade unions would not allow the strike to become 
a "useless event," urging that if a solution were not found for 
unemployment, the prime minister would lose labor support in the 
next election.  Redondo and CCOO leader Antonio Gutierrez sent a 
letter to Prime Minister Felipe Gonzalez to schedule a meeting to 
discuss a compromise on the labor bill. 

   Correspondent Concha Martin reports a far more critical reaction 
and highlights the "radically contradictory" figures provided by the 
Confederation of Spanish Employers (CEOE) concerning strike 
participation.  The CEOE, for example, perceived the strike to be a 
"failure" in light of the low 26-percent turnout rate (approximately 
2 million people).  CEOE leader Jose Maria Cuevas suggested that 
people may  have been pressured to participate in the strike.  He 
further noted a low turnout rate from the service sector and a 
comparably higher participation rate for the industry and 
transportation sectors.  He also alluded to a high turnout rate in 
select regions such as Asturias and the Basque country but 
attributed this to "picket violence, aggressiveness, and 
intimidation."  Cuevas believes the trade unions inflated the number 
of strikers.  He further claims the unions were unable to produce 
arguments that would convince citizens to strike, which forced them 
to "shield themselves with their own militants and 'agents'." 
Cuevas's remarks were seconded by president of the Spanish 
Confederation of Small and Medium-Sized Business Manuel Otero Luna 
who added: "The current model for trade unionism has failed." (CH) 
(Madrid EL PAIS in Spanish 28 Jan 94 p 18) 

   YOUTH UNEMPLOYMENT PEGGED AT ALMOST 50 PERCENT--An article in EL 
PAIS by correspondent R. Ruiz, cites Social Affairs Minister 
Cristina Alberdi as acknowledging 1 million young Spaniards are 
still unemployed despite government spending on youth educational 
and training programs.  Ruiz notes that the Socialist government 
allocated 1.6 trillion pesetas for such programs during 1989-93. 
The gender breakdown for unemployment rates, which have risen for 
the age group since 1989, is 40 percent for men and 48 percent for 
women under the age of 25.  Alberdi outlined what the Socialist 
government has done for people between the ages of 18 and 29.  She 
highlighted the creation of 116 new university degrees and 1 million 
training contracts of which 750,000 are slated for internships.  She 
also noted that 700,000 students were awarded academic scholarships 
every year and pointed to financial grants which were awarded to 
over 10,000 young Spanish farmers on a yearly basis to assist them 
in their first farming operation. 

   Despite government aid to students, Ruiz recalls that during the 
fall of 1993, students took to the streets to protest the increase 
in tuition, the lack of scholarships, and the poor quality of 
teaching.  Another bone of contention are the apprenticeship and 
training contracts, which Ruiz believes served as a catalyst for the 
27 January strike.  These entry level contracts are viewed by the 
trade unions as "contracts to exploit workers."(CH)  (Madrid EL PAIS 
in Spanish 20 Jan 94 p 25) 

   GOVERNMENT COMPLETES LABOR REFORM LEGISLATION--In late December, 
the cabinet approved the remaining labor reform legislation 
according to an article in EL PAIS by correspondent Carmen Parra. 
Parliamentary groups had until mid-February to submit partial 
amendments to the legislation.  The bill then goes to the Senate for 
approval, which is expected sometime in June.  The main trade unions 
whose dissatisfaction with the legislation led to the 27 January 
strike, did support the provision outlining new trade union election 
regulations.  However, they objected to other provisions concerning 
collective bargaining, dismissal reforms, and regulations governing 
apprenticeship contracts.  They also opposed an increase in the 
minimum wage (SMI), which the government proposes to raise 3.5 
percent, in contrast to the 6.5 percent suggested by the trade 
unions.  Labor believes that the reform proposals go too far, but 
Labor Minister Antonio Grinan asserts that the aim of the labor 
reform package is for "every possible job to become a reality." (CH) 
(Madrid EL PAIS in Spanish 30 Dec 93 p 14; Madrid EL PAIS in Spanish 
2 Feb; 8 Feb 94 p 13) 

   LABOR REFORM UNDERSCORES TRADE UNION DEFEAT--Mariano Guindal 
reports in LA VANGUARDIA that all the parliamentary groups, except 
for the United Left, the Canary Islands Coalition, and the 
representative from the Republican Left of Catalonia voted to 
support the initial part of the labor reform legislation.  Guindal 
quotes Labor Minister Antonio Grinan as saying: "The trade unions 
are entitled to call a general strike" but "it must not be forgotten 
that over 90 percent of the deputies representing the people have 
voted in favor of it, and this means that the vast majority of the 
population, whom they lawfully represent are in favor." (CH) 
(Barcelona LA VANGUARDIA in Spanish 29 Dec 93 p 9) 

   'EXPERTS' SAY LABOR BILL BENEFITS BUSINESS MOST--A group of labor 
relations experts--professors, labor lawyers, and labor inspectors- 
-believe that the labor reform bill will discourage collective 
bargaining because it moves approval for layoffs away from Labor 
Ministry control to "judicial" control.  Additionally, they claim 
that the reform legislation "goes against the Constitution, which is 
intended to protect workers from free market laws."  Citing labor 
mobility as an example, they noted that once the bill goes into 
effect employers can force workers to move to another city to fill a 
job.  At that point, the employee will have to make the decision 
either to accept the job transfer or to quit.  If the employee opts 
to keep his job and then goes to court to fight the decision, he 
will be fired despite legal appeal.  The experts also criticized the 
20,000 apprenticeship contracts which have been underwritten by the 
government, stating that this figure is nothing more than a 
"conversion" of some of the 30,000 contracts for regular employment, 
which were not renewed in January.  The apprenticeship contracts, 
effective as of 1 January 1994, allow the hiring of young, untrained 
workers to be paid at below the minimum wage.  (CH)  (Madrid EL PAIS 
in Spanish 26 January 94 p 21) 

   SWEDEN 

   LIBERALS: DEFICIT, SMALL BUSINESS, RESEARCH KEY TO JOBS--In a 
commentary in the 16 January Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER, Liberal Party 
leader and Minister of Social Affairs Bengt Westerberg and Finance 
Minister Anne Wibble defend the government's austerity package and 
plans for promoting investment as ways of fighting unemployment. 
Westerberg and Wibble assert that Sweden's high unemployment and 
high budget deficit are the same problem.  Unemployment, they argue, 
is the leading cause of the budget deficit, and both are related to 
structural faults in the Swedish economy.  The deficit can therefore 
only be eliminated by reducing unemployment and by following the 
government's austerity program, which includes reduced compensation 
for sick days and periods of unemployment. 

   Westerberg and Wibble's goal is to achieve full employment in 
Sweden by creating about 400,000 new jobs in the 1990's.  They point 
out that 200,000 new jobs were created in the latter half of the 
1980's and that net job creation would have been even greater had 
there been more labor available.  Westerberg and Wibble call for 
more than seven out of 10 of these new jobs to be in small 
businesses and new enterprises.  The government has introduced a 
number of measures to favor small business, for example, tax breaks 
for people owning their own business, the abolition of the capital 
gains tax on working capital in a small business, and the 
elimination of dual taxation on stocks. 

   The government has also emphasized measures to increase 
investment and promote research and development.  In this respect, 
Westerberg and Wibble reiterate, EU membership is vitally important 
to avoid "capital flight."  In addition, a better climate for 
investment can be created if interest rates are reduced after the 
austerity program is implemented.  Westerberg and Wibble point out 
that Sweden has lagged behind other industrialized countries in 
research and development oriented production.  They believe it is 
especially important to increase R &amp; D's share of total production, 

because it is precisely this production which is least sensitive to 
business cycles and price fluctuations.  The government is now 
preparing a proposal on increased support for technological 
innovation.  (WS)  (Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 16 Jan 94 p 
4) 

   GOVERNMENT TO ENCOURAGE HOUSEHOLD SERVICE JOBS--The Swedish 
Government is considering introducing legislation in the fall which 
would change tax rules to encourage private households to hire help. 
A study commissioned by the Minister of Taxation suggested giving 
tax deductions of 70,000 kronor to families with children who hire 
housekeepers or baby-sitters; it also recommended reducing employer 
fees--paid by an employer to the government for each employee--for 
these families and for companies providing household services. 
Taxation Minister Bo Lundgren said that the legislation could apply 
to housepainters and auto mechanics as well:  "The whole service 
sector suffers from our high tax burden in Sweden."  According to 
the professor who conducted the study, these proposals would create 
20,000 new jobs. 

   The proposals are expected to meet with opposition from the 
Social Democrats, who see the government as giving up high-wage jobs 
for low-wage jobs and higher wage differentials.  A Social 
Democratic tax expert said:  "The risk is that Sweden will get more 
and more of what are called 'junk jobs' in the United States--low- 
paying jobs with no development potential that do not require any 
education."  (WS)  (Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 28 Jan 94 p 
6) 

   SOCIAL DEMOCRATS CALL FOR MORE INVESTMENT--In response to what it 
considers the government's "passivity" regarding unemployment, the 
opposition Social Democratic Party (SDP) has put forward its 
economic program, calling for massive investment in Sweden's 
infrastructure.  The Social Democrats are hoping for an investment- 
led growth rate of 3.4 percent this year and 4.5 percent next year. 
They propose investments of $20 billion in infrastructure 
improvements, education, and labor market measures, $15 billion of 
which would be financed by taxes and reduced transfer payments.  The 
proposed infrastructure improvements include maintenance of roads 
and railroads, new railroad stations and airport hangars.  The SDP 
also advocates a temporary subsidy of 10 percent on housing starts 
before the end of December 1994 and 20 percent for housing 
renovations begun before March 1995.  They would also subsidize the 
renovation of schools, rest homes, community centers, and religious 
organizations.  Investments in environmental projects such as 
cleaning up old factories and reducing traffic noise would also be 
increased.  The SDP is also proposing the introduction of a 12-month 
apprenticeship for young people before they are hired at full wages. 
In addition, firms would be allowed to deduct 70 percent of 
machinery investments from their taxes but nonsocialist programs 
such as a capital gains tax reduction and the cessation of dual 
taxation on stocks would be eliminated.  (WS)  (Stockholm SVENSKA 
DAGBLADET in Swedish 26 Jan 94 p 11) 

   STUDY WARNS OF PERMANENTLY HIGH UNEMPLOYMENT--A report issued by 
the Association for the Study of the Economy and Society (SNS) 
warned that Sweden's current welfare system takes away the incentive 
to work and creates a class of permanently unemployed people.  The 
report, entitled "The Welfare State in Times of Misfortune," points 
out that employment levels have not risen despite economic growth. 
It warns that high levels of welfare payments make it more 
profitable to live on unemployment compensation than to accept a 
low-paying job.  The resulting pressure on public finances, 
according to SNS, will restrain economic growth and endanger the 
welfare state.  To break the cycle, the economic think tank 
recommends reducing welfare payments, in part by privatizing some 
types of insurance.  SNS economists believe the public sector's 
share of GNP should be reduced from 70 to 50 percent.  They also 
propose abolishing taxes on incomes under 60,000 kronor per year to 
make it easier for low salaried employees to live on their earnings. 
This tax reduction could be financed by increasing taxes on higher 
incomes.  (WS) 

   The hard copy version of this Foreign Press Survey contained two 
graphs dealing with--Growith Without More Jobs, and Unemployment by 
Region. 

Anilla B. (703-733-6285), Roger B. (703-733-6508), Robert H. (703- 
733-6504), Carolina H. (703-733-6288), Dian I. (703-733-6286), Rosa 
M. (703-733-6287), and Wendy S. (703-733-6506) contributed to this 
Foreign Media Survey. 
ELAG/24 FEB/ECONF/WED JEG 25/0232Z FEB 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24680 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
Document Type:FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-008--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Europe     Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 08, 25 
February 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Lat in America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most 
recent sources available to FBIS. 

   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Latin America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for suuary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. The EER is published in two 
editions, one for Western Europe (also including media coverage of 
Canada and Turkey), and the other for Eastern Europe.  Drawing 
primarily from domes tic media sources of these countries but also 
using other foreign media where appropriate, the EER focuses on 
national and regional economic issues, such as economic 
competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic reforms and 
other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade and 
investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   EU 

   SPD Opposes Funding Jobs Plan With EU Debt 

   DENMARK 

   Minister Announces Apprenticeships 

   FRANCE 

   Commentary Notes Clinton Saudi Deal Announcement; Commentary on 
Clinton Trade Policy; Editorial on Higher U.S. Interest Rates 

   SPAIN 
   Impact of New Hiring Contracts Viewed; Spain Leads EU in Having 
Largest Number Public Employees 

   SWEDEN 

   ABB Sets Up Joint Venture in Russia 

   TURKEY 

   Commentary Scores Government Economic Policy 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France, Greece, Portugal 

   EU 

   SPD OPPOSES FUNDING JOBS PLAN WITH EU DEBT--German Social 
Democratic Party (SPD) financial policy spokesperson Ingrid 
Matthaeus-Maier opposes the European Commission's desire to finance 
a European job creation program through new EU debt obligations 
independent of member-state budgets.  Matthaeus-Maier writes in the 
Duesseldorf daily HANDELSBLATT that, although she supports the goals 
of Commission President Jacques Delors' "White Book" plan for 
growth, competitiveness, and employment, the plan's provision for an 
independent EU financing capacity is "neither necessary nor 
desirable." 

   According to Matthaeus-Maier, such a capacity is not necessary 
because the EU budget already offers a sufficient number of 
financing plans, including the Cohesion Fund, the Structural Fund, 
and the Medium-Term Research Program.  Additional funds, she argues, 
could be raised through the existing European Investment Bank and 
the European Investment Fund, which is to be established this year. 
Taken together, these financing sources could raise around 30 
billion European Currency Units (ECU), an amount Matthaeus-Maier 
contends should be sufficient to fund the job creation program. 

   Matthaeus-Maier also maintains that an independent EU financing 
authority is undesirable.  First, she points out, there is good 
reason for the provisions in the Maastricht Treaty which require 
that the EU budget not be financed through debt but exclusively 
through the resources of the member states.  An EU financing 
capability, she argues, would create a new source of indebtedness 
which would take on a life of its own.  Member states would have a 
new loophole enabling them to escape limits on indebtedness at the 
national level.  Second, Matthaeus-Maier asserts, new indebtedness 
at the EU level would undermine the convergence criteria the 
Maastricht Treaty requires member states to meet to join the 
European Monetary Union (EMU).  Any financial obligations taken on 
by the EU ultimately would have to be divided up among the member 
states, making it even more difficult for them to meet EMU's limits 
on debt as percentage of GDP.  Third, Matthaeus-Maier contends, new 
EU debt would make a decline in interest rates even more difficult, 
thus hindering investment in new jobs.  The deeper the EU went into 
debt, the greater the eventual pressure for counterbalancing 
spending cuts and tax increases, steps which would be  "poison for 
economic growth."  Fourth, the interest on new indebtedness at the 
EU level would still have to be paid by the member-states, and any 
increase in member-state contributions would probably increase 
opposition to the EU. 

   What the EU really needs, Matthaeus-Maier suggests, is not a new 
way to increase debt but rather a reduction of debt at all levels 
and strict adherence to Maastricht's convergence criteria.  If 
available financial resources are insufficient, she concludes, then 
the Union's existing budget must be redistributed to fund the 
measures envisioned in the "White Book."  (RoH)  (Duesseldorf 
HANDELSBLATT in German 21/22 Jan 94 p 3) 

   DENMARK 

   MINISTER ANNOUNCES APPRENTICESHIPS--Danish Labor Minister Jytte 
Andersen has announced that recently enacted legislation gives 
municipal authorities a new tool in the fight against youth 
unemployment:  local government authorities can now offer poorly 
educated youth a two-year apprenticeship program.  Authorities will 
have three months from the time of application to decide whether the 
candidate is needy enough to qualify.  While there are only 3,OOO 
apprenticeships available for 1994, Andersen saw the new program as 
filling a major gap in the left-center coalition's comprehensive job 
stimulus effort. 

   Andersen made the announcement in response to a study--conducted 
by the Counties and Municipalities Research Institute--indicating 
the inadequacy of existing programs in finding lasting jobs for 
poorly prepared youth.  Under these programs, municipalities had 
been charged with finding jobs or vocational training slots for all 
unemployed between the ages of 18 and 25 within 14 days of 
application.  This meant that, as a last resort, municipal 
governments had to create "artificial jobs" and training courses for 
some 80,000 individuals annually.  The study generally lauded the 
results of these efforts, citing a high degree of participant 
satisfaction and success in eventually finding nonsubsidized jobs. 
The effort was deemed to have failed, however, in helping those in 
the youngest group (ages 18-20) without high school diplomas and/or 
work experience.  Among these "weak" youth, only half subsequently 
moved into the regular job market. (RB)  (Copenhagen BERLINGSKE 
TIDENDE in Danish 15 Feb 94 Sect. 1 p 1; Sect. II p 4; 16 Feb 94 
Sect. 1 p 4) 

   FRANCE 

   COMMENTARY NOTES CLINTON SAUDI DEAL ANNOUNCEMENT--LES ECHOS 
editor Gilles Senges, referring to President Bill Clinton's 
announcement of the Saudi Airlines purchase of U.S. aircraft, noted 
that it was the first time in aircraft history that a president of 
any country had substituted for the management of the manufacturer 
in announcing a purchase of aircraft.  According to Senges, the fact 
that President Clinton did just that and organized this announcement 
as a "grand occasion" in the presence of McDonnell Douglas and 
Boeing Aircraft management and the Saudi ambassador, is testimony to 
the scope of the battle that preceded the Saudi purchase.  It seems, 
Senges writes, that the Saudi Airlines purchase was clinched by the 
''generous'' U.S. agreement to reschedule Saudi Arabia's debt and by 
repeated visits to Saudi Arabia by Commerce Secretary Ron Brown. 
These visits were countered by those of French Foreign Minister 
Alain Juppe, Defense Minister Francois Leotard, Foreign Trade 
Minister Gerard Longuet, and finally by a visit by Prime Minister 
Edouard Balladur.  However, Balladur came back "empty handed." 
Senges observes that the United States had also put "all the weight 
of the Eximbank" behind its bid by guaranteeing the total contract. 
(DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in French 17 Feb 94 p 8) 

   COMMENTARY ON CLINTON TRADE POLICY--According to Pascal Aubert 
writing in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, the Clinton administration has 
shown its capacity to conduct negotiations and to have its point of 
view heard, with "an efficiency all the more frightening since 
(Clinton) does not have the free market inhibitions of his 
Republican predecessors."  The U.S. Government does not seem to care 
that it is contradictory to force open foreign markets with the 
threat to close its own and to accuse others of corrupting free 
trade while the United States is doing so itself, Aubert writes. 
This practice rests on the end justifying the means, with the only 
argument on its behalf being that U.S. economic security is the best 
guarantee of total security.  This presumption has justified forcing 
a "vassal (Saudi) monarchy" to buy U.S. aircraft, Aubert concludes. 
(DiI)  (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 18 Feb 94 p 4)c 

   EDITORIAL ON HIGHER U.S. INTEREST RATES--Nicolas Beytout, editor- 
in-chief for the Paris financial daily LES ECHOS, writes that the 
first rise in U.S. interest rates in five years was dictated by 
purely domestic concerns and will endanger the weak recovery 
currently taking place in France.  The increase in U.S. rates 
threatens to unravel the slow but progressive lowering of rates in 
France and Germany.  The risk now is that the German Bundesbank will 
raise German rates. 

   European economies, especially that of France, cannot afford 
continued recession, Beytout writes.  He observes that while the 
newly raised interest rates in the United States may slow down the 
U.S. recovery, they may have a greater effect in Europe, reducing 
growth and halting recovery.  The United States is raising interest 
rates to fight inflation at the same time as the German Bundesbank 
is reluctant to lower its rates because of inflation.  But the 
inflation they fear is in their countries, argues Beytout, not in 
France.  In raising interest rates, the United States is rendering 
French economic policy more difficult. (DiI)  (Paris LES ECHOS in 
French 7 Feb 94 p 3) 

   SPAIN 

   IMPACT OF NEW HIRING CONTRACTS VIEWED--The news of higher 
unemployment in January announced by the National Employment 
Institute (INEM) comes at a bad time for the Spanish Government, 
which has been pushing for passage of a labor reform bill.  The 
trade unions are contesting the reform on the grounds that it will 
not create new jobs, and opposition leader and People's Party (PP) 
President Jose Maria Aznar characterizes the government's policies 
as a "failure."  During a press conference, INEM director Alberto 
Elordi attempted to mitigate these concerns by explaining that the 
high unemployment rate in January can be attributed to seasonal 
employment ending after the Christmas season.  The Spanish 
Confederation of Employers' Organizations (CEOE) further downplayed 
the January figure by focusing on the increasing number of jobs 
which have been created since the first of the year.  Referring to 
the labor reform bill approved in January, which provided for 
apprenticeships, part-time jobs, and training contracts, Elordi 
noted: "Of the 400,000 job new job placements registered from 1 
January through 6 February, 80,4O7 resulted from apprenticeship, 
short-term, and training contracts."  These contracts represent a 9- 
percent increase in job contracts over January of last year. 
According to Elordi, women have a difficult time finding jobs, yet 
almost 61.1 percent of the part-time contracts have been signed by 
women.  Some 67.1 percent of the apprenticeship contracts have gone 
to men.  These types of jobs are encountering a wider acceptance in 
business circles.  For example, 5O0 of these contracts were signed 
daily in January and by February, this number had risen to between 
600 and 650 contracts a day. (CH)  (Madrid EL PAlS in Spanish 15 Feb 
94 pp 1,45) 

   SPAIN LEADS EU IN NUMBER OF GOVERNMENT WORKERS--According to an 
internal document from the Ministry of Public Administration to 
which DIARIO 16 had access, correspondents Isabel Duran and J. Diaz 
Herrera report that the government created 800,000 civil service 
jobs during the past decade, including those in government-owned 
companies and local governments.  Earlier, the People's Party (PP) 
had estimated the number of government workers at 500,O00 and made 
these findings public, accusing former Secretary of Public 
Administration Juan Manuel Equiagaray of keeping information from 
the public and denying reports concerning increases in the number of 
public officials.  On average and during the same time period, the 
number of public officials in other EU countries was 10 percent in 
contrast to Spain's 32 percent. 

   The state has become the largest employer in the country, the 
authors claim, even overshadowing the automobile industry, which 
employs approximately 5OO,OOO people and represents 28 percent of 
Spanish exports.  The Public Administration document reports that 
the number of public officials in Spain rose from 1,646,4OO to 
2,269,562 in a decade, indicating that between 12 and 15 percent of 
the Spanish work force is employed in the public sector.  The CEOE 
notes that Spanish industry has lost 340,000 jobs and more jobs will 
be lost in the agricultural sector as the country adheres to EU 
agricultural guidelines by reducing the number of farm workers.  The 
authors note that the service industry cannot absorb this large a 
number of unemployed people.  Economics professor Ramon Tamames 
describes the unemployment rate as "extremely alarming."  In his 
book "Alternative Spain," Tamames characterizes the causes of 
Spain's unemployment as an example of excessive "bureaucratization 
and waste."  He adds, it is "incomprehensible" that the birth rate 
in Spain should have only grown by a modest 3 percent during the 
past decade while the government bureaucracy increased by 32 percent 
in the same timeframe. 

   The problem is more serious in the autonomous communities, 
according to PP deputy Manuel Nunez where "veritable colonies" have 
developed around the governing parties, "which goes against Title 
VIII of the Constitution."  In Andalusia, for instance, the bloated 
bureaucracy has led to an increase in high level posts.  Nunez 
writes: "Compared to Catalonia, the Basques have three times as many 
public officials and compared to Madrid, the Catalans have twice the 
number of public officials."  A PP study indicates that the 
excessive  number of high level posts is hindering government 
administration. (CH)  (Madrid Diario 16 in Spanish 24 Jan 94 p 8) 

   SWEDEN 

   ABB SETS UP JOINT VENTURE IN RUSSIA--The Swedish-Swiss 
electronics firm Asea Brown Boveri (ABB), which already controls 45 
companies in Central and Eastern Europe, has announced the formation 
of a joint venture with Nevsky Zavod, the leading Russian producer 
of gas and steam turbines.  The new firm, to be based in St. 
Petersburg, plans not only to supply Russian power plants with ABB 
equipment and technology but also to sell entire prefabricated 
facilities as well.  Percy Barnevik, the head of ABB, foresees 
Swedish manufacturers making components that can then be assembled 
in Russia.  Barnevik noted that, at a time when many firms are 
skeptical about investing in Russia, "it means a lot to the Russians 
psychologically that there are some companies who are continuing to 
invest in the country."  (WS)  (Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET in 
Swedish 28 Jan 94 p C1) 

   TURKEY 

   COMMENTARY SCORES GOVERNMENT ECONOMIC POLICY--According to Al tan 
Oymen writing in MILLIYET, Turkey's current economic situation will 
continue to get worse unless the Turkish Government takes "radical" 
steps to improve it.  Such steps need to be radical enough that the 
public can accept them with a "sense of self-sacrifice."  Despite 
the government's intervention in currency markets to support the 
value of the lire, 0ymen criticizes the government for not also 
addressing the problem of high interest rates, which increase the 
burden of the public debt the government has allowed to accumulate. 
   Oymen points out that everyone, especially the government, knows 
there is a solution.  However, nobody seems "to have the strength" 
to do anything.  For example, the government, "accustomed to living 
above its means," is only partially reforming the tax system--a last 
minute, legal arrangement which does not solve the debt problem. 
The government also continues to tolerate large losses of the Public 
Economic Enterprises (KIT).  Furthermore, the government is not able 
to control the huge growth in imports nor stimulate stagnating 
exports.  Oymen questions how long this can continue. (EoC) 
(Istanbul MILLIYET in Turkish 21 Jan 94 p 1) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   France 

   --Oil companies Total, Elf have invited Iraqi oil delegation to 
Paris to examine "pending issues," according to Middle East Economic 
Survey (MEES) cited in LE FIGARO.. .date remains to be decided, 
probably end of February, March. . .MEES notes it as first official 
invitation by West European country since Golf War. (LE FIGARO Le 
Fig-Eco supplement 22 Feb 94 p V) 

   --Utility company Lyonnaise des Eaux-Dumez has signed a contract 
with China Canton to build and develop potable water production 
facilities in Canton which will produce 1 million cubic meters of 
water per day, around 25 percent of the city's needs. . . represents 
an 
investment of 1 billion francs (Fr), sales forecast to be around 
Fr350 million per year. (LIBERATION 7 Feb 94 p 15) 

   Greece 

   --Greek Telecommunications Organization (OTE), Albania's Telecom 
to jointly plan communications systems for Albania. .. OTE to train 
Albanian personnel in billing, using equipment, 
maintenance... financing to come from EU. (I KATHIMERINI 28 Jan 94 p 
27) 

   --Public Oil-Hydrocarbons Prospecting Company (DEP-EKI) signed 
oil drilling agreement with visiting Armenian energy 
minister. .. initial two wells to be followed by two more if 
successful. . . costs underwritten by Armenian Government. (I 
KATHIMERINI 29 Jan 94 p 22) 

   Portugal 

   --Maconde clothing firm to open ready-to-wear stores in East 
Europe using government special purpose credit lines. . .new stores 
slated first for Hungary, Czech Republic. (EXPRESSO PRIVADO 5 Feb 94 
p 2) 

   --Entrepreneurs, managers somewhat more optimistic on economic 
recovery although doubts persist. . .EXPRESSO/Euroexpansao survey 
among 170 businessmen finds 30.1 percent reporting improved sales in 
December 1993, 33.6 percent expecting improvement in next three 
months, 56.9 percent in next 12 months. . .however, 21.6 percent 
said business deteriorated in December compared to only 7.4 percent 
affirming same for November. (EXPRESSO ECONOMIA 5 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Roger B. (703-733-65O8), Ender C. (703-733-6285), Carolina H. 
(7O3-733-6288), Dian I. (703-733-6286), Rosa M. (703-733-6287), and 
Wendy S. (703-733-6506) contributed to this Foreign Media Survey. 
ELAG/25 FEB/ECONF/WED/CB 25/1611z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24681 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPThIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-25FEB94-HUNGARY 
<H3> <TI>      Hungary: Premier's Stance on NATO's AWACS Gets Wide </TI></H3>

</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Support 
       Prime Minister Peter Boross, leader of Hungary's right of center 
government, has received wide domestic support for his surprise 
announcement on February Il that if NATO launches airstrikes 
against Serbian forces in Bosnia, NATO's AWACS surveillance 
planes will have to leave Hungarian airspace for the duration of 
the attack. Interviewed by the daily Magyar Nemzet on 14 
February, Laszlo Kovacs--chairman of the foreign relations 
committee and member of the opposition Hungarian Socialist Party- 
-declared that he is "in complete agreement" with the prime 
minister's decision.  Moreover, Kovacs indicated to Duna 
Television on 18 February after a joint meeting of the 
parliament's defense and foreign relations committees that "on 
the whole" all seven parliamentary parties agree on the issue 
because Budapest must avoid "even the appearance" of "indirect 
participation" in hostile action against the Serbian forces.  The 
parliamentary consensus on banning NATO's AWACS flights appears 
to reflect athe public mood.  Hungary's largest daily, 
Nepszabadsag--a socialist paper that is usually a harsh critic of 
the government--supported Boross's stance in a 14 February 
editorial, declaring that it "most certainly meets with the 
widest possible agreement in public opinion" because the 
Hungarian people want to avoid getting "mixed up in any kind of 
war." 
   Support for Boross was not unanimous, however.  Criticizing him 
not for the substance of the decision but for the handling of the 
issue, Istvan Szent-Ivanyi, foreign affairs spokesman of the 
liberal Alliance of Free Democrats, charged that Boross went "too 
far" in announcing the decision publicly at a press conference. 
While he "approved" of the prime minister's efforts to keep 
Hungary out of the Serbian conflict, Szent-Ivanyi said, it would 
have been "more appropriate" to "simply remind NATO" that the 
agreement allowing AWACS surveillance flights over Hungary 
stipulates that the flights "cannot be used for military 
activities" (Magyar Hirlap, 16 February).  The only strong public 
condemnation of the decision itself appeared to come from the 
liberal daily Magyar Hirlap, which said in a 16 February 
editorial that by banning the AWACS flights Hungary was 
indirectly supporting the Serbian position and would therefore 
"share the guilt for all that is happening in Bosnia." 
   (AUTHOR.  BARCZAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL ELAG 
CHIEF ANALYST, (703) 733-6470) 
ELAG/GILISON/CB 25/2053z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24682 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
Document Type:FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-27--SO. KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      South Korea:  Acquiring 'Dual-Use' Advanced Weapons Technology </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY:      Press articles written last year by members of South 
Korea's military and civilian S and T establishments call for a 
"coordinated program" to develop "dual-use" technologies that can be 
used to manufacture highly advanced weapons "if the need arises." 
Although unequivocal evidence that such a policy is being adopted 
has not been observed in Seoul media reporting, articles on several 
new technologies and equipment types that qualify as "dual-use" by 
standard criteria have appeared over the past few months in ROK and 
Japanese publications.  Seoul press sources note that any efforts by 
the ROK to acquire advanced weapons components or technology would 
be enhanced by S and T agreements recently concluded with Russia, 
China, and Israel. 

   Dual-Use Technology for an 'Uncertain' Future 

   In the past year, several articles have appeared in the ROK press 
urging the government to support "dual-use" technology as a hedge 
against an "uncertain" future.  For example, the December 1992 issue 
of Seoul KUKBANG KWA KISUL argued that changes in the world's 
geopolitical relationships have made it impossible for South Korea 
to defend itself by relying on foreign equipment and technology. 
Not only are traditional suppliers reluctant to transfer technology, 
the defense requirements themselves are changing, forcing South 
Korea to "consider medium and long-term plans to secure the military 
power to deal with countries on the periphery through S and T 
development for national defense and qualitatively superior weapons 
systems."  The journal claimed that the key to both problems lies in 
"strengthening the bonds" between government and the defense 
industry, and for South Korea to use its own technology to develop 
sophisticated independent weapons systems. 

   The same journal in its May 1993 issue featured an article by a 
nuclear engineer from South Korea's Agency for Defense Development 
(ADD) on the need to apply nuclear technology to national defense. 
The article maintained that the distinction between civilian and 
military use of nuclear technology is not clear, and that products 
with defense applications can be "derived" by making improvements in 
how the ROK uses nuclear power.  KUKBANG KWA KISUL highlighted the 
ADD engineer's remark that "we must vigorously invest right now in 
research and development of the nuclear power industry, so that we 
can make use of it under new conditions if the situation changes. 
We have to maintain at least a technical capability." 

   Similarly, a senior researcher at the Korea Institute of Science 
and Technology's (KIST's) Policy Management Research Institute wrote 
in the July 1993 issue of KUKBANG KWA KISUL that "South Korea needs 
to establish a new policy that can achieve the two national goals of 
economic development and national security."  What is needed, 
according to the KIST researcher, is a "coordinated program" to 
develop "dual-use technology" with both civilian and military 
applications, that will enable South Korea to "deal with changes as 
the need arises."  The 4 August 1993 CHUGAN MAEGYONG made the same 
basic plea for "dual technologies," developed through coordination 
between the ROK's Defense Ministry, the Ministry of Trade, Industry, 
and Energy (MOTIE), and the Ministry of Science and Technology 
(MOST).  In the 30 August 1993 MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS), the head 
of the Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST), 
which was directly responsible for two of the dual-use projects 
listed below, wrote that South Korea's present task is to create an 
independent national defense based on high technology appropriate to 
the post-cold war era and developed through greater cooperation 
between the military and industrial sectors. 

   New Technology, Equipment With Potential Weapons Applications 

   Recent ROK and Japanese media reports describe some commercial 
technologies developed or acquired by South Korean companies and 
government institutes, which conceivably could be used to design or 
manufacture highly advanced weapons.  For some of these 
technologies, the potential military applications are obvious; 
others are more generic, with possible uses in a number of high-tech 
weapons programs.  All qualify by widely accepted criteria as "dual- 
use" in the sense described above. 

   1. An "electron beam welder" developed jointly by the Korea 
Institute of Machinery and Metals (KIMM) and Korea Ion.  The device 
reportedly cost 200 million won ($250,000) to develop, and can be 
used for precision welding and to join metals of different types (23 
October 1993 MKS). 

   2. An "ion nitriding electric furnace" and "numerical-controlled 
gas cutting machinery" by the same institute (29 December 1993 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG).  Of the 18 dedicated institutes within MOST, 
KIMM's 1994 S and T budget at $70 million is the third largest after 
the Korea Atomic Energy Research Institute and the Nuclear 
Environment Management Center (1 January 1994 MKS).  According to 
KIMM's director, the Taedok-based institute plans to "greatly 
increase its testing and evaluation functions for advanced machinery 
and equipment and expand related activities" in 1994 (7 January 1994 
MKS). 

   3. An "ultra-high precision (nanometer scale) lathe" developed by 
KAIST, also located at Taedok (29 December 1993 CHUGAN MAEGYONG). 

   4. High-speed "image processing equipment" to observe "how 
molecules of a material undergoing a disintegrating reaction are 
spatially distributed." Developed by a team from KAIST's chemical 
research laboratory, the equipment uses a high-energy charge coupled 
device for "direct observation of the size and form of the 
disintegrating material's distribution in three dimensions."  Only 
three institutions in the world reportedly have this equipment: 
Sandia Labs, and two universities in the United States and Japan (22 
January 1994 MKS). 

   5. Manufacturing technology for instruments able to measure high 
pressure, from an (unidentified) Russian research institute.  The 
item is one of several technologies reportedly being obtained by ROK 
firms through R and D contracts with Russia, according to the 11 
September 1993 HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN (HKS). 

   6. A high-energy capacitor able to withstand severe shock, 
extreme temperatures, and to operate in a vacuum, developed by 
Daewoo (9 June 1993 CHUGAN MAEGYONG). 

   7. Technology for a "solid fuel rocket engine" able to lift a 50- 
70 kg payload to an altitude of 80-90 km, by the Korea Aerospace 
Research Institute (KARl).  Projected performance doubles that 
achieved by South Korea's indigenous KSR-42Os rockets launched in 
1993, and gives the ROK the ability to develop a "rocket booster 
that meets South Korea's particular needs" (29 December 1993 CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG). 

   8. A "small gas turbine" to be developed by Korea Air for 
commercial use in generating electricity and as a prototype to 
develop related technology "for such things as aircraft engines" (5 
January 1994 MKS).  KIMM's director also stated, without mentioning 
the Korea Air project, that his institute would "indigenize" a 
"small gas turbine engine" (7 January 1994 MKS). 

   9. An "inertial navigation system" (INS) by Korea Air.  The 
company plans to acquire aviation electronics technology through a 
buyout of Litton Korea, "a firm which specializes in INS equipment" 
(5 January 1994 MKS). 

   10. A pilotless helicopter used to spread seeds and agricultural 
chemicals, being developed by Daewoo Heavy Industries in cooperation 
with Russian scientists (April 1993 SIN TONGA, 5 April 1993 CHOSON 
ILBO). 

   11. A "Cray model C916 supercomputer," reportedly the company's 
most powerful, for KIST's Systems Engineering Research Institute. 
The computer reportedly will be used for "structural analysis and 
fluid mechanics simulations, weather forecasting, and researching 
environmental problems" (30 June 1993 Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO). 

   12. A "computer software research center" established in Moscow 
by Samsung Electronics.  Samsung, a major defense contractor, hopes 
to take advantage of the "large number of high-level military 
software development technicians who were trained in the former 
Soviet Union," and plans to become involved in joint projects with 
Russian Government research agencies (29 November 1993 Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO). 

   Foreign S and T Agreements Conducive to Weapons Technology 
Transfer 

   South Korean efforts to acquire dual-use technologies presumably 
would be enhanced by S and T agreements recently signed with three 
major arms and arms technology exporting countries--Russia, China, 
and Israel--a fact duly noted in the ROK press.  Russia in 
particular has attracted South Korean media attention by its 
reported offers to barter advanced weapons (24 January 1994 CHUNGANG 
ILBO) and "enriched uranium" (25 January 1994 YONHAP) to repay its 
ROK debts.  Infrastructure is already in place for acquiring other 
types of sophisticated Russian technology.  In addition to various 
"S and T cooperative centers" and "industrial cooperation 
information centers" established in Russia during the past year, the 
ROK Government operates at least two organizations aimed at 
recruiting Russian scientists and transferring advanced technology, 
through MOST (13 October 1993 HKS) and MOTIE (9 November 1993 MKS). 

   Arrangements to acquire Russian aerospace technology have been 
concluded by South Korea's three largest defense contractors, Daewoo 
Heavy Industries (8 January 1993 MKS), Samsung Aerospace (1 August 
1993 HKS), and Hyundai--which reportedly sent some 30 PhD's to 
Russia to study "satellite technology" (31 July 1993 HKS), and has a 
joint venture with the aerospace firm Yakolev (5 November 1993 
CHUNGANG ILBO).  A 24 December 1992 CHUGAN CHOSON report describes 
how an unnamed South Korean company was able to bribe a Russian 
technician to hand over electronics technology that could not be 
obtained through formal channels; the incident suggests another 
route through which Russian weapons technology could be transferred. 

   On 5 November 1993, YONHAP reported some details of an S and T 
agreement signed by China and the ROK on 20 September 1993, 
including joint development of a "multipurpose satellite, aircraft 
design and testing technology, and medical lasers."  The satellite 
project was interpreted by YONHAP as "paving the way for a Sino- 
Korean partnership in the defense iridustry."  Citing "diplomatic 
sources," YONHAP also noted that "cooperation in nuclear energy may 
be not only in the reactor sector but could possibly develop into 
closer and wider partnership in the field."  In addition, the 5 
October 1993 CHOSON ILBO reported an agreement with Israel for 
scientific cooperation on several levels.  The paper observed that 
Israel, which is shifting much of its state-funded research from 
military to civilian projects, is entering the agreement partly out 
of "concern about employment for its high-level S and T personnel in 
defense-related industries." 

   (Author:  Hannas.  Question and/or comments, please call Chief, 
Southeast Asia/Korea Branch at (703) 733-6522) 
EAG/25February1994/MILF/TECHTF/TACF/TNDF/Asia Division 
CB 25/2104z Feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24683 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-25FEB-CHINA-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Plays Down Human Rights Problems </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                        Apparently seeking to avoid putting its human rights record in 
the spotlight at a time when Washington is beginning its annual 
review of most-favored-nation trading status for China, Beijing 
has responded with its usual circumspection to recent critical 
reports on the human rights situation in China from the U.S. 
State Department, Amnesty International, and Human Rights Watch. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

   Reflecting this year's typically restrained approach, Beijing 
adhered to the pattern of the past three years and responded in a 
pro forma manner and at a low-level of authority to the 1 
February release of the U.S. State Department's annual report on 
human rights, using the usual statement by a PRC Foreign Ministry 
spokesman to register its official opposition to the report 
(Xinhua, 3 February).  The spokesman, at the regular weekly press 
conference on 3 February, denounced the report in standard terms, 
saying it is "utterly unreasonable and totally irresponsible" for 
the United States to "distort, criticize, and attack" China's 
"domestic situation."  He went on to reaffirm Beijing's 
longstanding position that the issue of human rights is an 
"internal affair" which falls within the "sovereignty" of each 
country and to reiterate China's "resolute opposition" to any 
interference in the PRC's internal affairs on the "excuse" of 
human rights. 
   In another indication of Beijing's apparent intention to maintain 
a low-profile on the human rights issue, media commentary on the 
release of the State Department report was similarly low-level 
and limited to an article in Renmin Ribao by Shi Quan on 14 
February and a 4 February article in the PRC-owned Hong Daily Ta 
Kung Pao by well-placed columnist Shih Chun-yu.  Issued eleven 
days after the Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement, the Renmin 
Ribao article, while pegged to the release of the report, devoted 
most of its space to a historical discussion of the difference 
between China's view of human rights and the European "humanist 
concept" of rights.  It concluded by stating Beijing's standard 
position that the human rights issue should not be used to 
"meddle" in a country's internal affairs or "exert political 
pressure on them."  For his part, Shih Chun-yu used his Ta Kung 
Pao column to highlight what he said was a "significant 
improvement" in the human rights situation in China and to 
routinely warn Washington that efforts to "interfere" in China's 
internal affairs under the "pretext" of human rights will be 
counterproductive. 
   Beijing's effort to deemphasize its human rights problems was 
also evident in its low-key response to the critical reports 
issued in mid-February by Amnesty International and the Human 
Rights Watch on China's human rights record.  Offering Beijing's 
only observed public comment on the reports to date, Xinhua on 22 
February carried remarks made the previous day by a PRC 
representative to the UN Commission on Human Rights in Geneva. 
According to Xinhua, the representative made no mention of the 
charges in the Human Rights Watch report, focusing instead on the 
Amnesty International report as evidence that the organization is 
"highly prejudiced" against China and that its thinking remains 
that of the "Cold War era."  By contrast, last year Beijing had 
responded at a higher-level of authority with a Foreign Ministry 
spokesman statement to an Amnesty International report 
criticizing China's human rights record in Tibet (Xinhua, 23 May 
1993). 
(AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHEIF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ  cka 25/2351z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-24684 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000010994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   26 February 1994 </DATE1>
Article Type:FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
Document Type:FBIS TRENDS-25FEB94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Local Authorities Resist New Land Tax </TI></H3>


</HEADER>


<TEXT>
Apparently     reflecting conflict between Beijing and local leaders 
over tax reform policies adopted at a party plenum last November, 
some local officials have attempted to dilute a new "value-added 
land tax"--a capital gains tax on real estate--that they fear 
will discourage foreign investment.  Citing evidence that 
investors from Hong Kong and Taiwan will be "compelled to give up 
their development plans" if the land tax--promulgated with other 
tax reforms on 1 January--is enacted, the Hong Kong-based PRC- 
affiliated wire service Zhongguo Tongxun She on 1 February quoted 
Guangzhou Mayor Li Ziliu as claiming that the tax is a "type of 
local tax" and that "local governments" can therefore formulate 
"detailed rules for implementation" by "themselves."  Asserting 
that Guangzhou has its "own standard" in formulating these rules, 
Li stated that investors may "set their minds at rest." 
Politburo member and Shanghai party chief Wu Bangguo also seemed 
to signal provincial resistance to the center's version of the 
land tax in an interview with the PRC-owned Hong Kong paper Ta 
Kung Pao on 14 January when he reportedly stated that the 
collection of land taxes had "met with some problems" (15 
January).  Implying that in driving Shanghai's already exorbitant 
land prices even higher the tax would discourage investment, Wu 
suggested that further "study" was needed on how local taxes can 
be "fixed." 
   Central authorities, however, have underscored their resolve to 
impose Beijing's version of the tax policy on the localities--a 
move intended in part to reassert central control over China's 
finances from increasingly powerful provincial leaders. 
According to a report in the PRC-affiliated Hong Kong daily Wen 
Wei Po, Finance Minister Liu Zhongli told reporters in Beijing on 
1 February that the "provisional regulations" on administering 
the "value-added land tax" must be "strictly enforced" and that 
the "localities must comply" with the regulations (1 February). 
Furthermore, Liu stated that "laws and regulations" formulated by 
the localities without central approval are "null and void," 
although he conceded that "some readjustment" to the land tax law 
may be considered in light of "proposals" made by foreign 
investors.  Perhaps signaling Beijing's dissatisfaction with 
former State General Administration of Taxation Director Jin 
Xin's apparent inability to rein in assertive local leaders, the 
State Council recently demoted Jin to the post of deputy director 
and appointed Liu Zhongli in his stead (Xinhua, 16 February).  In 
contrast to Liu, Jin Xin had not been reported to take a hard 
line on the problem of local resistance to the land tax. 
(AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/BIETZ  cka 25/0009z  feb 

</TEXT>

</DOC>


